We should recognize, however, that ensuring compliance with arms control agreements remains a serious problem. Better verification and compliance provisions and better treaty drafting will help, and we are working toward this in ongoing negotiations. It is fundamentally important, however, that the Soviets take a constructive attitude toward compliance.

The Executive and Legislative branches of our government have long had a shared interest in supporting the arms control process. Finding effective ways to ensure compliance is central to that process. I look forward to continued close cooperation with the Congress as we seek to move forward in negotiating genuine and enduring arms control agreements.

Soviet compliance: chemical, biological, and toxin weapons, the notification of military exercises, a large new Soviet radar being deployed in the Soviet interior, encryption of data needed to verify arms control provisions, the testing of a second new intercontinental ballistic missile (ICBM), the deployment status of an existing Soviet ICBM, and the yields of underground nuclear tests.

Soviet violations of arms control agreements could create new security risks. Such violations deprive us of the security benefits of arms control directly because of the military consequences of known violations, and indirectly by inducing suspicion about the existence of undetected violations that might have additional military consequences.

We have discussed with the Soviets all of the activities covered in the report, but the Soviets have not been willing to meet our basic concerns which we raised in the Standing Consultative Commission in Geneva and in several diplomatic demarches. Nor have they met our requests to cease these activities. We will continue to pursue these issues.

Threshold Test Ban Treaty (TTBT) signed in 1974. Preparation of the Report entailed a comprehensive review of the legal obligations, political commitments under existing arms control agreements, and documented interpretations of specific obligations, analyses of all the evidence available on applicable Soviet actions, and a review of the diplomatic exchanges on compliance issues between the U.S. and the Soviet Union.

States made clear its intention not to ratify the Treaty. Prior to 1981 both nations were obligated under international law not to take actions which would ``defeat the object and purpose'' of the signed but unratified Treaty; such Soviet actions before 1981 are violations of legal obligations.

Soviet testing and in view of verification uncertainties, and we have been unable to reach a definitive conclusion, this evidence indicates that Soviet nuclear testing activities for a number of tests constitute a likely violation of legal obligations under the TTBT.

The President has said that the U.S. will continue to press compliance issues with the Soviets through confidential diplomatic channels, and to insist upon explanations, clarifications, and corrective actions. At the same time we are continuing to carry out our obligations and commitments under relevant agreements. We should recognize, however, that ensuring compliance with arms control agreements remains a serious problem. Improved verification and compliance provisions and better treaty drafting will help, and we are working toward this in ongoing negotiations. It is fundamentally important, however, that the Soviets take a constructive attitude toward compliance.

White House was Andrew Jackson. Americans perched on the roof and peered through the windows of this building to watch the horseback inaugural parades of McKinley and Teddy Roosevelt. They saw the face of the National when they watched newsreels of the inaugural parades of Wilson, Coolidge, and F.D.R. -- parades that took place when American admirals still wore cockeyed hats. And through all those years, the National was staging productions that entertained and delighted the people of this city.

And then a year and a half ago, an army of designers, electricians, and carpenters went to work to save it. They cleaned the exterior. They've refurbished the interior, as we have been able to see tonight, installed a new lighting and a sound system, and added a whole new building four stories high for dressing rooms and storage. And they did it all without a penny of government money.

And tonight we're among the lucky first to enjoy the results. A special thanks to J. Adams, the chairman of the National Theatre, to the Schuberts, Gerald Schoenfeld and Bernard Jacobs, and, of course, to Carol Laxalt and Betty Wright, the cochairmen of tonight's gala. I know we want to applaud everyone who had a hand in this wonderful restoration. With this reopening, downtown Washington has a splendid theater and a living link with the past.

Since the previous report (November 7, 1983) the Turkish Cypriot community declared its statehood. The declaration of November 15, 1983 was condemned by the Administration as unhelpful to the process of finding solutions. We urged reversal of the Turkish community's moves and called on all states of the world not to recognize the self-proclaimed entity. On November 18, 1983 we joined a nearly unanimous U.N. Security Council in passing resolution 541 which also called for reversal of the declaration and for no international recognition of the self-proclaimed entity.

Turkish Cypriot move and of our continuing determination to see the Cyprus question settled fairly and finally. We also met with (then) Turkish Foreign Minister Turkmen to whom we explained these same points. With both the Cypriot and Turkish government officials we urged flexibility in reacting to any opportunities for progress which may present themselves. The Secretary of State made a similar presentation to Greek Foreign Minister Haralambopoulos.

Cyprus (UNFICYP) for another six months. (Secretary General's report of December 1 is attached.) The Turkish Cypriot community did not support the terms of this renewal but its leaders have said they will continue to cooperate with U.N. forces in their peacekeeping role.

On January 2, 1984, the Government of Turkey announced its intention to remove 1500 of its troops from Cyprus. On the same day Mr. Denktash, leader of the Turkish Cypriot community, announced a series of ``goodwill'' measures designed to settle some of the outstanding issues between the communities. Included among these were proposals to turn over the city of Varosha and the Nicosia airport to U.N. administration, reactivation of the Committee on Missing Persons, and several other confidence-building measures. The Administration welcomed these proposals as being movement in the right direction.

The Secretary of State's Special Cyprus Coordinator Richard Haass and other Department officials have maintained close liaison with U.N. officials involved with the Cyprus question. We continue to support the Secretary General's good offices role.

President Kyprianou in November and in January constitute positive results. We intend to continue our strong support for the U.N. Secretary General's role in the search for solutions to the Cyprus problem.

But I want to thank Howard and John and all of you for your vital work in the Senate. Howard is not only the first Republican majority leader in more than a quarter of a century; I think we all agree he's one of the most effective majority leaders in history.

But your chairman, John Tower, has always advocated discipline for government and freedom for the individual. And in all the long history of our Republic, no one has ever done more to see that America has the defense that she required.

Time and again, Howard and John have given me the benefit of their knowledge, judgment, and understanding of the Senate. And whatever successes our administration has enjoyed, these two Senators deserve a big slice of the credit.

Think back to that crisp January day, back 36 months ago: inflation in double digits, prime interest rates at the highest level since the Civil War, economic growth disappearing. At the same time our defenses were weak. As John has pointed out so often, from 1970 to 1980 real defense spending dropped more than 20 percent. Military equipment was growing obsolete; real military pay was too low; and morale among our uniformed men and women was sagging.

In foreign policy America had become known the world over for hesitation, vacillation, and self-doubt. And our great nation stood by as if paralyzed while the Soviets amassed a vast military might, then began to intimidate our allies, fuel regional conflicts, and prop up tyrannies. And when Americans looked to their leaders for encouragement, they only heard about a so-called national malaise.

Well, in the past 36 months, the world has seen an American miracle. Time has marched on, but instead of growing older and more tired -- I'm not talking about me now -- [laughter] -- our country has recaptured the vitality, self-confidence, and courage of the youthful nation that she still is.

The prime interest rate is barely half what it was when we took office. Factory orders, retail sales, and housing starts are up. The stock market has come back to life -- a little nervous at times, but back to life. Real wages are rising, and America is leading the world in technological revolution, even more far-reaching and profound than the Industrial Revolution of a century ago.

Unemployment is dropping at the fastest rate in more than 30 years. Last year alone, more than 4 million Americans found jobs. And today, some 103 million Americans are at work; that's more than ever before in our history.

From Central America to Africa to the Middle East, we're working to support democracy and produce peace. In Lebanon, the peace process has been slow and painful, but we've made genuine progress. In Europe the NATO alliance has held firm. In our dealings with the Soviets, by strengthening our defenses and showing the world our willingness to negotiate, we've laid the foundations for a lasting world peace. And on an island in the Caribbean, we set a nation free.

Now, there's a story, and it's a true story and I know I've told it to some of you, but I know not all, and I hope the rest of you haven't heard it because I want to tell it. It comes from Grenada. A young first lieutenant marine who pilots a Cobra was in Grenada and then moved on to Beirut.

Grenada, every news story he noticed contained the words and the phrase that Grenada produces more nutmeg than any place in the world. And this was so regular in all the stories he decided that it was a code. And he was going to break the code. And he wrote back to say he'd succeeded.

Well, a moment ago, I called the turnaround in America a miracle. And, now, I don't mean a miracle like a magic trick; I mean a miracle of determination, hard work, and teamwork. All that has been accomplished, we've accomplished together. Believe me, down on Pennsylvania Avenue, Capitol Hill sometimes looks more like a mountain. And I don't like to think how hard it would have been to push our programs over the top without Republican control of the Senate. In fact, I think it would have been impossible.

In 1984 nothing matters more than keeping the Senate. And I pledge to do all within my power to see that we do just that. In the meantime, we still have plenty of work cut out for us: attacking the Federal deficit, getting inflation and interest rates down still further, wringing waste and fraud out of government, and so much more. Where we have honest differences you can count on me to be a willing listener and a genuine partner.

I know that you have been a strong right hand for Bill Smith as the Department of Justice has kept our promise to the American people to wage unremitting war against crime. You have played a leading role in our counterattack against those who terrorize innocent victims, and especially against organized crime, which can only be defeated by resolute action at the Federal level. Your experience and knowledge in this and many other areas will be sorely missed, but I know that your successor will build on the solid foundations you have laid. I want to thank you personally for a job well done.

Every day I have had a keen sense of accomplishment and pride in working with Bill Smith to serve the cause of justice and carry out your policies here at the Department of Justice. Thus, it is not easy for me to tender my resignation, which I do by this letter, effective on February 3, 1984.

Because of your unswerving leadership and strong support, the Federal effort against crime is being fought more effectively than at any time in our Nation's history. The law enforcement community knows it has a President who respects and supports what it is doing, and the results are now apparent to the American people.

My deepest thanks for the opportunity of helping you to further your goals. As I return to private life, I stand ready to do whatever you ask as you seek a second term, knowing that the American people will reelect a President who has served them so well.

II and made the difficult decisions that ushered in the nuclear age. In the postwar years, he oversaw America's transition from a wartime to a peacetime economy and began an era of growth and stability. In foreign affairs, President Truman established the cornerstones of the policy of containment in dealing with the communist threat to Europe. Through the Truman Doctrine and the Marshall Plan he stalwartly assisted free peoples in their efforts to stem the tide of totalitarian subversion. In applying the principles of collective security, President Truman assisted in the formation of the North Atlantic Treaty Organization to help European nations respond to this threat.

Although confronted with a series of major challenges throughout his tenure, President Truman responded with courage, humanity, decisiveness, and a wit which have secured his place in the Nation's history as one of our most respected Presidents.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 25th day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Nuclear Energy with an accompanied annex and agreed minute. The Agreement is accompanyied by my written approval, authorization and determination concerning the agreement and the memorandum of the Director of the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency with the Nuclear Proliferation Assessment Statement concerning the Agreement. The joint memorandum submitted to me by the Secretaries of State and Energy, which includes a summary of the provisions of the Agreement, and the views and recommendations of the Director of the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency and the Members of the Nuclear Regulatory Commission are also enclosed.

Nuclear Non-Proliferation Act and in order to strengthen the basis for continuing and close cooperation between our countries. In my judgment, the proposed revised agreement for cooperation, together with its accompanying agreed minute, meets all statutory requirements.

Non-Proliferation Treaty and of international non-proliferation efforts generally. We have a long history of close cooperation with Norway, particularly in nuclear research and in the critical area of reactor safety work. The agreement reflects our deep interest in strengthening international nuclear safety and in supporting Norway's important work in that area. The agreement will, in my view, further the non-proliferation and other foreign policy interests of the United States.

I have considered the views and recommendations of the interested agencies in reviewing the proposed agreement and have determined that its performance will promote, and will not constitute an unreasonable risk to, the common defense and security. Accordingly, I have approved the agreement and authorized its execution, and urge that the Congress give it favorable consideration.

Between the United States of America and Sweden Concerning Peaceful Uses of Nuclear Energy and accompanying annexes, agreed minute, and exchange of notes; my written approval, authorization and determination concerning the agreement; and the memorandum of the Director of the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency with the Nuclear Proliferation Assessment Statement concerning the agreement. The joint memorandum submitted to me by the Secretaries of State and Energy, which includes a summary of the provisions of the agreement, and the views and recommendations of the Director of the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency and the Members of the Nuclear Regulatory Commission are also enclosed.

Nuclear Non-Proliferation Act, which sets forth certain requirements for new agreements for peaceful nuclear cooperation with other countries. In my judgment, the proposed agreement for cooperation between the United States and Sweden, together with its accompanying agreed minute, meets all statutory requirements.

Government of the United States and the Government of Sweden to establish and confirm a framework for peaceful nuclear cooperation between our two countries in a manner which recognizes both the shared non-proliferation objectives and the friendly and harmonious relations between the United States and Sweden. The proposed agreement will, in my view, further the non-proliferation and other foreign policy interests of the United States.

The U.S.-Canada agreements are similar in objective to the social security agreements already in force with Italy, the Federal Republic of Germany, and Switzerland and to proposed agreements with Belgium and Norway which were recently submitted to Congress for review. Such bilateral agreements, generally known as totalization agreements, provide for limited coordination between the United States and foreign social security systems to overcome the problems of gaps in protection, and of dual coverage and taxation for workers who move from one country to the other.

Services. This report explains the provisions of the Agreements and provides data on the number of persons affected by the Agreements and the effect on social security financing as required by the same provision of the Social Security Act.

Nation is widely recognized. The science and technology policies which our Administration is implementing will ensure the continued preeminence of the United States in the various measures of national scientific and technological vigor reported here. We have provided for significant increases in Federal R&D support, especially in basic research, and encouraged scientific and engineering education. These will provide the basis for continued investments by both government and industry, which will strengthen our national security and our international competitiveness.

May I say, this is a tonic to be in Georgia with so many thousands of America's finest. I believe that I'm looking at citizens who don't consider themselves Democrats or Republicans so much as just deeply patriotic Americans.

You are concerned about your country and determined to do all you can to make tomorrow better. And you are doing that. It's people like you who show us the heart of America is good, the spirit of America is strong, and the future of America is great. You give meaning to words like entrepreneur, self-reliance, personal initiative and, yes, optimism and confidence. And you will lead America to take freedom's next step.

Perhaps you heard my speech to the Nation last night on the state of our Union. What I said before that joint session I certainly can see and feel here this afternoon: Energy, optimism, and progress are surging through our land. America is back, as I said last night, and standing tall. And we're looking to the eighties with courage, confidence, and hope.

Together, we've charted a new course since 1980. And because we took those bold steps, I believe America is stronger, more prosperous, and more secure today than 3 years ago. It seems like only yesterday we were hearing that our country was doomed to decline and the world would slide into disaster no matter what we did. Like death and taxes, the doom-criers will always be with us, and they'll always be wrong.

It was you who reminded Washington that we are a government of and by the people, not the other way around. And it's you who told us that it was time to put earnings back in the hands of the people, time to put trust back in the hands of the people, and time to put America back in the hands of the people.

Our economic program is guided by a spirit of enterprise that encourages risk-taking, rewards innovation, and involves millions of Americans making their own decisions. We have one policy intended to benefit Americans from every walk of life --  it's called economic recovery, one of the best recoveries in the decade.

In just 6 days, a brand new airline, Air Atlanta -- it's headed by Michael Hollis and primarily black-owned and managed -- will begin service to Memphis and New York. We salute the spirit of entrepreneurship in the black community, and I'm pleased to say we're getting the Federal Government out of the way so they can compete.

But we can do better. We can build a new era of lasting economic expansion filled with greater opportunities for all our people. You know something? -- that'll be quite an improvement from what we inherited, because in 1981, as I said last night, we inherited the worst economic crisis in postwar history. There was only one thing fair about those policies of the past -- and we hear a lot about fair today -- they didn't discriminate. They made everyone miserable.

From solid growth in housing to new frontiers in high technology, from a healthy recovery in real wages to a big improvement in productivity, and from record increases in venture capital to new confidence in the stock market, America is moving forward and getting stronger.

I believe our challenge of building a permanently manned space station within the next decade can open up an entire -- well, open up new industries, not just an industry for space-based entrepreneurs.

Our work is far from finished. Too many of our fellow countrymen are still out of work or down on their luck. They include workers and would-be workers in areas that depend heavily upon one company or industry. Many of them have been displaced by changes in the way things are produced.

If the dream of America is to be preserved, we must not waste the genius of one mind, the strength of one body, or the spirit of one soul. We need all our people -- men and women, young and old, individuals of every race to be healthy, happy, and whole. This is our goal. We will not rest until all Americans can reach as high as their vision and God-given talents take them. And that's why I've been asking the Congress for 2 years to get off the dime and pass our enterprise zones proposal. If they do, we can prove that areas of chronic unemployment need not be areas of permanent unemployment. But the Congress must act. Now, present company is excepted when I say this. I know where they stand.

And as I said last night, we need the cooperation of the Congress for structural reforms that will ensure continued progress for years to come. First and foremost, we must insist on common sense in Federal budgeting.

The disagreement is over how we do it -- with spending cuts and economic growth or through tax increases. Well, I happen to believe responsible budgeting does not mean routing more and more of your earnings to Washington, DC. Responsible budgeting means government spending no more than government takes in.

Our critics sometimes forget that even after our tax cuts, the American people are shouldering a near-record peacetime tax burden. The other problem with raising taxes, as we've seen in the past, is that it simply encouraged government to spend more. And since people had less money in their pockets to spend or save, economic growth was hurt, so fewer people were employed and able to pay taxes. Deficits went up, not down. Tax revenues doubled between 1976 and 1981, but deficits increased. A recent study shows that countries with lower tax burdens have higher rates of economic growth and employment.

Of course, this shouldn't come as a surprise to anyone who understands incentives: We don't face large deficits because you're not taxed enough; we face those deficits because government still spends too much.

Now a recent poll has revealed -- and I'm surprised -- that fewer than 10 percent of our people know what the Grace commission report is. We must change that. I asked an American industrialist, Peter Grace, to put together a task force of citizens from the world of commerce and industry to find ways that government could become more businesslike. Mr. Grace organized an executive committee of 161 such experts from the business world -- the private sector -- then nearly 2,000 others like themselves. They went into every area of government and, incidentally, financed the whole operation themselves.

The Grace commission's report has come up now. We have it in hand with nearly 2,500 recommendations that could save billions of dollars in wasteful Federal spending. I'm asking the members of our administration to study those recommendations with a fine tooth comb to see how many we can put in place.

Beyond that, I'm convinced that we need improvements in the budget process itself. Some 43 of our 50 Governors have the right to veto individual items in appropriation bills without having to veto the entire bill. When I was Governor of California we used that line-item veto to very good effect. Isn't it time to bring the Federal Government into the 20th century by enacting the same fiscal controls the States have been using for years? [Applause] Mr. Mattingly, sitting on this platform, is undertaking the task of getting this started up there on Capitol Hill.

A balanced budget amendment is no panacea, because it would take several years of continued effort to achieve it. But it would force the leaders in the Congress and the executive branch to sit down to work out a long-term plan for spending restraint. And I believe we owe this to the people. It's what you sent us to Washington to do.

Spending and regulations guided by common sense and fairness, a monetary policy that ensures lasting price stability, and a tax system anchored by incentives that reward personal initiative, risk taking, and economic growth -- these are keys to a society of opportunities offering a better life for our people with no barriers for bigotry or discrimination.

Well, most of us agree that government does have legitimate functions it must perform. Our answer must be we believe government's tasks can be performed more economically and efficiently. Cutting back a runaway government which stifles the spirit of enterprise can be profoundly positive, like performing surgery on a patient to save his life.

That's why the ultimate and overwhelmingly positive goal of our administration is to put limits on the power of government. Yes, but do it in a way that liberates the powers and the real source of our national genius -- you, the people, in your families, neighborhoods, and places of work.

We are a nation under God. I've always believed that this blessed land was set apart in a special way, that some divine plan placed this great continent here between the oceans to be found by people from every corner of the Earth who had a special love for freedom and the courage to uproot themselves, leave homeland and friends, to come to a strange land. And coming here they created something new in all the history of mankind -- a land where man is not beholden to government, government is beholden to man.

Well, the time has come for Congress to give a majority of American families what they want for their children -- a constitutional amendment making it unequivocally clear that children can hold voluntary prayer in their schools.

Within our families, neighborhoods, schools, and businesses, let us continue reaching out, renewing our spirit of friendship, community service, and caring for the needy -- a spirit that flows like a deep and mighty river through the history of our nation. But to lawbreakers and drug peddlers who would harm and prey on innocent citizens, who make our family and friends live in fear, we will demand justice with swift and sure punishment for the guilty.

United States has no higher mission than to build a lasting peace that enshrines liberty, democracy, and dignity for individuals everywhere. And I believe that what we've accomplished together -- restoration of economic and military strength and a growing spirit of unity at home and with our allies abroad -- put America in its strongest position in years to seize the opportunities for peace.

Sooner or later the Soviets will realize they have nothing to gain by waiting. Good-faith negotiations are in their interest, because the West could offer them many benefits their people now lack. People don't make wars; governments do. And if the Soviet Union wants peace, there will be peace.

People don't want confrontation; they want a better life. And that's what the spirit of America does best -- it builds the future. And we've always been willing to share the fruits of our success with others.

In these last 3 years, we've made a new beginning, a dramatic and far-reaching step toward a much better tomorrow. Thank you for keeping the faith. Thank you all for your strength and support. I believe we've come too far, struggled too hard, and accomplished too much to turn back now. With your help we can put strong wings on weary hearts. We can make America stronger not just economically and militarily, but also morally and spiritually. We can make our beloved country the source of all the dreams and opportunities she was placed on this good Earth to provide. We need only to believe in each other and in the God who has so blessed our land.

I have to tell you a little something here that's just reminded me of a story -- two things have reminded me. First of all, I understand that many of you heard me last night, and then I happened to hear that a great many of you heard me on television just a little while ago. And the other thing is that when two gentlemen came in here, that left me backstage with their wives. [Laughter] And that also helped remind me of the story -- [laughter] -- that the fact that you heard me twice also -- it happens to be a story of an older preacher who was talking to a young preacher who hadn't had as much experience.

South was a stronghold for the Democratic Party. But from the spirit I sense here, those days are long gone. Today it's the Republican Party that reflects the progress and the vibrance of the new South.

And I think -- having been a Democrat myself, as I'm sure many of you were also and made the change, and you know what it is like to make that change -- but I think that many of us look back -- I know I do -- and say, did I really change? Or was it that the party of my father and the party that I had belonged to, it changed? It no longer stood for the things that it had stood for, for so many years.

The new South will not, for political expediency, be tying itself to political bosses and big spenders in other parts of the country. Those days are over. The new South is concerned about economic growth and expanding opportunity for everyone. The new South is concerned about a strong America and about maintaining the values and the strength of character that made this country the richest and the greatest in history. And now is the time to reach out to our Democratic friends as never before and to tell them how good the water is over on this side.

But I just don't believe the people can be bought with promises anymore that have to be paid for out of the Treasury. They know who eventually ends up paying for all of those promises. I feel sorry for some of those Democratic Congressmen, though, at the same time. Can you imagine what it must be like, worn out after a day at the office? They go home. They try to go to sleep.

Calvin Coolidge once said that ``Patriotism is easy to understand in America. It means looking out for yourself by looking out for the country.'' Well, the Republican message to voters this year is just that: When we vote, we should do it for America. When we choose on election day, we should think of the future of our children. It'll require hard work on our part. We have to get our message out, and that isn't so easy in America. There just does seem to be more attention paid to things other than what we have to say.

For example, right now that whole thing about that all of our problems could be solved if we would just take that defense budget and whittle it down to size. We're so extravagant with defense spending. Well, would you like to know that in 1962 the defense budget under a Democratic administration was 48 percent? Would you like to know also that our budget -- that was 48 percent of the whole budget for defense. Our budget last year was 27.6 percent -- 27.6 percent.

The other day, I just heard one of them on television, and he referred to the recent recession as my recession. [Laughter] Well, now, as I recall with those double-digit interest rates and inflation rates and everything, and unemployment up there pretty high and climbing, and it'd been climbing since 1979, we proposed our economic recovery program. But when we fell off into the big dip called the recession -- which was really a continuation of the recession that had started in 1979 -- but when we fell off into that big dip of unemployment, and the housing industry folded because of the high interest rates, and the automobile companies and the steel companies all shut down, and it spread -- nothing of our economic recovery program had been put in place yet. It wasn't there. We were still operating on the last budget of theirs, which we had to inherit when we came into office.

The President. Well, but seriously -- [laughter] -- these are economic matters that a great many people don't understand. For example, right now, the whole talk about the deficits -- no one wants more than we do -- for years we've been complaining about them. But we started deficit spending 50 years ago. And for 46 of those 50 years, the Democrats had a majority in both Houses of the Congress -- to say nothing of how many times they also had the White House. And it is the Congress that spends money. There's nothing in the Constitution that gives the President any right to spend any money. Not a penny.

But they -- if you'll remember back -- they told us that deficit spending didn't matter because we owed it to ourselves. [Laughter] And they said it was necessary for prosperity that we have a little deficit spending too -- and a little inflation also -- and that we could keep on going with that. And now the pattern has been set to which the deficits are caused by what they call the uncontrollables, meaning programs that they created, adopted, and built in an automatic increase in spending every year so they don't have to go back and increase it themselves, it just automatically increases.

Well, these are the things -- why we need more in the Congress of the people like are on this platform, more so that we can get the job done of getting government back down to where it should be and proving that nothing is uncontrollable if a Congress is willing to undo the mistake that it made.

We'd permitted our military strength -- going back to the defense budget -- to erode. And as it declined, so did our prestige and our national security. How many of you have heard some friend who's back from going abroad in those days and comes back and the feeling that he got over there of the disdain that so many people felt for this country? But we reversed that trend in the last 3 years. And I think today every citizen of the United States is safer and the United States is more respected and more secure because of what we've done.

And right here, I've got to interrupt and tell a little story. I enjoy telling it. [Laughter] Those guys of ours, those young men and women in uniform, when you see one of them on the street anymore, remember what it was like back in the war, if you're old enough to remember then? Why don't you -- don't just pass them by. Kind of smile and maybe stick out a hand and tell them you're glad they're doing what they're doing.

What I wanted to -- the story I want to tell, I've been telling it all over the Capital, and I hope it hasn't gotten here yet. [Laughter] It comes from a young first lieutenant, a marine lieutenant who flies a Cobra. He was at Grenada, and now he's in Beirut. He moved on when the relief force moved over there. And he wrote back and said that while he was in Grenada, he noticed that every news story about Grenada contained one line that never varied, that Grenada produced more nutmeg than any other place on Earth. And he decided that was a code. [Laughter] And he was going to break the code. And so he wrote back to say he did.

Listen, I've kept you standing there longer than I intended to, and I just want to again thank you for all the support that you've given and the way you've rallied. And all of the polls show that the things that we want so badly and that are being denied by the majority today in Congress, the polls show they're the things that the American people overwhelming want.

Eighty-three percent of the most recent poll of the people said, yes, they want the deficits reduced, but they don't want them reduced by raising taxes. They want them reduced by cutting spending -- 83 percent. Over 70 percent in all the polls that I've seen say they want the President to have the line-item veto. By the same numbers, they want the constitutional amendment to balance the budget.

Just going to say a few words in here -- that it's a pleasure for me to welcome you here this morning, as one who knows firsthand the good work that you've been doing up on the Hill. And a special thanks to Bob Michel and Trent Lott, who are two of the most skilled and articulate legislators that I've ever known.

And I want to share with you a quotation that I came across recently in my unofficial reading. It comes from a man who was a celebrated speaker, a journalist, a soldier, an historian, and a statesman. His name was -- you've maybe heard it before -- Winston Churchill. Some say that if he wanted to, he could even have been a great character actor. [Laughter] He once said that Americans did not cross the ocean, cross the mountains, and cross the prairies because we're made of sugar candy.

Many observers predicted that we couldn't work together, that the economic and social problems that had piled up over 50 years had been insurmountable. Well, I think we've proved the critics wrong. And we did it by working together, by building coalitions, and by daring to chart a new course.

Inflation, as we said the other night, has plummeted to 3.2 percent during the last year. That's the lowest rate in over a decade. The prime interest rate is nearly half what it was when we took office. Factory orders, retail sales, and housing starts are up. The stock market has come back to life. Real wages are rising, and America's leading the world in a technological revolution that is even more far-reaching and profound, as I said the other night, than the Industrial Revolution of a century ago.

Unemployment -- dropping at the fastest rate in more than 30 years. Last year alone, more than 4 million Americans found jobs, and today 103 million Americans are at work. And that's more than ever before in our history.

In foreign policy, the world knows once more again what America stands for: the freedom of mankind. From Central America to Africa to the Middle East, we're working to support democracy and promote peace. In Lebanon, the peace process has been slow and painful, but we've made genuine progress.

In Europe, the NATO alliance has held firm. In our dealings with the Soviets, by strengthening our defenses and showing the world our willingness to negotiate, we've laid the foundations for a lasting world peace. And on an island in the Caribbean, we set a nation free.

Believe me, I know how tough this has been for many of you, but you can be proud of all that we've accomplished. There's no better place to sit than the Oval Office to see how important and effective you all are.

And in the meantime, we have our work cut out for us. We have to get on with the job of bringing the budget under still better control. To contain special interest spending we must pass the line-item veto. We must bring inflation and interest rates down still further without loading new burdens on the backs of the American taxpayer. We must maintain a strong defense and face our world responsibilities squarely. And we must continue to return resources and responsibilities to the American people that will mean more savings, more freedom, more economic opportunity, and more jobs for all Americans.

I want you and your Democratic colleagues to know that I'm serious about negotiating a downpayment on the deficit. This is not a political posturing, as some have suggested. I'm not ruling anything out as beyond the bounds of legitimate debate. But I do think that we should try to concentrate on the less contentious issues. If we all focus on what's doable, we can get something done for the American people.

I transmit herewith, for the advice and consent of the Senate to ratification, the Convention for the Protection and Development of the Marine Environment of the Wider Caribbean Region. The Department of the State has prepared a report with respect to the Convention which is attached. I also transmit to the Senate, for its information, the Protocol to the Convention Concerning Cooperation in Combating Oil Spills in the Wider Caribbean Region and the Final Act of the Cartagena Conference which adopted the Convention and Protocol.

It covers a variety of forms of marine pollution including pollution from ships, pollution by dumping, pollution from land-based sources, pollution from seabed activities, and airborne pollution. It includes provisions on specially protected areas, cooperation in emergency situations, and environmental impact assessment. The Convention also contains an annex outlining non-compulsory procedures for the peaceful settlement of disputes arising under the Convention.

Program's Regional Seas Program, is intended to be supplemented, where necessary, by the development of specific protocols to it, such as the Protocol Concerning Cooperation in Combating Oil Spills in the Wide Caribbean Region (which extends to other hazardous substances as well), providing for more concrete obligations. In areas where there are existing international agreements, such as on marine pollution from ships and by dumping, the Convention provides for the application of the relevant international rules and standards developed under those agreements.

The entry into force of the Convention, augmented by its Protocol, will be an important step in creating, in the region, marine pollution standards which are generally higher, more uniform, consistent in character, and closer to our own than presently exist. Consequently, the Convention and its Protocol will provide new protection for United States territory, the Gulf States, as well as the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands.

The United States played a leading role in the negotiation of the Convention for the Protection and Development of the Marine Environment of the Wider Caribbean Region. Expeditious United States ratification of the Convention would demonstrate our concern for the protection of the marine environment of the Caribbean region and our commitment to the region as a whole. It is my hope that the United States will also play a leading role in the effective implementation of the Convention, which we expect to enter into force in a short period of time. To this end, it is important that the United States be represented at the first meeting of the Contracting Parties, which will be held no later than two years after entry into force of the Convention, following the deposit of the ninth instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval, or accession.

I am transmitting for the Senate's advice and consent to ratification the Consular Convention between the United States of America and the Republic of South Africa which was signed at Pretoria on October 28, 1982. I am also transmitting for the information of the Senate the report of the Department of State with respect to the Convention. This Convention will establish firm obligations on such important matters as free communication between a national and his consul, notification of consular officers of the arrest and detention of their nationals and permission for visits by consuls to nationals who are under detention.

I welcome the opportunity through this Convention to improve the relations between the two countries and their nationals. I urge the Senate to give the Convention its prompt and favorable consideration.

Sunday night you'll be telling us that you're going to announce for reelection. Now, obviously, this is off the record until Monday, so before we get into this, we're hoping you might tell us, off the record, whether we're right about that.

The President. Well, making up my mind as to what the decision would be was left to the latest possible moment. I've always believed, for one thing, that campaigns are too long. But I also -- in the event that the answer was to be yes -- I've always felt that it's too easy to find yourself making decisions on the basis of the political ramifications, rather than on what's right or wrong with the decision that has to be made. And if I'd informed -- when I was Governor of California I would not let a Cabinet discuss with me any political ramifications of any issue. I won't let my Cabinet now do that. We will only discuss things on the basis of are they, or are they not, good for the people.

The President.  --  -- as to whether you're going to walk away or whether you're going to keep on trying. I can only say it has been -- what I guess I'm trying to say is that I tried very definitely in my own mind to not even consider what that decision was going to be for as long as I could and until I finally had to with all the ramifications that go with it, as to whether other people have enough advance notice, what they may want to do and so forth, and then I did it. And it has been fairly recently.

The President. They had to come to me as to whether they were going to do the physical job of putting together an organization, and that was done without any declaration from me, one way or the other. And to this moment, none of them have ever been told what that decision is going to be.

The President. I never thought of it much from a standpoint of pleasure. It hasn't been a game or anything with me. It's just been a deeply held conviction that, oh, stems from a lot of things. I think campaigns are too long. I would welcome a limitation on them. I think one of the reasons for the increasingly low turnout in voters is not a lack of interest; I think it's that we've bored them to death. They're never free of something political going on.

You couple that with the other things that I've told you already, about how I feel about not letting your mind dwell on those subjects, for fear it might affect your decisions on other things, and -- so it wasn't a game. No. I had enough on my desk without that.

The President. Well, on the assumption that you're going -- it would be, number one, I think I have heard some encouragement from the people. But it would be the desire to finish what I think is well started -- the economic recovery, to get this country back into a growth pattern. To stop having these recurrent recessions, which we've had eight times since World War II, where we just go from one and then, in a temporary cure that distorts the economy and sets the stage for another one even worse 2 or 3 years beyond -- to really have a solid recovery. And I think we have made a good start on that.

To set the stage for real negotiations with the Soviet Union, leading to peace in the world. To complete something that I started early on in my administration with regard to our neighbors south of the border, that I don't think we've ever carried out properly, and that is a friendship and a pattern of partnership in all these countries of the Americas that are so unique in this hemisphere. All of these things that remain unfinished.

The President. Well, no, other than what I said about not having it in mind, or not playing with that in my mind until recently, because I felt that what we were doing was what my mind had to center on, not what effect it might have on someone.

The President. Biggest political hurdle? Well, frankly, I have to say that some misperceptions that have been carefully crafted by a certain amount of demagoguery on the part of opponents of what we've been trying to do here. Issues that would have me uncaring for certain groups of our citizenry -- and they're not true at all. And they've probably been the most frustrating thing that I personally have felt. And yet they have -- the polls indicate -- they have been able to create this perception.

Let me take one. I won't get into the fairness thing or anything else, which I think is very unfair, that what they're talking about. But let's take the one of the polls showing that people have an image of me that I might recklessly get us into a war, I go for violence. I came here believing that one of the greatest challenges was to bring us closer to peace.

All through the campaign, it is true, I did not support agreements like SALT II, and I didn't support them because they were simply placing limits on how many more weapons could be built, that you could continue to expand militarily, but within certain limits. And what I said over and over again was the time has come to sit down and talk about reducing the number of weapons in the world.

And after 4 years of trying to avoid it on the part of President Wilson -- what he called his policy of watchful waiting -- we found ourselves embroiled in that war and unprepared for it because someone on the other side, namely the Kaiser, over and over again expressed his belief that America wouldn't fight no matter what was done. And finally, they did those things to where there was no choice but to fight.

Mr. DeFrank. Mr. President, your speech in Atlanta yesterday seemed to suggest, at least to us, that you think Walter Mondale might be your potential opponent in the fall. Is that a fair reading of some of the things you said yesterday?

The President. Well, you can't deny the fact and your understanding that he's out ahead. But I will tell you, I was most surprised when a number of you -- well, not you or any magazines, but a number in the daily press -- the media interpreted me at aiming a line at him. I hadn't even thought about it. I was talking about them as a group.

The President. Frankly, I think he has tried to be all things to all people, and I think he's made more promises than can probably -- can possibly be kept, because as soon as he keeps one promise he has made it impossible to keep another that he's made to someone else.

I've asked our people to do a little arithmetic here and find out, with all of his expressed concern about the deficit, which didn't seem to bother him in all those years he was voting on spending bills in the Senate, to see just how much they add up. And the figure's pretty high already that his promises, if all kept, would give us a budget that, as one of his opponents in the Democratic contest said of him, would make the deficits $400 billion.

I think every President before me has found it this way -- that you really look forward to those weekends at Camp David. You know, the walk to here, the elevator up, and once you're there, you're there. And that's it until the weekend comes, and so you have those things to look forward to. So, you fit it all in.

Ms. Clift. Well, some people say that you seem to handle the burdens of the Presidency so well that you ought to teach a course in stress management. What is your secret? I mean, you do seem very at ease in the office.

The President. Well, maybe I learned it early on as Governor of California when, for a time, I found myself becoming a victim of stress. And then I just sat down with myself -- and it also had to do with this thing we talked about earlier, with regard to political considerations -- and I said that the best that I can do is get all the viewpoints and all the advice I can get from staff and Cabinet, and then make a decision on what I honestly believe in my own mind is the right thing to do for the people. And I found that I started sleeping better.

Mr. DeFrank. All the polls, Mr. President, for a very long time, have shown that your personal popularity has always exceeded your job rating. What is it about you that the American people seem to like?

Ms. Clift. The public thinks of you as a very gregarious person, yet the people that work with you here say you're really quite private and reserved and that you don't reveal your feelings easily and that you don't have many close friends.

The President. No, I don't think that. Oh, I think there are certain things that you don't babble or blab about, but I think I'm gregarious. I like to be with people and with the group and to socialize.

Mr. DeFrank. Just briefly on a second term: Do you worry at all that going into a second term you might become an immediate lameduck, or do you see some advantages to a second term that you didn't have this time around?

The President. Yeah. But it is that type of job. And I know in California that, really, the things that were completed and the great achievements were done in the second term. And I didn't find that there was any sense -- till right toward the very end and similar to the situation I'd been in for 3 years, although we have a majority in one House. There I had a majority of the other party in both houses. So, it was an 8-year struggle -- well, with the exception of 1 year, when we got a bare lead, due to a couple of special elections. But I found there it was the same struggle that you'd had in the first term.

And I don't think that -- as I say, toward the end, yes. Where it comes to ratification of appointees who may be for term appointments that will be longer, or judicial appointments -- then you find there are some people that want to take advantage of the fact that maybe they can hold out and stall until you're gone.

The President. I'm trying to think in terms of those memories of the other time. Well, for example, in the first term there, we had laid the groundwork for the great comprehensive welfare reforms that were unlike anything that had been done anyplace in this country before. I never mentioned them in the campaign for reelection, never made them an issue, never held them up as something to look forward to. I didn't want to politicize it. And immediately after the reelection, we went to work on them, and we achieved them. And they had a terrific impact.

The President. I think that -- let me put it this way: I believe that there have to be some structural changes in our government, things that presently you can't get at. I would think that those would be -- you'd have a better opportunity in a second term. And this is part of the -- getting at the deficit problem over the long haul -- that I look forward to doing.

Ms. Clift. Some analysts think a second Reagan term would be more conservative and far less pragmatic than the first, particularly since you've pledged to fight hard on the social issues like abortion and school prayer. Is that a fair assessment?

The President. No. Let me say what everyone's calling ``pragmatic'' -- maybe I interpret pragmatic differently. I had this same run-in with some diehard people when I was Governor, and who thought, because I had compromised on something and settled for less than I'd asked for, they would have jumped off the cliff holding the flag. Well, you do that, and you're never around to get anything more. If this is pragmatic, then I'm pragmatic.

My belief is that in this democratic process, which entails compromise, you seek what you think should be done. And if you can only get half of it, three-quarters of it, whatever, and politically it is impossible to get beyond that, I don't think it makes any sense to dig in your heels and say then, ``I won't play.'' No, you take what you can get and tuck it away in your mind that you'll wait and come back another time and try to get the next bite.

And that hadn't been my interpretation of ``pragmatic.'' I know what the goal is. And suppose even at the very end you've only gotten 70 or 75 percent of the goal. Well, that's a lot better than being back where you started.

You know, when I was a sports announcer broadcasting major league baseball and I'd be calling a game in which a pitcher has not given a hit and you're getting up there at the sixth or seventh, I never mentioned it, because there's an old superstition in baseball that if anyone mentions that he's pitching a no-hitter, you'll jinx him and he won't pitch the no-hitter.

Ms. Clift. Right. You're in better shape politically than any President since Eisenhower in his second term. Do you consider yourself lucky, exceptionally lucky? Irish luck is something that a lot of people seem to tag you with. Is that something you've thought about?

The President. Well, luck is one name for it or not. Let me just say I think I've been blessed with good fortune in achieving some of the things that we have. When you stop to think that just 3 short years ago, there were an awful lot of people in this country that overwhelmingly believed that the good days for our land were over, that we would never again see the type of thing we'd had.

America's next frontier, space, as one of four great goals for the eighties. Well, today I'd like to tell you more about that challenge, about how we can advance America's leadership in space through the end of this century and well into the next, and how, by reaching for exciting goals in space, we'll serve the cause of peace and create a better life for all of us here on Earth.

For a quarter of a century, we've moved steadily forward in the exploration and utilization of space, extending our knowledge of our solar system, our galaxy, and our universe. The space shuttle, our most recent advance in space technology, gives us routine access to space.

Just as the Yankee Clipper ships of the last century symbolized American vitality, our space shuttles today capture the optimistic spirit of our times. Our many achievements have proven that we can do much in space and that there's much more we must do to ensure that America lives up to her description -- a land of hope and opportunity.

Our approach to space has three elements. Let me discuss each of them briefly. The first is a commitment to build a permanently manned space station to be in orbit around the Earth within a decade. It will be a base for many kinds of scientific, commercial, and industrial activities and a steppingstone for further goals.

Scientists from NASA, universities, and private industry will do research in and around the space station -- research that's only possible in the zero-gravity and vacuum of space. As needed, private industry will fund expansions of the NASA facility where companies can manufacture new products and provide new services.

But most importantly, like every step forward, a space station will not be an end in itself but a doorway to even greater progress in the future. In this case, a space station will open up new opportunities for expanding human commerce and learning and provide a base for further exploration of that magnificent and endless frontier of space.

United States space program. The tricentennial of the first German immigration to America was celebrated last year with a joint space effort. Just as our friends were asked to join us in the shuttle program, our friends and allies will be invited to join with us in the space station project.

The third goal of our space strategy will be to encourage American industry to move quickly and decisively into space. Obstacles to private sector space activities will be removed, and we'll take appropriate steps to spur private enterprise in space.

We expect space-related investments to grow quickly in future years, creating many new jobs and greater prosperity for all Americans. Companies interested in putting payloads into space, for example, should have ready access to private sector launch services.

Transportation Secretary Elizabeth Dole will work to stimulate the private sector investment in commercial, unmanned space boosters. We need a thriving, commercial launch industry. NASA, along with other departments and agencies, will be taking a number of initiatives to promote private sector investment to ensure our lead over current and potential foreign competitors. So, we're going to bring into play America's greatest asset -- the vitality of our free enterprise system.

We've always prided ourselves on the pioneer spirit that built America. Well, that spirit is a key to our future as well as our past. Once again, we're on a frontier. Our willingness to accept this challenge will reflect whether America's men and women today have the same bold vision, the same courage and indomitable spirit that made us a great nation.

The peaceful use of space promises great benefits to all mankind. It opens vast new opportunities for our industry and ingenuity. The only limits we have are those of our own courage and imagination. When President John Kennedy challenged America to go to the Moon, he said it would not be one person going but an entire nation putting him there.

Our space program has done so much to bring us together because it gives us the opportunity to be the kind of nation we want to be, the kind of nation we must always be -- dreaming, daring, and creating.

The President. Well, the actual facts and figures reveal that our tax program actually benefits more at the lower range than even the Kennedy tax program back in the sixties; that a higher percentage of his tax relief went to those in the top five brackets than has been true of ours; a higher percentage went to big business than was true of ours. Our tax program was fair. It was fair across the board.

Some years ago when there was a subversive element that had moved into the motion picture industry and Hollywood, there were great meetings that were held. There was one that was held in the Los Angeles Sports Arena -- 16,000 people were there, and thousands of them up in the balcony were young people.

Well, I thank you all very much. This is a moment I've been looking forward to. I remember with such pleasure the time we spent together last year. Today I feel like I'm doing more than returning for a speech; I feel like I'm coming home.

Being family makes us willing to share the pain of problems we carry in our hearts. But families also come together in times of joy, and we can celebrate such a moment today. Hope is being reborn across this land by a mighty spiritual revival that's made you the miracle of the entire broadcasting industry.

Americans yearn to explore life's deepest truths. And to say their entertainment -- their idea of entertainment is sex and violence and crime is an insult to their goodness and intelligence. We are people who believe love can triumph over hate, creativity over destruction, and hope over despair.

In his book, ``The Secret Kingdom,'' Pat Robertson told us, ``There can be peace; there can be plenty; there can be freedom. They will come the minute human beings accept the principles of the invisible world and begin to live by them in the visible world.'' More and more of us are trying to do this. George Gallup has detected a rising tide of interest and involvement in religion among all levels of society.

Abraham Lincoln called the Bible ``the best gift God has given to man.'' ``But for it,'' he said, ``we could not know right from wrong.'' Like that image of George Washington kneeling in prayer in the snow at Valley Forge, Lincoln described a people who knew it was not enough to depend on their own courage and goodness; they must also look to God their Father and Preserver. And their faith to walk with Him and trust in His word brought them the blessings of comfort, power, and peace that they sought.

My experience in this office I hold has only deepened a belief I've held for many years: Within the covers of that single Book are all the answers to all the problems that face us today if we'd only read and believe.

Let's begin at the beginning. God is the center of our lives; the human family stands at the center of society; and our greatest hope for the future is in the faces of our children. Seven thousand Poles recently came to the christening of Maria Victoria Walesa, daughter of Danuta and Lech Walesa, to express their belief that solidarity of the family remains the foundation of freedom.

God's most blessed gift to His family is the gift of life. He sent us the Prince of Peace as a babe in a manger. I've said that we must be cautious in claiming God is on our side. I think the real question we must answer is, are we on His side?

I know what I'm about to say now is controversial, but I have to say it. This nation cannot continue turning a blind eye and a deaf ear to the taking of some 4,000 unborn children's lives every day. That's one every 21 seconds. One every 21 seconds.

We cannot pretend that America is preserving her first and highest ideal, the belief that each life is sacred, when we've permitted the deaths of 15 million helpless innocents since the Roe versus Wade decision -- 15 million children who will never laugh, never sing, never know the joy of human love, will never strive to heal the sick, feed the poor, or make peace among nations.

I will continue to support every effort to restore that protection including the Hyde-Jepsen respect life bill. I've asked for your all-out commitment, for the mighty power of your prayers, so that together we can convince our fellow countrymen that America should, can, and will preserve God's greatest gift.

I think we're making progress in upholding the sanctity of life of infants born with physical or mental handicaps. The Department of Health and Human Services has now published final regulations to address cases such as Baby Doe in Bloomington. That child was denied lifesaving surgery and starved to death because he had Down's Syndrome and some people didn't think his life would be worth living.

Secretary Heckler and Surgeon General Koop deserve credit for designing regulations providing basic protections to the least among us. And the American Academy of Pediatrics and the National Association of Children's Hospitals have now affirmed a person's mental or physical handicap must not be the basis for deciding to withhold medical treatment.

Let me assure you of something else: We want parents to know their children will not be victims of child pornography. I look forward to signing a new bill now awaiting final action in a conference committee that will tighten our laws against child pornography. And we're concerned about enforcement of all the Federal antiobscenity laws.

Over the past year, the United States Customs Service has increased by 200 percent its confiscation of obscene materials coming in across our borders. We're also intensifying our drive against crimes of family violence and sexual abuse. I happen to believe that protecting victims is just as important as safeguarding the rights of defendants.

If we're to meet the challenge of educating for the space age, of opening eyes and minds to treasures of literature, music, and poetry, and of teaching values of faith, courage, responsibility, kindness, and love, then we must meet these challenges as one people. And parents must take the lead. And I believe they are.

I know one thing I'm sure most of us agree on: God, source of all knowledge, should never have been expelled from our children's classrooms. The great majority of our people support voluntary prayer in schools.

They said, ``We thank you for the flowers so sweet. We thank you for the food we eat. We thank you for the birds that sing. We thank you, God, for everything.'' A court of appeals ordered them to stop. They were supposedly violating the Constitution of the United States.

I think Americans are getting angry. I think they have a message, and Congress better listen. We are a government of, by, and for the people. And people want a constitutional amendment making it unequivocally clear our children can hold voluntary prayer in every school across this land. And if we could get God and discipline back in our schools, maybe we could get drugs and violence out.

Seriously, we need a new amendment to restore the rights that were taken from us. Senator Baker has assured us that we will get a vote on our amendment. And with your help, we can win, and that will be a great victory for our children.

During the last decade, we've seen people's commitment to religious liberty expressed by the establishment of thousands of new religious schools. These schools were built by the sacrifices of parents determined to provide a quality education for their children in an environment that permits traditional values to flourish.

Now I believe that some of you met with my advisers to discuss the situation of religious schools in Nebraska. We have all seen news accounts of the jailing of a minister, the padlocking of a church, and the continuing imprisonment of fathers of students. This issue of religious liberty has arisen in other States. The question is how to find the balance between assuring quality of education and preserving freedom for churches and parents who want their schools to reflect their faith.

These cases have mostly proceeded in State courts. A number of State supreme courts have reached decisions that moderated the effect of State regulations on religious schools. Last week, a panel appointed by the Governor of Nebraska concluded that the State's regulations violate the religious liberties of Christian schools.

But isn't it time for the Nebraska courts or legislature to solve this problem by a speedy reconsideration? I hope some way can be found to resolve the legal issues without having people in jail for doing what they think is right.

Within our families, neighborhoods, schools, and places of work, let us continue reaching out, renewing our spirit of friendship, community service, and caring for each other -- a spirit that flows like a deep and powerful river through the history of our nation.

How much of that money could we save, how much better off might Americans be if all of us tried a little harder to live by the Ten Commandments and the Golden Rule? I've been told that since the beginning of civilization millions and millions of laws have been written. I've even heard someone suggest it was as many as several billion. And yet, taken all together, all those millions and millions of laws have not improved on the Ten Commandments one bit.

Our mission stretches far beyond our borders; God's family knows no borders. In your life you face daily trials, but millions of believers in other lands face far worse. They are mocked and persecuted for the crime of loving God. To every religious dissident trapped in that cold, cruel existence, we send our love and support. Our message? You are not alone; you are not forgotten; do not lose your faith and hope because someday you, too, will be free.

If the Lord is our light, our strength, and our salvation, whom shall we fear? Of whom shall we be afraid? No matter where we live, we have a promise that can make all the difference, a promise from Jesus to soothe our sorrows, heal our hearts, and drive away our fears. He promised there will never be a dark night that does not end. Our weeping may endure for a night, but joy cometh in the morning. He promised if our hearts are true, His love will be as sure as sunlight. And, by dying for us, Jesus showed how far our love should be ready to go: all the way.

The President. No, I can't say that. But I believe what I've said so often, that the people let you know whether you should or not. And I just resisted allowing myself to think about it too early. I think campaigns are too long anyway. And I just waited as things went on and doing what had to be done here on the job and finally came to a decision that there was a belief in what we're trying to accomplish here and that I wanted to see if we couldn't finish it.

Mr. Hartman. How about Mrs. Reagan -- because ever since you were shot, she has been afraid for you, and she has expressed that in different ways many times. The discussions between the two of you, how difficult was it for her? How difficult were the discussions? What was the substance of those?

Mr. Hartman. Most people are saying this is going to be a close election. Whoever the nominee is for the Democrats, it's going to be a close election. You're an old political pro. Honestly, could you lose this election?

Frankly, I believe that there have been great misperceptions that have been created about me and this adminstration, what our positions are and where we stand. The fairness issue, for example -- I don't think anything could be farther from the truth about that.

The President. Yes, and supposed that we rigged our programs and our tax breaks and so forth for the rich and for business. These are absolute falsehoods. Anyone who looks at it, I defy them to go back a long way in some of the tax relief programs, such as Kennedy's tax cut program in the sixties, and you will find that there were more benefits for the top five brackets, the income tax payers, and for business in those bills than there were in ours.

The President. Dave, I'll tell you, what I would like to be able to say to them or have a chance to say to them is that, sure, when someone is down on his luck and is having hard times and they'd like to have someone to blame, they have heard a steady drumbeat. Now, they've been told over and over again that because we're trying to hold down government spending that somehow we're taking it out of their hides.

We are spending more on food for the hungry, more on the needy, more on health care than has ever been spent in the history of this country. If there are people that are falling through the cracks when we're spending more than has ever been spent on programs for them, more on food stamps and more people are getting food stamps, then we want to find out. And this was what the commission was to do, to find out why -- if this is true that this is widespread, then is this caused by inefficiency at the administrative level, that in the distribution of these programs? Is it caused by people who maybe don't know how or where to apply for them, don't have the knowledge they should have? What is the reason? Well, the commission reported that they did not find it that widespread.

What we have found in this country, and maybe we're more aware of it now, is one problem that we've had, even in the best of times, and that is the people who are sleeping on the grates, the homeless who are homeless, you might say, by choice. Now, this has been aggravated somewhat by some things at local or State levels, where there have been changes made in committing people with mental problems to institutions, and they've suddenly been turned out, willing to go. They want out. But they had no place to go.

Mr. Hartman.  --  -- that the Soviets respect strength. You're rebuilding our military and our defenses at the present time. However, tensions are at their greatest with the Soviet Union since the early sixties. The Soviets have left the negotiating table, and quite frankly, people across this country are more afraid than they have been in many, many years that we might be going to war.

The President. Well, what they need to find out -- and maybe in the campaign ahead we'll have an opportunity to tell them -- we're not in more danger. We are safer and more secure than we were several years ago.

The President. The proof is several years ago the United States had allowed its own defensive strength to decline to the point that you could look and say we weren't too far from a point of weakness in which the enemy could be tempted because we didn't have the strength.

The President. No. We're saying, ``We'll be at the table; come on back.'' They made a statement on the START talks. They made one statement about something of -- well, they were willing to discuss a certain number of missiles, a certain number of planes, a certain number of missiles and submarines. And we've said, ``We're ready to talk on that. We'd like to then throw in some limitations on the number of warheads'' -- total warheads, because each missile carries more than one warhead. They haven't come back.

Mr. Hartman. Deficits. Most people of knowledge say it's the biggest single problem facing the economic free world. You have suggested bipartisanship over in the Congress. Let's take a look at it late this year or sometime next year in '85. Why should people vote for you or anybody in Congress who are willing to put on hold for a year the biggest single problem facing the economic free world today?

The President. But we are talking now. What we've said is you can't solve the whole thing in this one year. We've talked about our budgeting and a program that we can agree on that won't be made a political football in the campaign, that they will come and meet with us on some provisions to start this string of deficits on a downward path and then, at the same time, to agree that having started this, as we called it, downpayment on that, we then take up the structural problems.

The President. Well -- [laughing] -- I think I would answer them that I'd be a lot better President if I had a majority of my own party in both Houses instead of having to buck the opposition in the House of Representatives.

Thank you, Bill. Members of Congress, distinguished guests, and ladies and gentlemen, I appreciate this chance to be with you. Over the years we've stood shoulder to shoulder on the major issues of the day. I remember when it was in style to say that no growth would improve the quality of life. Well, we can be grateful no one's falling for that anymore. The folks in your industry are today, as you have always been, working not to keep America the same but building to make it better.

Washington are doing that makes all the difference. Too often government is given a lion's share of the credit. And that's a pretty good excuse for a story here about the old farmer who took over a parcel of land down near the creek bottom. It had never been cleared, it was covered with rocks, brush, all rutted, and he just determined to make it flourish. And he went to work and he hauled away the rocks and he cleared away the brush, cultivated the ground and fertilized and so forth, and then planted his garden and before long just had a very beautiful garden.

We Americans have always been grateful to God for the blessings bestowed on this land. One of our greatest blessings was freedom that unleashed the creative energy of our people. That energy took an undeveloped land with vast stretches of wilderness and desert and turned it into an economic dynamo that has provided a better quality of life and a greater degree of freedom for people than any other in history.

I can't help but think that had Chicago faced modern Federal regulations, we'd still be stepping over the burned-out wrecks left by that great fire. Of course, back in those days, no one waited for help from Washington. They just rolled up their sleeves and went to work.

Chicago's resilience reflected the spirit of a free people. The key word is ``free.'' The prevalent notion in this country was that progress is the result of unleashing people's talents and energies to achieve goals as established by the people, themselves.

Now, this was contrary to another concept that has had a degree of acceptance in the latter half of the 20th century, especially in the Nation's Capital. This theory supposes that progress is a product of harnessing the people's energy and focusing it on predetermined goals. Planners would determine the goals to be targeted. The planners, invariably, are people with whom the espousers of this philosophy agree.

The American character is proud and independent. It's one of this country's greatest assets. We came here from every land. We're the product of every culture and race. We came to be free and to better our lives and the lives of our families. And yet, we are all Americans. Our love of liberty and the values that flow from it unite us as a nation and a people.

An aspect of American history, distasteful to some, is the important role played by the profit motive. Well, I, for one, have no trouble with the profit motive. When people are free to work for themselves they work longer and harder. They'll do a better job because they're not just following orders, they're doing what they want to do. Profit motive unleashed an explosion of energy in America.

Well, those who are uncomfortable with profits may not understand something that you folks in business know well. In a competitive economy, making a profit means filling other people's needs and doing it efficiently, courteously, and at as low a rate as possible.

It hasn't been perfect and, yes, our country has made mistakes. But with freedom and a profit motive we've achieved greatness as a nation. And don't let anyone tell you that because our people are working for themselves and their families it is contrary to community spirit and the spirit of human kindness and generosity. The frontier spirit of pulling together is legendary. And today people voluntarily donate hundreds of millions of hours and billions of dollars to charitable and community projects each year.

This, too, is inherent in the spirit of America. After all, when people are free the choice of helping others becomes meaningful. The choice of doing something to better one's community becomes a source of pride because it reflects the character of the donor and not the product of legal coercion.

Calls for more and more government may reflect a lack of understanding of the American character. Our values as a people are strong. We believe in work, yes, but also in family, faith, and neighborhood. We're optimistic people who believe we can overcome adversity and accomplish great things.

Four years ago it was clear that something had gone wrong. There was a growing feeling of pessimism and a sense of hopelessness inconsistent with the American character. For the first time the refrain was heard that America's best days were behind her.

The woes from which we're now emerging were not the result of some uncontrollable cycle, nor were they the result of personality defects in our political leaders. We simply strayed too far from those truths which serve as the basis of American progress. Government was spending too much, draining away any chance for growth in the private sector. Federal taxes were too high, undercutting the incentive to work or invest. Federal regulation was beyond all reason, tying our hands and threatening our freedom.

Getting this situation straightened out and putting this country back on the right road has not been easy, and the job is not yet done, but we have made a beginning. I want to take this opportunity to thank you for all your support over the last 36 months. What we've accomplished couldn't have been done without the active support of you and good folks like you.

Together, we've cut the growth in Federal spending more than in half. More progress can be made here, but we've made a good start. The prime interest rate has come down from 21\1/2\ percent to 11 percent. Here, too, those rates can and must come down more.

Teddy Roosevelt once said, ``It ought to be evident to everyone that business has to prosper before anybody can get any benefit from it.'' Well, together, we're restoring progress, and every American will benefit.

Working people are already seeing results. More people are, in fact, working today than ever before in our history. Last year unemployment took its biggest drop in 33 years. Real wages went up last year and the year before that. When we got to Washington, real wages were going down.

Just this morning we received two gems of good news. The leading economic indicators, forecasting the direction of the economy, posted a solid increase in December, the 15th increase in the last 16 months, and home sales in December jumped to their highest level in more than 5 years.

America's economy is strong and, yes, I do believe the American people are better off than they were before. We inherited despair, and we're turning it into hope. With hard work and common sense, we're turning the era of limits into an era of opportunity.

We've come a long way, but much remains for us to do. Turning the economy around was priority number one. Now we can turn to the equally difficult task of streamlining government, making it more efficient and responsive. We've made a start here, too. We've transferred a host of programs back to the State and local levels, programs that never should have been the Federal Government's responsibility in the first place.

We also put to work a team of experts from the private sector to determine where changes can be made to eliminate waste and make the Federal Government more cost-effective. The Grace commission came up with some 2,500 recommendations that are being studied right now throughout the departments and agencies. This was all done by some 2,000 of your companions in the business world who volunteered and even put up the money to fund their activity.

We, of course, still must come to grips with the deficit. My only caution is to watch out for those offering easy answers. I have attempted to keep this issue from being politicized by supporting the creation of a bipartisan working group from the Congress. The group will work with the administration on making a down payment on the deficit. More substantial measures will still be required. But one thing is certain: Raising taxes and threatening the recovery is no answer. This problem was long in the making. It'll require more than band-aid solutions.

I've sometimes compared government to that unkind definition of a baby: It's an alimentary canal with an appetite at one end and no sense of responsibility at the other. [Laughter] One of the first steps that we can take to make our system more responsible is providing the Chief Executive with a line-item veto. It's working in 43 States and I think it should be put to use in Washington, DC.

The American people want this reform. And they and I also want a constitutional amendment mandating a balanced Federal budget. Now, this isn't a new idea. At the adoption of the Constitution, 1787, Thomas Jefferson noted that the Constitution needed one additional article.

Well, in addition to long-term reforms, I believe we should make our tax system more simple, fair, and rewarding for all the people. If we could broaden the tax base, then personal rates could come down rather than go up. And I think tax simplification is an historic change the people want and our economy needs.

In closing, just let me express that I have every confidence that we can control government spending, taxing, and in doing so, ensure a lasting era of growth and opportunities for all our people. Although the rhetoric gets thick at times, especially during election years, the leaders of both political parties are individuals of good will, individuals who want what's best for this country. Nobody should ever sell America or Americans short.

This magnificent theater in which we're meeting today is part of the legacy of an individual who started in the sand and gravel industry, Colonel Henry Crown. His father, Arie -- I hope I have the name, pronounced the name right -- after whom this theater is named, was a Lithuanian immigrant. From the humblest of beginnings, Henry Crown became one of the most successful men in the American business world. Reflecting the good and decent values at the heart of this country, he's been one of this country's leading philanthropists. Colonel Crown, thank you for all you've done.

Today American liberty shines brightly, offering proof to a mankind plagued with tyranny and deprivation: There is a better way. Together, we can keep America the blessed land of freedom and opportunity God meant it to be.

The United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency has primary responsibility for leading the Administration's efforts to reduce the world's nuclear arsenals, to negotiate a complete ban or reductions in chemical weapons, to reduce conventional forces in Europe, and to reinforce the barriers against war through confidence-building measures.

Soviet actions in the area of arms control in 1983 were a disappointment. We developed several sound positions, demonstrated our willingness to be flexible, and consistently invited the Soviets to walk through the door to serious negotiations. We hope that the Soviet Union will be willing to do this in 1984.

For its part, the United States will leave no stone unturned in its pursuit of reductions in nuclear arsenals. In 1984 we will renew our efforts to use the arms control process in ways that enhance our national security and improve global stability.

With the coming of the new year, it will be forty years since Berlin as a city under four-power administration was created. This special status has made Berlin the free and prosperous city we see today. This status and the determination of the Allies to insist on their rights and to fulfill their responsibilities is why Berlin stands today in such contrast to its surroundings.

Even today, the Western Allies are Berlin's trustees. They are also, in an important sense, the trustees of the German nation. They are in Berlin as sentinels and as reminders that the tragic division of Germany and Europe is not immutable.

Berliners can be confident that the Allied role in Berlin, with its roots in history long past, with its present complexities, is still the guarantor of Berlin's liberty. Building on this solid foundation, it has been possible to construct East-West arrangements to benefit the people of Berlin.

Together we have celebrated successes such as the Quadripartite Agreement. These shared experiences have forged an unbreakable bond. Together we will work to create a bright future for Berlin. For the new year, I would like to renew to every Berliner our pledge: the American commitment to Berlin is unshakable.

The President. I was very pleased to welcome Prime Minister Nakasone and Foreign Minister Abe to Los Angeles for an official working visit at the start of both this new year and, I'm pleased to say, the second terms in office for two of us.

Japan. When I visited Japan in November a year ago, I told Prime Minister Nakasone that there's no relationship that is more important to peace and prosperity in the world than that between the United States and Japan. The discussions that we've had today have convinced me once again of the truth of that statement.

The Prime Minister and I have discussed a number of key regional and international issues, with a special focus on our relations with the Soviet Union and the upcoming arms reduction talks in Geneva. I informed the Prime Minister of my intention to pursue effective arms reduction agreements with the Soviets seriously and zealously, while pointing out that we believe that some hard bargaining lies ahead.

I promised the Prime Minister that as we pursue these talks, we'll keep very much in mind the interests of our friends and allies in both Europe and Asia. I told Prime Minister Nakasone that if the Soviets are prepared to cooperate, then we will make progress. I'm grateful that the Prime Minister supported our approach to these negotiations.

We have reaffirmed the importance that our own defense efforts make to regional peace and stability, and we vowed to work together to strengthen our mutual security cooperation within the framework of the Treaty of Mutual Cooperation and Security.

Our economic relations, particularly our trading relations, have been at the top of the agenda today, and we've discussed very candidly those areas where we have problems. We agreed to work strenuously in the months ahead to open our markets fully and to resist protectionist pressures in both countries.

I believe that we both agree that there is an urgent need to work together to resolve the problems in our trade relationship. We both recognize, I believe, that failure to overcome these obstacles in trade will complicate our ability to fulfill the vision of international partnership between Japan and the United States that we both share.

I have also reiterated our view that the capital markets measures that Japan announced last May should be fully and promptly implemented. I outlined my belief that implementation of the Agreement on Energy Cooperation should be accelerated. And I also indicated that we're pleased to welcome increased Japanese investment in the United States, which already is providing over 150,000 jobs to American workers.

Now, underlying today's meeting is a reaffirmation of the close and friendly ties between our two great peoples and our shared democratic values. Prime Minister Nakasone and I have pledged that we shall work to strengthen further our relations and cooperation as bilateral, Pacific, and international partners. And with this in mind, we've agreed that the recent report of the United States-Japan advisory commission is an excellent starting point for charting the future course of our relationship. Officials of our two governments will come together soon to review the report and its many excellent recommendations.

And finally, Mr. Prime Minister, it's been an immense personal pleasure to see you again. In five meetings, we have helped strengthen the powerful partnership for good between the United States and Japan of which I spoke before your distinguished Diet.

We value deeply our close friendship with Japan. As economic powers and as democratic nations, we're committed to the search for peace and prosperity for our own people and for all people. As leaders of two great nations, we have the mutual responsibility to work together in partnership to help people throughout the world secure the blessings of freedom and prosperity that we enjoy.

I believe that there are three distinctive elements in the current Japan-U.S. relationship. They are trust, responsibility, and friendship. At the beginning of the new year, the President and I have set a framework for our two countries to work together, based on these three elements, for promoting dynamic cooperation in quest of the peace and prosperity of the world.

The President and I exchanged views on the issue of peace and arms control. The negotiation on arms control will start next week in Geneva between Secretary Shultz and Foreign Minister Gromyko. I expressed my respect to the President's firm determination in pursuit of peace. I fully support his endeavor in launching this important negotiation.

The President and I reaffirmed the importance of maintaining close contact and unity among the industrial democracies on this issue. I earnestly hope that the historians of the future will mark 1985 as the year in which a great step forward was taken towards the consolidation of the world peace.

The President and I reconfirmed that the United States and Japan share heavy responsibilities for the sustained, noninflationary growth of the world economy and for the maintenance and development of the open and multilateral economic and trading system of the world. For this purpose, it is important to implement appropriate economic policies in our respective countries and to endeavor to maintain and expand the open market.

The President and I welcomed the advent of a new era characterized by the active cooperation in high technology, investment in capital exchanges, services, and other areas. We shared the determination of making serious efforts for a more balanced development of our trade and economic relations. To this end, Japan will promote economic policies that will enhance growth led by domestic private demand and will make further market-opening efforts.

To secure effectiveness of such mutual efforts, we will be engaged in an active joint followup effort and have designated Secretary Shultz and Foreign Minister Abe to oversee this cooperative process. Such work, needless to say, should be conducted with a view to strengthening our overall bilateral relationship.

The President and I shared the view that the report of the Japan-U.S. advisory commission was a valuable contribution and would merit a serious study by both sides. I expressed to the President that Japan intends to proceed further with its efforts at its own initiative to improve its self-defense capabilities, together with further strengthening the credibility of the Japan-U.S. security arrangements.

Mr. President, California has been a major gateway in the history of our trans-Pacific exchanges, and of course, California means a great deal for you, Mr. President. It was a great pleasure for me to meet with you here in California and to exchange views on our precious bilateral relationship in order to set the direction towards the 21st century. And there is no better place than California to talk about the importance of further promoting the dynamic development of the Asia and Pacific region.

Hunger and extreme malnutrition now threaten over 14 million people in Africa through the end of 1985. In response to this human catastrophe, America has responded as a government and as a people in a tremendous outpouring of aid. This fiscal year, the United States has already committed to Africa over 600,000 tons of emergency food, worth $250 million -- this is in addition to our regular food aid program of about 1 million tons. The U.S. response has been far larger and faster than that of any other donor nation or institution.

The American people have also responded selflessly to this crisis, from the U.S. grain company that recently donated enough food to provide over 1 million meals to Ethiopian children to an elderly woman who sent the Agency for International Development (AID) $2. Yet, even with all our country has already done to feed the starving, more -- much more -- must be accomplished by our nation in the months ahead to meet this challenge.

I am thus announcing today a comprehensive African hunger relief initiative. It addresses Africa's immediate emergency food needs, its pressing refugee problems, and its need to stimulate agricultural development on that continent.

Government's total commitment to Africa for fiscal year 1985 for emergency and regular food aid and disaster relief programs exceed $1 billion. This aid will provide over 1.5 million tons of emergency food. This overall $1 billion program will include resources already committed to Africa for the coming year, other AID resources, and a supplemental request on which I will ask the 99th Congress to take immediate action.

I have also today approved a $25 million drawdown from the United States Emergency Refugee and Migration Assistance Fund to finance urgent humanitarian assistance needs in Africa. This action is in response to appeals by the United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees and the International Committee for the Red Cross. This money will go to victims of the crises in Ethiopia, the Sudan, and other countries.

This past March I directed a study to be undertaken to produce new, effective initiatives to address Third World hunger problems -- emergency situations, such as the Ethiopian tragedy, and longer term problems. In July this food aid task force completed its work on emergency food crises. On July 10, the anniversary of the Food for Peace (P.L. 480) Program, I announced an initiative to help cut down the response time to Third World life-threatening food emergencies.

This is being done by the creation of a central forecasting capability for impending food emergencies; by prepositioning food for quick response; by helping poor countries pay for the sea and inland transportation of food; by increasing coordination among the donor countries; and by seeking increased private sector participation.

Today's food emergency in Africa reemphasizes the need to tackle the underlying structural problems of agricultural stagnation in the Third World. Poor countries must become more productive in agriculture if they are to grow the food so needed to feed their people.

As a result of this, coupled with the failure of the Soviet Union to fulfill its promises of economic assistance, an increasing number of Third World countries once dominated by the socialist model are experimenting with free market approaches.

Progress. This policy will emphasize use of America's agricultural abundance to support countries which have made commitments to agricultural policy reform during a period of economic hardship, including: (1) adequate price levels for agricultural production, based on market principles, and (2) improved rural infrastructure and private sector involvement.

Last year the administration initiated a 5-year program intended to support economic reform and agricultural production. Important work in agricultural research is also going forward, research that shows great promise of breakthroughs in seed varieties that can usher in a new era of productivity for rain-short regions of Africa.

The underlying structures of policies, institutions, appropriate technology, and human knowledge are being built. Progress is being made. We will not lose sight of the ultimate goal of strengthened economies, food self-sufficiency, and human enlightenment for Africa. But for the present, much of sub-Saharan Africa suffers increasingly from severe hunger, malnutrition, and starvation. A timely American response can save many lives. This is what the African hunger relief initiative is designed to do.

During the past few months there has been a series of bombings at abortion clinics throughout the country. I condemn, in the strongest terms, those individuals who perpetrate these and all such violent, anarchist activities. As President of the United States, I will do all in my power to assure that the guilty are brought to justice. Therefore, I will request the Attorney General to see that all Federal agencies with jurisdiction pursue the investigation vigorously.

In the course of the past year, the President has directed and managed a review of the full family of United States arms control positions, covering the spectrum of separate negotiations which have gone on in the past and presumptively will be resumed in the future. More recently, he has chaired and now completed a review of preparations for the opening of talks with the Soviet Union to take place next Monday in Geneva.

The United States approaches the January 7th and 8th meetings with the Soviet Foreign Minister with a sense of determination and patience and with hope for a productive outcome. We fully recognize that this is the beginning of a long and complicated process. The issues involved go to the very heart of national security interests of both countries.

They're extremely complex from a technological standpoint. Furthermore, these talks are only a part, although a vital part, of the broader relationship between our two countries, a relationship involving regional issues, human rights, bilateral issues, as well.

While considerable time, therefore, may be needed to reach agreement on arms control outcomes, the U.S. is hopeful that the Geneva meetings will facilitate progress toward addressing the difficult arms control issues before us. We are realistic concerning the obstacles we face, but we are determined at the same time to do our part to make these efforts succeed and to establish a framework and a process for resuming the bilateral arms control dialog.

Both the U.S. and the Soviet Union have a special responsibility to the international community to make these efforts succeed. The United States, for its part, has constructive ideas to present in Geneva, and we will listen carefully to the Soviet presentations. Our negotiators will be flexible and patient.

With equal commitment and flexibility on the part of the Soviet Union, we are hopeful that these meetings will provide a start down the long road toward achieving equitable and verifiable reductions in nuclear forces, toward enhancing deterrence and ensuring the peace.

I am today with deep regret accepting the resignation of Michael K. Deaver as Deputy Chief of the White House Staff. Mike plans to return to the private sector at a date to be subsequently determined, but in the general timeframe of March to May 1985.

California and in Washington. Nancy and I will sorely miss him, as will the Nation. He has compiled an outstanding record during his 4 years of service to this administration. Mike has been an excellent public servant, and the Nation is fortunate to have had the benefit of his talent and vision. Much of the success we've enjoyed in the first term is directly attributable to him. His shoes will be difficult to fill, and he leaves with our best wishes and affection.

Section 1. General Requirements. (a) There is hereby established a regulatory planning process by which the Administration will develop and publish a Regulatory Program for each year. To implement this process, each Executive agency subject to Executive Order No. 12291 shall submit to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) each year, starting in 1985, a statement of its regulatory policies, goals, and objectives for the coming year and information concerning all significant regulatory actions underway or planned; however, the Director may exempt from this Order such agencies or activities as the Director may deem appropriate in order to achieve the effective implementation of this Order.

Sec. 2. Agency Submission of Draft Regulatory Program. (a) The head of each agency shall submit to the Director an overview of the agency's regulatory policies, goals, and objectives for the program year and such information concerning all significant regulatory actions of the agency, planned or underway, including actions taken to consider whether to initiate rulemaking; requests for public comment; and the development of documents that may influence, anticipate, or could lead to the commencement of rulemaking proceedings at a later date, as the Director deems necessary to develop the Administration's Regulatory Program. This submission shall constitute the agency's draft regulatory program. The draft regulatory program shall be submitted to the Director each year, on a date to be specified by the Director, and shall cover the period from April 1 through March 31 of the following year.

Director may request; however, the Director shall, by Bulletin or Circular, exempt from the requirements of this Order any class or category of regulatory action that the Director determines is not necessary to review in order to achieve the effective implementation of the program.

Sec. 3. Review, Compilation, and Publication of the Administration's Regulatory Program. (a) In reviewing each agency's draft regulatory program, the Director shall (i) consider the consistency of the draft regulatory program with the Administration's policies and priorities and the draft regulatory programs submitted by other agencies; and (ii) identify such further regulatory or deregulatory actions as may, in his view, be necessary in order to achieve such consistency. In the event of disagreement over the content of the agency's draft regulatory program, the agency head or the Director may raise issues for further review by the President or by such appropriate Cabinet Council or other forum as the President may designate.

Sec. 4. Office of Management and Budget. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget is authorized, to the extent permitted by law, to take such actions as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this Order.

With your help and active support, this Administration has substantially reduced the burden and intrusiveness of Federal regulatory programs. In the past three years, we have eliminated many needless rules, revised ill-conceived ones, and held the number of new rules to the minimum necessary. The policies and procedures of Executive Order No. 12291 have imposed long needed discipline on the rulemaking process. As a result, Federal paperwork and the size of the Federal Register have declined for four consecutive years -- for the first time ever. Our accomplishments so far have been substantial, and we can take pride in them.

Much more can and should be done, however. Regulation has become one of the most important and costly activities of government, yet it is managed far less systematically than direct government spending. Several statutes and Executive Order No. 12291 establish procedures for agency rulemaking, but this is only the final stage of the regulatory process. Developing a government rule often involves years of studies, hearings, and intermediate decisions before even a proposed rule is issued for public comment. Frequently, senior agency officials are involved only after these earlier activities have greatly narrowed the options for final action and precluded effective Administration policy review.

Today, I have signed an Executive Order to establish a regulatory planning process by which we will develop and publish the Administration's Regulatory Program for each year. Under this process, it will be the personal responsibility of the head of each agency to determine -- at the beginning of the regulatory process, not at the end -- whether a given regulatory venture is consistent with the goals of the Administration and whether agency resources should be committed to it. Each agency head will thus be accountable for the management of the regulatory process, to ensure that policy options are not narrowed prematurely and that each significant regulatory proposal will be considered in relation to others.

To do this, I am requesting each regulatory agency to draft its proposed regulatory policies at the beginning of each year and to set forth a statement of priority regulatory activities, including prerulemaking actions, that constitute the agency's regulatory program for the year. This document should explain how each new activity will carry out the regulatory policies of this Administration and specify the agency's plan for reviewing and revising existing regulatory programs to bring them into accord with Administration policies.

After approval by the head of the agency, the agency's draft regulatory program should be submitted for review by the Office of Management and Budget. This review should focus on consistency with general Administration policy, and with the draft regulatory programs submitted by other agencies. The Office of Management and Budget will circulate a draft of the Administration's Regulatory Program for agency comment, review, and interagency consideration if necessary before the document is put in final form for publication. Issues may be raised for further review by a Cabinet Council or by me or by such other group as I may designate. This review will not interfere with the exercise of authority committed by statute to heads of agencies.

Budget in May as the Administration's Regulatory Program for the twelve-month period beginning April 1, 1985. During the year, this document will be used as a basis for reviews of individual rules under Executive Order No. 12291. At the end of the year, it should be used to assess the agency's performance and to prepare the next year's program.

I am directing the Director of the Office of Management and Budget to implement this regulatory review process immediately and to establish the procedures under which these documents will be submitted to the Director and reviewed. For their first submission, agencies shall submit their draft regulatory program to the Director on the date specified by him. The Director will prepare for my consideration the goals and priorities for all agencies in a manner similar to the identification of significant issues in the fiscal budgetary process.

I am convinced that this process will result in substantial improvements in Federal regulatory policy. It will help ensure that each major step in the process of rule development is consistent with Administration policy. It will enable agency heads to manage agency regulatory actions more effectively, at the same time that it enables the President to hold agency heads more closely accountable for implementing Administration policy.

The 1983 Revision constitutes a partial revision of the Radio Regulations (Geneva, 1979) to which the United States is a party. The primary purpose of the present revision is to update the existing Regulations to take into account introduction of advanced techniques for maritime mobile, distress and safety communications. The Revision is consistent with the proposals of and positions taken by the United States at the 1983 World Administrative Radio Conference for the Mobile Services of the International Telecommunication Union.

At the time of signature, the United States Delegation submitted a statement countering an unfounded political allegation of Cuba. The specific statement, with reason, is given in the report of the Department of State.

Telecommunication Union of their approval thereof. I believe that the United States should become a party to the 1983 Partial Revision as soon as possible, and it is my hope that the Senate will take early action on this matter and give its advice and consent to ratification.

I'm going to read a statement, and then, since there is a press conference tomorrow night, I want to tell you that we will not be taking any questions on the subject of the statement or anything else, and I'll see you tomorrow night.

They both compiled outstanding records of achievement. Each has indicated to me that while willing to serve in whatever capacity I would wish, each would welcome an opportunity to assume new responsibilities and new challenges. After 4 grueling years in their current positions, their desire for change is completely understandable.

This particular change will allow them each to meet new challenges and will bring renewed vigor to their respective responsibilities, while it gives me and the public the benefit of the continued service of two extraordinarily talented individuals.

While both men are admirably suited for their current positions, each is extremely well suited for his new assignment. Don Regan is a proven successful administrator. He has broad domestic and international experience. He has now gained extensive Washington experience, and he enjoys the respect of Members of the Congress and the Cabinet.

Jim Baker is a proven, successful member of our national security, legislative, and economic policymaking teams, and he would bring to Treasury not only his extensive Washington experience but also more than two decades of private sector experience with corporate law and finance. I'm confident that this change can be effected smoothly and that it will contribute substantially to the success of our second term.

Secretary Regan has served as a member of the Policy Committee of the Business Roundtable, as a member of the Council on Foreign Relations, and as a trustee of the Committee for Economic Development. He has also served as chairman of the trustees of the University of Pennsylvania.

Since my last report to you, leaders of the two Cypriot communities have completed a series of proximity talks with United Nations Secretary General Perez de Cuellar in New York. Those talks resulted in the Secretary General's announcement on December 12, 1984, that the differences between the parties' positions have been narrowed sufficiently to permit the scheduling of a summit meeting. President Kyprianou and Turkish Cypriot leader Denktash are now scheduled to meet January 17 in New York. The Secretary General has said he expects the two, at that time, to conclude an agreement containing the elements necessary for a solution to the Cyprus problem.

Council on the occasion of that vote includes his description of the progress made under his good offices mandate as well as the status of U.N. forces on the island. I am enclosing with this letter a copy of the Secretary General's informative report.

We have worked closely with the Secretary General and with all parties to the Cyprus question during the period, urging their cooperation and encouraging them to make progress. The Administration is pleased with the statesmanlike approach of both Cypriot parties that led to the announcement of the summit. We will continue to consult closely with Secretary General Perez de Cuellar, offering him any assistance we can to assure a successful meeting in January and continuing progress toward a fair and lasting Cyprus settlement.

The President. Well, let me just say there isn't too much I can tell you right at the moment. But I have just finished talking to George Shultz, and the meetings are concluded. And in 45 minutes, by our time, George will be addressing the press over there, making a statement to the press and probably taking some of their questions.

The President. Yes, this is all this meeting was supposed to do is to establish procedures for negotiations. I'm afraid some of the people overlook that. And I'd flinch a little when I would see references, and particularly on the air, as if this was supposed to be the arms negotiation. No, this was to set up the procedures.

Q. Okay. I guess we'll switch it to domestic issues. The Senate Republicans are planning to put out a budget several days before you put out your budget. And there has been information from White House officials in recent days that they don't think you'll be able to reach the targets that had been established about a month or so ago for deficit reduction. Do you think that this process is moving away from the White House? Do you think there's some danger you may be dealt out of this process?

I think that in working together they may have some ideas we didn't have. But, no, what our goal is, and what we hope to present to the Congress in our budget proposal is one in which the overall spending will be no greater in `86 than it was in `85. Now, that means that because some things are inflexible, such as the interest on the debt, that there will be some particular parts of government that will be getting less money. There may be some that we think ought to be eliminated. And so it won't be a freeze in the sense of freezing every item of spending in the budget at its previous level -- some will be increased; some will be decreased; some will be eliminated. But the total we're aiming at will be no increase in overall spending.

They're saying that because of your feeling that defense spending has to grow at the rate, or close to the rate intended, and because of what you've said about Social Security and other things like that, that it's impossible to reach even that goal.

Department itself has come in with a bigger cut than had been asked in the original plan that came over from OMB. The difficulty there, however, is in the out years. And I think that Defense has a legitimate argument about not setting figures. Now, you know we're required anymore by Congress -- and I have to tell you, having been 8 years in the budgeting process in California, I do not look with great favor upon this idea that you're supposed to project for the next 5 years what your budgets are going to be.

And with Defense, their argument is that no one, with regard to defense spending, can tell you what the necessities are going to be down the road or in years ahead. What if a potential adversary does something in the coming year that forces your hand to have to meet, in some way, with an additional defense capability or whatever? So Defense has done it for this year, and then has expressed the inability -- they have to project some figures, but those figures are meaningless for the out years. But they've done that.

Now, as for Social Security, here again I'd like to point out with regard to Social Security that while Social Security is included in the unified budget -- and that, again, by an edict of Congress -- Social Security is totally funded by a payroll tax. And that payroll tax cannot be used for any other part of government. In other words, if you somehow reduced Social Security -- actually, Social Security's running a surplus over and above its present income, but that surplus goes into their trust fund. It cannot be used to fund some other department of government.

Q. There's been some indication that an administration official who met with a group of reporters yesterday indicated that you might be willing to accept some kind of freeze on cost-of-living adjustments for Social Security recipients if Congress gets together on the idea.

The President. No, I think whoever that individual was referring to was someplace here in our own meetings -- and there have been hours of them on the budget thing. My own remark on one occasion that, obviously, if Congress was -- because there were stories that Congress was targeting and said something should be done about that -- that if Congress, en masse came down on the side of, say, reducing or holding off on the COLA, the cost-of-living increase, you know, what would I be able to do about that?

Now, a veto is only possible if there's a chance that your veto would be upheld. And I never remark about possible vetoes until whatever legislation we're talking about comes down to my desk and I see it. But that was the only remark. But again, as I say, you can't blame any of the deficit on Social Security.

The President. No, I feel committed to what I said about Social Security before: That this attempt during the campaign, as they did in 1982, to charge that I had secret plans for reducing Social Security -- I had no such plans, I have no such plans, and I see no reason to target Social Security when it plays no part in the deficit.

Q. Some of the conservatives in town have been watching what's been going on with your administration, especially since the election, and they see Bill Clark is going to go back to California, and they see that Ed Meese is going to go to the Justice Department, and from their initial comments, they're not going to be any much more happy with Don Regan than they are with Jim Baker. And they're afraid that there are not going to be any true believers in this White House in the second term. Should they be concerned?

The President. No, I don't think so, because the true believer in the White House is sitting here in the Oval Office. And no one has been whittling at me or trying to change my philosophy since I've been here.

But now, the case, for example, of Ed Meese going over to Justice. Well, he's been a Counsellor to me, and we've been together for a great many years, as you well know. Well, being my Attorney General -- [laughing] -- does not remove him from my being able to seek his counsel whenever I feel like doing so.

As for Don Regan coming over here, I don't know how anyone can complain about him, ideologically or philosophically. He has been as loyal to everything that I've wanted to do as anyone that I could name.

The President. We'll be talking again after the Inaugural. I could quite understand. She's been longer in her post at the U.N. than anyone who ever held that job. And it is a job in which you can find yourself saying, ``Enough, already.'' But I am hoping that I can keep her in the administration.

The President. Well, Ed's going to be here. As I say, he's within reach. He'll still be a member of the Cabinet. He'll just be sitting in a different chair. And Mike, I can understand his wanting to leave now for the private sector. But this isn't as many changes as some administrations have had.

The President. Yes. And I have been gratified by that, because everyone that I asked to serve, I told them, as I told the public, that I recognize that they -- many of them, most of them -- would be coming at a great personal sacrifice. And I could not expect them to contract in for the run of the show. And so they've all known that when the time came that they felt they had to return to their own lives, I would understand, and I'd try to replace them with someone equally qualified.

The President. Well, Don came and we had a talk about it, and then I had a talk with Jim. I wanted to make sure that this was something that both of them were very happy about and wanted to do. And frankly, I thought it was a great idea. It sure beat having them decide to go back to private life.

The President. I'm going to speak of the need for simplifying taxes. I'm not going to get into great details, as I will in the subsequent State of the Union Address. But the tax program -- and incidentally, some of your colleagues in the press and particularly columnists have been sniping that I'm dangling in the wind here, and all the momentum has stopped because we haven't been doing anything with that. That's not true.

We realized, all of us agreed, that the first priority had to be the budget. And we've been spending hours and hours -- we've had no time to go on to something else. When that's done, then we go at the tax program. And that's one that -- just like the budget -- we're going to have to look at everything that has been recommended, treat some of them, I'm sure, as options, and then decide what form we want to take. I think it's been one of the best tax studies that's ever been made.

The President. Well, we haven't had time to do as we've done with the budget, to sit down with it and say, ``All right, point by point, let's go through it.'' I haven't even done that. I have a copy of the plan on my desk. And while I've read a summary, I haven't been able to do that because my mind is too filled with the budget.

It's only fair to do as we will with some programs and say to the people, ``Look, this program is going to either disappear down here or be reduced down sizably in the years ahead,'' to give people a chance to adjust to this.

So, yes, we have hit upon a plan of putting us on a declining path as far as the deficits are concerned to the point that we will be able to project a date certain at which the budget will be balanced. And then I would hope -- and before then -- I would hope that we would make it constitutionally impossible for the Government to run another deficit.

And the great search for leaks, and the premature billing of something as a fact when many times it isn't a fact, this can become a problem. It can become a problem, for example, on the international scene to take a leak, some information from someone who won't let their name be used, and to take this as valid enough to print on the front page of a paper, and then leave us with having to mend fences with some friendly government that is offended by this misinformation.

I guess all that I would like to say is that I wish that the media that does so much of that -- that portion of the media -- I wish that they would have an ethic in which they would check that out with us to see whether it, in some way, might be harmful to our national security, and take our word for it if we said that it would be. And we'd be willing to explain why it would be. Then we might not have so many incidents that do cause us problems and set back, sometimes, programs that have been going forward.

The President. [Laughing] No. No, I'll tell you, we knew personally, Nancy and I, the gentleman out in California that did this for the Los Angeles Times. And so, knowing him and all, it used to be fun in the morning, in the morning with the paper -- and it's easy for me, because I always read the comics, and they put it on the same page as the comics -- that I would take delight in telling Nancy what her day was going to be, and -- [laughing] -- and what mine was supposed to be, and so forth.

Earlier today on his return from Geneva, Secretary Shultz reported to me on the full details of his discussions with Soviet Foreign Minister Gromyko over this past January 7th and 8th. As you're aware, his meeting with Mr. Gromyko has resulted in agreement between our two nations to begin new negotiations on nuclear and space arms. Our objective in these talks will be the reduction of nuclear arms and the strengthening of strategic stability. Our ultimate goal, of course, is the complete elimination of nuclear weapons.

Our differences with the Soviets are many and profound. And these new negotiations will be difficult as we grapple with the issues so central to peace and security for ourselves, our allies, and the world. But we will persevere. And while we must continue to resist actions by the Soviet Union that threaten our freedom and vital interests or those of other nations, we must also be prepared to work together wherever possible to strengthen the peace.

Today it's my hope that this week's meeting in Geneva, while only a single step, is the beginning of a new dialog between the United States and the Soviet Union. It's also my hope that as 1985 unfolds, this year will emerge as one of dialog and negotiations, a year that leads to better relations between the United States and the Soviet Union.

I believe a more stable peace is achievable through these negotiations, and I urge all Americans to join us in supporting this search for a more stable peace. But it takes two sides to have constructive negotiations; one side alone cannot do it. We've made clear our intentions and expectations for progress in U.S.-Soviet relations. Secretary Shultz has reinforced that message in his lengthy sessions with Mr. Gromyko. For our part we'll be flexible, patient, and determined, and we now look to the Soviet Union to help give new life and positive results to that process of dialog.

The President.  --  -- because it gives a false impression of what it is we're talking about -- but that will be on the table with everything else, of course. There are no preconditions with regard to the talks that we're going to have.

But this is research, a research program, and it is within the provisions of the ABM treaty. So, all that we've made clear is that we're going forward on the research, but we've also made it clear that if that research does come up, as we hope, with something that could be the defensive weapon we're talking about, nonnuclear, then we would be willing to go into negotiations and discussions with the other nations of the world, and with our allies, about what to do about that and whether and how to deploy.

Q. Mr. President, in the past you have characterized the Soviet Union as an evil empire, and you have said that they have repeatedly violated the arms agreements that they have made with the United States. Some of your advisers today doubt that the technology exists to adequately verify any agreement. Do you believe verification is possible, or do you think the Soviets will try to violate any agreement you might make?

The President. Well, we know that they have had a past record of violating agreements. We know also that absolute verification is impossible, but verification to the extent possible is going to be a very necessary feature in our negotiations. And I would like to also point out that because they themselves have expressed the desire to totally eliminate nuclear weapons, zero nuclear weapons is far easier to verify than if you're simply reducing the numbers. To have to continue trying to count numbers is much more difficult.

Q. Mr. President, thank you. Senate Republicans and the leadership and one of your top advisers both have said Social Security cost-of-living allowances are not necessarily untouchable in the effort to reduce the budget deficit. Is the Social Security COLA off limits, as you promised during the campaign, or is it negotiable?

The President. Well, Gary, I never specifically mentioned that. I did say, however, that I would resist anything that would reduce the payments and the benefits which, it had been intimated in the campaign -- you will remember I was responding to charges that I had some secret plot and plan to do that. I had no such plan, and I am resisting of this.

I think what someone has taken is a comment in one of our own meetings about the present budget, based on some news reports that up on the Hill there was widespread feeling about freezing the COLA's in Social Security. And all I commented on was that we might be faced with an overwhelming bipartisan majority in both Houses in support of that. Well, I don't talk about what I would or would not veto until something reaches my desk, but I think I would have to look at that situation and what I was faced with, with regard to a possible congressional mandate.

Social Security is not a part of the deficit problem. It is totally financed by a payroll tax, and that tax is totally dedicated to that one program. If Social Security's spending were reduced, you could not take that money saved and use it to fund some other program in the deficit. It would simply go back into the Social Security trust fund.

Q. Mr. President, a man in a subway in New York City took a gun and shot four youths who apparently were trying to shake him down. Without reference to that specific case, since it is in the courts, what do you think of the use of deadly force in trying to defend oneself against attack?

In general, I think we all can understand the frustration of people who are constantly threatened by crime and feel that law and order is not particularly protecting them. On the other hand, I think we all realize there is a breakdown of civilization if people start taking the law in their own hands.

So, while we may feel understanding or sympathy for someone who was tested beyond his control, his ability to control himself, at the same time, we have to abide by the law and stand for law and order.

The President. Well, there apparently are some centers of crime and places where criminals have found happy hunting more than others. But, actually, we've been making sizable progress in the last few years with regard to law enforcement. For the first time, I think, since the crime statistics have been kept, in the last 2 years, they have gone down, 2 years in a row in regard to serious crime. So, a lot of it, I think, depends on all of us in our insisting on law and order.

I don't blame the police so much for what we've seen over the years as a kind of an attitude in the whole structure of judicial and everyplace else in crime in which it seemed that we got overzealous in protecting the criminals' rights and forgot about the victim. And I think if we have stricter enforcement and stricter punishment, we'll continue to see decline in crime.

Q. Mr. President, have you painted yourself into a corner with your campaign promises to raise taxes only over your dead body, not to cut Social Security, and to keep up defense spending? The majority leader in your own party in the Senate is talking about writing his own budget, and it appears to many people that you have walked away from the deficit problem and the budget problem and are going to leave it to Congress.

Congress. And I don't mind if they want to do what they're doing and have some plans of their own or suggesting some. Maybe they've got some ideas we hadn't thought of. And I'd be very happy to look at theirs as well as ours.

First of all, I think that the risk of a tax increase, of slowing down the economy, and putting us right back in a pattern that we've had since World War II, eight recessions in a row, and every recession led to the next one being worse and inflation higher and unemployment greater and so forth. We have made a great start on a recovery that is based on sound principles and not on artificially stimulating the economy. We're going to stay with a plan of that kind.

I think that a tax increase would be counterproductive. And I think also that today -- even though you all had to report that there was a fraction of a percent of increase in the unemployment rate for December over November, I'd like to point out that -- and the statisticians always do puzzle me -- however, there were 340,000 more people employed in the United States in December than were employed in November. But, evidently, there were more new entrants to the job market. But we have more people employed today.

Q. Mr. President, you said after your reelection you did not want to break up a winning team. Yet your three top assistants are leaving the White House, and Mr. Deaver and Mr. Clark are leaving the administration entirely. Are you going into your second term with a second-string team, and aren't you going to feel a little lonely without your longtime California aides?

The President. Well, of course. I'll miss any one of those -- we've been a fine team -- and any that feel they have to leave. But it was no great surprise to me. I said from the beginning that I wanted people to take these positions in government, but I was not setting any time limit as to how long they had to stay. I know that some people can only stay a short time, and then they have to return to their own private lives and careers. And I said that I would then go out and find someone to replace them when that time came.

He didn't. Due to me, he was on the California State Supreme Court. He's given 18 years to public life, away from his private life, and he told me a couple of years ago, and he stayed on at -- when I urged him at that particular time to do so, for a while. But I've understood that he was coming to the point that he wanted to -- and would -- return.

The President. Chris, I think that would be way ahead of ourselves. We don't even know what kind of a weapon -- if we're able to come up with one -- that this would be. Now, I think maybe some of you have been looking at those drawings on your TV news programs at night in which you've already got a picture of the weapon -- and I can see it shooting missiles down, and it looks so easy. We don't know. That's why when I said ``Star Wars'' and criticized it, I never mentioned space or anything. I don't know. I'm not a scientist.

I said, all through history we've always been able to come up with a defensive weapon. Isn't it worth researching to see if there isn't some weapon that is more humane and moral than saying that the only defense we have in the nuclear age is that if they kill tens of millions of our people, we'll kill tens of millions of theirs?

We're searching for a weapon that might destroy nuclear weapons, not be nuclear itself -- destroy weapons, not people. And if we come up with such a thing, then is a time to turn to the world, to our allies, possibly even our adversaries, and say, ``Look, we now have this.'' And if we haven't by that time eliminated nuclear weapons entirely, this could be a big contributing factor to bringing that about.

The President. No, no. One of the three phases that has been agreed upon in what I think is a most successful meeting in Geneva is that we will be talking in three groups about strategic nuclear weapons -- these are offensive weapons -- about strategic intermediate-range weapons -- again offensive -- and there will be a third sector where we will be talking about defense and space, whether it has to do with weapons shooting things down that are in space or whether it's weapons in space shooting down.

And, as I say, what we're doing with this research -- and the Soviets had no argument about that, they couldn't argue about it -- is to research, continue researching -- is within the provisions of the ABM treaty.

The President. No. I feel that a tax increase, as I say, would be counterproductive and would set us back in the very thing that we have accomplished in these first 4 years and intend to carry on, and that is an economic expansion.

With regard to defense, here again I have to say, defense is not a program in which we can determine what we want to spend. That is dictated by outside influences, things outside our country. And I would like to point out that the Defense Department has come in on its own, voluntarily, with a bigger cut than had been asked of it for the first year, for 1986.

Now, they point out -- and I think I support them in this -- very logically that it is impossible to make a projection over 3 or 5 years as to what you will spend in those outyears. What if some development on the other side of the ocean absolutely makes it necessary for us to do something that we can't even contemplate now with regard to national security? So, all Defense has asked is do not pin them down to the outyears, but to accept that here, in good faith, they have come up with, as I say, a bigger increase [decrease] than was asked.

And may I call your attention to something else -- and maybe you'd like to rally around and help with a few editorials. I think this policy sometime ago of the Congress demanding that the President submit a budget and then, based on that budget, submit projections for what the government budgets are going to be for the next 5 years -- there isn't any economist in the world who can do that and accurately tell you what you're going to need down the road. And I'd like to point out that all of the projections that we inherited went out the window. They didn't match what we're doing now, and I think it is enough -- I know that most of the States get along just fine with constitutional provisions that they can't have deficits and with the Governors having to present a budget for that year, and a budget then when the next year comes around. And those projections, frankly, I pay no attention to them.

The President. No, we're going to reach our goal. We're going to submit a budget that sets us on that declining path. And, as I say, our aim is a budget that is based on -- that will be no more than the money spent in 1985. And that's our target, and we intend to meet that target.

There are a couple of things we can't control -- for example, the interest on the debt. So, we have to make allowances in other areas and find cuts that we can make there. It would be very simple if the budget was of such a nature that you could simply say everybody spend the same amount of money next year. We can't. Some are going to spend more, some are going to spend less, and some we're just going to wipe out entirely.

The President. Well, to have a meeting, as I said before, just to have a meeting doesn't make any sense. Now, in this next month or so, we're all supposed to get together and find out when the negotiations can start and where. If, at any time, a reason arises in which a summit could be helpful in that or in other matters, and a carefully planned agenda created which they, themselves, have said is necessary, I'm perfectly willing, and have been all this time, to go to a summit meeting.

I don't think it would make much sense simply to say, ``Well, now that we're going to talk about these other things, let's have a meeting just to get acquainted.'' That builds up people's hopes. And some previous Presidents have done that and found that the letdown was very terrible.

The President. No, they had a very carefully planned agenda. And, incidentally, there was no infighting among our group, and 15 people that went over there as the total delegation were in complete unanimity in their support of what we arrived at. And they were, all of them, experts in their fields. And there has been no infighting, as some have suggested, about what we were going to talk about there.

And there was very careful planning, and my last meeting with George and Bud McFarlane was just a few hours before they got on the plane to go over there. But we had agreed upon what our agenda was going to be and what our demands were.

Q. Mr. President, the time is drawing near when you will have to certify to Congress whether there's a need to continue supplying aid to the rebel forces inside Nicaragua. And I'd like to ask if you intend to press on with this program when that date comes, or do you see any reason or any developments that have occurred, that would permit the United States to drop this covert aid program.

The President. Well, Jerry, as you know, I shouldn't be talking about anything that is supposed to be covert, but I will say this: that our plans, we have no plans for abandoning the overall ideas of help such as were created by the Kissinger commission down there -- program proposed for over about the next 5 years to help those nations that are trying to become democracies to be democracies, and to support the people of Nicaragua, who, I have to point out, are governed by a group that took over by force -- ousted others that had been fighting for a revolution. And I think that -- and they are supporting the guerrillas that are trying to overthrow the duly elected Government of El Salvador. And, no, we're not retreating from what we feel are obligations there in Central America at all.

The President. Well, we have been holding to that and thought that it would be helpful in now what we're planning and going forward with. We have been eliminating some of the older missiles and taking out of service some of the submarines. We will continue on that ground.

The development of the Trident is not so much in the sense of adding to the nuclear force as it is in modernizing it, replacing older, less accurate missiles and submarines with not quite the capacity of the Trident. So, yes, we feel that we can live within it.

Remember, the SALT II is nothing but a limitation on how fast you increase weapons, which is one of the reasons why I was in support of a Senate -- even though I wasn't here at the time -- that refused to ratify it. And that's why my belief is that the type of negotiations we're suggesting are the only ones that make sense. Don't just limit the rate of increase; reduce the number of weapons.

Q. Well, Mr. President, your aides have said that they have some innovative, interesting ideas if the negotiations are resumed. What are your ideas? Defensive weapons aside, what are your ideas for reducing offensive systems, ideas that were not put forward in the negotiations that were aborted and that could offer some hope for progress in this new round of negotiations?

The President.  Well, I don't want to give away anything in advance, the things that belong at the negotiating table. But, yes, one of the things that we've made clear to the Soviets is that we recognize there may be differences with regard to the mix of weapons on both sides. And we're prepared to deal with that problem, and where, perhaps, we have something that is an advantage to us, they have something that's an advantage to them, to discuss tradeoffs in that area.

It is true that when we first went into the strategic missile negotiations, we believed that the top priority should be land-based missiles. But the Soviets made it plain that they weren't following our pattern of mix of missiles, that they placed more reliance than we did on the land-based. And they didn't wait for us when we told them that we were willing to -- okay, to deal with them on that problem. They went home anyway and didn't come back.

Mr. President, you started the workweek with a number of surprises and changes in your staff. I'm wondering, now that you have the opportunity, if you wouldn't like to get any other personnel changes off your chest, such as the change in -- a replacement for Mr. Clark. Is it true, for example, that Mr. Hodel is going to replace him?

The President. I think that there will be other things talked about other than just weapons. And, yes. But let me make it plain about detente. That is a word that -- been a little abused in the past in some ways.

The President. We did not and I -- well, I can't say whether we voiced our opinion of those in these meetings. They very well could have in the long hours of those meetings. But, no, all of those things -- and we've made it very clear to them what our opinion is of some of those practices.

Q. Mr. President, are you about to name former President Richard Nixon to a post in your administration, perhaps as a roving ambassador of some sort, or perhaps somehow involved in the upcoming arms negotiations?

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. In light of the changes in jobs between Mr. Regan and Mr. Baker, do you now plan to make a greater push on simplifying the tax system, and do you think it has a better chance of getting congressional approval?

Now, I know that some have suggested that maybe we're putting that on a back burner. No. We have been so busy, and we put top priority on getting the budget ready. And with regard to that tax study made by the Treasury Department, they now are also getting input from various sectors of the business world out there in society and also dealing with people on the Hill. I believe that there are -- they recognize that there are things in there that may be options to choose or not to accept.

And as soon as we get the budget in shape and presented, then we will go into the same lengthy process we've been in on the budget, only this time on the tax simplification, because we're determined that we're going forward on these tracks. But it is a two-track approach. We're not sending them up there as a package that somehow people can begin trading between one and the other.

The President is today announcing his intention to nominate four distinguished members of the administration to new positions. The nominations are Donald P. Hodel to be Secretary of the Interior, John S. Herrington to be Secretary of Energy, William J. Bennett to be Secretary of Education, and Richard G. Darman to be Deputy Secretary of the Treasury. The nominations will be transmitted to the Senate at an early date.

The President believes these nominees will provide exceptionally strong leadership in the second term of his administration. They are men of proven ability who have served in key positions within the Government. They will make a strong team even stronger.

In conjunction with these nominations, the President has directed Mr. Hodel and Mr. Herrington, once confirmed, to commence a study of their respective departments and to propose reorganizational options to the President. These options should be designed to recognize the interrelationship of energy, natural resource, and defense policies. The President is committed to maximizing effective management and efficiency in the natural resource area.

The President. Because Belgium, like the United States, is a member of NATO. Belgium has long been an important member and played a prominent role in the NATO alliance. As an alliance member, Belgium committed itself in 1979 to go forward with NATO's two-track approach to deployment and arms control regarding intermediate-range nuclear forces. This major decision was necessitated by the new and unprovoked threat to the West represented by the Soviet Union's buildup in SS - 20 missiles, a buildup which is still going on. The deployment of cruise missiles in Belgium is a sovereign question for the Government and people of your country to decide. But it was alliance solidarity behind NATO's two-track decision that helped to bring the Soviets back to negotiations, and alliance solidarity behind the dual track approach is crucial to our prospects for success in renewed negotiations. We hope Belgium will act with its commitments under NATO's 1979 decision in mind.

The President. As I said, alliance solidarity in proceeding with deployment is a major reason why the Soviets decided to return to Geneva. Our European allies fully appreciate this relationship between deployment and arms control. Our negotiating prospects would be seriously weakened if the Soviets believe they can get what they want in some other way than engaging seriously in a negotiating process leading to a balanced and verifiable arms control agreement.

This brings us to the question of public opinion in Belgium and throughout Europe. I can understand why some European polls, including the recent one that you published, suggest public concern about the deployments. The fact is that most people don't fully take into account the Soviet missile buildup in which the Soviets have more than a thousand warheads aimed at Western Europe. They launched an enormous disinformation campaign to persuade the people of Europe that somehow NATO is at fault for beginning to redress the balance in Europe. Our allies can help by standing firm and by making sure their publics understand the truth in this situation.

The President. The share of the common defense burden our European allies are shouldering varies. The United States is certainly doing its fair share for alliance security, although assessing national defense contributions is not nearly as simple as adding up money spent. One thing is clear -- massive and growing Soviet military capabilities threaten the credibility of NATO's deterrent.

The President. Well, first let me explain that this program is one of vigorous research focused on advanced defensive technologies with the aim of finding ways to provide a better basis for deterring aggression, strengthen strategic stability, and increasing the security of the United States and our allies.

In March 1983 I made clear in my original speech on the Strategic Defense Initiative, which we call SDI, that no change in technology can or will alter our commitments to our allies. I have repeatedly stated our commitment to NATO, and I am pleased to reaffirm that commitment here.

In 1979 NATO agreed that the best way to resolve any doubts about ``decoupling'' was to go forward with a two-track approach of deployments and arms control of intermediate-range nuclear forces. Alliance solidarity on all issues of deterrence is essential, both for our collective security and for arms control prospects.

In the course of these exchanges we hope that it will be possible to make clear how nonnuclear systems may, over time, offer us the chance to move away from reliance upon offensive forces which threaten massive destruction and, perhaps one day, move closer to reliance upon nonnuclear defense systems. We are very conscious in the United States that this will not occur overnight; that perhaps by the turn of the century, however, this evolution may be possible.

Between now and then, we will have to rely upon existing forces on both sides. But perhaps in the process we can come to an understanding of how these forces can be reduced and, over time, nonnuclear, nonthreatening defensive elements can be introduced.

The President. We understand the importance of exports, especially to countries like Belgium, and fully support the lowering of trade barriers. In this regard we are working hard to cooperate on a number of export requests from Belgian firms involving U.S. technology.

With regard to the broader question, we remain concerned about the Soviets acquiring advanced technology with potential military application. It simply doesn't make sense to give our adversaries technology that they could then use to threaten the West.

The President. It was a great pleasure to meet Prime Minister Martens today and to discuss with him a number of matters of mutual concern. As befitting the traditionally close relations between our two free countries, our talks were both friendly and productive.

Belgium is one of our oldest, closest, and most valuable allies. The Prime Minister and I devoted considerable attention to the current state of East-West relations, focusing on the importance of continued allied solidarity and resolve. We agreed on the value of improving East-West relations and achieving meaningful arms reductions. In this regard, I was pleased to review with the Prime Minister the results of the recent Geneva talks and to discuss the prospects for future progress.

We recognize that the progress that we're now enjoying in arms control discussions is linked to the alliance's commitment to modernize our defenses and the steps we've taken to maintain a balance of nuclear forces in Europe. And that's why we give special emphasis to an issue of central concern to the NATO alliance -- the deployment of intermediate-range nuclear forces in Western Europe to counter Soviet SS - 20 deployments. At the same time, we both place a high priority on finding a responsible means of reducing the arsenals of nuclear weapons that now threaten humankind.

In a related question, the Prime Minister and I examined the problem of transfer of technology from the West to potential adversaries. We reaffirmed our willingness to work closely together and with our other allies to establish guidelines consistent with our security interests in this vital area.

And finally, I'd like to note the high level of respect and affection that is apparent in our meetings today. The Prime Minister and the people of Belgium are good friends and solid allies, and we're grateful for this chance to exchange ideas. It was a pleasure to have Prime Minister Martens, Foreign Minister Tindemans, and all the official party here.

Reagan, and I am most satisfied with the talks that Foreign Minister Tindemans and myself had here in Washington. Our talks were based on the common values we share and in which we believe, and they were held in an atmosphere of frankness and friendship.

For my part, I want to stress five points: First, the outcome of the recent talks in Geneva is a first, positive step towards arms reduction negotiations, aiming at establishing a balance of forces at the lowest possible level. I especially value the fact that according to the preoccupations we expressed, the INF problem was given full consideration during these negotiations.

Europe depends essentially on the solidarity and the joint efforts of the American and European allies. Concerning INF, I confirmed our attachment to the dual track decision which is an expression of firmness in defense and of openness for dialog.

Four, the smaller NATO countries contribute in an important way to our common defense. I feel that Belgium made the substantial effort in order to bring about the resumption of the Geneva dialog. In this regard, I refer to Mr. Tindemans' and my own contacts with East European countries and to the early suggestions we made there on how to restart negotiations on arms control and disarmament.

Five, in the economic field, the cohesion of the alliance would be strengthened by further eliminating protectionism in our trade relations and by perfecting the procedures of our common approach towards East-West trade.

America was founded by men and women who shared a vision of the value of each and every individual. Our forebears strove to build a nation in which the dignity of every person was respected and the rights of all were secure. Our laws have sought to foster and protect human life at all its stages.

Legal acceptance of abortion imperils this cherished tradition. By permitting the destruction of unborn children throughout the term of pregnancy, our laws have brought about an inestimable loss of human life and potential. Yet the tragedy of abortion extends beyond the loss of the nearly 17 million children who have been robbed of the gift of life. This tragedy is multifaceted -- inflicting emotional harm on women, denying prospective adoptive couples the joy of sharing their loving homes with children, and eroding respect for the most fundamental of rights, the right to life.

No cause is more important than restoring respect for this right because the freedoms we hold so dear cannot endure as long as some lives are regarded as unworthy of protection. Nor can our commitment to defend the dignity of all persons survive if we remain indifferent to the destruction of 1.5 million children each year in the United States.

This respect for life is evident in communities throughout our Nation where people are reaching out, in a spirit of understanding and helping, to women with crisis pregnancies and to those who bear the spiritual and emotional scars of abortion. Such efforts strengthen the bonds of affection and obligation that unite us and assure that the family, the primary guardian of life and human values, will continue to be the foundation of our society.

If America is to remain what God, in His wisdom, intended for it to be -- a refuge, a safe haven for those seeking human rights -- then we must once again extend the most basic human right to the most vulnerable members of the human family. We must commit ourselves to a future in which the right to life of every human being -- no matter how weak, no matter how small, no matter how defenseless -- is protected by our laws and public policy.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 14th day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

For the past 4 years Michael Evans has been our official White House photographer, snapping the parade of events at the Executive Mansion and traveling with us around the world. Mike has captured everything from Cabinet meetings to Easter egg rolls, and his thousands of pictures provide a full and fascinating record of the hard work, exhilaration, and pageantry of American government.

And yet, in the course of his duties, Mike saw the need for another kind of record -- one that would focus entirely on individuals. In these pictures there would be no seals of office, no shots of executives behind their desks or journalists at their typewriters. There would be no flags, no gardens, no tall, white pillars. Each subject would simply stand before a backdrop of plain gray.

American democracy, for they show men and women of all backgrounds and walks of life. And although these people are helping to govern the most prosperous and powerful nation in history, you can examine all 600 pictures without once finding an arrogant or imperial gaze.

In the words of George Will, ``Representative governments are, well, awfully representative, at least in this sense: They are made up of folks who look like and are like most other folks. The portraits testify, I think, to democracies' pleasantness.'' End of George Will quote.

Consider, for example, the portrait of the senior Senator from Mississippi. John Stennis first came to the Congress when the family that lived in the White House was named Truman and before half the Americans now alive were even born. For almost four decades he has played a central role in all the great events of our national life. Yet his portrait shows, despite all those years of exercising power, John Stennis has remained what he was at the outset -- a man of gentleness, courage, and conviction.

Pause for a moment before the portrait of Barbara Bush. During the first 4 years of our administration Barbara traveled with her husband some 600,000 miles. She's been a staunch supporter of a great Vice President and our administration, and in her portrait we see Barbara Bush as she always is -- intelligent, charming, gracious.

So, there we have it -- a comprehensive portrait of the men and women involved in the government of our great Republic during this fleeting but crucial moment in our history. Tonight we will enjoy these pictures; future generations will treasure them.

When Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., began his career, the principles of social justice for which he stood were very controversial. But by the end of his career, he was a deeply respected leader of international stature who helped lead an extraordinary revolution in America's laws and customs.

Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act of 1972 (bumper standards). An annual report also is required by the Energy Policy and Conservation Act of 1975, which amended the Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act and directed the Secretary of Transportation to set, adjust, and enforce motor vehicle fuel economy standards. Similar reporting requirements are contained in the Department of Energy Act of 1978 with respect to the use of advanced technology by the automobile industry. These requirements have been met in the Seventh Annual Fuel Economy Report, the highlights of which are summarized in the motor vehicle safety report.

For the second year in a row, traffic fatalities have dropped significantly. The 43,945 fatalities recorded in 1982, while still unacceptably high and a tragedy to the Nation both in terms of lives lost and the economic consequences of the deaths, represent an 11 percent decrease from the preceding year.

In addition, despite large increases in drivers, vehicles, and traffic, the Federal standards and programs for motor vehicle and highway safety instituted since 1966 have contributed to a significant reduction in the fatality rate per 100 million miles of travel. The rate has decreased from 5.5 in the mid-60's to the 1982 level of 2.76. This means that motorists can drive more miles today with less risk. If the 1966 fatality rate had been experienced in 1982, more than 87,586 persons would have lost their lives in traffic accidents.

Achieving even greater reductions in the annual traffic death toll will not be easy, but it is a challenge we readily accept and intend to actively pursue. Motorists today are better informed and driving in safer vehicles and on safer roads. But they are still victims of habit and of human nature.

They choose not to wear safety belts because they do not expect to be in an accident. They drive after drinking too much, because alcohol is part of our social mores. And they sometimes speed and take unnecessary chances, because being in a hurry is an unfortunate fact of modern life.

The answer lies in widespread public education efforts, and a continuing national traffic safety commitment that involves government, the private sector, and the individual motorist. We will also consider new regulations, but only when there is no practical alternative, and when we are certain that doing so will result in a clear and beneficial improvement in safety.

While we can be justifiably proud of the accomplishments to date, we are convinced that this approach will bring about even more progress, and that American motorists and pedestrians will ultimately enjoy a greater level of personal safety as a result.

Soviet counterparts in Geneva. I invited our team members to the White House so that I could personally express to them my recognition of their extremely hard work and my gratitude for the successful outcome.

U.S.-Soviet arms control process back on track. I emphasized my determination to reach agreements which bring about deep and verifiable reductions in nuclear forces and which enhance strategic stability.

I am keenly aware of the hard work and long hours ahead for these dedicated people in carrying out the analyses needed to support American negotiating positions. But I am confident that with the expertise and dedication each member of our team brings to this work, the United States will do its part to make the coming negotiations succeed.

Forty years ago today, a brave young man named Raoul Wallenberg disappeared from the streets of war-torn Budapest. This young Swedish diplomat had been assigned to his country's legation in Hungary in March 1944, where he undertook a humanitarian mission to save the lives of as many Hungarian Jews as possible.

Heedless of personal danger, Wallenberg pulled people out of death marches, boarded deportation trains, handed out Swedish papers to thousands of innocent people on the way to death camps and insisted to the Nazi occupation authorities that anyone holding Swedish papers be released in his custody. Altogether, Wallenberg is responsible for saving the lives of nearly 100,000 Jewish men, women, and children from certain death in Nazi extermination camps. Some of the people whom he saved are now prominent citizens of our own country.

It is written in Holy Scriptures: ``Greater love hath no man than this, that a man lay down his life for his friends.'' Raoul Wallenberg's friends were any and all who suffered injustice. Each day he willingly jeopardized his own life so that others might live. In the face of horror and evil, this noble young man stood tall and unflinching.

In 1981, as a reflection of the debt of gratitude which all Americans owe to Raoul Wallenberg, I signed into law legislation making him an honorary United States citizen. He is the only non-American, other than Winston Churchill, ever to be honored in this way. To be true to our own values, this was the least that we -- as Americans -- could do to underscore our unbounded admiration for Wallenberg's courage and dedication to humanity and the abhorrence with which we view his unjust and illegal imprisonment by the Soviet Government.

The U.S. Government has repeatedly raised Raoul Wallenberg's case with the Soviet Government, and has requested a full and satisfactory clarification of his fate. But the only Soviet explanation of Wallenberg's fate was a statement in 1957 that he died 10 years earlier in a Soviet prison. No explanation has been given of the circumstances of his arrest and subsequent disappearance.

In the depths of the horrors of World War II, Raoul Wallenberg was one shining light of inspiration, upholding the honor of the human race. The world owes a tremendous and eternal debt to this great man. And the Soviet Union owes the world a full and complete accounting of his fate.

I took this occasion to assure Ambassador Goodby of my continuing strong support for the efforts of the U.S. delegation, working with our NATO allies, to search for an outcome in Stockholm which will enhance confidence and reduce the risk of war in Europe. Earlier in the Conference, the West put forward a package of concrete proposals designed to achieve these goals.

During the previous round, the Conference finally succeeded in adopting a new working structure which should encourage more detailed discussions and comparison of the proposals before it. We hope that this new arrangement will foster the beginning of productive negotiations on the substance of a final agreement.

The Stockholm Conference has a unique role to play in East-West relations. Its resumption comes shortly after the agreement reached in Geneva between Secretary of State Shultz and Soviet Foreign Minister Gromyko calling for renewed U.S.-Soviet negotiations. Complementing those arms control efforts which seek to reduce force levels, the Stockholm Conference addresses the proximate causes of war -- miscalculation and misinterpretation -- and seeks to ensure that those forces are never used.

One year ago, I said that, in dealing with the Soviet Union: ``We are prepared to discuss the problems which divide us, and to work for practical, fair solutions on the basis of mutual compromise.'' We have brought this spirit of practicality, fairness and compromise to the Stockholm Conference. It was in this spirit that I addressed the Irish Parliament last June and offered to meet the Soviets' concerns in Stockholm halfway. We agreed to discuss their declared interest in the principle of renunciation of force if this would lead them to negotiate seriously on concrete measures to give effect to that principle.

The Soviet response to our invitation to negotiate has not been forthcoming. The Soviets have yet to demonstrate a willingness to put aside those ideas which are more rhetorical than substantive; they have yet to join the majority of participants who favor a serious, practical approach to developing meaningful confidence-building measures.

At Stockholm, 35 nations are being offered the opportunity to seek solutions to security problems through cooperation rather than confrontation. The U.S. and our allies look for a successful outcome to this Conference, one which will further the goals of the Helsinki process to which it belongs, by lowering the artificial barriers which divide Europe and encouraging more constructive, cooperative relationships among individuals as well as among nations.

Even with good will on all sides, the Stockholm Conference faces a difficult task. The issues are complex and important, touching the vital interests of the participants. Nonetheless, meaningful progress can be achieved this year in Stockholm if all participants work seriously and in a constructive spirit.

There seem to be some signs that you intend to stay on the sidelines and let Congress wrestle with a lot of the touchy things like the budget, Social Security COLA's, and that sort of thing, at least in the beginning of this second term. Is that your intent?

We're been putting in long and bloody hours on this budget matter, and in a few weeks, we will be ready. But we've keeping our people up there in the Congress posted on this, keeping them as well informed as we can of where we are, the type of things that we're talking about doing. And in a short time, as I say, in just a matter of a few weeks, we will be delivering to Congress our proposal, and we think it'll be on target with what we're trying to do for 1986.

The President. Oh, no, no. All these lines as if, well, when the election was over I sat back and disappeared or something -- I disappeared into the Cabinet Room, where we've been having these meetings for endless hours. There wasn't anything to go out and wave a flag about until we have it put together. And then after you have it put together, you've got to allow your Cabinet officers and department heads to come in on their own and present their views as to whether we can do better or whether we've done too much.

The President. Well, I almost have to be, although if I also go out of office with having put us for the first time in 50 years on a declining deficit pattern to where we can target a date certain that the budget will be balanced and have put us on a program that is of a permanent nature, so that that's the end of deficit spending.

Great Society really got under way and came into effect. Well, in those 15 years, the budget increased to almost 5 times what it was 15 years before. But the deficit increased to 38 times what it was before.

Nineteen seventy-four -- the Congress came up with a whole new budget plan. They were going to -- they had a new procedure. And since they did that, I don't think we've had a budget. All they do is tear apart the budget that you send up. But in those several years, from 1974 on up to past 1980, there were more than $500 billion in deficits. The pattern was set.

The President. Actually -- I know I get that question an awful lot, as if you sit over here and that's all you think about is what are they going to write in the history books. You know, the truth of the matter is, I don't think about it at all. I think about trying to get the job done. And I came here with an idea in mind of what I felt should be done, that it was time that something should be done, both on the international scene but also domestically. I'd been out on the mashed-potato circuit talking about it for three or four decades.

And so, we started in with the plan. And, as you know, the only thing that has remained constant are the pessimists. They're still around. They said the plan wouldn't work. And now that it's working, they say it won't last. Well, they were wrong the first time, and they're wrong the second time.

This is the first recovery in eight recessions since World War II that has been a real recovery based on solid principles in which unemployment has come down at the same time inflation has come down, the same time the interest rates have come down. If you'll look back in the history of previous recessions, you'll find that usually they brought about what they said was a recovery artificially. And you'd have -- well, if unemployment came down some, inflation went up. This is a recovery based on solid principles, where all these things are happening.

Ms. Devroy. In referring to those, those are -- a lot of your legislative success in the beginnings of those kind of successes occurred early in your first term and then picked up, particularly the legislative area. Historically, second terms for Presidents have not been roaring successes; they sort of trickle off. What are your expectations? Do you expect to be as successful legislatively as you were the first term?

The President. I think there's a very good chance of it, because I think that the very thing you were talking about, the size of the deficits, has finally caught everybody's attention. And I think that there's a possibility that we'll see one of those moments when we forget we're Democrats and Republicans and realize that we're citizens of this country and we've got a job to do. But in other words, it's of crisis proportions. And it is based on built-in spending increases that must be altered and altered permanently.

Ms. Neuman. Mr. President, some people say that recovery has benefited primarily white people, that the ``We the People Inaugural'' we are about to witness is a ``We the White People Inaugural.'' Given your meeting this week with some black representatives, do you have any thoughts about how to reach out to the majority of blacks, who were not in your column?

The President. Well, I know that there are a number of leaders of various organizations that are coming forth all the time with reports that build this idea, that somehow we've relegated the black community to a second-class status. Well, that's not our intent, and that's not our practice.

First of all, of the people, since we came here, who got jobs, more than a million of them are blacks who have left the unemployment ranks. It's true, they've got farther to go. There was no question of that, that based on some of our past history and all, they're on an upward climb, but, as I say, they have further to go.

What we have done -- we have some things before the Congress that we haven't gotten yet that would be further of benefit to them. The enterprise zones program would benefit them disproportionately to others. It's been there 3 years, and we haven't been able to get it through the House. The very fact of reducing inflation has been of benefit to people who are in the lower earning scale, because it means a lot more to them. In education the number of blacks who are now getting college and university educations is far higher than it has ever been in our history.

There must be specific things. This is what we talked about with this group of very fine people who came in -- these black leaders from every kind of calling you can imagine. We have done more than has ever been done with regard to stimulating, in the small business community, entrepreneurship, businesses that are black owned. We have -- in aiding that -- we have made sure that government contracts definitely are aimed to make sure that minority-owned businesses get a fair crack at those.

Now, all of this is aimed at a problem that has been ignored by too many people in the various ethnic communities in our country -- and we have them, as you know, the Irish in south Boston and so forth. You find that their standard of living, their prosperity is based on how many times a dollar that comes in to that community by way of pay. The individual goes out to work and brings home his paycheck -- how many times that dollar turns over before it gets back out into the general economy, out of that community.

Ms. Devroy. Do you think -- how would you rate that in terms of disappointments? You had said during the end of the first term that you were going to make a major effort to reach out to black voters and all voters, and it didn't seem to work.

I don't think that the rank-and-file know about minority-owned businesses and how far we've gone with that. I don't think they know about legislation that we have sent up to the Hill -- like the enterprise zones -- that has not been passed. Legislation that -- in other areas that has to do with improving their status. I don't think they know about the fair-housing proposals that we have sent up there and that, again, a Democratic majority has not dealt with.

The President. I tried that in the very beginning, and I found out, very frankly, that they are so committed politically to the opposite party that they don't want to hear. And I have to come to the conclusion that maybe some of those leaders are protecting some rather good positions that they have, and they can protect them better if they can keep their constituency aggrieved and believing that they have a legitimate complaint. If they ever become aware of the opportunities that are improving, they might wonder whether they need some of those organizations.

The President. Oh, no, I can understand that. I can understand when you come into government, it's a little different than the private sector. Someone gives up a great deal to take an appointment in government, whether it's a Cabinet position or whatever it is. And, unlike a business, where there's the continued challenge of the profit motive and growth and so forth, yes, after a time, I can see where some of the excitement is gone in that particular job. But what we've found out here is that it doesn't mean that it's just -- that it's gone for being -- continuing to work in government or they wouldn't be taking other jobs.

The President. Yes, it is, because, as I say, we've got a great start. If you really look at the whole tone of government today and what was being debated in government up until 4 years ago, about cost -- or programs, and this new program, and let's spend money over here in doing this -- the whole debate now has turned around to how much should the rate of cutting be and what should we cut. No one's talking about new programs and spending more money by government. No one's talking about more authority in the Federal Government. We're adjusting and giving back to local government and to State governments authority that the Federal Government should never have taken from them in the first place.

California, most of our great accomplishments came in the second term. The great welfare reform that was different than anything that's ever been accomplished in this Nation took place in the second term.

The President. Oh, no, no, because, as I say, it's -- no, if you walked away now and someone else came in with a different view, all of this could be unraveled. The idea is to get it clinched and in place, that we can then have an amendment to the Constitution that says hereafter the Federal Government cannot borrow money, it must stay within its means, have an economic recovery that is based on sound principles to where the people have accepted that if the government takes too much money from the private sector, you have these recessions that we've been having for 50 years.

Ms. Devroy. Quick on foreign policy, then. At this point are you so committed to the Star Wars defense or the -- I'm sorry, the SDI initiative, that you'd be willing to go out of office not having achieved any arms control if the Soviets won't move on the other two?

The President. Well, I don't think -- I don't look at it as that -- that that is a possibility. I think when they actually see this -- and the very fact that at Geneva we successfully put it there as one of the things that's going to be negotiated -- you see, when they're talking space wars and so forth, they're talking about some things where they're even ahead of us, and that is having nuclear weapons in space that can shoot down at us. We're not talking about anything of that kind.

We're talking about research to see if there is not a defense that can be built that doesn't kill people, kills weapons, that can keep the weapons from coming to your shores, if there is such a thing. And I would hope that they would work on such a thing. If you can have that, then the very thing that they themselves have said they want, an elimination of these weapons, becomes more than just possible.

The President. I don't believe, since research is contained in the ABM treaty today, I don't think that this is going to cause a walk-away from the table. And if it is, then they never meant to come to the table to begin with.

But let me point out something that they'd have to consider. Suppose we could succeed in getting down to the point of elimination of nuclear weapons. But we know how to make nuclear weapons, and if down someplace in the future there should come a time of strain and stress, who would know if somebody -- they would have to think maybe we were doing -- we could think that they were doing -- somebody say, ``Hey, maybe let's get a few of these things ready for use,'' and who would know that they were doing it? But, if in the meantime, our technology has made it plain that there is a defense against such things, then you have guarded against that ever happening in the future.

It's the same thing, in other words, as when at Geneva, after World War I, we outlawed chemical weapons, gas, poison gas, but our soldiers on both sides -- all sides -- were also still equipped with gas masks. And we find today -- because why? Because people have, knowing how to make it, have continued to make it or started in to make it again. Well, the same thing with the nuclear weapons.

The President. It's not only my wife, it's everyone -- this picture that is being created that I sit at the desk and wait to see who's going to grab this arm and pull me this way or grab this one and pull me that way. You know something?

And with Nancy, yes, we've been married for 30-odd years, and of course we talk, and of course she has opinions. And I listen to her opinions. And sometimes we argue about them, and I don't listen. But sometimes -- well, as I say, we get along, and I find myself going home and, I think like every other happy husband, telling them what the day was like and what we did and all.

The President. I think part of that is that I don't think there's ever been a Cabinet system here like we have. I may be wrong, but my impression of previous Cabinets is that they'd meet periodically in regular meetings, and they would report to the President what they were doing in their departments. Well, in California, I decided to -- [inaudible] -- system and brought it here. They're like a board of directors meeting, and they don't have to keep their mouths shut about somebody else's area or agency's department.

Today I have asked three highly capable Americans to be the head negotiators of each of three groups making up the U.S. delegation to the negotiations on nuclear and space arms. These negotiations will take place in accordance with the agreement reached at Geneva on January 8 between Secretary of State George P. Shultz and Foreign Minister Andrey A. Gromyko of the Soviet Union.

Senator John Tower of Texas will be nominated to serve as U.S. negotiator on strategic nuclear arms. Ambassador Maynard W. Glitman, a minister-counselor of the Foreign Service of the United States, will be nominated as U.S. negotiator on intermediate-range nuclear arms.

Nuclear Weapons Program Management. The Task Group shall consist of seven members qualified for service by reasons of experience and education. The President shall appoint three members and shall designate one of those members to act as chairman of the Task Group. The chairman and ranking minority members of the Committees on Armed Services of the Senate and House of Representatives will each appoint one member.

Defense and the Department of Energy in establishing requirements for, and in providing resources for, the research, development, testing, production, surveillance, and retirement of nuclear weapons and shall recommend any needed change in such procedures.

Sec. 4. General. (a) Notwithstanding any other Executive order, the functions of the President under the Federal Advisory Committee Act, as amended, except that of reporting to the Congress, which are applicable to the Task Group, shall be performed by the Secretary of Defense, in accordance with guidelines established by the Administrator of General Services.

Constitution of the United States against all enemies, foreign and domestic, that I will bear true faith and allegiance to the same, that I take this obligation freely, without any mental reservation or purpose of evasion, and that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties of the office on which I am about to enter, so help me God.

Staircase on the State Floor at the White House. The ceremony was attended by immediate members of the Reagan and Bush families, members of the Cabinet and the senior White House staff, and bipartisan congressional leaders.

The 20th amendment to the Constitution requires that the President be sworn in on January 20; however, because the date fell on a Sunday, the public inauguration ceremony was held at the Capitol on the following day.

Mr. Walsh. Well, I tell you, they've given it all year, Mr. President. This is the greatest football team and the greatest group of people I've ever been around. And I hope we've added to today's festivities.

The President. You certainly did. And, you know, if now that the season's over and you fellows haven't anything to do for a while, I have to go up on the Hill and deal with Congress in a few days -- how would you like to come back and I could use a front-line four?

Committee has, at my request, agreed to move the official Inaugural ceremony to the Rotunda of the United States Capitol. I have directed the Committee for the 50th American Presidential Inaugural to make every effort to develop an alternate event for tomorrow afternoon -- one which would allow those who have traveled so far and have given so unselfishly an opportunity to be a part of this historic occasion.

Nancy and I are disappointed that the weather in Washington caused this change, but the health and safety of those attending and working at these outdoor events must come before any celebrations. Medical and military experts have warned that tomorrow's weather -- which could see temperatures with a windchill factor as low as 30 degrees below zero -- would pose significant risks to the well-being of the many thousands of persons who planned to attend and work at these events. Under such conditions, exposed flesh can freeze within 5 - 10 minutes, triggering considerable danger to many of the parade and ceremony participants, spectators, and the general public. In addition, equipment would not be operable.

We are deeply grateful for the enthusiasm and patriotism which has been the hallmark of so many persons from all 50 States who have given so much to make this Inaugural a success. We look forward to seeing many of them Monday night at the Inaugural balls, which will be held as scheduled. It may be cold outside, but our hearts will always be warmed by the many wonderful memories of thousands of our fellow citizens coming to Washington this weekend to join us as we continue our work to make America great again.

This has been an historic day, and it's not over yet. Together, we mark the end of one term and the beginning of another. And I want each of you to know how grateful I am for all that you've done -- all the energy and personal commitment that you have mustered in these last 4 years to make our system work.

In the shifting alliances of a free government, we in this room have been intense allies on some issues, while disagreeing on others. But I think the level of respect and courtesy with which we've treated each other speaks well for us and confirms the viability of this great democratic system which is now in our care.

His Inaugural Address said: ``Our Congress represents the people and the States. In all legislative affairs, they are the natural collaborator with the President. In spite of all the criticism which often falls to its lot, I do not hesitate to say that there is no more independent and effective legislative body in the world. It is, and should be, jealous of its prerogatives. I welcome the cooperation and expect to share with it not only the responsibility but the credit for our common effort to secure beneficial legislation.'' Calvin Coolidge.

Well, I hope we can work together in that same spirit. I have a plaque on my desk in the office that says what I firmly believe, and that is there is no limit to what a man can accomplish if he doesn't -- what he can do and where he can go if he doesn't care who gets the credit.

We're very grateful to you for these gifts. And may I offer a toast to all of you here, the Members of the Congress, all the guests who are here with you, and to the best Vice President this country has ever had, George Bush, and to the next 4 years.

Mr. President, you've been very good to come up here to the Hill every once in awhile, not only with official messages, but when you just had an informal word to say from time to time. As you know, beyond this beautiful picture here is a normal route to the House of Representatives. When this Chamber was once the old Chamber, and then as we developed the new Chamber beyond it, there were a set of beautiful bronze doors that were between the two, that are now down in the East Portico of the Capitol.

Note: The President spoke at 1:50 p.m. at the luncheon for congressional leaders and invited guests which was held in Statuary Hall at the Capitol. Following the luncheon, the President and Mrs. Reagan returned to the White House.

Who would ever have thought that I'd be the one standing up and talking, while all of you were -- well, almost all of you -- were sitting down and listening. It just goes to show here in Washington things have a way of turning out the opposite of how we intend.

I know you didn't get your chance to salute all of us, but I just want you to know how happy and how important it was for Nancy, myself, and the Vice President and Mrs. Bush to come here to salute all of you.

You know, we and all America were so looking forward to seeing each one of you perform and delight us with your wonderful talents and exuberance. And what a great American family you are. Because whether you come from as far away as Hawaii, California, Texas, Florida, New York or Mississippi, or Washington or Alaska, or -- I'm told the team from Alaska was the only one that came here and really was and could have gone through with the parade because they came with a team of huskies. I can't go on naming all your States, because I know all 50 are represented here, and the territories, and you represent America at its best. And you would have given America the greatest show on Earth.

Now, we were all anticipating the parade. And I was looking forward to every unit. I'd heard about all of you. And particularly, there was one that -- someplace in here, I think, is a band from my home, or the town where I was born, Tampico, Illinois. And with that band was going to be the pompom girls from the high school in Dixon, Illinois, where I graduated.

I want to tell you, I have a little knowledge and understanding of some of your problems. I was the drum major of the Dixon YMCA Boys Band, and I had a brief career, because we were asked to head up the parade in a nearby town on Decoration Day. And I know that everyone was briefed about the parade course and everything, but I had also been told that a fellow on a white horse was going to be out in front, and I figured I'll just follow the man on the white horse. Who can go wrong doing that? And I was going down the street, making with the baton, and pretty soon I thought the music was beginning to sound a little faint. [Laughter] I looked over my shoulder. Everybody had turned the corner. I was going down the wrong street all by myself.

Well, we know the tremendous time and personal dedication that each of you put into your preparations -- everything from bake sales to getting church and civic groups to help you raise the money to pay your way, to the long, long hours of rehearsal so that you perform at your very best.

District of Washington; deputy parade chairman, Marine Lieutenant Colonel Frank Turner -- they were a tremendously effective organizational team, and they would have been there to line your parade route down Pennsylvania Avenue.

But it would have been a magical moment to tuck away and cherish with your loved ones during all your later years. But it was not to be. And I just hope you understand that we only made this decision after we were convinced that it was absolutely necessary to protect your own health, as well as the health of the thousands who would be lining the parade to watch you. Believe me, we had professional medical advice in making that decision.

But I pledge one thing to all of you today, and that is to serve with the very best of my abilities and to try, during these next 4 years, to live up to the spirits of unity and pride that you have brought to Washington, because that's what makes America the greatest country on Earth.

There's another thought that I'd like to leave with you, and that is that your trip here, despite the cancellation of the parade, is still very worthwhile and important, because all of us together have been participants in a great miracle of modern history -- the simple, peaceful continuation of power ratifying the sovereignty of we, the people. There has never been a transfer of power by bayonet in America and, God willing, there never will be.

Thomas Jefferson once said: ``How little do my countrymen know what precious blessings they are in possession of and which no other people on Earth enjoy.'' Well, today we can rejoice that more and more people on Earth are moving toward democracy, and we can rejoice that America, a nation still young compared to so many others, is the oldest, most successful republic on Earth.

Yesterday I pledged a new America, an opportunity society in which all would benefit from economic freedom. We are pushing closer than ever to that great goal, but we cannot rest on our laurels. Further economic progress can and will be made for all Americans once we simplify taxes and lower tax rates, create enterprise zones to stimulate economic activity in our cities, and permanently limit the ability of the Federal Government to spend, so that less money will go to the Federal Establishment and more will stay in the hands of the people, who are the creators of the prosperity we enjoy.

Ms. Gray. Yes, Mr. President, you're speaking to me. And you're speaking to thousands of your pro-life Americans, who are here to tell you that we appreciate your being in the White House so very, very much.

I feel a great sense of solidarity with all of you. And I'm convinced, as I know you are, that our response to the 12th anniversary of Roe vs. Wade and Doe vs. Bolton must be to rededicate ourselves to ending the terrible national tragedy of abortion.

A year ago, in my State of the Union Address, I called on everyone in our country to rise above bitterness and reproach and seek a greater understanding of this issue. I believe that spirit of understanding begins with the recognition of the reality of life before birth and the reality of death by abortion.

But the spirit of understanding also includes, as all of you know, a complete rejection of violence as a means of settling this issue. We cannot condone the threatening or taking of human life to protest the taking of human life by way of abortion.

And I want you to know that I feel these days, as never before, the momentum is with us. Surely, recent advances in medical technology have changed the debate. Surgeons now speak of the ``patient in the womb.'' We now know more than ever before about the unborn. Doctors have invented procedures that can give blood transfusions to the fetus and even administer medication.

The film -- which, as you know, I'm sure, is narrated by a former director of the world's largest abortion clinic -- provides chilling documentation of the horror of abortion during the first 3 months of life. It's been said that if every Member of the Congress could see this film of an early abortion, the Congress would move quickly to end the tragedy of abortion. And I pray that they will.

I will continue to work with all of those -- in the Congress and out -- who believe, as I do, that abortion is taking the life of a living human being; that the right to abortion is not secured by the Constitution; and the state has a compelling interest in protecting the life of each person before birth.

I've spoken here of the evidence today that establishes that the unborn is a living human being. We must not forget that in reality, if there is any justice in the abortionist position, it would require that they establish beyond a doubt that there is not life in the unborn -- and they can't do that.

It's been a long, hard struggle the past dozen years. But I know all of us are feeling hopeful about a positive resolution of this issue, and I don't think our feeling of hope is inappropriate. There are already signs that we've changed the public attitude on abortion. The number performed each year is finally leveling off. The general feeling that abortion is just a small, harmless medical procedure that's simply a matter of choice has almost disappeared.

House and you have said to us that we must come together. And I want you to know that we have had, maybe, some of our differences before. But now this grassroots, pro-life, American, whole movement is united. We want the paramount human life amendment with no compromises, Mr. President.

Ms. Gray. And, Mr. President, we want to work with you this year because we know that there are some things that we can do right now. One is, we can stop the funding of abortions in the District of Columbia, and we, as pro-life Americans, want to work with you to get that bill through. There are things that we can do, and we want to work with you.

Note: The President spoke at 12:01 p.m. from the Oval Office via a loudspeaker hookup with the rally site. Participants had gathered on the Ellipse for a march to the Supreme Court on the occasion of the 12th anniversary of the Supreme Court's decision on the abortion issue. Nellie Gray was president of March for Life.

Max Kampelman, John Tower, and Mike Glitman bring to their new assignments broad experience and deep knowledge. With the strong support of Paul Nitze and Ed Rowny, I am confident that our new team will represent the United States very effectively.

I view the negotiating commitments we undertook 2 weeks ago with the Soviets in Geneva with the utmost seriousness. I have no more important goal than reducing and, ultimately, eliminating nuclear weapons. The United States will have concrete ideas to put on the negotiating table. We hope the Soviet Union will follow a similarly constructive approach.

I also want to emphasize that we are determined to achieve a good agreement -- an agreement which meets the interests of both countries, which increases the security of our allies, and which enhances international stability. Our new negotiators share this important goal. I look forward to working closely with our negotiating team in the months ahead. In this effort, I have charged Max and his colleagues with the responsibility of keeping appropriate Members of the Congress fully informed. With the patience and support of the American people, Congress, and our allies, I am confident that we will succeed.

Federal agencies receive outside advice, information, and assistance from some 900 advisory committees, councils, boards, and commissions. They include a total of about 20,000 members, at a combined annual cost of approximately $74 million. About two-thirds are established by statute.

A recent analysis found that 284 advisory committees reported no significant accomplishments during the last reporting period, and of these, 161 reported no activity whatever. The study also found that in many cases agencies failed to give serious consideration to the policy recommendations of committees.

It is evident that many advisory committees are not serving a useful purpose, and should be eliminated. It is also obvious that valuable committees are not receiving proper support and attention from agency leadership. Elimination of needless committees and improved management of the remainder will result in increased committee credibility and better advice and information at lower cost to the government.

The Office of Management and Budget and the General Services Administration will assist you in this effort and will report overall progress, consistent with the annual review required by the Federal Advisory Committee Act.

Musical theater is an American art form that has been part of our lives for over a century. The songs are a true expression of the era in which they were written, but they also evoke something eternal in the American ethos -- echoing our joy in good years, reflecting our sadness in difficult ones, and lifting our spirits in times of challenge.

Jerome D. Kern, one of the founding fathers of the American musical theater, whose centenary we observe this year, is widely honored for his many contributions to this uniquely American art form. His prodigious body of work -- over 1,000 songs and 108 complete scores for Broadway shows and Hollywood films -- forms a major part of the core of musical theater as we know it in America and as it has spread throughout the world.

Gershwin and wrote with the elegance, wit, and sophistication that characterize the best American popular music. He was esteemed by his peers, who twice voted to honor him with Academy Awards -- for ``The Way You Look Tonight'' and ``The Last Time I Saw Paris.'' New generations of audiences of all ages and backgrounds have taken his melodies to heart and given them a permanent place in our American musical heritage.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-third day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

I think it's particularly fitting that your visit coincides with our Inaugural time, when the mantle of power here in the United States is passed to the choice of the electorate. Wherever we are, no matter what our political agenda, those who believe in democracy and human rights should rejoice in times like this. Believing in the peaceful transfer of power through democratic elections and a solid respect for human rights unites all of us here today with millions of people across the globe.

Being from democratic countries, you know it's difficult to get opposing political parties together, even in worthwhile endeavors like this. Well, the bipartisan support behind this effort reflects the value we place on enhancing long-range hemispheric collaboration among the free and democratic countries of the Americas. Building and reinforcing these ties has been of the utmost importance to this administration and will continue to be so during the next 4 years.

Our efforts are guided by three consistent and mutually reinforcing goals: We seek to promote the development of democratic political institutions; we want to encourage economic growth, which will increase opportunity and improve the standard of living for people throughout the hemisphere; we're willing to help our friends defend themselves against Soviet bloc, Cuban, and Nicaraguan sponsored subversion.

Forefathers believed so firmly, and that is that free and democratic government is the birthright of every citizen of this hemisphere. The Americas should be, and by right of heritage, ought to be populated by free and independent people.

The Great Liberator lamented that mankind is all too willing to rest unconcerned and accept things as they are. And that's why we who are committed to free government and democratic institutions must maintain a sense of fraternity between ourselves and other freedom-loving peoples.

Today, there are many reasons for optimism. Despite economic problems and the threat of well-armed, anti-democratic forces, we Americans -- and by that I mean all of us, all Americans, from the North Slope of Alaska to the tip of Tierra del Fuego -- are enjoying a rising tide of democracy.

I'd like to take this opportunity to offer my heartfelt best wishes to the representatives who are with us from the hemisphere's newest democratic governments -- Uruguay and Brazil. And I'd like also to offer my congratulations to the people in political leadership of Argentina who, I understand, have been chosen by the Center for the 1985 International Democracy Prize.

Well, today, as never before, we need this spirit of enterprise to overcome the economic challenges of the hemisphere. The leap in energy prices, the onset of global recession in 1979 and 1980 brought serious hardship throughout the world.

Here in the United States we countered the economic downturn with economic reforms that lowered tax rates, eliminated counterproductive government regulations, and brought down the rate of increase in government spending. We concentrated on promoting growth and opportunity, on encouraging business enterprise and investment. And this formula worked well for us. Last year we had a growth rate of 6.8 percent. And that was the best since 1951. And the inflation rate was only 4 percent. In fact, it has only averaged 3.9 percent over the last 3 years.

While putting our own economic house in order, we've tried to help our hemispheric neighbors and friends. We increased by over 50 percent the level of bilateral economic assistance over the previous administration. We've continued to support the World Bank, the Inter-American Bank, and the IMF programs. We've worked with leaders in government and the private sector to encourage the refinancing of international debt. Your cooperation has been indispensable in this effort.

Americas. I'd like to add that I'm equally optimistic that our economic problems, which today seem so menacing, will be overcome. Free people, given time, will find a way to solve what may appear to be unsolvable. I can assure you, the people of the United States are anxious to work with your people to build a prosperous and opportunity-filled future. Our cooperation will enhance our chance for economic progress and help us meet some serious challenges to our security as well.

The transition to democracy, especially in Central America, has been accompanied by a concerted and well-financed effort by the Soviet bloc and Cuba to undermine democratic institutions and to seize power from those who believe in democracy. This is nothing new. Venezuelans who struggled so long and hard for freedom faced this same threat as they transformed their country into a democracy. Similar subversion -- financed, armed, and supported by the outside -- has plagued Colombia and other countries, as well.

States, in the past, has enacted sanctions against Cuba for such aggression. The Sandinistas have been attacking their neighbors through armed subversion since August of 1979. Countering this by supporting Nicaraguan freedom fighters is essentially acting in self-defense and is certainly consistent with the United Nations and OAS Charter provisions for individual and collective security.

Well, I think it behooves all of us who believe in democratic government, in free elections, in the respect for human rights, to stand side by side with those who share our ideals, especially in Central America. We must not permit those heavily armed by a faraway dictatorship to undermine their neighbors and to stamp out democratic alternatives at home. We must have the same solidarity with those who struggle for democracy as our adversaries do with those who would impose Communist dictatorship.

It was just 1 year ago when the Bipartisan Commission on Central America, of which John Silber was a member, issued their report. These distinguished citizens concluded that there is indeed a threat to Central America. As they recommended, I have asked the United States Congress to provide $8 billion in aid over the next 5 years for economic and social help. We're also taking steps, including active diplomacy, to defuse a potential crisis. We support, for example, all 21 objectives of the Contadora process, including the implementation of the democratic commitments made by the Sandinistas to the Organization of American States in 1979.

If we're for democracy, we're for peace, domestically and internationally. Today, with democracy on the rise, we have it within our power to recapture Simon Bolivar's dream. We can have a united hemisphere, living in peace, opportunity, and freedom.

The ideals we share have come of age. And now is the time; we are the people; democracy is the way. There are some 600 million of us from that tip of Tierra del Fuego up to that north coast of Alaska, bound together by a common heritage and history, all of us Americans, all of us worshiping the same God. What a power for good in the world we can be if we strengthen our neighborliness and the contact and the cooperation between us.

Supreme Court's decision in the Grove City College case. Majority Leader Bob Dole has introduced the legislation as S. 272. This bill reflects the compromise reached after long and arduous efforts between Members of the Senate and the administration at the end of the 98th Congress. Regrettably, the press of time prevented the 98th Congress from adopting the approach embodied in this bill.

Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973; and the Age Discrimination Act) so that extension of Federal financial assistance to any program or activity of an educational institution covers all of its educational programs and activities, subjecting them to the prohibitions in these Federal laws against discrimination on the basis of sex, race, handicap, and age.

Congress. The 98th Congress almost completed the task of developing an acceptable response to the Grove City College decision, and there is no good reason why the 99th Congress cannot finish this work by enacting the legislation introduced today. I am confident that this will happen so long as no efforts are made to alter the legislation's fundamental purpose or add to it needless and crippling amendments that go beyond the careful reversal of Grove City contained in S. 272.

I was thinking as George [Bush] was speaking that I've been truly blessed these past 4 years to have been surrounded by some of the most capable and talented executives and leaders the White House has ever seen. This is truly -- and this is not hyperbole -- this is truly a history-making team.

It's been a tremendous 4 years. And I'm feeling absolutely bullish on the next 4. I was just thinking the other day that in our first administration, we made history, and in the second, we can change history forever.

Four years ago we came here knowing what was wrong, but in truth, as conservatives who'd been out of power for a great many years, some of us had limited practical experience in how exactly to right all the wrongs that had preceded us. But we had a philosophy, and we had a vision.

We lowered tax rates for individuals in businesses; we instituted tax indexing; we slowed the growth of government; we slowed the number of regulatory edicts emanating from Washington; we began to return power to the States and counties and towns and cities; and we began to return power to the people.

You know the facts about inflation, about how more people are employed than ever before in our history. But I think the most eloquent testimony about the success of our program and how we were right to stand firm in the face of the pessimists and doom-and-gloomers is in the numbers that came out Tuesday: the biggest increase in the gross national product since the Truman administration and the smallest increase in inflation since 1967.

Now, that term, if you haven't heard it before, ``all ahead full,'' that's a Navy command that has to do with guiding or directing a ship. The last time I used that I was in an entirely different career.

In the next 4 years, all of us together are going to transform America. We're going to lower tax rates further by instituting for the first time since the income tax began real tax reform to make the entire system more simple, more fair, and more efficient. And by lowering tax rates, we're going to encourage greater productivity and the creation of wealth for all.

We're going to continue to trim the size of government. Think a moment how remarkable and truly revolutionary it is that hundreds of people who came to Washington to assume positions of governmental authority actually succeeded in diminishing the government's authority. Now this is not the normal bureaucratic way of things. Normally, people say, ``Put me in power, and I'll return more power to you.'' But they get into power, and they find they kind of like it and figure ways to get some more. Well, we've been the administration that didn't do that. And this alone is cause for great pride.

In the next 4 years, we're going to go for economic growth. Now, ``growth'' can sound like some kind of a buzzword, as if all kinds of growth are always good in and of themselves. But when we talk about growth, we mean letting the free marketplace of the freest country in the world expand to its ultimate, and thereby give complete opportunity to every person in our country. We've made great strides in civil rights in our history, but blacks and Hispanics and all minority group members won't have full and equal power until they have full economic power. And that begins with the jobs that are created by growth. We want opportunity for all. And if we have to say goodbye to needless regulations and turn an unfair tax structure on its ear to give opportunity to all, well, that's what we'll do.

We're going to continue to speak out in support of the other great change -- the return to traditional values that was sparked in 1980. We're for prayer in the schools; we're against abortion. We support the return to basics. We'll continue, under our next Secretary of Education Bill Bennett, the policies that already have resulted in renewed excellence in education. We support the family and oppose anything that would take from it its power and its moral authority.

We're a friend of peace first, last, and always. But the American soul was forged in freedom. And we will be a friend of freedom everywhere, and the foes of freedom will be our foes. We must assure the survival and success of freedom in Central America. We cannot break faith with freedom anywhere. This is our heritage and our moral obligation.

I think there's an understandable tendency when a second term begins to think that all the great work is behind us; that the big battles have been fought, and all the rest is anticlimax. Well, that's not true. What's gone before is prolog. Our greatest battles lie ahead -- all is newness now, and the possibility of great and fundamental change. We can change America forever. And that's some great and beautiful music we've been playing these past 4 years, but the way I see it, from here on, it's shake, rattle, and roll.

Governing isn't easy. And some of you, I know, feel an understandable fatigue. There have been bureaucratic disagreements and tensions. Well, this weekend, I want you to put up your feet and relax. And Monday -- don't think too much about the job -- Monday when you come in, sit down at the desk and breathe deep, because Monday the world starts all over again. It's the beginning of a brand new administration, and we're going to make new history together from here on in.

I think you sense, as I do, an ebullience in our country, and our joy is not inappropriate to the times. Our joy is an engine that is going to move our nation into a great promised land of freedom, dignity, and happiness. We've only just begun. We're here together as we were 4 years ago. We share a covenant, a public trust.

The U.S. delegation will be headed by Ambassador Max Kampelman, who at the same time will represent the United States in one of the groups at the negotiations; in the two other groups, the American side will be represented by Senator John Tower and Ambassador Maynard Glitman.

As you know, it was so cold here in Washington this week, we had to hold the inaugural ceremonies inside. It was a great disappointment to many who planned to attend, but I'm sure it was a good idea. An outside event would have given new meaning to our planned ``freeze'' on the Federal Government.

The inauguration ceremony is simple and unpretentious, but sitting there next to Nancy, waiting to take the oath of office, I was deeply stirred. In that short ceremony, our nation comes together to reaffirm our faith in individual liberty and celebrate the democratic institutions that have preserved and protected our freedom for over 200 years. To place one's hand on the Bible and solemnly swear to defend the Constitution of the United States is to be reminded of how strong the will of our free people, guided by faith, can be.

We start out the new year with good news. The fundamental strength and vitality of our economy is unquestionable. In 1984 we grew stronger and faster than we have in over 30 years, while inflation stayed lower than any time since 1967. Last month 340,000 people found new jobs in an economy that now employs more people than ever before in history. Like a sapling in springtime, our economy sprang back after a long winter and reached for the Sun. Once we began to remove the crushing weight of high taxes and overregulation, nothing could hold us back.

Our challenge in 1985 is to build on the momentum of progress, to carry the economic expansion forward so that its opportunities and benefits touch every American. Let's make 1985 the year of opportunity. Let's use our economy, America's tremendous engine of prosperity, to break down the barriers and obstacles on the road to achievement.

Our goal must be an open society in which hope is nourished and effort rewarded, where the promise of tomorrow is found in opportunity today. The entrepreneurial genius of the American people transformed a continent covered by wilderness into the leading industrial power in the world today.

We in government should learn to look at our country with the eyes of the entrepreneur, seeing possibilities where others see only problems. That way, instead of the unemployed, we'd see a resource of potential workers waiting to add their labors, their ingenuity, their creativity to an expanding marketplace. And instead of ghettos, we'd see potential enterprise zones, where increased incentives to work and invest could produce a renaissance of business activity and community involvement.

It's my great hope that, in the months ahead, forward-looking Members from both sides of the aisle in the Congress will join with us in this important work. We must follow through on the policies that have given us 25 months of economic growth by simplifying our cumbersome tax codes and lowering rates still further, while making sure that the overall burden of government on our private economy grows no bigger.

After we've come so far, we must never turn back to the old destructive habits of taxing and spending. With a future beckoning so brightly, we must move forward on the optimistic path of economic growth and expanding opportunity. Don't let anyone underestimate America.

We must ask of ourselves only the best. We must challenge ourselves to hurdle the accepted limits of the past, to draw a new map of possibilities, and give new meaning to the word ``success.'' Isn't that, after all, what it means to be Americans?

The President. I think when people like -- [inaudible] -- Dr. Nitze, who have been engaged in negotiations back over the years, the many negotiations, they are aware of the difficulties and how tedious and long they can be, how patient you must be, and how many times we've gone to the table and come away without anything that was of really any great importance. So, I can understand that.

I, on the other hand, tend to be a little more optimistic, not euphoric. I, too, know how tough this is going to be. But, at least, it is the first time that I can recall the Soviet Union openly, themselves, saying that they wanted to see the number of weapons reduced, and have even gone so far as to say what we have said, that they would like to see the elimination of nuclear weapons entirely.

The President. Well, we're certainly going to try. I know that I wouldn't try to confine it to 4 years, because I know how long some negotiations have taken with them. But we're going to stay there at the table, with the hope that this time we can arrive at an actual reduction of weapons.

The President. Well, on the first part of that I can only say that we know no more than you have just said about this -- that there are voices, and some from within Russia, that have indicated to others in conversation that perhaps his illness is quite serious. I don't know whether that would have an effect on these talks or not. The very fact that they're going forward with them, that after 17 days of the month that was given to setting a date and so forth, they've come forth with a date and named their negotiators, would lead me to believe that, no, they intend to go forward.

Constitution, you couldn't submit a budget, a balanced budget, yourself, because cutting that much suddenly would hurt too many people. But you'll leave your successor -- possibly a Republican -- deficits of more than a hundred billion dollars a year. Wouldn't a constitutional amendment require him or her to make cuts so large that they would do what you don't want to do, which is hurt many people?

The President. Well, in all this talk and during the campaign, when I was accused of never having submitted a balanced budget since I'd been here, I had to wonder how they had the nerve to say that. The President has no right to spend money. The Constitution doesn't give the President the right to spend a nickel. That's up there on the Hill. And every budget that we have submitted since I've been here has been smaller than the one that Congress would finally agree to. So, in fixing the blame for why we haven't done more than we've done in reducing spending seems to be pretty evident.

So, I've always believed that the constitutional amendment, if adopted, would set a target date, that based on a declining path of deficits, then you could foresee and say by such and such a date we must achieve a balanced budget, and from then on, the Government spend no more than it takes in. And this is one of the reasons why our own plan, here, of getting the deficit down to 4 percent of the gross national product and then 3 percent and then 2 percent would give us a pattern in which we could then pick that date and say that's when it should be effected.

The President. No, because we're still trying now to get started on this path, with the budget that we'll be taking up to the Congress. But we think we're going to meet our goal with regard to a $50 billion reduction and the 4 percent figure. And, having once started that, I think we can keep on the other track.

Q. Mr. President, Senate Majority Leader Bob Dole -- the man you're depending on to shepherd many of your programs through Congress -- said yesterday that any deficit reduction plan is going to be in real trouble unless you hold down the growth in defense spending. The Pentagon responded by saying that those who try to lower military spending want to weaken the security of the country. Now, how are you going to possibly get meaningful deficit reduction plans through Congress when there's such a big gap between your administration and the Republican allies in Congress?

The President. Well, I saw Bob on television saying some of those things. And I think sometimes the shading, and then quoting him later in the printed media, has not been reviewing the bidding with the same inflection. I think he was calling attention to what could be a fact within the Congress -- that consistently, over the years, the Congress have, when they've needed money for some other program, they have thought, well, defense is the place we can get it.

Now, to go beyond that and just simply say, on a matter of dollars, ``We're going to take more dollars regardless,'' is very risky, because the Defense Department -- that's the budget, the one budget that is dictated by people outside the United States. You can't ignore what other people are doing, other possible adversaries, with regard to your own defense spending.

And so, I think when they see, and when we have a chance to explain, how much the Department of Defense has come down from its original projections for this period and for '86, I think, they're going to see that there isn't much more to get there. We've squeezed that apple pretty good.

The President. Well, that's what I meant in the beginning about the inflection. What he was talking about, I think, was the attitude of Congress and that if there's any appearance to Congress that we're not putting the Defense Department on the table along with everything else in the negotiations, that we wouldn't get anyplace with them. It is going to be there, but then we're actually going to show where the cuts are.

But beyond that, if there's reluctance, as there has been for 4 years now -- the Congress -- to go as far as we want to go in reducing the growth in Federal spending, then I've said we'd take our case to the people and explain to the people what it is we're trying to do and why we have to do it.

Q. Mr. President, last week you indicated that America's black leaders had misled their constituents about your administration's performance. Would you address the suggestion, in your remarks, that black Americans who voted against you, by a margin of 9 to 1, did so based solely on the statements made by the leaders?

The President. I don't know that they did that entirely, but I do think that there is a lack of understanding of what our policies are and what we've been trying to achieve in these 4 years. In fact, one very well-known leader of a black organization confirmed what I said. I wasn't speaking about all leaders. I've been working with a great many leaders.

But it isn't just leaders of black organizations. I think there is a tendency of some individuals who have positions in organizations that have been created for whatever purpose, but for some purpose -- to rectify some ill -- that then, once that gets going, they're reluctant to admit how much they've achieved, because it might reveal then that there's no longer a need for that particular organization, which would mean no longer a need for their job.

And so, there`s a tendency to keep the people stirred up as if the cause still exists. And I think that there's some of this that's been going on, because if you look at the accomplishments and the achievements that we've made in this field -- from the very beginning I ordered a program of aid to the historic black colleges and universities because of their great tradition and what they have done in the field of making education possible at the time when, without them, it wouldn't have been possible; small business and the efforts that we have made to lead to entrepreneurship and the ability in the minority communities for them to create businesses; the directing of some of our subcontracting, defense and other government areas -- that a percentage of that is going to go to minority-owned businesses; the things like the enterprise zones bill, that we've been trying now for 2 or 3 years and can't get it out of committee in the House of Congress. Here is a bill that is aimed directly at inner city areas which would be heavily minority, and it would provide jobs and opportunity in those areas for those people.

Such accomplishments as the lowering of inflation is of greater benefit to minorities who have not brought themselves up to the level of income of the rest of society. All of these things right now -- the youth opportunity pay scale, we want a lower minimum wage for teenagers that are out there looking for their first jobs. And the heaviest segment of unemployment in the United States is among black teenagers. The Black Mayors' Council endorses this bill, and yet it's being opposed in the Congress. We haven't been able to get it yet because what we've done with the minimum wage right now is price out of the job market young people without job training who are out there looking for their first job.

The President. I'm not going to name the organizations, but I'm going to say something about redirecting their efforts -- a number of the organizations. I'm a little older than the rest of you, and I can remember before there was a civil rights movement. I can remember very clearly the injustices in this country -- and they weren't confined to one section of the country -- the prejudice that prevailed, the things that were just accepted, even by people who maybe felt no prejudice themselves. And I think there is a need for us to focus more on what has been accomplished and less on creating an ill will and a feeling that all the grievances still remain.

No, we haven't done the job completely. There is still further to go, but let's not forget what has been accomplished. And one of the things that a black leader referred to the other day was his protest that some leaders in this cause are actually striving to build, for whatever reason, two Americas: a black America and a white America. That isn't good enough. That isn't what we need or what we want. That would be very destructive to the very things that these people say they're striving to attain.

What we need, what my goal is, is an America where something or anything that is done to or for anyone is done neither because of nor in spite of any difference between them racially, religiously, or ethnic origin-wise.

Q. Sir, I would like to move on to the issue of Central America. You said the other day Nicaragua is receiving support from Iran's Khomeini regime. Can you elaborate? What kind of support and how serious a security threat is it for us?

The President. Well, as far as I want to go here is to say that it's very evident that they have sought their advice. I believe that very possibly there has been some help in training and in certain types of munitions now that have come to them from Iran. The whole problem also is this: That we know that Iran has backed and supported certain terrorist activities. We also know that there are representatives of most of the prominent terrorist groups, worldwide, in Nicaragua giving advice and training and help to the Sandinista government.

The President. Oh, I think the United States faces an imminent threat of terrorism from a number of groups not only for that reason but for other reasons that have to do with our relations with the Communist bloc, our activities in the Middle East. We know that our people, worldwide, have been targeted and American institutions targeted. And we're doing everything we can to minimize that threat and to work with our allies and the other democratic nations to try and exchange intelligence information, to see if we can't treat with those criminals the way we treat with other criminals, by way of Interpol.

I've never retreated from the belief that the peace proposal that we made is the best way to go. It is based on a continuation of the Camp David accords and the United Nations 442 [242]. And what it requires is the getting together of moderate Arab nations, agreeing that Israel does have a right to exist as a nation, and Israel coming together -- with regard to the whole matter of lands still occupied by Israel, that they took in armed conflict -- and to see if we cannot create more Egypts, more countries willing to arrive at peace agreements with Israel, bring peace to that very troubled region. And I would think that both those leaders would be very important ones to talk about this subject.

Q. We've had attacks on our Embassies and our marines and our diplomats, and our citizens have been kidnaped. I wonder, sir, there's been no public sign of American retaliation that you spoke of 4 years ago, and has it been over the past 4 years that you've found that it's actually somewhat impossible for us to deal out swift and effective retribution?

The President. Well, Candy, let me just say that it's -- I referred to them as criminals a little while ago. They are criminals. They may think they've got a noble cause or something -- they're criminals, committing the worst and most despicable kind of crimes. Now, you have the same problem that you have with crime. They act surreptitiously; they come out of hiding; they're anonymous; they disappear again. You have to track them down; you've got to find them. You try to prevent their crimes by crime prevention measures, defensive measures, the best you can. You try to track them down. Then you hope that you can punish.

Right now the terrorists -- one of the things that has kept us from retaliation is the difficulty in getting definite information enough as to who they are and where they are that you do not risk killing -- doing the same thing they're doing -- killing innocent people in an effort to get at them.

Q. Well, if I could just quickly ask you then, are you suggesting -- I understand your inability to talk of specifics -- but are you suggesting that the case is not closed in Beirut and what happened to our marines and our Embassies, that's still a very active search for those responsible and will there then still be swift and -- retribution?

Q. Mr. President, your communications with Ambassador Kirkpatrick about her future in the administration at least has created the perception that those communications are either through intermediaries or through the press. You're meeting with her Wednesday -- is this like a summit meeting -- you don't plan a summit until you are assured of some reasonable amount of success?

The President. [Laughing] No. And I have to tell you those press stories that I've been reading are driving me right up the wall, because they're not based on fact or anything. She and I will be having a talk. I need to know what she might be interested in doing. I have to present what might be the opportunities at this end. But I hear and have read all these things, and they're not being helpful at all -- these stories. And I don't know where the leaks are coming from.

The President. No. But, as I said, the press is trying to pretend that they know what jobs I'm going to offer. No -- and I haven't said anything to her or to anyone else about that particular subject. So, I'm as amazed at the stories that are appearing as I can be.

SALT II agreement. But, your Navy Secretary says he's waiting for a decision from you on the next action required to stay within SALT limits regarding Trident submarines. Have you made that decision, and has it been communicated to the Defense Department?

The President. No. What he's talking about is the fact that, as we continue with our Trident submarines, we are approaching a point at which, if we abide completely by the SALT II agreement, we would then have to find other weapons to eliminate. We have eliminated some in going forward with this, and we've run out of, I think, of the particular weapon that we were eliminating -- that we'll have to do that, or discuss whether we actually go above. And, in that regard, we have to take into consideration that the Soviet Union has, we believe, not stayed within the limits.

Now, do we want to join them in that and forget the whole idea, or do we want to talk to them about going forward. But we haven't made a decision because, and I say, that's down the road aways, and it's a few Trident submarines away from where we are now.

Q. Sir, I'd like to go back to your relationship with black voters in the United States. While there obviously have been some gains, it's still a fact that black unemployment is about 2\1/2\ times what it is for whites. And there are virtually no blacks holding visible jobs in the executive branch.

And we keep seeing these reports saying that your programs are hurting poor people, many of whom are black, and that just doesn't square with the statement that it's a misperception, that all the problems are a misperception.

The President. Well, there is a black in our Cabinet, and I had a meeting not too long ago with some 200 blacks in executive positions in our administration. And as Governor of California, I appointed more blacks to executive and policymaking positions than all the previous Governors of California put together.

So, I think that there is a lack of understanding or communication, for some, because there are many black groups and individuals who know what we're doing and who are highly supportive of us and of what we're doing. So, again, as I say, I hope we can get the message to the others what it is we're trying to accomplish.

Q. Mr. President, South African President P.W. Botha has indicated plans to change some aspects of the Government's apartheid policy. For example, limited political participation for blacks living outside the so-called homeland areas. What is your reaction to this? Do you consider this a major, minor, or no step at all toward freedom for the black majority?

The President. Bob, we feel that we are making some progress there. They know of our feeling about the repugnance of apartheid, and we think that there are many people in South Africa who want that system changed. And we think that we are giving them encouragement in our support of that position. And we are working steadily and quietly with them and are going to continue to do that.

You've said that American troops would not be involved in Central America, but if we started facing a terrorist threat from Nicaragua, couldn't you have a situation where you'd have to send in American troops?

The President. Well, a President should never say never, but I can tell you right now that we've never had any plans at all. We've realized that that would be counterproductive, even with regard to our friends in Latin America. So, we're continuing to work with the Contadora, we're continuing to work with the other Central American nations down there to be helpful. The Kissinger commission report, that called for aid that would be mainly social aid and economic aid and only military help in the line of training and arms and so forth and equipment. And that's still going to be our policy.

The President. No. I have agreed to stay beyond the summit meeting for a couple of days for a state visit, official state visit to Germany, to Western Germany. And that will be close enough to the time that, I think, that if there's any observance, it would be there and with our hosts, the German Government. And I have to tell you that I hope that, worldwide, the observance this time, of the end of World War II, will not be the rejoicing of a victory and recalling all of the hatred that went on at the time. I hope we'll recognize it now as the day that democracy and freedom and peace began, and friendship between erstwhile enemies.

Q. You've been listening to a conversation with President Reagan, an interview with correspondents from seven radio networks. This program has come to you live from the Roosevelt Room of the White House.

Throughout the struggle for freedom and democracy, men and women of extraordinary dedication have emerged to lead others in the pursuit of human dignity. Jose Marti was one of those heroes, and today we are proud to honor his numerous accomplishments on behalf of his fellow Cubans.

Jose Marti was one of those giants who possessed numerous talents. As an orator, journalist, lawyer, novelist, and literary critic he was able to do much to enhance and further his people's rich cultural heritage. It is certain that he will be remembered by the freedom-loving people of our world as a pioneer and leader in the movement for true human liberation.

Senator Cohen was first elected to the U.S. House of Representatives in 1972, where he served until his election to the United States Senate in 1978. He is currently a member of the Senate Armed Services Committee and is chairman of the Subcommittee on Seapower and Force Projection. He is a member of the Governmental Affairs Committee and chairman of the Subcommittee on the Oversight of Government Management. Additionally, he is a member of the Select Committee on Intelligence.

Commission referenced in paragraph 3 above, the quotas established by paragraph (B) of this proclamation shall apply to articles entered, or withdrawn from warehouse, for consumption on or after the effective date of this proclamation. However, those quotas shall not apply to articles entered, or withdrawn from warehouse, for consumption if application of those quotas would prevent the entry, or withdrawal from warehouse, for consumption of the articles and if the articles were (1) exported from the country of origin prior to the effective date of this proclamation and (2) imported directly into the United States, as determined by the appropriate customs officials, in accordance with the criteria set forth at 19 CFR 10.174, 10.175 (1984).

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 28th day of Jan., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

The Director of the National Science Foundation shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member of the Commission. The President shall designate a Chairperson from among the five voting members of the Commission.

Commission and the agency head, permit the Commission to utilize their facilities and services to the extent that the facilities and services are needed for the establishment and development of an Arctic research policy. The Commission shall take every feasible step to avoid duplication of effort.

Sec. 6. Administration of the Commission. Members of the Commission who are otherwise employed for compensation shall serve without compensation for their work on the Commission, but may be allowed travel expenses, including per diem in lieu of subsistence, as authorized by law for persons serving intermittently in the government service. Members of the Commission who are not otherwise employed for compensation shall be compensated for each day the member is engaged in actual performance of duties as a member, not to exceed 90 days of service each calendar year, at a rate equal to the daily equivalent of the rate for GS - 16 of the General Schedule.

Sec. 10. Public Participation. The Interagency Committee will provide public notice of its meetings and an opportunity for the public to participate in the development and implementation of national Arctic research policy.

Each agency represented on the Committee shall, to the extent permitted by law and subject to the availability of funds, provide the Committee with such administrative services, facilities, staff, and other support services as may be necessary for effective performance of its functions.

Sec. 2. Functions. (a) The Commission shall review the overall adequacy of the chemical warfare posture of the United States with particular emphasis on the question of whether the United States should produce binary chemical munitions. In conducting its review, the Commission shall take account of the considerations specified in Section 1511 of Public Law 98 - 525.

Sec. 2. Functions. (a) The Commission shall review existing public outdoor recreation policies, programs, and opportunities provided by the Federal government, State and local governments, and private organizations and entities and shall review privately provided outdoor recreation resources to the extent that they affect the demand for public outdoor recreation resources. The Commission shall, consistent with the need for fiscal economy at all levels of government, make recommendations to the President concerning the outdoor recreation resources, programs, and opportunities that will ensure the future availability of outdoor recreation for the American people. In making its recommendations, the Commission shall assess the budgetary and regulatory cost increases or cost savings of its proposals, and shall, to the extent possible, utilize such studies, data, and reports previously prepared or under preparation by Federal agencies, States, private organizations or other entities.

Commission. Members appointed from among private citizens of the United States may be allowed travel expenses, including per diem in lieu of subsistence, as authorized by law for persons serving intermittently in the government service (5 U.S.C. 5701 - 5707).

The President. Well, your industry played an integral part in the national economy. Your contributions to the revitalization of America's fundamental values of personal initiative and perseverance have been especially significant.

Washington, we released some figures that over the past four quarters productivity has increased at the highest rate since 1971, and manufacturing productivity in those same four quarters was at the highest rate since 1973.

Our efforts to lower taxes, cut government spending, and rid our economy of inflation have paid off. And I really appreciate the role that your association, the National Association of Home Builders, played to make our program succeed.

And, also, I send greetings and congratulations to your new incoming president, John Koelemij, who met yesterday -- I met with him here at a meeting on the deficit. John, we have a full platter of issues this year, and we're looking forward to your help and support.

Our primary goal for the second term is to ensure continuation of strong economc growth with low inflation and lower interest rates. And to achieve this, we have to cut Federal spending to control the deficit.

We got into this deficit mess not because government collects too little in taxes, but because government spends too much. And this year we're planning to take bold steps to remedy the situation and to start a trend of declining deficits as a percentage of gross national product.

Despite progress in many areas, cardiovascular disease remains this Nation's number one cause of death. The sad fact is that more than 40 million Americans have one or more forms of heart or blood vessel disease. Strokes afflict almost two million people annually. As many as 1.5 million persons will have a heart attack this year, and approximately 550,000 of them will die. In all, diseases of the heart and blood vessels will take the lives of almost one million of our fellow citizens -- some of whom may be our family members, our friends and our co-workers.

Almost as many people will die from cardiovascular disease during 1985 as from cancer, accidents, and all other causes combined. Economic losses will also run high. This Nation will spend an estimated $72 billion in 1985 for medical treatment, lost salaries, rehiring and training, and insurance and disability claims resulting from heart and blood vessel disease.

In 1948, those two organizations joined forces to seek ways to reduce early death and disability from heart disease, stroke, and related disorders. Since then, much has been accomplished through research, professional and public education, and community service programs.

We have learned, for example, that maintaining proper nutrition, not smoking, and controlling high blood pressure can make a significant difference in the rate of incidence of these diseases. As a result, the death rates for heart attacks and strokes are much lower today than they were in 1948.

Association to make everyone more aware of the dangers of smoking. Tougher labeling laws for cigarette packaging and advertising enacted last year by Congress will help. Research projects, such as the Coronary Primary Prevention Trials concluded in 1984, have given new impetus to the American Heart Association's long-standing finding that control of blood cholesterol decreases risk for heart attacks and strokes. The American Heart Association has taken major steps to inform the public about the significance of those test results, to influence Americans to adopt a prudent diet, and to encourage the efforts of scientists who are unlocking the mysteries of heart and blood vessel diseases.

Now, Therefore, I, Ronald Reagan, President of the United States of America, do hereby proclaim the month of February 1985 as American Heart Month. I invite the Governors of the States, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the officials of other areas subject to the jurisdiction of the United States, and the American people to join me in reaffirming our commitment to the resolution of the nationwide problem of cardiovascular disease.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-ninth day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

The history of the American Nation is one of conviction in the face of tyranny, courage in the midst of turmoil and faith despite the roils of doubt and defeatism. Throughout our 208 years of freedom, the people of the United States have drawn upon the lessons learned at the dawn of our liberty by acting ``with a firm reliance on Divine Providence'' and expressing gratitude for the many blessings a loving God has showered upon us.

War, the Continental Congress proclaimed a National Day of Prayer each year for eight years, a practice that ended with the winning of the peace in 1783. Decades later, while the Civil War raged, this observance was renewed by Abraham Lincoln. Responding to a Senate Resolution requesting the President to designate and set apart a day for prayer and humiliation, Lincoln said that ``intoxicated with unbroken success, we have become too self-sufficient to feel the necessity of redeeming and preserving grace, too proud to pray to the God that made us.'' He then called the Nation to prayer.

We can give thanks to God for the ever-increasing abundance He has bestowed on us, and we can remember all those in our society who are in need of help, whether it be material assistance in the form of charity or simply a friendly word of encouragement. We are all God's handiwork, and it is appropriate for us as individuals and as a Nation to call to Him in prayer.

By joint resolution of the Congress approved April 17, 1952, the recognition of a particular day set aside each year as a National Day of Prayer has become a cherished national tradition. Since that time, every President has proclaimed an annual National Day of Prayer, resuming the tradition begun by the Continental Congress.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Alfred H. Kingon to be Cabinet Secretary and Deputy Assistant to the President. Mr. Kingon will succeed Craig L. Fuller, who will assist the Chief of Staff in coordinating the transition for the next few months before returning to the private sector.

Affairs in January 1984. In this position he serves as the Secretary's principal adviser on Treasury issues effecting business, trade and professional organizations and groups. Prior to becoming Assistant Secretary he served, since 1981, as the Deputy Assistant Secretary for Developing Nations, with responsibility for economic and financial relations with developing countries, including debt rescheduling and International Monetary Fund programs.

Mr. Dawson earned his M.B.A. from the Stanford University Graduate School of Business, graduating in the top 5 percent of his class. He has a bachelor's degree, with honors, in economics from Stanford University and has done graduate work in economics at Woodrow Wilson School of Public and International Affairs at Princeton University.

Mr. Chew has been serving as Senior Deputy Comptroller of the Currency for Policy and Planning since April 1984. In that capacity he has been responsible for OCC's analysis of the economic, structural, and deregulatory policy issues affecting the national banking system. In addition, he has overseen the Office's bank chartering and licensing functions, including applications for national bank charters, branches, mergers, and other banking activities. He has been responsible for the Office's financial management, strategic planning, and the computer and systems modernization programs. From 1981 to April 1984, Mr. Chew served as Executive Assistant to the Secretary of the Treasury. He previously was vice president of Citizen's Choice, a public interest organization affiliated with the U.S. Chamber of Commerce.

Mr. Rogers has been a member of the White House staff since 1981 and now serves as Assistant to the President for Management and Administration and Director, Office of Administration. In addition to his present responsibilities, he recently served as director and general manager of the Committee for the 50th American Presidential Inaugural.

House transition team, and prior to the transition served as assistant to the president for administration at the American Enterprise Institute for Public Policy Research (AEI). He previously worked as a researcher in the White House during the Ford administration.

Assistant to the President for Political Affairs. In addition to her White House responsibilities, she recently served as director of public liaison of the Committee for the 50th American Presidential Inaugural.

Thank you, ladies and gentlemen. It's very good to be here again. I look forward to this meeting every year more than any other. And I want to personally welcome our guests from other countries to Washington, our Capital. We're happy to have you here with us.

We've already heard some of the history from representatives of the two Houses. But I think some of the story may be unknown, even to a few of our hosts from the Congress here today. Back in 1942, at the height of World War II, a handful of Senators and Congressmen discussed how they might be of personal and spiritual support to one another. If they could gather now and then to pray together, they might discover an added resource, which would be of sustaining value. And so, very informally, they began to meet.

In time, in both the House and Senate groups, some informal rules evolved. The members would meet in the spirit of peace and in the spirit of Christ, but they need not be Christians. All members would be welcome, regardless of their political or religious affiliation. Sincere seekers, as well as the deeply devoted, all on a common journey to understand the place of faith in their lives and to discover how to love God and one's fellow man.

They wouldn't publicize the meetings, nor would they use them for any kind of political gain. The meetings would be off the record. No one would repeat what was said. And, above all, the members could talk about any personal problem on which they needed guidance, any sadness for which they needed prayers.

Eisenhower, as we've been told, came into the story. In 1952, when he was running for President, one of his most important strategists, and a fine man -- was a fine man, a Senator named Frank Carlson. I guess he was kind of Ike's Paul Laxalt. [Laughter] One night, out on the campaign trail, Eisenhower confided to Senator Carlson that during the war, when he was commanding the Allied forces in Europe, he had had a spiritual experience. He had felt the hand of God guiding him and felt the presence of God. And he spoke of how his friends had provided real spiritual strength in the days before D-day. Senator Carlson said he understood, that he himself was getting spiritual strength from members of a little prayer group in the Senate.

The prayer meetings in the House and Senate are not widely known by the public. Members of the media know, but they have, with great understanding and dignity, generally kept it quiet. I've had my moments with the press, but I commend them this day, for the way they've worked to maintain the integrity of this movement.

Some wonderful things have come out of this fellowship. A number of public figures have changed as human beings, changed in ways I'd like to talk about, but it might reveal too much about the membership. Fellowships have begun to spring up throughout the Capitol. They exist now in all three branches of the Government, and they have spread throughout the capitals of the world, to parliaments and congresses far away.

Since we met last year, members of the fellowship throughout the world have begun meeting with each other. Members of our Congress have met with leaders and officials from other countries, approaching them and speaking to them, not on a political level, but a spiritual level.

I wish I could say more about it, but it's working precisely because it is private. In some of the most troubled parts of the world, political figures who are old enemies are meeting with each other in a spirit of peace and brotherhood. And some who've been involved in such meetings are here today.

I think we often forget in the daily rush of events the importance in all human dealings of the spiritual dimension. There are such diversities in the world, such terrible and passionate divisions between men, but prayer and fellowship among the great universe of God's believers are the beginning of understanding and reconciliation. They remind us of the great, over-arching things that really unite us.

In this job of mine, you meet with so many people, deal with so many of the problems of man, you can't help being moved by the quiet, unknown heroism of all kinds of people -- the Prime Minister of another country who makes the bravest of brave decisions that's right, but may not be too popular with his constituency; or the fellow from Indiana who writes to me about some problems he's been having and what he did to solve them.

You see the heroism and the goodness of man and know in a special way that we are all God's children. The clerk and the king and the Communist were made in His image. We all have souls, and we all have the same problems. I'm convinced, more than ever, that man finds liberation only when he binds himself to God and commits himself to his fellow man.

Will you forgive me if I repeat a story that I told here last year? It's a story that goes back to the fourth century. There was an Asian monk living in a little remote village, tending his garden, spending much of his time in prayer. And then one day, he thought he heard the voice of God telling him to go to Rome. Well, he obeyed the Lord's command, and he set out on foot. And many weary weeks later, he arrived in the capital city of the Roman Empire at the time of a great festival that was going on in Rome. And the little monk followed the crowd that was surging down the streets into the Colosseum. He saw the gladiators come forth, stand before the Emperor, and say, ``We who are about to die salute you.'' And, then, he realized these men were going to fight to the death for the entertainment of the crowd. And he cried out, ``In the name of Christ, stop!'' And as the games began, he fought his way down through the crowd, climbed over the wall and dropped to the floor of the arena. And when the crowd saw this tiny figure making his way out to the gladiators, saying, ``In the name of Christ, stop,'' they thought it was part of the entertainment. And they began laughing. But when they realized it wasn't, then their laughter turned to anger. And as he was pleading with the gladiators to stop, one of them plunged a sword into his body, and he fell to the sand of the arena, and as he was dying, his last words were, ``In the name of Christ, stop.'' Then a strange thing began to happen. The gladiator stood looking at the tiny figure lying there in the sand. A hush fell over the Colosseum. Way up in the upper tiers, a man stood and made his way to the exit. Others began to follow. In dead silence, everyone left the Colosseum. And that was the last battle to the death between gladiators in the Roman Colosseum.

Never again in the great stadium did men kill each other for the entertainment of the crowd. And all because of one tiny voice that could hardly be heard above the tumult. One voice that spoke the truth in God's name.

Today in Vienna, members of NATO and the Warsaw Pact will resume their efforts to negotiate reductions of conventional forces in central Europe. These talks on mutual and balanced force reductions (MBFR) are an integral and important part of our commitment to achieve genuine progress in arms reductions -- conventional, chemical, and nuclear.

Last month, the NATO alliance in its ministerial communique expressed the continuing Western commitment to do everything possible to achieve a verifiable agreement reducing conventional forces to parity at lower levels. Such an agreement would enhance confidence, improve military stability, and reduce the risk of war in Europe. On its return to Vienna, the United States delegation will continue to do its part to achieve such an agreement.

On February 1st we begin the Fifty - Ninth Annual Black History Month, a national celebration of the role of Black Americans in all segments of life in this nation and of Black culture around the globe.

It is a very special privilege for me to call on the people of the United States to join in this important time of exploring, learning, appreciating, and saluting all that Black Americans have done to help build our country.

I'm pleased to speak to you on the occasion of the New Year. This is a time for reflection and for hope. As we look back on the year just concluded and on the year that is to come, I want to share with you my hopes for the New Year, hopes for peace, prosperity, and good will that the American and Soviet people share.

Just over a month ago, General Secretary Gorbachev and I met for the first time in Geneva. Our purpose was to begin a fresh chapter in the relations between our two countries and to try to reduce the suspicions and mistrust between us. I think we made a good beginning. Mr. Gorbachev and I spent many hours together, speaking frankly and seriously about the most important issues of our time: reducing the massive nuclear arsenals on both sides, resolving regional conflicts, ensuring respect for human rights as guaranteed under international agreements, and other questions of mutual interest. As the elected representative of the American people, I told Mr. Gorbachev of our deep desire for peace and that the American people do not wish the Soviet people any harm.

While there were many areas which we did not agree, which was to be expected, we left Geneva with a better understanding of one another and of the goals we each have. We are determined to build on that understanding in the coming months and years. One of the most important things on which we agreed was the need to reduce the massive nuclear arsenals on both sides. As I have said many times, a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought; therefore, we agreed to accelerate negotiations where there is common ground to reduce and eventually eliminate the means of nuclear destruction.

Our negotiators will soon be returning to the Geneva talks on nuclear and space arms, where Mr. Gorbachev and I agreed we will seek agreements on the principle of 50-percent reductions in offensive nuclear arms and an interim agreement on intermediate-range nuclear systems. And it's my hope that one day we will be able to eliminate these weapons altogether and rely increasingly for our security on defense systems that threaten no one. Both the United States and Soviet Union are doing research on the possibilities of applying new technologies to the cause of defense. If these technologies become a reality, it is my dream that, well, to one day free us all from the threat of nuclear destruction.

One of the best ways to build mutual understanding is to allow the American and Soviet peoples to get to know one another better. In Geneva we signed a new agreement to exchange our most accomplished artists and academics. We also agreed to expand the contacts between our peoples so that students, teachers, and young people can get to know each other directly. If people in both countries can visit, study, and work together, then we will strengthen the bonds of understanding and build a true foundation for lasting peace.

I also discussed the American people's strong interest in humanitarian issues. Our democratic system is founded on the belief in the sanctity of human life and the rights of the individual -- rights such as freedom of speech, of assembly of movement, and of worship. It is a sacred truth to us that every individual is a unique creation of God, with his or her own special talents, abilities, hopes, and dreams. Respect for all people is essential to peace, and as we agreed in Geneva, progress in resolving humanitarian issues in a spirit of cooperation would go a long way to making 1986 a better year for all of us.

A safe and lasting peace also requires finding peaceful settlements to armed conflicts, which cause so much human suffering in many parts of the world. I have proposed several concrete steps to help resolve such conflicts. It is my hope that in 1986 we will make progress toward this end. I see a busy year ahead in building on the foundations laid in Geneva. There is much work to be done. Mr. Gorbachev will visit the United States later this year, and I look forward to showing him our country. In 1987 I plan to visit your country and hope to meet many of you.

On behalf of the American people, I wish you all a happy and healthy New Year. Let's work together to make it a year of peace; there is no better goal for 1986 or for any year. Let us look forward to a future of chistoye nyebo [blue skies] for all mankind. Thank you, spasibo.

I see a good augury in the way we are beginning the New Year, which has been declared the Year of Peace. We are starting it with an exchange of direct messages, President Reagan's to the Soviet people and mine to you. This, I believe, is a hopeful sign of change which, though small, is nonetheless a change for the better in our relations. The few minutes that I will be speaking to you strike me as a meaningful symbol of our mutual willingness to go on moving toward each other, which is what your President and I began doing at Geneva. For a discussion along those lines, we had the mandate of our peoples. They want the constructive Soviet-American dialog to continue uninterrupted and to yield tangible results.

As I face you today, I want to say that Soviet people are dedicated to peace, that supreme value equal to the gift of life. We cherish the idea of peace, having suffered for it. Together with the pain of unhealing wounds and the agony of irretrievable losses, it has become part and parcel of our flesh and blood. In our country there is not a single family or a single home that has not kept alive the memory of their kith and kin who perished in the flames of war, the war in which the Soviet and American peoples were allies and fought side by side.

I say this because our common quest for peace has its roots in the past, and that means we have a historic record of cooperation which can today inspire our joint efforts for the sake of the future. The many letters I have received from you and my conversations with your fellow countrymen -- Senators, Congressmen, scientists, businessmen, and statesmen -- have convinced me that in the United States, too, people realize that our two nations should never be at war, that a collision between them would be the greatest of tragedies.

It is a reality of today's world that it is senseless to seek greater security for oneself through new types of weapons. At present, every new step in the arms race increases the danger and the risk for both sides and for all humankind. It is the forceful and compelling demand of life itself that we should follow the path of cutting back nuclear arsenals and keeping outer space peaceful. This is what we are negotiating about at Geneva, and we would very much like those talks to be successful this year.

In our efforts for peace, we should be guided by an awareness of the fact that today history has willed our two nations to bear an enormous responsibility to the peoples of our two countries and, indeed, the peoples of all countries for preserving life on Earth. Our duty to all human kind is to offer it a safe prospect of peace, a prospect of entering the third millenium without fear. Let us commit ourselves to doing away with the threat hanging over humanity. Let us not shift that task onto our children's shoulders.

We can hardly succeed in attaining that goal unless we begin saving up, bit by bit, the most precious capital there is: trust among nations and peoples. And it is absolutely essential to start mending the existing deficit of trust in Soviet-American relations. I believe that one of the main results of my meeting with President Reagan is that, as leaders and as human beings, we were able to take the first step towards overcoming mistrust and to activate the factor of confidence. The gap dividing us is still wide, to bridge it will not be easy, but we saw in Geneva that it can be done. Bridging that gap would be a great feat, a feat our people are ready to perform for the sake of world peace.

I am reminded of the title of a remarkable work of American literature, the novel ``The Winter of Our Discontent.'' In that phrase let me just substitute hope for discontent. And may not only this winter but every season of this year and of the years to come be full of hope for a better future, a hope that, together, we can turn into reality. I can assure you that we shall spare no effort in working for that. For the Soviet people, the year 1986 marks the beginning of a new stage in carrying out our constructive plans. Those are peaceful plans. We have made them known to the whole world.

The President. I believe the advantages and disadvantages are the same for Mexico as they are for the United States. Two countries as closely joined as ours affect each other greatly. Mexico's problems are felt in the United States, and the problems of the United States are felt in Mexico. But the reverse is also true; we share in your successes and good fortune, and you share in ours. Our proximity to each other is a fact of life. It creates a relationship that is different from our relationship with any other countries. I believe our relationship today is as good as it is because, as neighbors, we cannot afford not to cooperate. That means we must quickly overcome any differences that exist, because an inability to cooperate is harmful to both our countries. From that point, we have built a relationship that is mature and mutually respectful.

Q. Early in January you will meet President Miguel De la Madrid for a conference considered normal and regular between the Presidents of neighboring countries. What do you expect of this meeting and of our nation's future relations with Mexico?

The President. You are right; these meetings are normal and regular. For close neighbors like Mexico and the United States, whose relationship is so complex, it is important for heads of state to have a close working relationship. This has certainly been the case with President De la Madrid and me. When a relationship such as the one between the U.S. and Mexico exists, a relationship in which there is constant communication at all levels on many subjects, progress is made continuously. President De la Madrid and I meet regularly to discuss the most important matters and to exchange views directly so that we are better able together to direct the course of our relationship. In other words, what I expect to come of this meeting is a further strengthening and deepening of our relationship and greater cooperation on the issues that concern us most. I expect our relations with Mexico to continue to improve in the future, and I see no reason why they cannot. Our relationship is a model of what two countries can accomplish if they respect each other's sovereignty and are determined to cooperate on areas of mutual interest.

Q. Because of its proximity, Mexico has an important bearing on the national security and geopolitical concerns of the U.S. Government. How serious are U.S. concerns over differences in foreign policy -- mainly in Central America -- and how do they influence U.S. attitudes and the relationship with Mexico?

The President. Our relationship with Mexico is complex, as complex as our relationship with any other important country such as the United Kingdom, France, or Japan. We are constantly working to overcome our disagreements wherever possible and to improve our relationship in the other areas. In the case of Central America, there are differences of opinion between our two governments, although these differences are not as great as they are often portrayed in the press and by some individual analysts. We are in frequent communication with the Mexican Government about Central America. It is important to both our countries. Even if we do not reach complete agreement, it is crucial that we understand each other's point of view and maintain our ability to discuss our points of view openly and honestly, as two friendly, sovereign, mature nations. I should stress, however, that our experience shows that it is possible to work constructively together on a wide array of other problems despite our differences. We certainly would not want actions to be taken because of our differences over Central America; that would impair other aspects of our relationship. Our relationship is, after all, based on many important issues, not just one.

Q. Because of its effect on the economy and immigration, the border between Mexico and the U.S. is of great concern to both countries. How could those concerns be resolved? How do you propose to address this issue?

The President. Those concerns are best managed by clear and frequent communication at all levels between our two governments. This process begins with my regular consultations with President De la Madrid, a man with whom I have developed a very close and personal working relationship. We have a binational commission which meets regularly under the chairmanship of the United States Secretary of State and the Mexican Secretary of Foreign Relations. In addition, cabinet members from both of our governments have regular meetings with their counterparts to deal with problems affecting both sides of the border. The interparliamentary exchange between our two legislatures provides a means for our lawmakers to discuss these common problems as well. The International Boundary and Water Commission maintains a constant dialog aimed at promoting equitable use of water resources along the border. And progress is being made to implement the Border Environmental Cooperation Agreement which President De la Madrid and I signed in 1983. The issues posed by our common border are many faceted and require continuous attention; no single solution or formula will address all of these facets or necessarily produce a permanent solution. It is only by continuing to work on each individual aspect of the issues created by our common border, using the many channels for cooperative and constructive discussion, that we can deal effectively with them.

Q. The border between the U.S. and Mexico is more than national. It represents a division between an advanced nation and Third World countries, between Anglo-Saxons and Latinos, between different cultures and political systems. How can the United States use this border to minimize its differences with Mexico and the rest of Latin America?

The President. The border has already helped to minimize the differences between our two cultures. On both sides of the border one sees an impressive cultural cross-fertilization that is helpful in building mutual understanding. This is happening largely outside of government; it is a phenomenon that is being carried out by the Mexican and American peoples, by universities in the area which promote study and research, by businesses which forge commercial and cultural ties, and by private foundations and voluntary institutions. Their efforts help us become better neighbors and make it easier to resolve border problems which may arise between our countries.

The President. I am personally committed to free and fair trade and to fighting protectionist trends in the United States. The position of my administration has been made clear by several decisions to oppose protectionist measures, such as my recent veto of a measure which would have restricted imports of footwear, textiles, and copper. Certainly, Mexican entry to the GATT will be a potent weapon to use against the forces of protectionism, because it is a sure and clear sign that Mexico wants fair treatment for its exports and is willing to treat other countries' exports in a fair manner, according to established international standards. The United States is the world's most accessible market. We are the world's freest trading nation. Most Americans want free trade, but Americans also want to be assured that our exports, on which many Americans depend for their livelihood, are treated fairly in foreign markets.

Q. The debt problem in developing countries is far from being solved. This problem also touches your country, even in a different manner. What solutions are you considering? How could the debtor countries' burden be eased without sacrificing their prospects for development?

The President. We are very concerned about the debt burden of developing countries, particularly in this hemisphere, and we want to help those developing countries grow. We have outlined our approach in the Program for Sustained Growth put forward in Seoul by Secretary [of the Treasury] Baker. That plan emphasizes economic adjustment and new lending to assist growth and flexibility on the part of the international financial system. The aim of this plan is precisely to use development and growth as a means of dealing with debt and improving the well-being of people in developing countries.

Q. As a result of your dialog with Secretary General Gorbachev and your hope for peaceful competition after the Geneva summit, U.S. relations with the U.S.S.R. may improve. How could this spirit of Geneva be implemented in this hemisphere, specifically with Mexico, Central America, and the Caribbean?

The President. The spirit of Geneva could very easily be implemented in this hemisphere if the Soviet Union would cease its support of groups who are attempting to establish Communist dictatorships in the Americas. This is an issue that deeply affects not only the United States but all American democracies. The hand of the Soviet Union and its Cuban surrogate can be found behind terrorist movements such as the M - 19 in Colombia, the AVC in Ecuador, and of course the FMLN in El Salvador, among others. It is behind the Nicaraguan Government's subversion of its democratic neighbors. And the link between the governments of such Soviet allies as Cuba and Nicaragua and international narcotics trafficking and terrorism is becoming increasingly clear. These twin evils, narcotics trafficking and terrorism, represent the most insidious and dangerous threats to the hemisphere today. This hemisphere is truly the cradle of democracy. Communism is an unwanted, foreign ideology. The Soviets realize that it will never be established by choice in this hemisphere, so they resort to subversion and support for terrorism. Their malevolent activities in this hemisphere affect our bilateral relations with them. If they truly seek improved relations with the United States, one way to achieve that goal would be to end those activities.

Q. The growing problems between the United States and Nicaragua are introducing increased tensions in Central America, despite efforts of the Contadora process. To what extent are you prepared to assist the Contadora nations in reaching a peaceful solution there? Would you reopen bilateral negotiations with Nicaragua if the Contadora nations called for this action?

The President. We fully support the efforts of the Contadora nations to achieve a comprehensive and verifiable implementation of the Contadora Document of Objectives. We have repeatedly stated that we would fully respect any such agreement arising from the Contadora process. During nine rounds of bilateral talks with the Sandinista government, we tried to help advance the Contadora process. We concluded, however, that the Sandinistas were using the talks to undermine Contadora. In our view, the most fundamental issue in the region is national reconciliation. There will be no lasting peace without democratic national reconciliation. To encourage national reconciliation, we have told the Sandinistas that we will resume bilateral talks when they accept the March 1985 proposal of the democratic resistance for a church-mediated dialog, cease-fire, and a suspension of the state of emergency. The proposal of the opposition is a reasonable one. But the Sandinistas do not seek reconciliation; they seek the consolidation of a Communist dictatorship. That is why they refuse to talk to the democratic resistance. That is why they have attempted to crush the church, the free press, free labor, business, and any political dissent within Nicaragua. And that is why they have attempted to sabotage the Contadora talks, which are now suspended at the insistence of the Sandinista government.

Ladies and gentlemen, I can't tell you what this welcome means to me. And I know so many that had a hand in it -- all of you here at the El Centro naval facility, members of the Navy League, and the Fleet Reserve Association. I'd like to say a special greeting, also, to Congressman Duncan Hunter and Mika Camarena, whose husband gave his life for all of us in the fight against the drug traffic. And my thanks to the Holtville Band. I think you're well known to some of them here.

Well, this is, as I say, a very great welcome. I know that the El Centro naval facility is not only a great training center here for all of our Navy pilots but is the winter home of the Blue Angels, host to the Royal Air Force Falcons. There's only one thing, as an old ex-horse cavalryman: How come this Navy facility is out here in the desert? May I just say to all of you -- and I know that time is of the essence and I must get in this and cross the border -- may I just say that of all the things that one can find to be proud of in a position such as mine, nothing has made me more proud than the men and women in uniform in our Armed Forces. God bless you all. And every time I read some things like Mr. Qadhafi sounding off the way he does, I just think to myself about all of you, and I can't be bothered with Mr. Qadhafi.

President De la Madrid, distinguished guests, and citizens of Mexico, it is a special privilege for me to begin my new year with you. As one year becomes another, we're reminded of those meaningful items in our lives that remain constant even through the passage of time. I think we can all be grateful, on both sides of the border, for one thing that has remained constant over these many years: the good will between our peoples. Good relations have been part of our past; they are an important part of our present; and will most assuredly be part of our future.

The trust and cooperation between our two countries are mirrored in the solid personal and professional relationship President De la Madrid and I have developed. I have met with him on three occasions, and the telephone line between Mexico City and Washington, DC, has been kept busy with our calls.

I'm looking forward to our meeting today; we have much to discuss. The economies of our countries are already closely linked. As we prepare for a better future, we should explore new ways of improving the well-being of both our peoples by enhancing the business, trade, and financial ties that bind us. In our relationship, clearly, we help ourselves by helping each other. I also look forward to discussing with you, President De la Madrid, other areas of mutual concern and cooperation. The good and decent people of both our countries have made a strong commitment to fight the scourge of narcotics and drug trafficking. This battle continues. Issues of regional and global peace are of intense interest to us both, as is the expansion of democracy in this hemisphere. Cross-border environmental questions are important. As one would expect of close neighbors, we have much to talk about. As one would expect between friends, I am certain our exchange will be in the spirit of mutual respect and understanding.

Citizens of Mexico and the United States share a very human relationship. This was never clearer than when earthquakes savaged your country a few months ago. The heart of the American people went out to you. My wife, Nancy, returned home from visiting the devastation with stories of the quiet dignity and perseverance displayed by your people in the face of great personal tragedy. We are proud to be friends of such people.

President De la Madrid, honored members of the delegations, and friends, this visit marks the fourth meeting that I've had with President De la Madrid. And I hope you agree, Mr. President, that each meeting seems more productive than the last. I deeply appreciate the open and candid manner in which we are able to discuss the issues at hand. It speaks well of our personal relationship and that of our countries.

We examined, in our meeting, trade and investment between the United States and Mexico. This is an area in which, I believe, more progress can be made with great benefits to both our peoples. Mexico's debt burden remains a serious challenge. But I am impressed with the commitment that you've made, Mr. President, to meet this challenge and to take the necessary steps to achieve a robust, growing Mexican economy. The United States remains ready and willing to work with you to reach that goal.

We also discussed today the considerable progress made since the signing of the Border Environmental Agreement in 1983. Men may have drawn a line in the ground to determine the boundary between us, but God made the land on both sides of that line. And it's up to us to take care of resources that are placed in our care. With a 2,000-mile border, there is considerable room for expanding our cooperation in this area. I took special note, Mr. President, of the recent agreement to proceed with a major reconstruction of bridges.

We also had an opportunity today to review the ongoing battle with the drug traffickers, as you have just said -- a fight in which Attorneys General Garcia Ramirez and Meese are playing a leading role. Cleansing our societies of this evil is not without cost. America joins with you in mourning the death of those valued Mexican officials who have been killed in the struggle against narcotics. There are tears on both sides of the border for the Mexican policeman killed recently in the State of Veracruz. They have shown honor and courage that transcends international boundaries. Our own DEA agent, Enrique Camarena, brutally murdered in the line of duty exemplifies this. He is an American hero, born here in Mexicali.

Our meeting today has afforded us a good opportunity to discuss our differences and to expand our cooperation in many areas of mutual interest. It appears these areas are expanding. And that, I believe, should surprise no one. We share many fundamental values and, in the end, these values will draw us closer. Exemplifying this, Mr. President, was an interview you recently conducted with a Mexican newspaper. And in it you applauded the progress toward democracy being made throughout Latin America and concluded that the tendency of all the world is to seek democracy. Furthermore, you said, and I quote, ``Regimes of force or authoritarian regimes are not the solution to overcoming economic and social problems in Latin America. Democracy is more effective in accomplishing these aims in a lasting way than the authoritarian regimes.'' Well, your words ring true, Mr. President. A commitment to democracy is the only true path to justice and to economic progress. Mexico and the United States can and should stand shoulder to shoulder in support of democracy in this hemisphere.

Outside this building is a bell, symbolic of the bell rung by an historic champion of human freedom, Father Hidalgo. This priest rang the parish bell in 1810 to rally the American [Mexican] people to fight against oppression. Miguel Hidalgo, Jose Maria Morelos, and many other brave Americans [Mexicans] gave their lives for this cause. And on the eve of September 16th, the bells are rung to commemorate your country's independence. We in the United States also have a bell symbolic of our liberty and independence; it's called the Liberty Bell. It's a national treasure, kept in Philadelphia at our Independence Hall. As we leave here today, let us pledge to each other that Mexico and the United States will ring the bells of freedom as Hidalgo, Jefferson, Juarez, and Lincoln did before us. It's a sound sweet to the ear of all who long to be free. Let us ring the bell of freedom so that all citizens of this hemisphere -- and we are all Americans, North, Central, and South -- will hear.

Permit me to start today by wishing you and your families a happy and prosperous 1986. As we begin this year, we can be grateful that America is at peace, that our economy is growing, and that throughout the land there's a renewed sense of confidence in America and our future.

I'd like to speak to you today about two vital aspects of foreign policy: our relations with our neighbors, Mexico and Canada. Just yesterday I traveled to Mexicali, Mexico, to meet President De la Madrid. This was our fourth meeting since his election and my seventh with a Mexican President since my own election in 1980. Today relations between the United States and Mexico are good. There's no clearer proof than our cooperation in rescue efforts after an earthquake struck Mexico City last September. And my talks yesterday with President De la Madrid were marked by an air of friendship. We've made progress in a number of areas which concern our two nations directly, including the improvement of Mexican-American bridges and border crossings and the expansion of trade between our two nations.

We paid particular attention to the fight against illegal drugs, both drug production and smuggling. In the past, our cooperation in this effort has helped stem the flow of narcotics into the United States. But in recent months, drug smuggling has been picking up. Well, President De la Madrid and I have agreed to redouble our efforts to bring this illegal trade, this trafficking and the warping and destruction of human life, to an end. We're of one mind about the need to eliminate drug crops, to provide heavy patrols on the border, and to step up the prosecution of those who deal in illegal narcotics. Both Mexican and American officials have given their lives in the battle against illegal drugs. For the sake of those brave men and every young person whose life is at stake, we must all -- and will -- continue the fight until victory is won.

In the international field, President De la Madrid and I expressed our respective viewpoints, notably on the problems of Nicaragua and other countries in Central America. President De la Madrid stressed that the conflicts in Central America have, in many cases, arisen from social and economic injustices. Well, for my part, I agreed that the nations of Central America have for many years been beset by poverty. And I pointed out that the United States is currently providing some $1.2 billion a year to the region in economic aid. But I felt bound to add something else, something crucial: The answer to Central America's problems is political and economic freedom, not Soviet tanks and ruthless regimes like the Communist dictatorship in Nicaragua that wages war against its own people. And this is why the United States will continue to support those fighting for freedom and democracy in Nicaragua.

Permit me to turn now to Canada, our neighbor to the north. Last March I traveled to Quebec City to meet Canadian Prime Minister Brian Mulroney. The Prime Minister and I agreed that relations between our two countries are excellent. Canada and the United States maintain the largest trade between any two nations on Earth. We cooperate in the defense of North America and are partners in the NATO alliance. We share a tradition of democracy and political stability and a firm commitment to economic growth. We're not only friends and neighbors; we're cousins.

Since our March meeting, the Prime Minister and I have worked to improve our relations still further. Already, we've committed ourselves to joint efforts in defense, the environment, and space. With regard to trade, I've informed the Congress that I want to begin negotiations with Canada on an agreement of historic significance to both countries. Our goal is to promote free and open economic competition and to reduce those few barriers to our trade that still remain. When Prime Minister Mulroney visits Washington this March, I believe the mid-1980's will already have taken shape as the most productive period in the long history of Canadian-American friendship.

During my 1980 campaign for office, I called for a North American accord -- a renewed spirit of friendship and cooperation between the United States, Mexico, and Canada, the three great nations which share this continent. I was delighted to see that spirit so much in evidence yesterday in Mexicali. And I'm confident that this spirit of friendship among our three countries will mark 1986 and the years beyond.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 6th day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

On behalf of my fellow Americans, I am honored to send you our warmest greetings on this day, this deeply holy day of Christmas for Orthodox and other Christian believers around the world including within the Soviet Union.

The date that you and we celebrate Christmas may be different. But the meaning and magnificence of what we celebrate -- the divine birth of one man, hero, strong yet tender, Prince of Peace -- is the same. This birth brought forth good tidings of great joy to all people. For unto us was born this day a Savior who is Christ the Lord.

We are told there are up to 100 million believers in the Soviet Union alone. Whether you are from Russia, Ukraine, Byelorussia, Armenia, Georgia, the Baltic states, or elsewhere inside the Soviet Union -- please know that we in America join you as one family under the Fatherhood of God, binding ourselves in a communion of hearts, for today and tomorrow and for all time. Know, too, our heartfelt desire that this day will kindle in all men that spirit which alone can bring us real peace on earth.

Peace is the condition of life for which all fervently pray. Of the many apparent paths to peace, we have seen one path that does lead to peace, the same path illuminated by Jesus Christ -- the path of truth and love and humility. Millions of Americans join you our brothers and sisters in a common struggle to overcome the barriers to peace -- falsehood, selfishness and pride, whose bitter fruit becomes a thirst for power and domination.

God's commandment that we love our neighbor as we love ourselves is a commandment to respect the God-given rights of our fellow man -- it is the commandment of freedom and of peace. Let us take heart knowing that our power to fulfill His commandment is not material but spiritual; and let us remember that no force on Earth can ever destroy the love of God that burns in our hearts. In the words of the prophet Isaiah: He giveth power to the faint; and to them that have no might he increaseth their strength . . . they that wait upon the Lord shall renew their strength; they shall mount up with wings of eagles; they shall run and not be weary.

On this special night I would like to say a prayer of my own -- a prayer that God will touch and bless each of you in a most special way. And may we pray together, tonight and every night this year, that God's message of peace may touch the hearts of all His children -- especially those upon whom we depend to make and keep peace in the world.

The President today announced the appointment of Alfred H. Kingon as Assistant to the President. Mr. Kingon will continue to serve as Cabinet Secretary, a position he has held since January 1985 when he was also named Deputy Assistant to the President.

One of the greatest satisfactions I have experienced as President has been to work with people like you: dedicated, patriotic Americans willing to put their exceptional talents and wide experience to work -- full time and overtime -- in key decisionmaking roles in order to build an even better America with a brighter future for all our people.

Yours has been a challenging assignment, and you have handled it with great distinction. We have come a long way together. Following up on our campaign promise, we removed the grain embargo and stuck to it. The consistency of our policy has helped the American farmer to win back markets some had thought we might have lost for good. And, beyond that, our far-sighted export initiatives have helped to create new markets abroad for our agricultural producers. Through our PIK program we made headway in reducing the economic stress being felt in rural America.

There is more, Jack, much more than can be squeezed into a letter. I guess I say it all when I say that you have been an invaluable member of our team from Day One. We knew we could always count on you.

The resounding vote of confidence we received from the American people in the last national election was due in no small measure to the things you have helped us to accomplish. The American people, especially our farmers, owe you a debt of gratitude.

You got results because you had what it takes: imagination and leadership, and above all vision and a deep sense of purpose. It is a vision we share of an America that gives a fair shake and deserved encouragement to those who work on our farms and ranches, our orchards and vineyards to produce and market the agricultural products that make us a land of such blessed abundance.

That vision has been the mainspring of your brilliant accomplishments as Secretary of Agriculture. We will miss you, Jack, but I am confident you will continue to make important contributions to America as you return to the private sector.

For the past five years, it has been my great honor and privilege to serve as your Secretary of Agriculture. The proudest moment of my life was when you asked me to be a member of your Cabinet. It is, therefore, with great regret that I today herewith submit my resignation to be effective Friday, February 14, 1986.

One of the greatest challenges I have experienced has been the opportunity to serve you and American Agriculture. I believe I have made a difference -- building an improved future for this great industry.

The times have been difficult in rural America for many but with farm program reforms, farm credit legislation, and interest rate declines, I think we have set the stage for real recovery. Although there is much yet to be accomplished, we have made meaningful progress.

You and Nancy are an inspiration to all Americans and to the world as well. I am convinced that the future will bring even more success to this great Nation under your guidance. Sue and I both thank you for the confidence you expressed in us and for asking us to assist in fulfilling your vision of an America with strength, optimism and pride.

I, Ronald Reagan, President of the United States of America, find that the policies and actions of the Government of Libya constitute an unusual and extraordinary threat to the national security and foreign policy of the United States and hereby declare a national emergency to deal with that threat.

For purposes of this Order, the term ``United States person'' means any United States citizen, permanent resident alien, juridical person organized under the laws of the United States or any person in the United States.

Sec. 4. The Secretary of the Treasury, in consultation with the Secretary of State, is hereby authorized to take such actions, including the promulgation of rules and regulations, as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this Order. Such actions may include prohibiting or regulating payments or transfers of any property or any transactions involving the transfer of anything of economic value by any United States person to the Government of Libya, its instrumentalities and controlled entities, or to any Libyan national or entity owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by Libya or Libyan nationals. The Secretary may redelegate any of these functions to other officers and agencies of the Federal government. All agencies of the United States government are directed to take all appropriate measures within their authority to carry out the provisions of this Order, including the suspension or termination of licenses or other authorizations in effect as of the date of this Order.

These prohibitions are subject to regulation by the Secretary of the Treasury. Certain of the prohibitions in the order will apply as of 12:01 a.m. Eastern Standard Time, February 1, 1986. The remainder of the prohibitions of the order will become effective immediately.

I have authorized these steps in response to the emergency situation created by international terrorism, in this instance the actions and policies of the Government of Libya. Its use and support of terrorism against the United States, other countries, and innocent persons violate international law and minimum standards of human behavior. These Libyan actions and policies constitute a threat to the security of the United States as well as the international community. Our Nation's security includes the security of its citizens and their right freely to go about their lives at home and abroad. Libyan use of and support for terrorism also constitute a threat to the vital foreign policy interests of the United States and of all other states dedicated to international peace and security.

Since Libya was officially designated under U.S. law in 1979 as a country that has repeatedly supported acts of international terrorism, the United States has taken a number of steps in response to hostile Libyan policies and actions. We have denied licenses for exports that may contribute to Libya's military potential or enhancing its ability to support acts of international terrorism. We have denied export of most national security controlled items; of goods or technical data which could contribute directly to the Ras Lanuf petro-chemical complex; of aircraft, large off-road vehicles and parts with a high risk of diversion by Libya for military activities; and for oil and gas technology and equipment not available from third-country sources. On the import side, we have banned Libyan petroleum and, since November 1985, Libyan refined petroleum products. We have stopped Libyans from coming to the United States for aviation maintenance, flight operations or nuclear related studies. We have taken measures to limit the expansion of Libyan UN Mission facilities. We have also repeatedly called upon corporations to withdraw American citizens from Libya, for their safety, and we have restricted the use of U.S. passports for travel there. All these measures have not deterred Libya from its use and support of terrorism. Moreover, approximately 1500 Americans remain in Libya.

The Congress of the United States has repeatedly deplored the Qadhafi regime's use of and support for international terror. Recently it did so by enacting section 504 of the International Security and Development Act of 1985. Moreover, I have determined that Libya falls within the terms of another statute directed by the Congress against those countries that support terrorism against civil aviation, section 1114 of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended.

The United States reaffirms its call to Libya and all nations supporting terrorism to turn away from that policy. The United States also calls upon other nations to join with us in isolating the terrorists and their supporters. We must demonstrate by firm political and economic sanctions that the international community considers such actions intolerable, that states that engage in such actions cannot expect to be accepted members of the international community.

Failure to call Libya into account for its policy places the civilized world at the mercy of terrorism. This has necessitated the steps I have taken today. The terrible tragedies of Vienna and Rome demonstrate that no nation can be immune, that each nation must bear its fair share of the vital effort against the politics of terror. I call upon every nation to do so now.

On December 27th terrorists, as we know, attacked Rome and Vietnam [Vienna] international airports. It was the latest in a series of atrocities which have shocked the conscience of the world. It's clear that the responsibility for these latest attacks lies squarely with the terrorist known as Abu Nidal and his organization. The number of his victims increased by 19, among them 5 Americans, including Natasha Simpson, an 11-year-old girl. Many others from around the world were wounded. And we shall make every effort to bring Abu Nidal and other terrorists to justice.

But these murderers could not carry out their crimes without the sanctuary and support provided by regimes such as Colonel Qadhafi's in Libya. Qadhafi's longstanding involvement in terrorism is well documented, and there's irrefutable evidence of his role in these attacks. The Rome and Vienna murders are only the latest in a series of brutal terrorist acts committed with Qadhafi's backing. Qadhafi and other Libyan officials have publicly admitted that the Libyan Government has abetted and supported the notorious Abu Nidal terrorist group, which was directly responsible for the Rome and Vienna attacks. Qadhafi called them heroic actions, and I call them criminal outrages by an outlaw regime.

By providing material support to terrorist groups which attack U.S. citizens, Libya has engaged in armed aggression against the United States under established principles of international law, just as if he had used its own armed forces. We've urged repeatedly that the world community act decisively and in concert to exact from Qadhafi a high price for his support and encouragement of terrorism. The United States has already taken a series of steps to curtail most direct trade between our two countries, while encouraging our friends to do likewise. Terrorists and those who harbor them must be denied sympathy, safe haven, and support.

In light of this latest evidence of Libya's growing role in international terrorism, it is clear that steps taken so far have not been sufficient. Tougher, more comprehensive measures are required by the international community. Accordingly, I signed today an Executive order stating that the policies and actions of the Government of Libya constitute a threat to the national security and foreign policy of the United States. Congress has been notified of my decision. Under the authority vested in me by the Constitution and the laws of the United States, I've taken measures to end virtually all direct economic activities between the United States or U.S. nationals and Libya. These measures, some of which take effect immediately and others no later than February 1st, impose a total ban on direct import and export trade with Libya, except for humanitarian purposes. They prohibit commercial contracts and other transactions with Libya, including travel-related activities other than those needed for journalism or to carry out this order. I call on all Americans in Libya to leave immediately. Those who violate these orders should know that they will be subject to appropriate penalties upon their return to the United States. Let the Government of Libya understand that it is fully responsible for the welfare of those Americans still in Libya and that Libya will be held accountable for any attempt to harm them or restrict their freedom to depart.

Our differences are not with the people of Libya, but with Colonel Qadhafi and his regime. We've taken these steps after much reflection and in full awareness of the economic consequences which the United States stands to incur as a result. Civilized nations cannot continue to tolerate in the name of material gain and self-interest the murder of innocents. Qadhafi deserves to be treated as a pariah in the world community. We call on our friends in Western Europe and elsewhere to join with us in isolating him. Americans will not understand other nations moving into Libya to take commercial advantage of our departure. We will consult with all our key allies to pursue the goal of broader cooperation.

Italy's Prime Minister Craxi, in whose country one of the recent attacks occurred, properly emphasized the necessity not only of coping with terrorists but identifying ``those states that guarantee terrorist protection and the possibility to arm and organize themselves to carry out their bloody raids.'' Qadhafi's Libya is such a nation, and we call upon other nations to join us in denying it the normal economic and diplomatic privileges of the civilized world. If these steps do not end Qadhafi's terrorism, I promise you that further steps will be taken.

But wait; before taking your questions, let me extend a warm welcome back to one of your colleagues, Sarah McClendon [McClendon News Service]. Sarah's been absent for a while, but she's back now, and I'm delighted. Sarah is a true Washington institution who's seen a lot of history that she's covered aggressively and fairly. Sarah's kept several of my predecessors, eight Presidents in all, and me on our toes over the years. And I'm truly honored that she chose tonight for her first public appearance, but I had a feeling she wouldn't miss this. So, you see, it's not that we haven't been holding press conferences; I was just waiting for Sarah to come back. [Laughter] And in honor of her return, I'd like to offer Sarah the first question. Don't worry, Mike [Mike Putzel, Associated Press], you'll get the second one. Sarah?

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. That was very nice of you, and I appreciate it. Sir, I want to call your attention to a real problem we've got in this country today. The hospitals and the doctors are sending the elderly sick home too soon, before they're really ready to go, and that makes a burden on their families. This all seems to be based on the Medicare payment formula, and I know that there's a fear across the land from Gramm-Rudman for fear that the Medicare payments may be reduced further. I wonder if you can't have your experts make a solution to this.

The President. Sarah, I can't tell you what the final decision has been on this. We have been looking at this entire program, things that can be done and should be done, and also the possibility we're looking at as to whether we can't find something to take care of catastrophic illnesses. I tried to do this when I was Governor in California, and I couldn't get any public interest in it at all. I guess everyone has a feeling it'll never happen to them. But we are looking at this and as to what we can do with regard to some of the problems that have arisen, because, as you know, the program has expanded in cost greatly. Medical care and, well, health care, generally, has been one of the highest factors in the increase in inflation. So, I promise you, we're looking at it.

Q. Mr. President, you said in your opening statement that there is irrefutable evidence that Colonel Qadhafi was involved in the airport attacks. The European allies seem less convinced. What proof is there of Qadhafi's involvement in those attacks?

The President. Mike, the only thing I can say in answering that question -- and I can't do all that you would like to do because there are things that should not be revealed -- but I can assure you that we have the evidence. We have the evidence of the amount of training that has been given; that, too, he has denied. I don't think he's capable of telling the truth about these things. But we know the location of training camps for terrorists, and we also know that Abu Nidal has more or less moved his headquarters there into Libya. So, we speak with confidence. And I would like to remind you that in the first moments or days or hours following these last two, he did openly praise them as heroic undertakings. And then very shortly, along about the time that the Coral Sea was leaving Naples -- and it was only leaving because its leave time there was up -- but he suddenly decided that, no, he was distressed by these acts of terrorism. I think he was speaking more honestly the first time.

Q. Mr. President, if I could just follow up for a moment. You say that you could prove -- that you have conclusive evidence that he, Colonel Qadhafi, is personally involved in those attacks that killed Natasha Simpson and the others?

Q. Mr. President, for some 40 years American Presidents have been confronted directly with the Middle East problems. You and your predecessors have often spoken of the legitimate rights of the Palestinians. My question, Mr. President, is how did Palestinians attain these rights? How do they rid themselves of foreign occupation? Should they emulate the U.S.-backed freedom fighters in Afghanistan, the contras in Nicaragua, or is there a peaceful way? And I'd like to follow up.

The President. Well, the peaceful way is the thing we've been trying to promote, Helen, the idea of peace between the Arab States and Israel. And we have emphasized from the very first that the problem of the Palestinians must be a part of any solution. But I would also like to point out that virtually every Arab country has thousands and thousands of Palestinians. In fact, some of them, they're practically a majority of their population. So, they are in a number of countries, and in many of these countries they are not made citizens of those countries. They're allowed to live there and so forth, but they don't have passports. They don't have all of the privileges that a citizen of the country would have. And there has to be a solution, particularly -- we're not talking about all of those; they seem to be content with where they're living -- but those that became refugees, the great refugee camps that we found in Lebanon. Those are the ones that are literally people without a country, and we think there has to be a solution found for them. The reason that we have not approved the dealing with Arafat and that sect, the PLO, is because how could they sit in in a peace conference when they deny the right of Israel to exist as a nation and have refused to endorse or support or accept the two resolutions, 442 and 238 [242 and 338], of the United Nations?

The President. No, and I don't think that they ask for that. Theirs is -- and I would say this of any other country that they're working with -- that you can't ask them to negotiate with someone who's sitting on the opposite side of the table saying that they start from the negotiating position that Israel doesn't have any right to exist. And this is the main thing; it's the reason why we have not felt free to talk with an Arafat until he gives up that position.

Q. Mr. President, you have said that your policy towards terrorists is swift and effective retribution. And after the Achille Lauro case you said, ``You can run, but you can't hide.'' But isn't this one more case where there is no retribution and where the people behind the terrorism have in effect been able to hide?

The President. Now, you mentioned the people behind the terrorism. I'd like to point out that all this talk that there's been about harsh talk and no action and so forth -- could I recap just a moment here?

Two of the great terrorist actions against the United States took place in Lebanon: the bombing of our Embassy and the slaughter of our marines there. But in both cases the perpetrators of those acts died with the victims; they were suicide attacks. Now, we've made every effort to try and establish, well, who brought these people there? They certainly can't be questioned. How did they get there? Now we've had two more recent attacks. But in these two attacks the perpetrators are either dead, killed on the scene, or they're wounded and in hospitals under arrest. But, again, here is a better opportunity now. This was something of a suicide attack, and Qadhafi himself has referred to more suicide terrorist actions; in other words, finding some poor souls that are fanatic enough that they can be told that they got a free ride to heaven if they'll go out and give up their own lives to kill someone else, innocent people. The only actual case where there were terrorists, and there they were, and we knew their location and where they were trying to go, and we brought them down -- and that was the Achille Lauro case -- and turned them over to the Italians at their request. After all, it was their territory and their ship, and they wanted to do the prosecuting. And they will be prosecuted.

I know it appears that we sit here and are not doing anything. I'd like to tell you something that we have done. We have actually recorded in the last year, and know, that we have aborted 126 terrorist missions. Now, I won't go any further, and I'm not going to tell you how this was done. But in our intelligence and working with the other countries, we have been able to anticipate and, as I say, abort that many terrorist missions.

Q. But, sir, if I may follow up, what you seem to be saying is that in this particular case, in terms of going to the source, going after Abu Nidal or going after the Libyan training camps, it's basically going to be next time for a military strike. And I wonder, given your criteria, which are that there has to be a direct link between the terrorists and the target and that no innocent civilians can be hit, why should Mu`ammar Qadhafi or Abu Nidal believe you?

The President. I'm not going to talk beyond the action that we've taken here. I am not going to make any comment as to whether we have other actions in mind or what might be done. I think that Mr. Qadhafi would be very happy if I did answer such a question, but I'm not interested in making him happy.

The President. I'm not going to comment on that or their location or anything further on it. I'm just going to assure you that we have the intelligence that led us to be able to do that. They weren't all in the United States, or I don't know how many. I haven't got the count before me right now.

Q. Mr. President, you signed a directive which would have required a great number of government employees to take lie detector tests for security purposes. But when Secretary [of State] Shultz publicly complained, you changed your mind and cut back on that directive. And one of your aides said to reporters that you really hadn't understood what was in it when you signed it. My question is, did you understand it when you signed it originally, and, if so, why did you change your mind?

The President. No. No, when Secretary Shultz came back, he had been accosted by the press in Europe. And they were leading to believe that I had okayed virtually carte blanche the 2\1/2\ million Federal employees subject to lie detector tests and they would be tested based on their personalities or their own personal lives and so forth. None of this was true. And the document I signed was not changed, nor did I change my mind. I was able, when the Secretary and I had a chance to talk when he came back, to point out that what I had signed was a directive that was creating an investigative policy that we were -- I did not create it -- in that I asked for and was proposing that we come together on a policy for heading off espionage. And, therefore, out of the thousands and thousands of employees, there is a very limited number that actually deal with classified material or could possibly be involved in this. And I recommended, among other things, that this be included as an investigatory tool in such investigations, and it would be limited to what we were trying to find out -- espionage and whether to head it off or not. So, whoever was telling that -- and I've seen it and heard it and so forth, and I've sat there fidgeting in my chair because it wasn't true. That's what I signed, and that's what's still signed.

Q. Sir, Secretary Shultz made the point that he doesn't believe lie detector tests are accurate, that often they catch people who are not guilty and even let people who are guilty go. I take it you think they are accurate.

The President. I think that it's a useful tool. I know that he does not have too high an opinion of them, and I think that he was thinking also if you're going to have one of those in which you get into people's personal lives and so forth. But also there are others who have a greater confidence in them in such an investigation, where you are directly going at a subject. One of the things that they've done, and the record of polygraph tests throughout our land has proven, that they have been responsible for more confessions than anything actually proven there, that the very nature of the test has led to a multitude of confessions of various crimes and so forth.

Q. Mr. President, the last time you asked the Europeans to take any sort of sanctions against any of the states which might be responsible for terrorist acts, you asked them to stop flying commercial flights into Beirut. The policy was not a notable success. The Europeans have proven extremely reluctant. Is there any reason for you to believe, or for us to believe, that things will be any different this time, simply because you are asking them yet again?

The President. I don't know. We're going to consult with them. I don't know that we're going to outright ask them. We're going to tell them what we're doing. They have told us in the past that, well, the limited actions that we had taken against Libya earlier were rather ambiguous. So, now we're taking some that are a little unambiguous, and maybe that'll change some of their minds, maybe it won't. Some of them may have problems of their own, in their own economies, that's just going to render this nearly impossible. But we're going to consult and see how much cooperation we can get.

Q. Mr. President, how seriously do you take the threat of Mr. Qadhafi that if there is some indication of Israeli or American military retaliations, that Washington, DC, will become a target for hit squads?

Q. I have a domestic policy question, Mr. President. You seem to be one of the few people in your administration who seems to believe that you can have a 3-percent real growth in defense spending and still satisfy the Gramm-Rudman balanced budget amendment. If you are wrong, sir, are you willing to settle for less defense spending, or will you eventually have to raise taxes to meet the bill?

The President. Well, as you know, in the budget resolution that was passed by the Congress itself, it called for a 3-percent real growth in defense spending, and this is what we're incorporating in our '87 budget that we'll be coming forth with pretty soon.

Q. But a lot of people say you have to raise taxes eventually. And you know, you said in 1982 that you wouldn't raise taxes, and then you did. And you have said over the years that you wouldn't reduce Social Security benefits, and you later changed your mind on that.

The President. Now, the tax increase, let me just say here -- and the one that you mentioned -- yes, I got burned because I agreed to a tax increase that in reality was actually getting rid of some of the Christmas tree ornaments that were hung on the original tax program, our original tax cut. Some of them weren't things that we had advocated. But I was promised $3 in spending cuts for every dollar of increased revenue. I never got the $3. So, I'm like that fellow in the story. I'm still yelling, pay the $2, only $3 in my case.

But the thing with that tax, it's not being stubborn about that. It's just being that if you look back at history, every time that you have sought through tax increase to increase government's revenues, you find out that you have placed a block in the path of progress and economic growth and you wind up with less revenue at higher rates.

Now, the tax situation, we're getting the same percentage of gross national product in tax revenues at the lower rates than we've been getting before. And the answer to more revenues for government is economic growth. I believe that a tax increase would run the risk -- in fact, I'm almost positive that it would be more than a risk -- it would set back the economy and could even trigger possibly a slump in the economy. So, we've gone on now for the last 3 years. We've added almost 9 million new jobs. We have 110 million people, roughly, that are employed; the highest percentage of the potential working pool ever in our history is employed. The stock market today set a new high again, all-time high. It's now 1565, went up $18 and something.

And I think for us to turn around and take a chance on something that in the past has proven that every time tax rates are raised, you've got some people in the country that are waiting with a choice program of their own to spend that money, not to use it to reduce a deficit. We're going to keep on trying with these next 5 years to get down to a balanced budget through spending cuts. Then, if that isn't enough, and if we're convinced that we have government down to the absolute level where it cannot go below that and perform government's functions and services, then it would be a time to look at revenues, but not now.

The President. Oh, I don't know. Someone on their side has suggested later in the fall. We thought that June would be a nice time to do it, and not get around to waiting and saying that it's got to be a year between visits. In fact, the last words of the Secretary General [General Secretary] to me when we said goodbye was that we should keep in touch and not just wait until there was another meeting, but to keep on with what was started there. And I said to him, proposed that it might be in late June, in the summer. And he nodded his approval of that when he accepted my invitation. Now others have perhaps suggested that it should be at another time. But there hasn't been a date set, and other than the suggestion, they haven't given us any reason why they think that later in the fall would be better than in June.

Q. Mr. President, back on the subject of terrorism, what effect, if any, do you think the actions you have taken today will have on the welfare of the U.S. hostages in Lebanon? And I would like to follow up.

The President. Well, I think we are talking about two separate subjects here, even as to the nature of the people that are holding them and the other terrorists that we've been talking about. But I can only tell you that we have been meeting with, talking with, a number of individuals, a number of other governments, following every lead that we can that would lead to their rescue. And we're not going to let up until we're successful in that. Again, I can't get specific on the things that we're doing other than it is a constant and all-out effort. But I think that it would be counterproductive for me to explain any of the things that we're doing.

The President. We have no reason to believe that they are not -- I hesitate to say well treated. Let us say that, apparently, they're in as reasonably good health as could be expected in view of their incarceration.

Q. Mr. President, in connection with your next meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev, the Russians, in response to the terrorist activities that you have been talking about this evening, have made some very defensive statements of Libya and of Qadhafi. And as you know, they supply Libya with a good deal of their military equipment and possibly some of the training, some of which may be then passed on to the terrorists. I would like to know, when you sit down and talk to General Secretary Gorbachev or if you're in communication with him before your next meeting, do you intend to bring this up and suggest to him that they could be more forthcoming in areas outside of your direct talks and make the climate better?

The President. Yes. This was very definitely one of our conversations, or one of our topics in our one-on-one conversations about why we had a suspicion of them. And it was incorporated in a subject that I had brought up in which I said that it was obvious that both of us suspected the other, distrusted the other, and that it was going to take more than words, but take deeds for us to eliminate that distrust. And if we could do that, then we could get on with the business of reducing arms and so forth instead of looking at each other as antagonists all the time.

The President. Well, very obviously, they have to be a consideration. As you will recall, the first time that we took some economic actions, there were roughly 8,000 Americans in Libya. And we asked -- did not order and did not declare an emergency, but asked them to come back. And now there are between a thousand and 1,500 there. But, yes, you have to consider them as potential hostages.

The President. Oh, no, I used that in the term that we use it in conversation about someone. No, I just think that the man is a zealot. He is pursuing a revolutionary cause that could affect a great many countries. And you only have to look at his performance in Chad in which he then violated the word that he had given to France with regard to his aggression there and other places. So, I feel that you have to be on guard against virtually any kind of act.

Q. Mr. President, how safe or how risky do you think it is for Americans to travel to Europe these days? And are you satisfied that our allies have redoubled their efforts for airport security, as you asked them to do last summer?

The President. Well, I certainly am going to want someone, just as Jack was, who has all the experience that is necessary in that field. And, yes, it would be fine if we come up with a working farmer.

The President. I think we have. The farm program -- and he stayed until the farm bill was completed and signed. And it's going to take a little patience for a time. You can't do something instantly, pull out a rug that's been there for a great many decades. But we think that we have a program now that is going to help maintain an income for the farmer at the same time that we get agriculture back out to market control and not government regulation and control. I think we all ought to heed the fact -- I have the greatest sympathy for them. And I think that we have a great responsibility because a lot of their problems come from government, instead of government helping. And the proof of that is if you look at those areas of farming that are not a part of the government programs and subsidies and so forth, they are not having the economic problems that the other part of farming is having.

The United States today will begin consulting with allies and other friendly nations in Europe and the Middle East to encourage cooperation in imposing economic and political sanctions on the Qadhafi regime and Libya. We will monitor the effects of our actions to decide what additional steps may be needed to isolate Qadhafi politically and economically and to bring an end to worldwide terrorism. Cooperation of our allies and friends is critical if we're to exact a high cost to Qadhafi.

Europe has borne the brunt of Qadhafi's latest outrages. European leaders surely recognize that there is a strong and increasing public sentiment for firm action against those who support terrorism. Many Arab States have suffered also from terrorism. Arab leaders are well aware of Qadhafi's uncivilized behavior, and he is a threat to them, as well. Europe and the Middle East countries have lost more than 1 billion in tourism alone. Airport workers in Rome have gone on strike to protest this situation. All countries are spending millions in increasing security. The cost in lives and property is enormous, and this will surely increase if terrorist acts continue.

But the cost of rampant and spreading terrorism is a price free nations cannot and will not pay. In our consultations, the United States will make it clear our position is that all nations must act in concert if we are to halt terrorism. It is essential that we make Qadhafi and others pay a premium if they continue their attempts to terrorize the world. Many actions will be taken, and we will hold in abeyance any further decisions that we make. The United States will continue to reserve the right to act in an appropriate manner in our own self-defense. All available measures will remain under consideration to bring terrorists to justice. We want to convince Qadhafi that terrorism will not be cost-free, nor will it be without consequence. Should Qadhafi continue his involvement in international terrorism, we're fully prepared to take additional measures.

Last spring in Quebec, Canadian Prime Minister Brian Mulroney and I appointed Special Envoys to study the subject of acid rain -- Drew Lewis of the United States and William Davis of Canada. This morning I received their report from Drew Lewis. I am pleased that Drew and Bill have completed this important step forward. They have worked long and hard to study the serious concern of acid rain. Their efforts represent a very positive development in U.S.-Canadian cooperation.

This report represents an earnest effort by the United States and Canada to address an important environmental issue and exemplifies what can be accomplished in the spirit of Canadian-American cooperation. We will be carefully reviewing the report and its recommendations. I look forward to discussing the matter further in my meeting with Prime Minister Mulroney here in March, as we continue to address together this topic which is of such great interest to both of our countries.

The President. That's possible. We'll hope that, well, as many as possible would join. I think that I can understand that there are economic factors that are engaged here, that countries that have more trade, certainly, than we do with that country. On the other hand, they've got to weigh it against having to stay constantly on guard, literally military at their airports, a loss of tourist trade, the added cost of all these other things, too. And I think the case is so clear that if we could all stand together and isolate that country, that country would then have to change its ways.

Q. About Colonel Qadhafi, you've described him as a barbarian, as flaky. Now he's, in effect, drawn a line in the sand and warned you not to cross it. Is he likely to retaliate, maybe close those borders, keep in those 1,500 Americans that you've ordered home?

The President. No, I don't think there's any indication of that, nor would we permit him to do such a thing. But we've taken the action we've taken, and as I said last night, I won't add anything to what might be on our minds for the future. Let him wonder what's on our mind.

Q. Mr. President, when the Russians invaded Afghanistan, we imposed a grain embargo. When you came into office in 1981, you were opposed to the grain embargo, I believe, saying it was ineffective and hurt our farmers and our economy. How does that differ from economic sanctions and doing business with Libya?

The President. Well, it differs in the sense that we just picked out one particular American industry and shut that down and shot ourself in the foot in doing it. And my position was that if it ever requires us to have economic sanctions with Russia or anyone else, it should apply to all American industry and not just penalize one, particularly when the product of that one could be obtained by our heretofore trading partner in any of a number of places in the world. And that's exactly what they did, and probably permanently reduced our agricultural export market.

Q. Mention has been made of the 126 aborted terrorist acts. Can you tell us if any of those might have occurred in the United States, were aborted in the United States, or give any specifics about any individual acts that were aborted?

The President. The thing is -- and this morning I haven't had time after saying this last night -- I realized that I hadn't asked for a breakdown on where these were. I've heard some things about them; and some of them, probably a couple of dozen, applied to the United States. But that could have been also United States installations overseas. So, I'm going to get a breakdown on that.

Q. I wonder if I might change gears on you just a little bit, Mr. President. I wonder what you're going to say to the unemployed textile workers in the Carolinas and in Georgia the next time you visit those States as a result of your veto of that textile bill.

The President. Well, I'd say right now I have the deepest sympathy for anyone who is going to lose their position and any industry that is going to feel hardship because of this. On the other hand, we know that the protectionism would result in equally painful unemployment for other Americans in other industries; it's a two-way street. And all experience shows what happens when we go down that protectionism road. What I have asked for is an additional $100 million for our Job Training Partnership Act for us to help in retraining and even moving people who are in an industry that is maybe going to have a permanent decline.

At the same time, I have to say that if you look at the recent figures, there hasn't been that much of a change in the textile industry in recent years. And it's true that there are a great many other countries now that are in the marketplace. But we're also going to do something that I found we had been lagging in: I had supported the multifiber arrangements, and that evidently we hadn't been enforcing as we should the quotas that exist. We have some 1,300 treaties or agreements with other countries. And I have ordered a strict maintenance of those rules. So, we're going to try to minimize any effect that this may have. But we can't ignore the fact that protectionism, as we used it back in the beginning of the Great Depression -- and I was around then -- led literally to a worldwide depression. It just isn't the way to go. This Smoot-Hawley tariff was the villain, in that case, that perpetuated and added to the Depression.

Q. During the debate on the textile bill, Chairman Rostenkowski said that when Congress comes back this month, he will begin work on new trade legislation. Do we need new trade legislation? Would you support it?

The President. If there's anything left to plug that we are not doing. But, as I said, we are going to -- and have embarked on a rigorous program of dealing multilaterally and bilaterally with other countries -- to make sure that we get a level playing field and that we do not go on putting up with unfair restrictions on our exports to other countries while we ourselves are playing the game of free trade.

Q. If we may return to Libya for a second, I was wondering what you think of the American support for your policy? ABC News has a poll out this afternoon which indicates that 87 percent of Americans approve your economic sanctions and one-third would approve some sort of military action against Libya.

The President. Well, I'm glad of the first figure, and I'm glad that we have support if it ever becomes necessary to do the other. The thing that I've always said about retaliation is that we must not get tempted into creating a terrorist act on our own in response to a terrorist act. But I am in a position of not being able to comment on what any future actions might be.

Q. Mr. President, to expand on that a little, as someone mentioned earlier, the response out of Europe this morning has not been promising in support of the position you took last night and the call you made for our European allies to join us in the economic sanctions. If you could have the European leaders with you this morning instead of this group of reporters, what would you say to them to try to convince them to join us in the economic sanctions?

The President. Some of the things that I said here in one of my first answers, and point out to them what the choice is. We go on living in a world in which you have to surround the docks where your ships sail from and your airports. You have to be constantly on guard against the suicide type of attack against which there is so little chance to resist or defend yourself. And the other might be very short lived if we could all isolate someone who has proven their willingness to be an international outlaw.

Q. Does it make you angry or upset you at all that they are not willing to make some economic sacrifice to solve this problem? After all, after your 1981 sanctions, the U.S. gave up extensive economic ties.

The President. Well, I'm not going to say I'm angry. And I can understand the other when they're looking at possible unemployment. You have to remember that several of those countries have not had anything near the economic recovery that we have had, and they're lagging far behind. They already have excessive unemployment. They're still trying to get back on their feet. In that same period of 3 years, in which we have created almost 9 million new jobs, there are some of those trading partners of ours that have not created a single new job in the last 10 years. So, obviously they're torn between these two problems. At the same time, I would hope that we could persuade them that we're talking about something of short duration, that if we could all stand together in a thing of this kind, we might once and for all bring back into the fold of civilized countries these outlaws that are perpetrating the terrorist deeds.

Q. Mr. President, you just mentioned jobs. You talked about unemployment. Domestically, there is some good news today. The unemployment statistics are out for December; the trend continues downward. When will America reach that magic 5-percent number that the economists say is full employment?

The President. Well, I've asked our people to take some close looks at what is full employment anymore. It seems strange to me that we're still talking about a figure down there that has to do with the people who, through no fault of their own, are unemployed. And yet, at the same time, we have, today, virtually 110 million people employed. But the significant thing is you can say, well, also our population has increased. But the potential employment pool consists of all people, male and female, between the ages of 16 and 65.

Today the highest percentage of that potential pool is employed than has ever been employed in our entire history. So, do we honestly know what the figure of full employment is? I do know that if you take the present unemployed in our country, and you go down to what could be considered possible long-term unemployment or the potentially unemployed -- permanently unemployed, I should say, not potentially, you will find that only a small percentage of the unemployed have been unemployed for 26 weeks or longer. And everyone else, in other words, fits into that pool of people who are either new entrants into the job market -- just as last month, when the figures showed this morning, when we increased employment by 230,000 in the last month, at the same time the job market increased by 90,000 people. So, you take those figures and bring it down to those that are obviously having problems getting a job. Most people, when you say the number of people unemployed, they think in terms of a single pool of people that are out there month after month with no job. It's an ever-changing pool, except for that little fringe at the top which is, say, at 6 months some of them even then get jobs, but they've been unemployed that long.

And, so, I've been asking for some studies to find out what really is full employment. I remember some years ago we said it was 4 percent. Well, if you check back, you'll find no one did any research to determine is 4 percent the correct figure for the people that will always be either voluntarily in between jobs or just newly entering the job market.

The President. Yes, that's why this Job Training Partnership Act that we brought about after we came in -- we found that the job training programs of the past have been tremendously expensive. They were spending about as much as it would cost to go to Harvard. Not that I suggest Harvard as an answer to employment. [Laughter] But we found that the job training was, in many instances, training people for jobs that did not exist anywhere near their home area.

So, this partnership thing is a partnership between local government, local industry, and the Federal Government to train people for the jobs that are available in their particular areas. And it has had a job placement rate tremendously higher than any other previous job training programs. So, this is what we must continue to do and even emphasize and do more, as I say, to add more to this, because, yes, the national rate of unemployment doesn't mean that it's evenly distributed.

There are some places -- well, I like whenever I'm in a city, including Washington, I like to count the help wanted ads on Sunday in the Sunday paper, those pages of just column after column of employers looking for employees. Well, last week it was around 50 pages in the Washington Post. When I was out in California, it topped 60 pages in the Los Angeles Times. Now, these are employers seeking employees, and it isn't that these are for great skilled jobs for which there just aren't people trained for that. You look at them, and these are a cross section of everything from maids and receptionists and clerk typists and truck drivers and whatever you want to name.

Now, it suggests to me also, then, that maybe the answers, as the demography changes in our country, maybe some of the answer is simply help people move, a redistribution program. And this is part of our program also. It is not only job training; but if it's an area where the whole industrial background has changed, then why not help those people get to places where there is a market for their talent.

The President. No, it should be just like Jack Block; somebody that's walked in the furrows he's plowed in his own ground and that is a farmer and knows about that. And this is what we'll be looking for, someone with that kind of experience and firsthand knowledge of farm problems.

Q. Agriculture, Defense, so many Federal programs will be affected when and if Gramm-Rudman takes effect. One of those that's estimated will be seriously affected is the drug interdiction program along our southern borders. Perhaps half their budget might go. How does that reconcile with the priority your administration has put on drug enforcement and interdiction?

The President. Well, if I read your question correctly, I think what we're referring to here is the ultimate thing that if the Congress will not agree with proposed cuts, then an enforced cutting that is prescribed -- 50 percent for defense, 50 percent for the other programs. I hope we never have to come to that. If the Congress will cooperate with us in making the cuts that have to be made where we have selection over them, we'll never have to resort to that sequestering of programs in which you just automatically go in with a meat-ax approach and they're automatically cut. I never favored that part of the legislation at all. We have to have a willingness to cut.

And if you look at the budgeting process -- you know, I squirm a little when they keep calling it the President's budget. The President's budget consists of the estimate that the people who have to run the programs under the various Cabinet departments and agencies -- what they estimate it will cost them to carry out the programs that have been passed by the Congress of the United States. The President, under the Constitution, can't spend a nickel; it's all dictated. But it's always seemed strange to me in the budgeting process. They've announced they'll have a program to do something. All right. We turn it over to the people that are going to run that program. And then we sit down with them -- long hours around a table like this -- about what is it going to cost to achieve the purposes set out by the Congress in that program. And we arrive at a figure that the people are going to have to run the program say, ``This is it, and we can do it for this.'' Then you send it up on the Hill, and you find Congressmen who aren't going to have anything to do with running the program saying, ``Oh, no, you got to spend more money than that.'' And they pass more money than we say is necessary for the program.

Q. If I could follow up on Gramm-Rudman, because I think we'll be hearing a good bit of it in the year to come, Mr. President. Some people on the Hill say that was the coward's way out, the Congress' coward's way out of the budget dilemma. Do you agree?

The President. If anything, it might have been that part where, if you can't come to a meeting of the minds, you sequester, and it's enforced -- the cutting. And no one has to take any blame for it; it's written into the law. It wasn't a coward's way out, if you stop to think. The thing that appealed to me -- as a matter of fact, by sheer coincidence, down here in this end of town, I had brought in an idea that why don't we set up a several-year plan for planned reductions of the deficit leading to a point in the future that we can say, ``Here, we will have balanced the budget.'' And then have an amendment to the Constitution that says we have to keep it balanced. And suddenly, realize that up on the Hill are -- or learned that they were talking about the same thing, the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings bill. From that part of it, there's nothing cowardly about it. It's a disciplinary measure.

If instead of every year you have to fight over the single budget, whether you can get the cuts to start whittling at that deficit, you have a program that says, ``All right, we're all agreed that starting here with the deficits to there, we're going to reduce them annually at a rate that gets us to zero.'' Then, the discipline that's exerted on all of us is that if any one of us, on our side or on their side up on the Hill wants or advocates increased spending over and above this 5-year plan, why, they're breaking ranks in a 5-year program that has a definite goal. And I think that this is something that's been lacking for a long time.

The President. Well, the Congress itself, in the budget resolution, had passed a resolution that called for in 1987 a 3-percent real growth, and they had agreed to that. I think that it is proper and that we should do it. I don't think there's any way that we can retreat from what is the first and prime responsibility of the Federal Government, which is the security of the United States. Five years ago, when I came here, half the airplanes in our Air Force and in our naval force couldn't get off the ground on any given day because of a lack of spare parts or fuel or lack of pilots. The same thing was true of naval ships that couldn't leave harbor. Well, today we've got a working military. And of all the things I think I can be proud of, that is the thing I'm most proud of, is the young men and women in our country today in uniform. We haven't seen anything quite like it, certainly in peacetime, and in my lifetime.

Q. It's been 25 years since we've had relations with Cuba. And most of our Latin American friends and Caribbean friends have warmed relations with Fidel Castro. Some of them have normalized relations. And he's sent signals to us that he's ready to sit down and negotiate. Do you see that happening?

The President. Such signals were sent to us some time ago in our administration, and we moved immediately. And they were just signals. Nothing resulted from our attempt at having negotiations and talks with them about the problems between us. So, I think the ball is kind of in his court. If he really means it, then let him propose to us some things he's willing to talk about and redress some wrongs that need redressing.

The President. Oh, I think there are a number of things: restoration of freedom to his own people, the right of those people who were driven from his country to travel back and forth and visit their families and friends, release of political prisoners. Now, we did get some exchange, a small number of those. But we also found out in the Mariel boat exodus to the United States of people -- that he loaded us up with some -- not political prisoners, prisoners, all right, with records as long as your arm in every kind of brutal crime you can name. And we've been shipping them back to him as fast as we can.

Q. One more terrorism question. Your emphasis in the last few days on Libya and the problems with Colonel Qadhafi give the impression that he is responsible, or that his nation is responsible, for the bulk of the export of international terrorism. Number one, do you believe that? Secondly, if Mr. Qadhafi were to magically disappear from the planet Earth this evening, how much would that reduce the international terrorism problem?

The President. But I couldn't give you a figure on that, and I don't know that I've ever indicated that it is the bulk. There are other nations in the world that are surreptitiously helping terrorism along. But we will soon be releasing a white paper on what we know about his financial support, training, things of that kind. And we do have the evidence.

Now, one thing that I can name, just as an example, because this has been out and made public already. The men who are lying in the hospital, wounded, from Rome and the Vienna undertaking, and those that died, those terrorists that died, they were carrying passports, Tunisian passports. These passports, we happen to know, were the passports that the Libyan Government confiscated from the workers in Libya who had come across the border -- as people do here in our own country -- to work in Libya, but were from Tunis. And then, because of some arguments he was having with the Tunisian Government, he expelled them from his country, sent them home, and confiscated their passports. So, here turn up some terrorists, and they're carrying the passports that were taken away by the Libyan Government.

Recent advances in medicine continue to bring out ever more clearly and dramatically the unity and continuity of pre- and postnatal life. Just as we know that the pre-born infant in the womb can now undergo therapies that can contribute to health after birth, we also know that certain types of behavior by the expectant mother can do grave harm to her unborn child, harm that often shows up in the form of serious birth defects.

FAS is characterized by such serious health problems as prenatal and postnatal growth retardation, developmental and learning disabilities, mental retardation, and other physiological abnormalities such as heart, kidney, and skeletal defects.

This knowledge led the Surgeon General of the United States to issue an advisory in 1981, which strongly encourages women who are pregnant or considering pregnancy to avoid the use of alcohol because of the potentially serious adverse consequences. The Surgeon General's advisory also stresses the preventability of these consequences.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighth day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

I, Ronald Reagan, President of the United States, hereby order blocked all property and interests in property of the Government of Libya, its agencies, instrumentalities and controlled entities and the Central Bank of Libya that are in the United States, that hereafter come within the United States or that are or hereafter come within the possession or control of U.S. persons, including overseas branches of U.S. persons.

This Order does not apply to the property of Libyan citizens or entities not controlled by the Government of Libya. Moreover, the Order does not confiscate property of the Government of Libya. Such property will continue to belong to the Libyan Government, and financial assets held in U.S. banks and their branches overseas will continue to earn a commercial rate of interest as appropriate.

I have taken these further steps pursuant to the national emergency I declared in Executive Order No. 12543 on January 7, 1986. My reasons for taking these actions are set forth in my letter to you of January 7, 1986, reporting the measures taken in that Order. Based on a continuing assessment of the situation, the steps taken became necessary to carry out the purposes of that Order. They are not intended to deprive the Government of Libya of property but rather are to help assure the orderly management of the dissolution of the United States economic ties with Libya and to protect against the possibility of unlawful Libyan actions which adversely affect American interests.

Q. Mr. President, Colonel Qadhafi warned that as a consequence of American hostility towards Libya, his country could come even closer to the Soviet Union than it already is and that he may transform it into another Cuba. First of all, do you think he could achieve this goal? Secondly, would you prepare to tolerate it, and would this develop into something to be stopped?

The President. Well, I don't think there's any question but that the relationship between the Soviet Union and Qadhafi's Libya has been very close. Soviet arms and weapons have been coming in there and stockpiled in there for a number of years. We're well aware of all of that. So, I don't see that there could be very much more than is already going on, and I don't think that the fear of something else or the concern about that should in any way make us unwilling to isolate Libya, as long as Qadhafi insists on backing terrorism the way he is. We can't allow that to go unanswered in the world.

Q. Mr. President, the Italian Government has decided to stop sales of arms to Libya and will not allow Italian workers to replace American workers. But it is also said that further sanctions should be decided jointly by Europe and not independently by -- [inaudible]. Are you satisfied with this measure? Do you feel that Europeans would be able to do something together?

The President. Well, except that his suggesting that on sanctions that there should be a joint discussion of whether this should take place -- but, yes, I appreciate very much, as I say, what he has said so far.

Q. Mr. President, you said in your news conference that you had irrefutable evidence about Qadhafi's involvement in the Vienna and Rome attacks. Now Mr. Andreotti said that he would want to see more proof. Next week you are sending Mr. Whitehead [Deputy Secretary of State] to Europe. Will he disclose to the European governments some of the evidence that you have?

The President. Yes, as a matter of fact, the State Department has released quite a document now. Perhaps some of you have seen it; I know it's available to everyone. Now, that document is based on unclassified information. To go further with classified information would run the risk of revealing some of our sources and so forth -- the type of thing you don't want to do. But I'm sure that Mr. Whitehead will be discussing with them this and whatever else can be released at that level to them about the information that we have. And there isn't any question -- a matter of fact, the unclassified document that you have makes it pretty evident that he is widely connected. We know for a fact that he's met a few times in just recent months with Nidal.

The President. Well, I was not totally surprised. I recognize the problems they have in many of them with trade on a far larger scale than we have, but I have to say that I think there is a moral issue involved here with regard to a sovereign state that is so obviously resorting to terrorism literally against the world. And I am hopeful that, as they continue to consider this and learn more facts -- and that's why Mr. Whitehead's mission -- that we may find that we can come together on isolating this outlaw among the world's nations.

The President. No, I was quite surprised at that. You don't join them at their level; terrorism in response to terrorism is not the answer. It is terrorism that is the evil. When I mentioned a moment ago about -- there is a moral issue involved here. This is what I'm hoping that our friends and allies will consider. Can we place trade, everyday relationships, ahead in value of the immorality that is inherent in people who will come in, as they did, into an airport and just simply shoot human beings that were there -- men, women, children -- with no regard to what participation those people have in anything that's going on?

The President. Well, for one thing, we were a little defenseless with regard to taking actions in response to this terrorism while so many of our citizens were there and potential hostages. So, we felt that we should untie our hands with regard to whatever action might be necessary in the future. And, as I say, I'm hopeful that our allies might see that sanctions can be successful if enough of us do it.

Q. Sir, could I ask, if the Europeans still show reluctance after Mr. Whitehead's visit and after your evidence that you've shown them and they take a position that you feel is not fully supportive, are you afraid that this might develop into a kind of split with the European allies such as developed over the Soviet gas pipeline?

The President. I think our relationship is too strong for this. It certainly would not make us turn on them, and I'm quite sure that they desire to keep the relationship the way it is. I don't believe that there has ever been a time when the outright friendship between governments, or allies, has been as strong as it is now.

Q. Mr. President, the Austrian Government has, as recently as yesterday, made a point again that she has no information of Libyan involvement in the airport attacks. Since Austria, as a matter of principle, does not impose sanctions on any country except if it is in accordance with United Nations Security Council resolution, what would you expect the Austrian Government to do?

The President. Well, they've taken some positions, as you say, on a matter of principle, not just aimed at this particular incident. On the other hand, perhaps if we make available to them the information that does indicate the guilt of Libya, they might reconsider and realize that this was an assault, literally an act of war, against Austria.

The President. Well, as I say, Mr. Whitehead is going; and to some of our immediate allies, such as in the economic group, I have asked our people to send on my behalf, personally, to the heads of state this document that I was describing a little while ago.

Q. Mr. President, Qadhafi has threatened to hit American bases in Europe and the people around them. And Italy is particularly exposed in this case. Do you take the threat seriously? Have you done anything about it?

The President. Oh, I think we have to take the threat seriously. As I said in the press conference the other day, through our intelligence and our cooperation with other countries in their intelligence gathering, we have been able to abort 126 terrorist missions in the last year alone. So, yes, we take those threats seriously.

Q. Sir, in Geneva you spoke with Mr. Gorbachev about terrorism after the Soviet Union, itself, and its diplomats became a victim of terrorism in Lebanon. Did you feel after the summit that there was a certain common understanding between the superpowers concerning terrorism? And what do you make out of the recent Soviet reactions as, for example, today Foreign Minister Shevardnadze, who said that the American actions threaten Libyan sovereignty?

The President. Well, I've recognized that there are certain elements of propaganda that go on in this relationship. But at the same time, in my talks with Mr. Gorbachev, he expressed his repugnance, the feeling that he had of repugnance for terrorist acts.

The President. I don't really. I don't think that there would be a setback with regard to that peace formula. We're having some problems with it, with moving forward on the peace process. I have to tip my hat to King Hussein, who has been most courageous in trying to carry this forward. And I believe that we have established some basis of trust with many of the Arab States, and I don't think that that will be actually affected by this.

The President. Well, I think there was maybe some feeling that publicly they had to stand together in the world today as it is. But I haven't seen any real evidence of a falling away of relationships with us.

Q. Mr. President, may I just ask you one more Austria-related question. What is your evaluation of the fact that Austria -- which has very close connections with the Arab countries, which has tried to at least have some moderating effect on Yasser Arafat, has welcomed Qadhafi in Vienna a couple of years ago -- that Austria was chosen by the terrorists as one of their sites for their attacks? What does this prove, or does it prove anything?

The President. The only thing I know is that I have had a report that Austria is holding in jail at least three members of the Abu Nidal group. And this, in itself, could be a reason for them taking an action in an effort to blackmail Austria into releasing its members.

Q. Sir, Qadhafi said at his press conference yesterday that you had concentrated on the activities of Palestinian terrorism -- I think he used that word -- and ignored the root causes for it. What would your reaction be to that?

The President. Well, again, Mr. Qadhafi's speaking quite loosely and without any regard to the truth and the facts. We have said from the very beginning in the peace process that the problem of the Palestinian refugees had to be a part of the peace process and there had to be a resolution of that problem, and we still feel that way.

Q. Mr. President, economic sanctions against Libya would evidently hurt the German economy. The sanctions you have ordered do not necessarily hurt the American economy. If Chancellor Kohl, for example, would sit here with us, how would you try to explain to him that it might be worthwhile in the long term to pay a price?

The President. Well, as I say, I understood the problems of some of our allies and friends. Their trade is on a greater basis than ours. And a matter of fact, we're probably the lowest on the ladder of trade with Libya, and this due in part to the fact that we already had partial sanctions that were put in effect a few years ago. So, I'm aware of that, and I know that problem.

Again, though, I have to point out: Is it a permanent trade that they can go on then -- and we've seen the newsreels on television -- the armed guards, the military forces, policemen carrying submachine guns and so forth at the airports and the various public buildings of countries such as West Germany and the others, the United Kingdom, all these other allies -- can they see this as a fair trade? That in return for maintaining economic relations, that their countries must continue in this armed state with this sense of insecurity? What is going to happen to international travel? I have had any number of people that, just coming in casual contact with, have gone out of their way to tell me that they'd canceled any plans for travel, whether it is business or pleasure. Now, is this a fair exchange for retaining the trade? And remember, I don't think you should think of the sanctions as something that is forever. You think of it as something that says straighten up and fly right to Mr. Qadhafi, and then things will change.

The President. No, as a matter of fact, you have me here; I can't discuss things of that kind. I think Mr. Qadhafi would be pleased to hear my answer, but, no, I can't answer that. I just say that I think that we should be ready for any contingency.

The President. Oh, I think it would have to be more than words; I think by deeds alone. For example, in reading this material there, you will find he does engage in training and in financing -- through accounts in many of the banks, including banks in Europe as well as the United States -- terrorist movements. He would have to reveal by action that he has severed those connections and is no longer backing these terrorist groups.

The President. Well, no. We'll try to explain our position to them and, very frankly, try to persuade them that they do have a very real stake in this. I've been in most of those airports in all of those other countries that we're talking about sometime or other. No, I've not been in Austria. I have missed Austria.

The President. Well, not with the things that are lined up between summits and the economic conference that will be held in Japan and so forth. I'm not exactly a free agent when it comes to going where I want to go. [Laughter] There are people that tell me where I'm going. But, no, but I'd like that. But I say, in seeing that and now seeing the extent of those security measures that I described, I just -- as I say, I feel that action -- we must make it plain that we're not going to put up with that.

Just this week, we had some very good economic news. Jobs are up, and unemployment is down -- all the way down to 6.8 percent, the lowest rate in more than 5\1/2\ years. So, I'd like to talk to you today about the new strength of the American economy and what we can do to keep our economy growing.

You'll remember that when our administration took office in 1981, inflation was raging in the double digits. Today inflation is down to less than 4 percent. In 1981 interest rates were soaring. The prime rate reached more than 20 percent, and interest rates generally were at the highest level since the Civil War. Now interest rates have tumbled; the prime itself has dropped by more than half, and we expect long-term interest rates to drop still further.

When we took office, strong economic growth seemed an impossible dream. Today we're enjoying one of the strongest economic expansions since the end of World War II. Business productivity in the third quarter of 1985 increased at a strong annual rate of 3.7 percent. Real business fixed investment, as a share of real gross national product, hit a record high in 1984, rose to a new high in 1985, and is reaching for yet another historic high. This investment means our economic engines are being recharged with new means of production -- new high-tech equipment like computers, communications systems, and electronic gear -- and at a faster rate than ever before.

Perhaps the best news concerns the creation of jobs. During 1985 alone, the number of payroll jobs increased by 3 million; and today almost 110 million Americans are employed, the largest proportion of the Nation's population in our history. Last weekend in the Washington Post, I noticed that there were almost 50 pages of help wanted ads. And since September 1982, according to the Conference Board, the nationwide help wanted index has almost doubled -- a sure sign of economic vitality. Unemployment, as I mentioned, is down to 6.8 percent. When you focus only on those who've been unemployed 27 weeks or longer, the number drops still lower.

And, even here, in the case of the long-term unemployed, there is hope in the form of our Job Training Partnership Act. This act replaced old programs that were training people for jobs that didn't exist anywhere close by and spending as much to do it as it costs to send someone to a good college. Our job act combines Federal efforts with those of State and local industry to train people for jobs that are close at hand. It costs less and succeeds more often, much more often.

The economy is in better shape today because we've worked hard to get the Federal Government out of your pockets and off your backs. We've cut taxes, limited government regulation, supported sound monetary growth, and taken commonsense steps like deregulating the price of oil. This last measure made oil prices tumble and brought OPEC, the oil cartel that used to push us around, to its knees. But now we must force the Government to go on facing up to its responsibilities, most notably to reform our entire system of taxation and to bring Federal deficit spending to an end.

The Gramm-Rudman-Hollings amendment, which I signed into law in December, calls for us to deal with deficit spending head on. It mandates smaller and smaller Federal deficits until 1990, when the Federal Government will have a balanced budget at last. But while the amendment tells us that we must bring deficit spending to an end, it leaves crucial questions about just how to do so unanswered. Well, I will continue to say that as far as I'm concerned, a tax increase is out. I, furthermore, intend to insist upon the maintenance of a strong national defense as the first duty of government to the people. Instead, our administration will meet its Gramm-Rudman-Hollings obligations by submitting budgets which eliminate government inefficiency and curtail needless expenses like vast amounts for Amtrak and subsidies for those who don't need them.

On tax reform, we want to make corporate rates lower and bring down individual rates for you, the American people, in order to provide the incentives that spur economic growth. The tax reform bill passed last year by the House has its weak points, but it succeeded in lowering both corporate rates and income tax rates for most individuals. Now the bill goes to the Senate. We'll have a chance to improve it, but, believe me, the special interests are going to be there, lobbying just as hard as they can. If we're to protect the interests of all the people, I'm going to need your support.

My friends, I'm convinced that with your help we can succeed on both these issues, giving the people tax reform and the Government a sense of fiscal responsibility. Together, we'll build on the economic successes we've already achieved and lead America on into a new era of opportunity and growth.

Iran's practice of stopping neutral shipping in the Gulf has now been carried out for approximately 5 months and has involved stopping vessels from Kuwait, Italy, West Germany, Denmark, Yugoslavia, Poland, and Japan, among others. The rules of naval warfare have traditionally accorded a belligerent certain rights to ascertain whether neutral shipping is being used to provide contraband to an opposing belligerent. We are continuing to assess the facts of this particular incident, not all of which are yet known, to determine whether this stop and search was appropriate under the circumstances.

Nevertheless, we consider the Iranian policy of stopping and searching neutral shipping in the Gulf region to be one of the significant consequences created by the Iran-Iraq war. The dangerous conflict between Iran and Iraq now continues because of Iran's intransigent refusal to participate in a negotiated solution. We have stated our deep concern about this incident because of the danger of misunderstandings, overstepping of rights and norms, and even violence, which are inherent in all ship search incidents. The United States Government repeats its call for Iran to change its position regarding a solution to the conflict, and again calls for the earliest possible end to the war, with the sovereignty and territorial integrity of both sides intact.

Of all the blessings that Americans enjoy, few are more important than good vision. It is this priceless gift that enables us to behold the great beauty of our country and take full advantage of the many opportunities it offers. Yet too many of us take the gift of sight for granted, and each year thousands suffer vision loss that could have been prevented. To avoid such tragedy, all of us must be more aware of what each of us can do to protect our eyes and safeguard our eyesight.

The most important sight-saving precaution is to have regular eye checkups. Such examinations can provide valuable warning of incipient eye diseases that could endanger our vision. Early detection is invaluable, because eye research has produced new treatments that can halt many potentially blinding diseases before they have a chance to impair vision.

For people with diabetes, eye examinations offer an especially good chance to benefit from sight-saving discoveries. Research sponsored by the National Eye Institute has shown that laser treatment can help many people who are at risk of visual loss from diabetic eye disease if the condition is detected early. Anyone with diabetes should be made aware of the importance of regular eye care.

Routine eye examinations are important for people who are middle-aged or older, because that is when many eye diseases have their onset. With regular eye care and prompt attention to conditions that need treatment, most Americans can be free of disabling visual impairment in their later years.

Children also need early and regular eye examinations. Even the healthiest-looking child may have some unsuspected visual problem that needs prompt attention. A routine checkup can detect such disorders in time for effective treatment, sparing the child a needless handicap.

Guarding against eye injuries is important for everyone. In the home as well as in the workplace, people should wear a face mask, goggles, or safety glasses when working with chemicals or machinery that might be dangerous to the eyes. People participating in sports should use appropriate protective eyewear. And children should be taught the basic principles of eye safety.

In addition to saving our own vision, we can give the gift of sight to others after our death. By arranging to become eye donors, Americans can help insure that our Nation's eye banks will be able to continue supplying the precious tissue needed for sight-restoring corneal transplant operations.

We should also support the excellent voluntary organizations that seek to prevent blindness and improve the lives of the visually handicapped. Through their programs of eye research, public education, and special services to people with low vision, these groups make an enormous contribution to the public good.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirteenth day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

March 16 - 22, 1986, will mark the 25th observance of National Poison Prevention Week. During the past quarter-century, there has been a remarkable reduction in childhood poisonings. In 1961, when Congress passed the law authorizing this annual proclamation, some 450 children under five years of age were killed each year in poisoning accidents. By 1983 (the last year for which we have complete statistics), the annual death toll for children under five had dropped to 55 -- an 88% reduction. Some of this improvement can be attributed to the use of child-resistant packaging, while another contributing factor is increased public awareness of the need to keep medicines and household chemicals out of the reach of children.

For the past 25 years, the Poison Prevention Week Council has coordinated a network of health, safety, business, and voluntary organizations in an effort to raise public awareness and to observe National Poison Prevention Week. The Consumer Product Safety Commission, which serves as the secretariat for the Poison Prevention Week Council, administers the Poison Prevention Packaging Act. This Act requires that 16 categories of hazardous household products, including prescription drugs, must be sold in child-resistant, safety packaging. Over the past two and a half decades, poison prevention programs have been implemented at the local level by poison control centers, safety councils, pharmacies, departments of health, hospitals, and many others. All of these organizations deserve great credit for a quarter of a century of success in raising public awareness of poison prevention and in sharply reducing the annual death toll.

We must continue to emphasize the need for poison prevention. Since children are particularly liable to accidental poisoning, their guardians should be informed of the need to use child-resistant packaging and to keep potential poisons out of the reach of children.

To encourage the American people to learn about the dangers of accidental poisonings and to take preventive measures, the Congress, by a joint resolution approved September 26, 1961 (75 Stat. 681), authorizes and requests the President to issue a proclamation designating the third week of March in each year as National Poison Prevention Week.

Prayer is deeply woven into the fabric of our history from its very beginnings. The same Continental Congress that declared our independence also proclaimed a National Day of Prayer. And from that time forward, it would be hard to exaggerate the role that prayer has played in the lives of individual Americans and in the life of the Nation as a whole.

Prayer, of course, is deeply personal: the way in which it finds expression depends on our individual dispositions as well as on our religious convictions. Just as our religious institutions are guaranteed freedom in this land, so also do we cherish the diversity of our faiths and the freedom afforded to each of us to pray according to the promptings of our individual conscience.

In prayer, let us ask that God's light may illuminate the minds and hearts of our people and our leaders, so that we may meet the challenges that lie before us with courage and wisdom and justice. In prayer let us recall with confidence the promise of old that if we humble ourselves before God and pray and seek His face, He will surely hear and forgive and heal and bless our land.

Ecuador's return to elected government in 1979 was one of the first waves of a rising tide of liberty witnessed throughout the hemisphere. President Febres-Cordero, we have watched with admiration as you and your government have strived to come to grips with the serious threats to Ecuador's economic, political, and social well-being. You are an articulate champion of free enterprise and those democratic ideals that are close to the hearts of the American people. All those who love liberty are impressed with your courage and responsibility in attacking not just the symptoms but the underlying causes of misery, poverty, and unemployment. Mr. President, by protecting your country's good name and creditworthiness, by avoiding simplistic solutions and quick fixes, by unleashing the economy, building forces of the marketplace, you are leading your country to a better tomorrow.

Your uncompromising faith in political freedom is consistent with your support of economic freedom. We applaud your efforts to bolster the democratic institutions of your country. We also applaud your moves to encourage private sector growth and invigorate your economy. The United States stands by your side, and we will continue to do all we can to help. When I say the United States stands with you, that is especially true when it comes to your determination to defeat the twin menace of international terrorism and narcotics trafficking. You've put yourself on the line against these vile and insidious forces. Your courage and integrity and that of your people have not gone unnoticed here. Drug traffickers and terrorists are the enemies of all decent people, and the United States is proud to be your ally in this brave struggle.

In a speech to your countrymen, Mr. President, you advised your citizens to ``stand up when it is a matter of defending honor and freedom.'' Well, that is exactly what Ecuador under your leadership has been doing. Few countries in the hemisphere have made the tough public stand against dictatorship, left and right, as has Ecuador. As you have pointed out on several occasions, democracy and the protection of human rights is the surest way to peace as well as freedom. It is no mere coincidence that those few nations controlled by oppressive Communist regimes can be tied to so much of the turmoil and bloodshed that is plaguing this hemisphere. It should surprise no one that the rifles used to take over a court building and murder judges in a democratic nation can be traced to a country controlled by those who don't believe in freedom, human rights, or democracy. Democracies can no longer afford to ignore this unfortunate fact of life.

Your voice, Mr. President, is doing much to alert the freedom-loving people of this hemisphere to this continuing danger. The path of democracy, peace, and free enterprise is often difficult; but with courage, moderation, and wholehearted commitment, you're leading your people down that path. In doing so, you are not only building a stronger Ecuador, but you're contributing to a more peaceful and secure hemisphere. The dream of freedom and opportunity is the property of no one country. It is the birthright of every American, and that means every person from the North Slope of Alaska to the tip of Tierra del Fuego. We are all Americans.

And today we are proud to welcome you, President Febres-Cordero, as the leader of free people, as a man with a deep and abiding conviction, and as a statesman we respect and admire. President Febres-Cordero, welcome.

President Febres-Cordero. President Reagan, Mrs. Reagan, distinguished guests, ladies and gentlemen, for my wife and me, it is a great satisfaction to be received on this state visit by you, Mr. President, and by your wife. It is always a pleasure for a President of Ecuador to visit the United States. The long tradition of friendship between our peoples and the identification with the same democratic principles makes the return of an Ecuadorian chief of state to this great country not only enjoyable but also stimulating.

The fact that the United States of America and the rest of our continent share the same historic goals is not a recent phenomenon. It began with simultaneous battles to obtain political independence, and it continues today with the present defense of democracy, of liberty, and of individual rights -- a defense which has meant a long series of shared efforts. During moments of particular anguish in international relations, from that era of a struggle to claim the value and use of the American wealth from commercial monopolies until the tremendous confrontation of the Second World War, our peoples have been united, and our governments have enjoyed very strong cooperation. This historical path becomes especially important when a government in the United States headed by you, Mr. President, coincides with an Ecuadorian government headed by me, both working toward common goals: to vigorously restore to our peoples the pride of belonging to their respective countries; to revitalize economies that have suffered setbacks; to return to the individual and groups the right to carry out initiatives without the need for bureaucratic interference, with the understanding that the state exists to serve the individual, not to be served by the individual.

The cooperation between our peoples and governments, and international cooperation in general, are indispensable to confront the problems the world is experiencing. The goal of that remarkable man of our times, His Holiness John Paul II, of making 1986 the year of peace requires us to adopt important attitudes. Peace must come from the fact that between human beings there exists the willingness to cooperate and that hope grows within every human being. Peace must be based on the concept of justice, law, and harmony.

Peace, unfortunately, nowadays has great enemies: the savagery of terrorism, which in its evil neither respects nor distinguishes among people, places, or circumstances; its ally, drug trafficking, which corrupts and destroys physical and moral integrity. Governments, which consider that man is at the center of creation and that man is the main act of history, should cooperate to combat these crimes against humanity. Peace has also another enemy: the agents of war, the ideological motivators of aggression, which contribute to the unjustifiable arms buildup. It will only be possible to have true and enduring peace in our world when, through the willingness of all men, a disarmament process may start in the world.

My country, Mr. President, is a country with a pacific tradition. Neither violence nor the abuses of power that affect certain parts of the world have ever taken root in our land. We practice a democratic system which we seek to expand and to perfect, since we believe that it allows for the best social organization. It is only by prevalence of democratic regimes that stem from the sovereign will of our people that our continent and the whole world will be able to enjoy a true and enduring peace. We are careful of service of the standards of human rights generated by national and international laws. There is no conflict, we believe, between respecting those rights and exercising a serene but determined authority. To use power to guarantee to the 9 million Ecuadorians who have the right to work, to be educated, to live fully is an imperative which coincides perfectly with the fight against lawlessness; above all, that lawlessness, which in its cruelest form, terrorism, undermines society with the greatest savagery and cruelty. In no way does it deny criminals the protection provided to them by the law, but neither does it allow them to go unpunished for their crimes.

Mr. President, Ecuador has met its international obligations in an effort which has been widely recognized by the international press and the world financial community. We have successfully rescheduled our foreign debt. We have regained our prestige as a serious country, which we have gained after many years of fruitful and responsible economic relationships with all countries of the world. We have been able to recover our economy, as all indicators clearly show. We have achieved this through a reasonable application of sound economic policies: letting the market play its fair role and allowing for free initiative to flourish. We have promoted harmony between labor and capital within the observance of law and order. We have not at any time neglected -- and it keeps being our main concern -- these social policies. Those are the final objectives of our action. It is undoubtedly the well-being of our people what we are looking for with all our energies. Social welfare, within the framework of justice it is the most appropriate soil for peace to flourish. Without peace and the well-being of all our peoples, the stability of this whole hemisphere is in danger.

In order to achieve social well-being, we require the solidarity and cooperation from those who are capable of working together with us, from those who have the capacity to assist us. We have to demonstrate to the world that there is no need of despotism, that there is no need of collectivism, to mitigate our people's sufferings. Yes, Mr. President, we wish to prove that with liberty and free initiatives, it is indeed possible to reach standards of living which are adequate to the human being.

I am sure, Mr. President, that this visit, which originated from your generous hospitality and that of the people of your country, will bring our two nations closer in strengthening their common ideals, and at the same time it gives my wife and me the opportunity to reaffirm our sincere friendship for you and your esteemed wife. Thank you.

Dr. King forged a dream out of the values of his religion and the ideals of our nation's founders. He cherished the dream of a world where human dignity was respected, human rights were protected, and all stood equal before the law. Like Lincoln, he sought the full realization of the principles set forth in our Declaration of Independence.

So, as we celebrate the birth of Martin Luther King, Jr., let us recommit ourselves to living his dream. As we rejoice in his achievements and mourn again his untimely death, let us emulate the profound faith and the deep love for humanity that inspired him. Let us work without tiring for a world at peace, in which justice and freedom prevail.

I have no objection to statutory recognition of the refuge at Cape Charles. This is a significant resting and wintering area for migratory birds along the Atlantic Flyway and an important habitat for the bald eagle and peregrine falcon, two endangered species. I am pleased to note that, in recognition of the area's importance, the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service has already administratively acquired land at this site and established the Eastern Shore of Virginia National Wildlife Refuge. The Service will continue to operate and maintain the existing refuge and intends to expand it as fiscal conditions permit.

Unfortunately, H.R. 1404 does not simply provide protection for this valuable habitat. It would also require the Secretary of the Interior to develop a training center at the refuge for use by the Service, other Federal and State agencies, educational institutions, and private organizations and individuals.

In this time of fiscal constraint, the Federal government must limit its expenditures to matters of significant national concern. The provisions of H.R. 1404 requiring establishment of a training facility do not meet this test. The Service has fully adequate training facilities already in place, including a facility at Leetown, West Virginia, as well as the use of various private sector facilities. In addition, the Service is actively supporting the effort to clean up the Chesapeake Bay by designating an existing Service field station in Annapolis, Maryland, as its primary center for work on this important program. I believe that it would be more appropriate for State or private entities to fund and develop a training center if they consider it essential.

President Reagan. President Febres-Cordero, Mrs. Cordero, distinguished ladies and gentlemen, it's an honor tonight to welcome to the White House a national leader who is clearly devoted to the political and economic freedom of his people.

President Febres-Cordero, when you were elected, you were well known to the Ecuadorian people as a man who would not waver in pursuit of the welfare of his country, even in the face of enormous pressure. You promised leadership and reform, and you have not let your people down. When we met, I could see in you the strength of character and love of liberty which the Ecuadorian voters saw. It's been a genuine pleasure for me to get to know you better after our first meeting a year and a half ago.

Here in this historic setting, which was once the home of Thomas Jefferson, it's fitting to recall, President Febres-Cordero, the words of your last State of the Nation message to the Ecuadorian people. In it you said, ``Democracy is the highest and most noble political system that mankind has created throughout its history.'' Well, Jefferson would be proud of an expression such as that. Today we see a resurgence of democracy throughout the hemisphere, a resurgence which started, as did the cause of national independence, during the last century in Ecuador.

Democracy, as you have so eloquently stated on many occasions, Mr. President, is the way not only to freedom but also to peace and to economic progress. In Central America, we both know this is especially true. I want to take this opportunity to thank you for your strong support of democracy in that troubled region. Those who would repress their own people and export subversion to their neighbors should not underestimate the depth of our commitment and steadfastness. They should note your words. You said, ``So long as the people are not given the full right to self-determination, there will not be peace in Central America.'' Well, those of us who enjoy freedom cannot take it for granted. We cannot turn our backs on those struggling for freedom against oppressive regimes. We must provide assistance.

And, Mr. President, in that same State of the Nation Address, you reminded your people that Quito was once termed the ``light of the Americas.'' And you challenged, ``All Ecuadorians must see to it that that light remain lit here and throughout the continent.'' Well, in this task, holding high the light of liberty and freedom, the people of our two countries can and should and will stand together. So, let us drink a toast to that and to you, President and Mrs. Febres-Cordero.

President Febres-Cordero. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, distinguished guests, as President Reagan mentioned in his very kind words of offering, the talks that he and I have had have been what talks between old friends are like. The President's affability and unpretentiousness, as well as the coincidences on many of our points of view over the destinies of our countries and of the whole hemisphere, have allowed us to leave formalities aside and enable us to have clear and frank exchange of views.

When in my youth I studied in this great country, I could not have imagined then that a moment like this could ever take place. At that time, I frequently watched Western movies -- [laughter] -- some of them featuring an extremely likable star -- [laughter] -- called Ronald Reagan. [Laughter] I must confess that I'm still an addict to Westerns. [Laughter] But now I view President Reagan as the actor of a more transcendental and historical role. Of course, Mr. President, this doesn't mean at all that there is a significant distance between our respective ages. We belong to the same generation, a generation that, fortunately, always believed in the everlasting values of dignity; a generation that was and is willing to face up to obstacles and to overcome the rigors imposed by nature and by men.

You and I, Mr. President, have in us something like a cowboy spirit, and with that spirit we are trying to improve the lot of our countrymen. Our peoples and all mankind, Mr. President, are going through a period of strains and unprecedented problems. You, as I in my own country, are responsible for taking the reins of the state with the conviction that in so doing we are effectively serving our peoples. But we cannot complain; we have asked for it. [Laughter] We have no one to whom to complain for the burdens that our duties impose upon us. You are performing your task with courage, with vigor, and keen sight that will be recorded, definitely, by history. I hope, too, that my efforts will likewise be fruitful and that Ecuadorians may soon be able to lead a better life and that my country, Ecuador, may reaffirm some of those transcendental values that have been lately threatened.

Let me, in thanking you for your toast, express my best wishes for your permanent well-being and that of your distinguished wife and ratify, at the same time, my confidence in your nation's leadership within the important affairs of the world. Thank you. Ladies and gentlemen, allow me now to raise the glass for the health and well-being of the President, Mrs. Reagan, and all her distinguished family.

Tomorrow marks the opening of the fourth round of the nuclear and space arms talks. These negotiations are devoted to seeking ways to reduce the U.S. and Soviet arsenals of nuclear weapons and simultaneously to strengthen strategic stability. I have no higher priority than to achieve agreements which would strengthen America's security and that of our allies by establishing a more stable strategic balance at radically reduced levels of weaponry. And it is my hope that we can one day eliminate them altogether.

The upcoming session represents an important opportunity to give new momentum to arms negotiations. Building upon the fresh start in our relationship that General Secretary Gorbachev and I made at our meetings in Geneva, it is my hope that we can see the general agreement on principles that we reached in Geneva translated into real progress at the negotiations. General Secretary Gorbachev and I made a commitment to accelerate Soviet-American arms reduction negotiations where there is common ground. Specifically, we agreed to the principle of 50-percent reductions, appropriately applied, in nuclear offensive arsenals and to seek an interim agreement on limiting intermediate-range missile systems. We hope that during this new round of talks progress can be made toward achieving these mutually beneficial objectives.

During the previous round of the negotiations, the Soviet Union made counterproposals to the concrete American arms reduction positions. After careful study, we found the Soviet counterproposals to have some positive elements, but also to be seriously one-sided in a number of key areas. To move the negotiations forward, the U.S. made a fresh offer. Our offer encompassed a proposal to cut in half the offensive nuclear arsenals of both sides in an appropriate and equitable way. The U.S. proposal takes account of expressed Soviet concerns and builds on the common elements in our respective positions. It seeks deep cuts, no first-strike advantage, continuing defensive research -- because defense is much safer than offense -- and no cheating. Our proposal is fair, balanced, and, if accepted, would result in the most dramatic cuts in offensive arms ever achieved.

The new U.S. offer is not a take-it-or-leave-it proposition. I have instructed our negotiators to press ahead in laying out the details of our position and in seeking and expanding common ground. Our objective remains an agreement for 50-percent reductions, appropriately applied, in the strategic nuclear arsenals of both the United States and Soviet Union and for enhanced stability by reducing the capability to conduct a first strike. With respect to intermediate-range nuclear forces, our objective remains the eventual elimination of the entire category of LRINF [Longer Range Intermediate-Range Nuclear Forces] missile systems, but we are prepared to work out an interim agreement based on the principle of equality which limits LRINF missiles. In the defense and space forum, we will continue to seek to expand our dialog with the Soviets concerning the offense-defense relationship. We will also push for Soviet agreement to our new proposal for reciprocal visits to laboratories engaged in strategic defense research.

U.S. negotiators are ready for tough but honest bargaining. The challenge ahead is formidable, but they have the flexibility to explore any promising avenues for agreement. As we have said before, we are more interested in results than in methods of reaching them. If the Soviets approach this round in a similar spirit, the prospects for progress will be greatly increased. Our two countries have it within our power to make 1986 a year of genuine peace and progress in arms control. Fair, equitable, and verifiable reductions of the weapons of massive destruction will serve Soviet and American interests and that of all humanity. It is a noble goal and an awesome responsibility. I wish our negotiators good luck and Godspeed.

The Martin Luther King, Jr. Elementary School has become very special to all of us at the White House since we began our partnership in education 2 years ago. It's wonderful to be here today at your fine school. I just wanted to come by and say a few words about the man for whom your school was named. I have a hunch we can all learn a few things from his life and the things that he believed in and fought for, just as Mr. Woodson has told us already. I can't help but feel there are some lessons we can all remember together.

I wonder now if some of you know the names and places that for another generation, for your parents' generation and your teachers', are so well known. They will always be unforgettable. Montgomery, Alabama, and Selma and Birmingham, Little Rock, Arkansas -- a lot of hearts were broken in those places, but a lot of history was made, too, and a lot of justice grew out of the pain that happened in those towns.

Montgomery is where a black woman named Rosa Parks refused to get up and give her seat to a white man on a bus. That was the beginning of the famous Montgomery bus boycott. Martin Luther King, Jr., was one of its leaders. He and his followers just refused to take the city buses anywhere as long as blacks had to sit in the back. They just wouldn't accept it anymore. They said, ``Enough.'' They walked everywhere; they'd walk for miles rather than take the bus. There was a phrase for what they were doing that was famous then. It was called peaceful protest -- saying no in a peaceful way. And the protesters went to the courts, where one day in June, 6 months after the boycott began, a United States District Court made a ruling. They said that racial segregation on the city bus lines was unconstitutional; it was contrary to that great Constitution by which we all live in this country.

Later the Supreme Court, the highest, most important court in the whole country, would listen to similar cases and hand down more civil rights decisions. One big case was argued by a young lawyer picked by Dr. King himself. The young lawyer and another lawyer worked together without pay, and they won the case. And that young lawyer is my friend, Samuel Pierce, and I'm proud he is a member of our government as the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development.

Martin Luther King, Jr., pursued progress all over the country in freedom marches and on freedom rides, in speeches and demonstrations, at the pulpit and in private conversation. He was a much loved and -- it's sad to say -- at that time, much hated. But I think it's true that those who loved him and those who hated him were pretty much united in agreement on this: Martin Luther King, Jr., was right to insist that the civil rights movement be nonviolent. And he was brave. Your teachers won't approve of my using the word I'm going to use now, but I have to. It's the best word for it. It takes a lot of guts not to hit back when someone is hitting you, and he had that kind of guts. I hope that's something you'll be able to emulate in your lives.

And if you can emulate another thing about Martin Luther King, Jr., I would hope it would be his passion. He felt so strongly about things; he really cared. He really felt the injustice he talked about, and he really felt the dreams that he shared. You can see it in his words, in the way he used them.

Well, those are great words: ``I want to leave a committed life behind.'' I want my life to have meaning; I want it to be a statement. That's a wonderful way to feel. In fact, I think it's the only way to feel. Our country is different and better because that was his attitude. And that's not just a phrase; our country is different and better; that's a literal truth. Our country is different because Martin Luther King, Jr., made it better by the way he lived his life. And that's why Dr. King's birthday is now a national holiday for everyone in the country -- because his contributions benefited all Americans.

And that gets me to my almost-last point. It's something I've been thinking a lot about recently, and I wanted to share it with you. It is this: The civil rights workers of the 1950's and '60's -- long before you were born -- they won their great battle because America had a conscience that they could appeal to. Now, you know what a conscience is. It's that thing that tells you the difference between right and wrong and that tries to get you to do right. And you know that bad feeling you get when you've done something wrong. That's conscience, too. Well, America had a conscience, and it was a good, strong one. It wouldn't let us hide from the truth, and it wouldn't let us sleep until we all, together, as a whole country, admitted that all people are equal and that in America there should be no second-class citizens. Our national conscience told us to change and start to be fair. And we listened and changed, and we started to be fair.

Ultimately, the great lesson of Martin Luther King, Jr.'s, life was this: He was a great man who wrested justice from the heart of a great country, and he succeeded because that great country had a heart to be seized. Martin Luther King, Jr., really helped make our nation freer. It's not a perfect place; we still have a long way to go. There's unfinished business, and we can't rest until all prejudice is gone forever. But we're a better, freer place; and now it's up to you, as the future grownups of America, to use that freedom to make a better life.

And how do you make the best use of freedom? Well, you get a good education. When you get a good education, when you study hard and read your books and ask questions, then you can become anything. The outstanding men and women up here on the stage with me will all tell you that if you work hard you can make a wonderful future for yourself, you can have the most exciting job, travel all over the world, help your fellow man. An education is like a spaceship; it can take you anywhere.

And you know what I hope? The dream I have for each of you is that one day in the future, when you're all grown up, you'll all come back here and visit on Martin Luther King, Jr.'s, birthday. And maybe someone up here will be making a speech, and they will introduce the next speaker with the words, ``And now, the President of the United States.'' And they'll turn, and they'll be pointing at you, because you'll be the President. Do you think that's a good idea?

I thank you so much for inviting me here today. This is where I wanted to be. So, thank you, my friends, and God bless you all. And now, if you don't mind, I'm just going to take a second -- I have to tell you a story, an experience of mine in my youth. I was playing football in a little college in Illinois, and this was back in the days before any Martin Luther Kings. He had just barely been born. But there were people with prejudice and hatred.

In our school, we had a young black man who came to school and who I remember -- he's departed this world now -- but he's probably the closest friend I ever had. And down on the line together, he played center, and I played right guard. And in those days, you didn't have an offense and a defense; you played both ways. You stayed in the game till it was over. And he and I became, as I say, the closest of friends down there in the middle of the line, where things got rough and tough.

And one day we played a team that didn't have any mix in its lineup. And playing opposite Burgie -- his name was Franklin Burghardt, but my nickname for him was Burgie -- playing opposite Burgie was a fellow that was filled with hatred and prejudice, and it was very obvious. And he was very vocal about it when we would line up against each other. He also played dirty against Burgie. In the huddle I looked across once and saw Burgie, and his lip was bleeding where he was biting it. He had already an injured knee before the game, and this fellow had found out about it -- evidently he groaned at the wrong time -- and he was using his dirty tactics to further hurt that knee. And Burgie was biting his lip to not show the pain. And in the huddle, we were so mad -- and all of his teammates -- we wanted to go after the fellow. And Burgie said, ``No, this is my problem; this is my fight.'' And no one knew anything about it.

Well, Burgie played him all that game. And he didn't play dirty; he played clean. He just played the hit-'em-hard kind of football that we're taught and that's within the rules. And by the middle of the fourth quarter his opponent, playing dirty with all of his dirty tricks, was literally staggering. And his coach had to send in a substitute for him. And he started off the field. He was wobbling as he started off. And halfway to the sideline he stopped, stood there for a minute, then he turned around. And he came staggering back, elbowed his way through the two teams as we stood there in the time-out waiting for play to resume, and up to Burgie and faced him. And then I saw he was crying; the tears were running down his face. And he stuck out his hand, and Burgie took it. And he grabbed it with his other hand, and then crying he said, ``I just want you to know you're the greatest human being I've ever met,'' and turned and left the field.

You see, just one individual with principles like that, like Dr. King and like Franklin Burghardt -- a conversion right there from hatred to respect and even liking on the part of another man. Well, I just couldn't go away without telling you that story. The world is so different today. And those of us who were a part of that revolution that Martin Luther King performed in, all of us, we are so happy for what has happened and so happy to see all of you here together in this different kind of an America. You keep it that way and keep making it better.

In 1983 at the Japanese Diet, I called for the total abolition of nuclear weapons. Since that time the United States has put forward a series of proposals to achieve this goal through radical reductions in strategic weapons. As early as 1981, I set forth a specific proposal for the elimination of all long-range intermediate nuclear missiles. At the Geneva arms control talks in November, we made yet another proposal designed to bring us closer to the goal of zero nuclear weapons.

Now the Soviet Union has responded with a proposal which builds on some of the elements we had previously set forth. I welcome the Soviets' latest response and hope that it represents a helpful further step in the process. We, together with our allies, will give careful study to General Secretary Gorbachev's suggestions. Many elements contained in the response are unchanged from previous Soviet positions and continue to cause us serious concern. There are others that at first glance may be constructive.

The American delegation in Geneva has instructions to implement the agreement reached at the Geneva summit to seek early progress in achieving radical reductions in offensive nuclear weapons, including an interim agreement on intermediate-range nuclear forces. If the position outlined by General Secretary Gorbachev advances this objective, it would prove to be a constructive step.

America was founded with a ringing affirmation of the transcendence of human rights. Our Declaration of Independence proclaims that the rights to ``Life, Liberty and the pursuit of Happiness'' are not a grant from the government, but a gift from the Creator; and we declared that the same Divine Providence in which the new Nation placed its ``firm reliance'' imposes on government a solemn duty to respect and secure these fundamental rights.

Yet, on January 22, 1973, the Supreme Court of the United States struck down our laws protecting the lives of unborn children. At that time there were those who predicted confidently that in time Americans would come to accept the Court's decision and the ``new ethic'' that it reflects. History has proved them wrong. Each year the terrible toll of more than a million innocent human lives has weighed more heavily on the conscience of America.

Each year remarkable advances in prenatal medicine bring ever more dramatic confirmation of what common sense told us all along -- that the child in the womb is simply what each of us once was: a very young, very small, dependent, vulnerable member of the human family. When Americans demand legal protection for human life, we are simply being true to our most basic principles and convictions. We are reaffirming the self-evident truths set forth in our Declaration of Independence. Indeed, we are reaffirming the consensus of civilized humanity by recognizing that children need special safeguards and care, including appropriate legal protection, before as well as after birth.

Those who champion the right to life know the harsh pressures and the profound anguish that drive some women to consider abortion. The most moving testimony to our reverence for human life has been the generous, even heroic efforts made by so many religious and charitable organizations to help women with problem pregnancies and to facilitate the adoption of infants into families eager to give them love and care.

Those who work to restore legal protection to the unborn do so with the knowledge that they have gone to the defense of the weak, the silent, the endangered. But that is not something new. Whenever disasters have endangered human life, we Americans have always responded swiftly and selflessly.

Respect for the sanctity of human life has not died in America. Far from it. With every passing year it shines ever more brightly in the hearts of more and more of our citizens as they come to see the issue with greater clarity in all of its dimensions. As we carry this message to our courts, our legislatures, and our fellow citizens, let us never be discouraged. Let us put our trust in God, the Lord and Giver of Life, the Creator Who endowed us with our inalienable rights. May we soon rejoice in the day when reverence for human life is enshrined as surely in our laws as in our hearts.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 15th day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

The Soviet response is another step in what we hope will be an increasingly positive process of give and take. We will, together with our allies, give it careful study, keeping in mind our basic objectives. Many elements of the Soviet proposal appear unchanged and cause us concern. Others, at first glance, appear constructive. We also have proposals on the table that we hope the Soviets will respond to. We look forward to exploring both sides' proposals at the negotiating table in Geneva. We welcome the Soviet Union's response and its support for the goal of the elimination of nuclear weapons, a goal toward which we have long been committed. We hope the details of the Soviet proposal will prove to represent a helpful step in the arms reduction process and the implementation of the joint statement's call for early progress.

At first glance many elements in the new Soviet proposal appear unchanged from their previous proposals and cause us concern; for example, the continued linkage of reductions to a ban on ``space-strike arms.'' We believe strategic defenses can make a significant contribution to stability in a world free from nuclear weapons. In other areas there may be some constructive steps; for example, the Soviet statement addressed verification measures, including on-site inspection. This offer, of course, needs to be translated into specifics for it to be properly evaluated. Other parts of the Soviet offer also require more concrete detail, and we hope Soviet negotiators will explain their proposals promptly and fully in the proper negotiating forums.

We wish to emphasize that Geneva is the proper place for detailed explorations of both U.S. and Soviet proposals on nuclear and space arms. The Soviets mentioned ideas regarding progress in other arms control fields, such as MBFR [Mutual and Balanced Force Reduction negotiations], chemical weapons, and CDE [Conference on Disarmament in Europe]. We hope they will explain their ideas fully in those negotiations, as well. The United States tabled new proposals in the nuclear and space talks (NST) at the end of the last round, and we expect a further Soviet response to those proposals. Our goal remains equitable, verifiable, and stabilizing agreements. We will evaluate the Soviet proposals in that light.

I am delighted to send my warmest good wishes to all the distinguished guests attending the annual Ambassadorial Reception of the Congress of Racial Equality. I send special greetings to Roy Innis, the Chairman of CORE, and one of America's outstanding civil rights leaders.

This year's event stands out as a very special milestone, because it is being held as a prelude to the first observance of the birthday of Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. as a National Holiday. King's was truly a prophetic voice that reached out over the chasms of hostility, prejudice, ignorance, and fear to touch the conscience of America. He challenged us to make real the promise of America as a land of freedom, equality, opportunity, and brotherhood -- a land of liberty and justice for all.

Dr. King was an uncompromising champion of nonviolence, yet he was often the victim of violence. And, as we know, a shameful act of violence cut short his life before he had reached his fortieth birthday. Although today he is honored with speeches and banquets and monuments, let us not forget that he was once jeered and threatened, fined and jailed. But through it all he never sought revenge, only reconciliation. His unshakable faith enabled him to conquer the temptation to hate and the temptation to fear. His was a triumph of courage and love.

He made it possible for all of us to move closer to the ideals set forth in our Declaration of Independence: that ``all men are created equal,'' equal because our Creator -- not the state -- has endowed us all with certain unalienable rights, and that it is the duty of the state to secure and protect those rights.

In saluting Martin Luther King, I also salute those who like Roy Innis have picked up the banner that fell 18 years ago from the hands of the slain Dr. King. I salute all those who have continued to work for brotherhood, for justice, for racial harmony -- for a truly color-blind America where all people are judged by the content of their character, not the color of their skin.

Attorney General Meese and my young friends here on the platform and ladies and gentlemen, good afternoon, and welcome to the White House. You know, we've come together today in a capital city that's often preoccupied with bigness -- big questions like tax reform and big statistics like the gross national product and, yes, big levels of funding. And to paraphrase the late Senator Everett Dirksen, he said, ``A billion dollars here, a billion dollars there, and pretty soon it adds up to real money.'' [Laughter] But in the midst of all this bigness, it's only too easy to lose sight of what really matters -- which is the individual. At this ceremony today, it's my honor to remind the Nation, the entire Nation, of the importance of the individual by awarding medals to four remarkable young Americans.

Two of the medals recognize outstanding service to others. And the first goes to the youngest honoree, 13-year-old Trevor Ferrell. Trevor lives with his family in a fine home outside Philadelphia on the Main Line, and until 1983, when Trevor was 11, that neighborhood was virtually his entire world. And then during the Christmas holidays, Trevor happened to glimpse a very different world on television. It was the world of the Philadelphia inner city, and the TV that evening showed street people bedding down for the cold winter night, broken men and women huddling in abandoned cars and burned-out buildings. Trevor went to his room, got a blanket, and asked his parents to take him downtown. And Trevor gave that blanket to a man he and his parents found sleeping over a subway grate. Soon Trevor was making trips to the inner city regularly, handing out the food, blankets, and clothing that had begun coming his way as friends, church groups, and businesses heard of his interest in helping the homeless. Word continued to spread, and today scores of individuals and organizations, moved by the example of young Trevor Ferrell, are joining him in his inner city work of charity.

The second medal for service goes to 19-year-old Janelle Lynn Peery of Cheyenne, Wyoming. When Janelle was 15, she noticed a bump above her right knee; the diagnosis: bone cancer. In a drastic effort to save Janelle's life, her right leg was amputated. Nine miserable months of chemotherapy followed, and as Janelle put it, with courageous understatement, ``When you spend 9 months being sick to your stomach, it's not too pleasant.'' The experience Janelle went through would have devastated many grownups, but young Janelle faced it with bravery and began to reach out to others. ``When I came out of the hospital,'' Janelle recently said, ``my basic philosophy on life was that I'm here to help people.'' Janelle's mother had made her daughter a teddy bear, and Janelle began making teddy bears just like it to give to other children in the hospital, each with a note attached which read, ``A little hand for you to hold onto when you get scared.'' Soon Janelle began counseling, and in the 4 years since her own surgery, she's counseled hundreds of cancer patients and amputees. Today Janelle is a freshman at Brandeis University, and I understand that in her spare time she's an expert skier.

And now it's my honor to announce the two medals for bravery. One goes to an 18-year-old -- Richard Makinson of Pixley, California. One spring day in 1984, when Richard was 16, he and friends were swimming in the Feather River. For Richard, swimming was an activity that required special attention. You see, he's a diabetic and must be careful not to overexert himself. On this day Richard had perhaps pushed himself too far, because he noticed that he had become shaky. In order to raise the sugar level in his blood, he stopped swimming to go get something to eat. On his way, Richard heard screams. He turned to see that two little girls had fallen into an unsafe part of the river and were being swept downstream. Despite his dangerous condition, Richard dived in. He reached one girl, 12-year-old Susanna Foster; and although she was terrified and struggling, he managed to get her safely to the riverbank. Richard then returned for the other girl, 11-year-old Kristy Boring. He got within a few feet of her before the current dragged her under. Richard dived again and again, but Kristy was gone. Richard returned to the shore and collapsed, devastated that, although he'd saved one girl, he had been unable to rescue the other.

In a recent interview, Richard said that his act of bravery ``makes me feel good, but I still don't think it was such a big deal. Anyone who was there would have done the same thing.'' Well, Richard, that's the modesty of a hero.

The second medal for bravery goes to 17-year-old Gregory Delzer, of Lead, South Dakota. On an autumn evening in 1984, when Greg was 16, he and three girls were walking to the Lead High School for the homecoming dance. By the way, Greg, one boy with three girls -- I have to hand it to you. [Laughter] As Greg and his friends neared the school, a speeding car suddenly rounded a curve and headed straight for them. One of the girls jumped clear; the other two girls seemed to freeze. As the car sped down upon him, Greg chose to save his friends, not himself; and he threw the two girls free. An instant later, Greg's head shattered the car windshield; both his legs were broken. The driver never even stopped. Later that night, he was arrested.

And there we have it -- Trevor Ferrell, Janelle Lynn Peery, Richard Makinson, Gregory Delzer -- four young Americans to inspire us all. I've often said that when I consider the youth of our country, I know that America will be in good hands. I've never felt that more strongly than at this moment. Once again, congratulations to each of you. And to your parents, thank you for raising such fine young Americans and for permitting us today to share in your pride.

Roy was a journalist, a communicator by trade. He was also the quintessential American activist. His skills and dedication helped turn the NAACP, a small civil rights organization, into a nationally prominent force for civil rights with hundreds of thousands of members. He turned an issue which many would rather have swept under the rug into a movement America was forced to reckon with. His courage, his dedication to the rights of every individual, his love for all mankind, manifested in his sincere belief in nonviolence -- all of these were inseparable parts of his character. Roy Wilkins was the grandson of a slave. He witnessed and experienced many injustices, yet he was never overcome with hate. He was an individual who sought not to tear down, but to build a better America.

And this spirit was clear to all when in 1949, at a time when the Nation had yet to come to grips with the worst aspects of institutional racism, Roy Wilkins spoke to the convention of the NAACP about the real meaning of Americanism. ``This is our land,'' he said, ``this is our nation. We helped to build it. We have defended it from Boston Common to Iwo Jima.'' With words like this he touched the conscience of his fellow countrymen. As we look back, all Americans are grateful for citizens like Roy Wilkins who dedicated themselves to seeing that America lived up to its promise of liberty and justice for all. And because of Roy Wilkins, we're closer to that noble goal.

It gives me great pleasure, then, to commemorate Roy Wilkins' contributions to the cause of human freedom, contributions that strengthened the moral underpinnings of the American way of life. I have a gold medal specially struck in memory of this great man, Roy Wilkins, an American hero. And Mrs. Wilkins, I would like to present it to you now on behalf of the Congress of the United States and of all of your fellow citizens.

Mrs. Wilkins. Mr. President, I would like to thank you for presenting the medal. I would like to thank Senator Moynihan and Representative Rangel for having introduced in the Congress the bills -- the bill, I should say, or the bills, isn't it, sure -- which was responsible for the creation of this medal. Now, unlike my husband, Mr. President, I'm not a very modest person. [Laughter] So, I will say that this medal was well merited.

Mrs. Wilkins. I have in my home two documents that were signed by you. One is a certificate from the University of California for an honorary doctor of laws degree that was given to Roy. The other is a very kind letter that you wrote to me at the time of Roy's death. And I shall always appreciate it. I also have your order at the time of Roy's death which had all American flags all over the world flying at half-mast from the time of his death until after his funeral. I think -- as I say, I'm not modest -- I appreciate your having done this, and I shall always remember it. But I think, Mr. President, he deserved this honor, too.

Mrs. Wilkins. Roy, you see, was a real patriot; I think one of the best patriots, because he loved this country and he spent his whole adult life working for the truths upon which this country was founded. He believed that this country should have integrity, and this is what he devoted his life to. And so I say to you, thank you again for everything, but mostly for remembering the extraordinary man to whom I had the joy of being married for 52 years.

H.R. 3384 contains some desirable features, particularly a change in the Federal employees health benefits law recommended by my Administration that would allow anticipated rebates of health insurance premiums to be paid by insurance carriers to Federal annuitants, as is already allowed for active employees. I fully support the proposed rebates, but I could not approve the bill, especially because of one seriously objectionable feature. That feature would eliminate the current 75 percent ceiling on the Government's share of the premiums of any individual health insurance plan of employees and annuitants.

Elimination of the ceiling would add to Government costs and increase the Federal budget deficit at the very time that there is a critical need for fiscal restraint. In order to comply with the deficit reduction mandated by the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings Act, spending for most Government programs will have to be cut. Under those circumstances, this is not the time to raise the Government's personnel costs.

Lifting the 75 percent ``cap'' by itself would directly increase Government costs for many Federal Employees Health Benefits (FEHB) premiums, since the Government would now pay for costs previously paid by employees. OPM has estimated that this will result in adding almost $90 million to the Federal deficit in fiscal year 1986 and another $173 million in 1987. Over the six-year period 1986 through 1991, the Federal deficit would increase by an estimated $1.2 billion. Some proponents of this provision will claim that it would save money because it will induce employees to shift to low-cost plans. However, any such savings must be weighed against the substantial Federal cost increases projected over the next six years.

Health benefits reform legislation proposed by the Administration included lifting the cap as one of its elements. In our proposal, however, that provision was linked with structural improvements in the Federal employees health insurance program, including a change in the way the Government's contribution is established, that would reduce the cost of the program for both employees and the Government. H.R. 3384 ignores that essential linkage by simply lifting the cap without program reform, resulting in an unacceptable shift in costs from employees to the Government. I look forward to working with the Congress early in the session to develop a suitable package of structural reforms that would include lifting the cap.

In addition, the provision requiring direct access to and permitting direct payment for the services of nurses and nurse-midwives, without supervision or referral by another health practitioner, deserves full evaluation, including hearings by the Congress. In its present form, it is a major departure from established health care practice and may be counter to many State laws.

In the meantime, I urge the Congress to act as soon as possible to enact acceptable legislation that will permit Federal annuitants to receive rebates of health insurance premiums without undue further delay.

The President met this morning with Ciriaco De Mita, head of the Italian Christian Democratic Party. They discussed the promising evolution of democracy in Latin and Central America. The President, noting today's meeting between Deputy Secretary [of State] Whitehead and Prime Minister Craxi, emphasized the need for concerted responses to the scourge of international terrorism. The President and Mr. De Mita stressed the continuing strong relationship between Italy and the United States.

Mr. De Mita provided the President with a review of his recent trip to Central America. They agreed that the tide was turning in the region toward those advocating freedom and democracy. The President commended the Italian Government for its firm stand against global extremism and its support for American efforts to isolate those responsible for fomenting terrorism. They further agreed on the need to support those who advocate accelerating the peace process in the Mideast. The President and Mr. De Mita agreed that alliance cohesion played a crucial role in securing a more forthcoming Soviet approach to security issues and the arms control negotiating process. They also reviewed the positive developments in East-West relations flowing from the Geneva meeting between the President and Soviet General Secretary Gorbachev.

Following the Oval Office meeting, Mr. De Mita also spoke at length with the Vice President on a range of international issues. Particular attention was focused on the report of the Vice President's task force on terrorism. The Vice President and Mr. De Mita discussed encouraging developments in Central America, including the recent inauguration of Guatemalan President Cerezo, which they both attended.

This year marks the first observance of the birthday of Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. as a national holiday. It is a time for rejoicing and reflecting. We rejoice because, in his short life, Dr. King, by his preaching, his example, and his leadership, helped to move us closer to the ideals on which America was founded. We reflect on his words and his works. Dr. King's was truly a prophetic voice that reached out over the chasms of hostility, prejudice, ignorance, and fear to touch the conscience of America. He challenged us to make real the promise of America as a land of freedom, equality, opportunity, and brotherhood.

Although Dr. King was an uncompromising champion of nonviolence, he was often the victim of violence. And, as we know, a shameful act of violence cut short his life before he had reached his fortieth birthday.

His story is well-known. As a 26-year-old minister of the Gospel, Dr. King led a protest boycott of a bus company that segregated blacks, treating them as second-class citizens. At the very outset he admonished all those who would join in the protest that ``our actions must be guided by the deepest principles of our Christian faith. Love must be our regulating ideal.'' Otherwise, he warned, ``our protest will end up as a meaningless drama on the stage of history . . . shrouded with ugly garments of shame.'' Dr. King's unshakable faith inspired others to resist the temptation to hate and fear. His protest became a triumph of courage and love.

The majesty of his message, the dignity of his bearing, and the righteousness of his cause are a lasting legacy. In a few short years he changed America for all time. He made it possible for our Nation to move closer to the ideals set forth in our Declaration of Independence: that all people are created equal and are endowed with inalienable rights that government has the duty to respect and protect.

Let all Americans continue to carry forward the banner that 18 years ago fell from Dr. King's hands. Today, all over America, libraries, hospitals, parks, and thoroughfares proudly bear his name. His likeness appears on more than 100 postage stamps issued by dozens of nations around the globe. Today we honor him with speeches and monuments. But let us do more. Let all Americans of every race and creed and color work together to build in this blessed land a shining city of brotherhood, justice, and harmony. This is the monument Dr. King would have wanted most of all.

The first national holiday for Martin Luther King, Jr., will be celebrated this Monday, but Dr. King's birthday fell this past week on Wednesday. I spent a good part of that morning at the Martin Luther King, Jr. Elementary School in Washington, and believe me, that was the place to be. I've got a pen pal at the school, 8-year-old Rudy Hines, and he's kept me up on the doings at the school and what he and his friends are thinking about. So, I wasn't surprised that, in spite of their age, the children at the King school knew all about his life and why it had meaning for all of us.

Vigorous enforcement of the civil rights laws continues. More employment discrimination cases were filed by the Justice Department during our first administration than during the previous 4 years. And we have successfully prosecuted more criminal civil rights cases in more parts of the country. We've also continued strong support for the fair housing laws.

I agree with the late Dr. King that our country won't be free until we're all free. But I take it a step further: Our nation won't really be prosperous until everyone in it enjoys a share of the fruits of prosperity. What progress have we made in this regard? Well, still not enough. Record high employment, lower tax rates, lower inflation, dropping interest rates, and continued economic growth have helped Americans -- and that includes black Americans. The policies of the past 5 years have produced the biggest economic expansion since the 1960's. Because of these policies, about 400,000 black Americans moved up and out of poverty from 1983 to 1984. A record 10.7 million black Americans are holding jobs. In fact, blacks have gained an average of 40,000 new jobs a month for a total of 1.5 million since the recovery began. In addition, the median family income of black Americans, adjusted for inflation, rose almost 2 percent in 1984.

Another measure of expanding opportunity is minority entrepreneurship; and there, too, the news is encouraging. The Commerce Department reports that the number of black-owned businesses increased 47 percent between 1977 and 1982. By the way, over the past 3 years, minority firms have enjoyed $15 billion in government business and at least another $15 billion with private sector companies.

Now, none of this happened by accident. The economy is expanding because from the beginning we made it clear that one of the prime motivating intentions of this administration was to get the economy going again. And it was clear the way to do that was cut tax rates, stop penalizing initiative, and sit back and watch the fireworks. All of us have benefited. The poverty statistics show John Kennedy was right when he said, following his own tax cuts, a rising tide lifts all boats.

So, we've done some boat lifting the past few years, but it's still not enough. We can do better. We can reform our tax system, make it fairer, and lower most people's tax rates. We can also get spending under control and keep government from demanding more and more of your money. For years now we've been asking for enterprise zones in depressed areas, areas that would get tax breaks to attract the businesses that create jobs. And in education, we propose the educational voucher system in which families that live in poor areas can use vouchers to send their children to any of a number of schools, whichever they think is doing better. No reason parents shouldn't be given more freedom of choice, and no reason schools shouldn't compete for students.

I met today with Ambassador Robert L. Barry, head of the United States delegation to the Stockholm Conference on Security and Confidence Building Measures and Disarmament in Europe (CDE), which resumes on January 28, 1986. I expressed to Ambassador Barry my satisfaction with the progress made during the last round of the Stockholm Conference and my belief that an accord with important implications for the overall East-West relationship can be achieved there this year.

At our meeting in Geneva in November, Soviet General Secretary Gorbachev and I stated the political commitment of the United States and the Soviet Union to work with others for a successful conclusion to the Stockholm Conference. I have instructed the U.S. delegation to pursue concrete results at the negotiating table in Stockholm. Such an agreement, in keeping with the mandate for the Conference, must be meaningful in military terms; it must give reassurance to all states that the military activities in Europe are routine and nonthreatening. The agreement must be verifiable and go well beyond the limited confidence-building measures agreed to in Helsinki over 10 years ago.

If the Stockholm Conference is successful -- and the U.S. will do its part to ensure that it will be -- it can help to lower the barriers which now divide Europe artificially East from West, thereby making the threat or use of force less likely. The Stockholm Conference, moreover, can contribute to security in the larger sense, that which encompasses political, economic, cultural, and humanitarian matters -- human rights -- as well as strictly military matters. The attainment of this broader concept of security is the fundamental objective of the United States. I am confident that our delegation in Stockholm will advance these objectives in the months ahead.

I'm delighted to accept the position of Honorary Chairman of the United Way's centennial in 1987. And, even better news, Nancy is just as delighted to become the Honorary Chairwoman. Both of us have held positions with the United Way in the past, and we're very pleased to do so again.

I was the United Way's national spokesman in 1961. Looking back, I realize this was one of the experiences that caused me to become such a believer in voluntarism. I saw what could be accomplished by people who cared and got involved. Today, we know that government alone is not the answer. It takes the commitment of every American to meet the needs of friends and neighbors in our local communities. The role for voluntarism, for United Way, and for the many other fine human services agencies in this country is as great today as it was 100 years ago.

We challenge United Way to help this country reassess current community needs and to identify the emerging needs of the future. And we challenge you to build even more coalitions and approaches to meet those needs. We also understand you're now working to double your resources and services to America. We heartily endorse that goal, and we challenge you to see how quickly you can attain it.

Since the United Way's contributions are substantial, it is appropriate that it should accept great challenges to mark the occasion of its 100th anniversary. Nancy and I look forward to hearing of your plans and progress as you strive to achieve these important goals.

Ann Ascher, of Los Angeles, CA, is president of Ann Ascher, Inc. She is a founding member and past chairman of the board of the Southern California Center for Nonprofit Management, which provides management techniques to the nonprofit sector. She is a former member of the President's Advisory Council on Private Sector Initiatives.

Lyda Hill, of Dallas, TX, is general chairwoman of the Volunteer Connection, which was established to encourage agencies to find new ways to utilize volunteers. She is president of the Seven Falls Co., founder and chairman of the board of Hill World Travel, and president of Hill Development Co. in Dallas.

Nowhere has the spirit of voluntarism shone more brightly than among the members of the United States Jaycees and its affiliated State and local organizations. Currently numbering more than 268,000 members and more than 6,500 chapters in 50 States, Jaycees have actively involved themselves in the life of our communities by providing leadership, rendering services, and returning the biblical hundredfold in a variety of endeavors. Their noteworthy contributions include such humanitarian projects as assistance to the elderly, fundraising for the disadvantaged, cardiopulmonary resuscitation programs, energy conservation, and countless other efforts to address community needs.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-first day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Department of Defense efforts in aeronautics and space in 1984 were broad and far-reaching and included programs in military satellite communications crucial for deterring and containing hostilities, a variety of programs in aeronautics to modernize and advance defense helicopters and Vertical/Short Takeoff and Landing Aircraft (V/STOL), and, of course, support at various military facilities for launching space vehicles, both civilian and military, and tracking their operations. Also, DOD consolidated research and technology on defense against ballistic missiles under the Strategic Defense Initiative Organization to provide programs and guidance for future decisions with respect to such defenses.

NASA activities in 1984 began to reflect our new commitment to encouraging private U.S. enterprise in space pursuant to Executive Order 12465 and our National Policy on the Commercial Use of Space. NASA activities also in 1984 continued to reflect the legislative mandate of the 1958 Act: to pursue activities for peaceful purposes for the benefit of all mankind, to provide widest dissemination of information resulting from such activities, and to undertake our national reach into space in cooperation with other nations and groups of nations. Our continuing commitment to this mandate was given special emphasis in 1984 when I announced to you and to the Nation on January 25 a plan of action to establish a permanently manned Space Station in the 1990's. I invited other countries to participate in this endeavor which, I believe, will spotlight the incredible potential of space waiting to be used for the betterment of mankind.

My 1984 goal to build a Space Station is a logical extension of U.S. voyages and operations, both national and international, made possible by the Space Shuttle, the vehicle of our current Space Transportation System. We used both transportation systems to place into orbit a broad array of applications satellites in 1984. Among these were satellites to observe Earth and search out its resources, assess and monitor food production, and keep watch for natural disasters so that human lives and property could be protected against them in a timely fashion.

Another major highlight of U.S. air and space operations in 1984 was the dramatic demonstration of the ability of our astronauts to recover, repair, and redeploy malfunctioning spacecraft. This capability promises substantial savings in both time and money.

Our reach into air and space in 1984 brought us a rich bounty of information essential for developing new technologies for human advancement on Earth and for ensuring the Nation's continued primacy in air and space research. In our reach for the stars, knowledge continues to be both the key and the quest. As this report reveals, it is a grand search in which we all share, one that enriches and advances our Nation and all peoples everywhere.

Continued strong support for our Nation's science and technology has been and will continue to be a policy of this Administration. The goals of this support are enhanced national security, improved quality of life, and increased industrial competitiveness. Today, more than ever before, we must use our technological resources aggressively in order to retain international leadership.

This report highlights recent achievements in federally supported science and technology. It also presents areas of major emphasis for Federal action as we move forward in the coming years. Our challenge for the future is to draw upon our unique strength in basic science and accelerate the development of technology and products that will benefit our society.

But now I'm pleased to tell all of you who've come today to march for life, welcome to Washington, and thank you all for your commitment and support for the right to life. When you insist upon legal protection for all human life, you're simply being true to our most basic principles and convictions as Americans. We'll continue to work together with Members of the Congress to overturn the tragedy of Roe versus Wade.

The President.  --  -- together, we will ensure that the resources of government are not used to promote or perform abortions. And I know that many of you provide compassionate care for women seeking alternatives to abortion. The heroic efforts of these women who choose life are a moving testimony to our reverence of human life. Each child about to be born is a unique, unrepeatable gift. Each child who escapes the tragedy of abortion is an immeasurable victory.

Last month I had a very special visitor in the Oval Office. Mother Teresa was in town, and we were able to exchange holiday greetings. We've often heard Mother Teresa say that: ``Abortion has become the greatest destroyer of peace. If we really want peace, if we're sincere in our hearts that we really want peace, we should make a strong resolution that we will not allow a single child to feel unwanted, to feel unloved.'' That was Mother Teresa's reminder to us.

Our nation's affirmation of the sacredness of all human life must begin with respect for our most basic civil right: the right to life. And again this year, let me say I'm proud to stand with you in the long march for the right to life. God bless you all.

Miss Gray. Mr. President, we want to thank you very much for being with us today, and we liked particularly your words which said that each and every human life is precious. And we want to work with you and your administration. Particularly, we want to stop the funds for abortion in the District of Columbia -- no exceptions and no compromise. We want, also, to work with you to assure that we have prolife judges appointed. And, Mr. President, we are here in unity today -- unified -- the grassroots movement with our no-exception position, and we will be working for the paramount human life amendment. May we work with you, Mr. President?

Note: The President spoke at noon from the Oval Office via a loudspeaker at the rally site. Participants had gathered on the Ellipse for a march to the Supreme Court on the 13th anniversary of the Supreme Court's decision legalizing abortion. Nellie Gray was president of March for Life.

Well, it's been a pleasure to be here with you today and to have you here at the White House to discuss a fundamental goal of our administration: private sector initiatives, encouraging the American people to get involved in helping one another and providing service to their communities. And I want to begin by thanking each and every one of you for agreeing to serve on this newly constituted Presidential Board of Advisors on Private Sector Initiatives. Your own volunteer spirit is an example of the good citizenship we want others to follow. And I'm proud that we're on the same team. This is not a Republican issue or a Democrat issue; we're promoting an aspect of the American character that is as fundamental to our way of life as our freedom to speak, assemble, and worship.

Back when I was younger -- some younger people think that I was along about the same time as Alexis de Tocqueville -- [laughter] -- and I lived in a small town on the Great Plains of the Midwest, the Nation's Capital seemed very far away. So, we couldn't wait for the Government to provide assistance to our friends and neighbors when they were in need. We knew it was up to us, and helping each other was the natural thing to do. It created a true sense of community. Now, I'm not suggesting that there's no role for government, but I think it behooves all of us to nurture the kind of community spirit that I just mentioned.

In the early days of this administration, we've been trying to do just that. In October of 1981 we set in motion a Presidential Task Force on Private Sector Initiatives to promote private sector leadership and encourage public-private partnerships that meet public needs and decrease reliance on government. It seems that during the 1970's, people began looking at government not as the tool of last resort but as the first and foremost solution to our problems. Paid government employees began to replace volunteers. Some people acted as if funding ever-expanding government programs with taxpayer dollars was an act of personal charity. Well, I've always thought charity is what people decide to do with their own time and money by themselves. Had the trend of more and more government financed by higher and higher taxes continued, it would have killed off one of our greatest national assets: the spirit of neighbor helping neighbor.

Our first 44-member task force, chaired by Bill Verity, a prominent businessman that we all know, went to work trying to reinvigorate the American spirit of voluntarism and community service. And for 14 months these top professionals used all their talents and skills to raise awareness and build local networks. A computerized data bank of projects was established, and people everywhere seemed to be on the move. And I was just telling some of my comrades here at the head table that we still have that computer bank. And for people in communities who have a problem and want to know a way to solve it, all they have to do is get in touch, and we can put them in touch with people that have already worked out some private sector way of meeting the problem.

For the first time, a White House Office in Private Sector Initiatives was created. And after the task force finished its work, a Presidential Advisory Council on PSI, headed by another top business leader, Bob Galvin, was set in motion. And now we see thousands of partnerships in education forming. And our aspiring young astronauts are hard at work studying their math and science. Through OPERATION: Care and Share, millions of pounds of food are reaching the needy. Private partnerships are forming to address the issues of child care, missing children, and crime prevention. Small businesses and the corporate world are pitching in, using their entrepreneurial ingenuity to revitalize our neighborhoods and create summer jobs for our young people. Thousands of youngsters are touching America as they help maintain our public lands.

We're not letting good works go unrewarded. Through the C Flag program, we've been recognizing outstanding community projects. Thousands of these flags are flying around the country symbolizing that great American spirit of we can and we care. I'm deeply grateful to all who are involved. It's been a truly noble endeavor, and I think those who gave their time, energy, and talent have every reason to be proud of what was accomplished -- and much has been accomplished.

As an overall phenomenon, we're talking about the world's mighty force for good. On the individual level, both the giver and the receiver benefit when we help one another. Our communities, States, as well as country, are better and more decent places because of it. Even if we were to greatly expand government programs -- and I assure you we can't and won't -- we could not legislate or regulate the compassion, caring, and innovative use of resources that are built into our voluntary programs.

What are the types of private sector initiatives I'm talking about? Well, let's take a few examples of what some of you right here in this room have done. I know that the New York Stock Exchange, among many other laudible activities, has designed a program to work with New York State teachers in providing a better economics education for students. And I want to congratulate the chief executive officer and chairman of the exchange, John Phelan, for this. Thank you, John. I also want to thank him for agreeing to serve as Chairman of this Advisory Board. Another example of community service of which we can all be proud is that of the National Association of Broadcasters. NAB has been deeply involved in programs to counter drug and alcohol abuse. They use their medium to build the community in a wide variety of ways -- from voter education to producing public service announcements aimed at improving productivity. For all of this, and for agreeing to serve as Vice Chairman of this Advisory Board, I'd like to thank NAB president, Eddie Fritts. Thank you.

Now, I realize that all of you in this room are involved in this type of positive, community-based activity or you wouldn't be here. I just want you all to know that I appreciate what you've done and all the work that you will be doing on this Advisory Board. The ball is in our hands now, and we can't let it drop. We've got positive momentum on which we can build. Now, as you embark on your new mission with this Board, I hope I can count on each of you to use the full extent of your talents and resources to promote the long-term development of private sector initiatives. We must continue to do what we can to bolster phenomenal growth of these private sector efforts. And we must continue to draw attention to how much individuals and private organizations are able to accomplish.

I hope that history will look back on this time not just as a period of economic recovery but also as a time when a rebirth of the American spirit was translated into unprecedented good will and good deeds between all Americans. That goal is well within reach, and we must work to make it real. And I look forward to hearing of your achievements directly and through my Office of Private Sector Initiatives. Thank you for volunteering. Together we can do it.

Now, in a moment I'm going to go out that door, and I'm going to get a chance to do what I didn't have a chance to do at the beginning at the luncheon, and that is to greet each one of you individually down here in the Blue Room. But I want to thank you all, and God bless you all for what you're doing. Thank you.

I'm delighted to meet with leaders who support our goal of getting the Government out of businesses that should be owned and run by the private sector. This is a test to see if Congress is serious about meeting the challenge of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings -- start scaling back the scope and size of government. If we're to bring down deficit spending, what a better place to start than by trimming away those costly activities like Conrail, which the Government should never have been involved with in the first place.

But over 10 years ago, the Federal Government entered the freight railroad business when several rail carriers went bankrupt. In 1981 I directed the Secretary of Transportation to draw up a plan to sell Conrail. It was clear then that the Government didn't need to be in the railroad business. And the case today for returning Conrail to the private sector is even stronger. Fortunately, the business community has proved it's both capable and eager to assume this responsibility. Many companies bid for the chance to buy Conrail, and we had tough negotiations to get the best deal. Our goals in selling have been that Conrail must remain financially strong so that the railroad will not, again, become a public ward. Service to shippers and communities must be preserved, and the Government must get a good financial return.

Well, nearly a year ago our efforts paid off when Elizabeth, the Secretary of Transportation, selected the Norfolk Southern Corporation to purchase Conrail from the Government. Since then, Congress has been reviewing the rail process. Shippers, State and local officials, other railroad companies, rail labor leaders, and a host of other persons interested in Conrail's future have been given a full opportunity to comment on the proposed sale. And after all that attention, there's no serious question but that Conrail should be returned to private ownership now.

Under the agreement reached, Norfolk Southern has given its approval to public interest covenants designed to preserve quality service, protect the Conrail shippers, and to ensure the financial strength of Conrail. The buyer is committed to investing hundreds of millions of dollars each year to keep Conrail in top condition. And the sale brings to Conrail the financial resources of a strong parent. Conrail has had to shed tens of thousands of employees and thousands of miles of track in order to become even marginally profitable. So, through the sale, Conrail's services will be integrated into a larger rail system. It'll bring new business to Conrail from the cheaper and faster north-south single-line service that the combined railroads can offer. The new owner will diversify Conrail's traffic base and lower its operating costs. It'll stimulate competition, not inhibit it. Major markets and rail gateways will be open to new competition. Shippers will benefit from these new alternatives, which translates directly into benefits for consumers. And Norfolk Southern will pay the Government over $1.2 billion in cash on the date of sale, once the Congress approves the necessary legislation. More importantly, the sale of the railroad to a strong buyer means that the already overburdened American taxpayer will never again be called upon to foot the bill. When the private sector can deliver better service for less money than the public sector, as it can with Conrail, then the Government must step aside.

British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher has successfully privatized more than a dozen major nationalized industries, including British Aerospace, Jaguar, and British Telecom, generating over u 7 billion for the treasury. In this country, State and local governments have taken the lead in contracting out such public services as garbage collection, street cleaning, and even prison services to the private sector. Not surprisingly, the result has been reduced costs and better service.

I believe that the sale of Conrail is a good example of how our government can follow Britain's example and responsibly ask the private sector to do a better job. We've found a strong company that promises to promote Conrail's financial strength and service. We have bargained for tough protections to make sure that the buyer lives up to its promise. Government ownership is no way to run a railroad. Your hard-earned tax dollars shouldn't be used to own or operate a business out of a Federal office building. And I hope that you'll join Secretary Dole and me in our fight to get the Federal Government out of the railroad business.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Daniel J. Elazar to be a member of the Advisory Commission on Intergovernmental Relations for a term of 2 years. He will succeed Mary Kathleen Teague.

Since 1967 he has been serving as professor of political science and director of the Center for the Study of Federalism at Temple University. He has also been serving as president of the Jerusalem Center for Public Affairs in Jerusalem and Philadelphia since 1976.

The President met today with five Afghan children, victims of the continuing Soviet war against the people of Afghanistan. The children are being treated in the United States for severe wounds and burns they received as a result of the fighting in their homeland. They were brought to the United States by the Free Afghanistan Alliance, a private voluntary organization based in Cambridge, which has arranged for the children to receive treatment and prosthetic devices through an affiliate of the Massachusetts General Hospital.

These children are a poignant reminder of the thousands more who have been killed and hurt since the Soviet occupation of Afghanistan and who have little or no prospect of adequate medical care. The United States Government, with the support of Congress, provided funds for humanitarian assistance, including medical training, to the freedom fighters and victims of the Soviet war. The American people, particularly groups such as the Free Afghanistan Alliance and the Committee for a Free Afghanistan, have given generously to alleviate the plight of the refugees and those who remain in Afghanistan. But the real solution to the problem must be a political one, including the complete withdrawal of Soviet forces, the establishment of conditions for the safe return of the refugees, and a guarantee of the Afghan people's right to self-determination.

I hope I haven't kept you waiting. I had to stop in at a meeting down the hall there of Republican mayors. I had a ticket to fix. [Laughter] Well, good afternoon, and welcome to the White House complex. I'm very glad that you could come by to see us and to hear our views on the issues that will shape the budget in 1986.

The Federal deficit is among the last major obstacles blocking America's path to permanent prosperity. In these past 5 years, we've cut tax rates by nearly 25 percent and then indexed the brackets to protect people from being bumped into higher brackets by inflation. We've seen inflation itself drop by two-thirds, interest rates tumble by more than half, and we've seen more than 9 million Americans find jobs during 3 straight years of economic growth. Americans, I think, are believers again.

There's one area where no one believes the Federal Government is doing a good enough job -- and that's getting Federal spending under control. And I'm with you -- I don't think so, either. Even though tax revenues have been growing, spending has been shooting up even faster. And so, the Congress passed the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings amendment that mandates steadily declining deficits until we reach a balanced budget in fiscal year 1991. And that's when I think we should have a constitutional amendment that says from here on, it'll always be a balanced budget. And when we get that, I'm going down there to the Jefferson Memorial to see if that statue of Tom is smiling. [Laughter] Because he's the first person that ever remarked about that. At the ratification of the Constitution, Thomas Jefferson very eloquently said it has only one glaring omission: ``It does not have a prohibition against the Federal Government borrowing money.'' So, let's catch up with him.

Well, I want you to know that the budget we submit in a couple of weeks is going to meet the deficit targets that were set by that legislation I mentioned. And it will do so while protecting Social Security and the safety net, while going forward with the bare minimum that we need in defense spending growth and without increasing taxes. We've got to get government in shape for the 21st century. And one of the ways we plan to do that is by getting government out of activities that it can no longer afford or shouldn't have been doing in the first place. A case in point is our determination to sell Conrail and get the Federal Government out of the railroad business. Yesterday, before a group in this same room, I urged Congress to help us meet our deficit targets by approving the sale of Conrail. And I'm happy to tell you that the Senate passed its first test vote on that issue by a score of 90 to 7 yesterday, so I think we're on our way. I've heard that our budget will be DOA, dead on arrival, maybe even dead before arrival. Well, the gravediggers better put away their shovels and get out their hammers because we're not burying our budget. We intend to get that budget passed and to build a prosperity that lasts for all the American people.

And now let me address another issue -- defense. [Laughter] I know there are some who claim that we are spending too much on defense, that defense is somehow being allowed to escape the harsh scrutiny of the budget process. Well, forgive me, but the modest defense growth that we're calling for already represents a major compromise with the Congress. Indeed, while doing our best to improve the Nation's defenses, we have compromised with the Congress on every defense budget since September 1981. They have all been reduced below the figures that we had believed were essential if we were to be doing the job. We've compromised so much that this year, for the first time in more than a decade, the defense budget has actually fallen below what it was the year before.

But by far the most important point is this: Of all the items in the budget, defense is the only one which must be decided with reference not only to American policy but to the policies of foreign powers who would attempt to terrorize, intimidate, or threaten us and our allies. While our defenses fell into disrepair during the 1970's, the Soviets raced ahead with the biggest military buildup in the history of the world. And that buildup continues. The Soviets are engaged in space weapons research. They are constantly adding to their nuclear arsenal and are tirelessly building up their conventional armed forces, especially their navy. I don't mind sharing with you one of the exchanges that I had with Secretary General Gorbachev. He suggested that maybe we were trying to bankrupt them by forcing them into an arms race. I ended that argument when I told him we were still just trying to catch up with what they were doing. But to gut the defense budget now would be to put at risk the developing nations of the Third World, including growing democracies like El Salvador and Ecuador, to endanger the defense of Western Europe. It would cripple our hopes for successful arms talks with the Soviets, and we cannot permit this.

But there's no question that Gramm-Rudman-Hollings is going to demand some hard choices. But I'm confident that our budget makes the right choices and that it deserves your support. So, please, let your voices be heard both at home and right here in Washington. You do that and Capitol Hill will get the idea; they're rather sensitive to that sort of thing. And, my friends, I want to thank you for all the support that you've already given us. Together we're participating in history. We are shaping America's future. The budget battle promises to be long and hard, but the rewards will be great. And once we bring deficit spending to an end, our nation will enter an era of unparalleled opportunity and growth. So, be heard, and realize that there are a great many of your friends and colleagues -- greatly intelligent and informed on a great many issues, but who don't really know how ridiculous the whole Federal budgeting process really is. We're trying to get that straightened out, too.

In 3 days I'll be going up to the Capitol to fulfill my responsibility of reporting to the Congress on the State of the Union. So, I'm spending this weekend finishing up some last minute work on my speech -- dotting the i's and crossing the t's and taking time to look back and to reflect on the days and months ahead.

A piece of history trivia for you: After Washington and Adams, Thomas Jefferson discontinued the practice of delivering an annual State of the Union Address. He began a long custom of delivering written messages. It wasn't until 1913 that President Woodrow Wilson returned to the House Chamber to deliver a speech. Wilson felt a President could do a better job reading his message than a clerk could. He said, ``I'm very glad to have this opportunity to address the two Houses directly and to verify for myself that the President is a person, not a mere department of the government hailing Congress from some isolated island of jealous power -- that he is a human being trying to cooperate with other human beings in a common service.'' Cooperate in a common service -- I guess that pretty much says it all.

This will be my fifth State of the Union Address. It's almost getting to be old hat. In each address I've been mindful of one unchanging fact: I may be a Republican President, and be mighty proud of it, but I need the help of Republicans and Democrats in the Congress if we're going to solve the serious problems confronting our nation. I think back to 1981 -- to the terrible economy, the inflation and interest rates, the sense that, both home and abroad, everything had gone haywire and was slipping out of control. And I remember the first thing I did was to ask the Congress to pass an economic recovery program -- one that would not be my program, but our program. By ``our'' I meant not just those of us who serve here in Washington but we, the American people. And so it was.

We came together as a nation. All of us cooperated to rescue a country in distress and bring America back. So, now we look ahead again with high hopes that we can build on our success and work in bipartisan spirit to make 1986 the year of opportunities for America. A year of opportunities to create a future of unlimited opportunity; a year to unite for full employment from Harlem to Hawaii so that every American who seeks work can find work; to build a floor of security beneath every family, but no ceiling of opportunity above any American's head; to act now so that our children can truly look forward to inheriting a land freed from runaway debt, prices, crime, and drugs; and, yes, freed from the terror of nuclear attack.

We know the challenges we must meet. We must make sure that government no longer stands as a roadblock to a stronger and smarter economy -- an economy that becomes more sophisticated technologically in both our new and traditional industries, so we can compete successfully with our trading partners. We need to make sure that the weight of taxes and education, health and retirement costs, doesn't crush those who will lead America into the 21st century with their risk-taking and hard work. And we need to do all that's required of us to keep America secure.

In this storm-tossed world of terrorists and totalitarians, America must always champion freedom, for freedom is the one tide that will lead us to the safe and open harbor of peace. So let us join hands, Republicans and Democrats, and go forward together vowing not to flinch from the difficult but wise decisions that await us: to get government spending under control; to make our system a model for greater simplicity, fairness, and growth; and to prepare America for a prosperous future in a world that is free and at peace.

This year marks the 199th anniversary of Shays' Rebellion, sparked by, among other grievances, a high land tax that weighed down on working people. Shays, a farmer and a veteran of the Revolution, had fought for the independence and freedom of our country. Shays' protest was put down forcefully, but it helped lead to the adoption of the United States Constitution, a blueprint for freedom giving each of us the right to help direct the course of our government to fight against injustice, if you will, without having to lead an armed revolution. Our future can be as heroic and as exciting as we will it to be. Each day brings new opportunities for great dreams and great feats. Let's begin now -- united, confident, and determined to get the job done.

Truck and bus safety is important to all Americans. More than 5 million trucks travel more than 135 billion miles each year on our highways transporting raw materials, finished goods, food, and other essential products and services. Buses annually carry millions of Americans to over 10,000 cities and communities. Clearly, the safe maintenance and operation of trucks and buses is vital to the health and safety of all users of our Nation's thoroughfares.

The truck and bus industry is a major employer in our country, essential to the Nation and to the smooth and safe flow of commerce. The safe operation of trucks and buses is of great consequence to the motoring public with which they share the roads. Safety compliance not only saves lives, it is also sound business practice. It reflects well on the industry and enhances profitability.

Ultimately, the most important means to improve safe operation are those activities undertaken by the truck and bus industry itself. Therefore, I challenge each and every person, business, and association involved in the industry to make a commitment to encourage safe truck and bus operations. I am convinced that such an effort will reward everyone. The industry must also inform the public that safety is one of its highest priorities.

January is a particularly appropriate time to direct the Nation's attention to special care in the operation of vehicles on the highways, because of ice and snow conditions in many parts of the country. Observance of this week should help to establish an increased safety consciousness throughout the entire year.

I call upon our State governments to increase their efforts to improve safety compliance, using their own resources as well as funds provided by the Federal government. I call upon industry, labor, and the professional drivers of the country to continue to improve the safe operation of trucks and buses. Very special care must be exercised in seeing to the safe maintenance and operation of trucks carrying extremely hazardous materials.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-fifth day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Mr. Brokaw.  --  -- but seldom have so many people been so interested as they are in this next question. I know you're the representative of all the people, but the time has come, Mr. President, for you to make a choice. Now, who do you like: the Bears or the Patriots?

The President. I worried about that while I was watching the pregame show here and wondered whether I maybe should change into a neutral color. And then I saw a shot of the Chicago Bears, and one of them was wearing a red sweater, and I decided it was all right.

Mr. Brokaw. Super Bowl Sunday has become a kind of undeclared national holiday. Do you think that occasions like this help shape our national character, or are they really just kind of entertaining diversions from things like the deficit and terrorism and Qadhafi and so on?

The President. Well, I think it's typically American that we can have -- or be diverted by things like this from the serious problems, and I think it's part of the American personality. And I know that other countries take athletics seriously, too, but there's something different about it in America. It's so much a part of American life that I think it's a part of our personality.

The President. Well, probably. And I'm pleased that he did remember that much. After 91 years, he's still coaching. So, there've been how many hundreds or thousands of young men have come through the ranks with him. But I remember him very vividly as a coach. He could demonstrate as well as tell you, because he had been a star at Eureka College, a great star himself.

Mr. Brokaw. Now, you were a guard; and Presidents Ford, Nixon, and Kennedy also played in the line. What is there about the line that prepares you for Presidential politics better than the backfield, it appears?

The President. Well, you know, the line certainly feels that those fellows behind them wouldn't be able to do anything if we didn't pave the way for them. But, no, I was a guard; and 3 years of varsity ball at Eureka, I averaged all but 2 minutes of every game.

The President. There were some, but he was as loyal and as principled about football and winning for Rockne. Yes, I knew some of those stories about him. As a matter of fact, I had been trying to write the story, when I got in pictures, with the idea of playing Gipp. And Warner Brothers bought the life story of Knute Rockne, and there it was. But, yes, Gipp was older than the rest of the fellows and totally dedicated to winning and all, but he was a fellow that could almost -- it was like Babe Ruth pointing at the center field fence and then hitting it over that fence -- he could almost do whatever he said he would do. And Mrs. Rockne, who was on the picture with us, told us that he was the only man in all those years that ever really got under Rock's skin to where there was a kind of father-son relationship with him.

Mr. Brokaw. The Oval Office may be the only office in America that doesn't have a betting pool going on the Super Bowl. Someone has estimated that, what, $2 billion may be wagered on this Sunday, most of it illegally. Does that bother you at all -- that there's so much betting on football?

The President. Well, I wish that it could be without, because I think when it gets up to that kind of money, then there is too much temptation to try and fix things. And human nature being what it is, we know from past history that sometimes they get away with that. That was one of Rockne's greatest determinations, was he threw a gambler out of his office one day, bodily, who had come to see him and was seeking some information about who was going to win. And Rock just -- he hated the idea of gambling associated with football.

Mr. Brokaw. Mr. President, football is a metaphor for so many things in American life, including politics. Now, at the end of this game today, one team is going to be in a deficit situation and all those players are going to face a very taxing year in 1986. You're about to deliver the State of the Union Address. Are you going to put the American people through the same experience in 1986 -- a taxing year?

The President. I don't like the use of that word. It might be taxing for me and my energy. But I don't like the idea that someone might hear this and think I'm thinking of taxing them, because I'm not. [Laughter] I don't want any tax increase.

The President. Well, it was our ball back on our own 35-yard line. We were 1 point behind. There were 20 seconds to play, but we thought the ref had said 2 minutes. And Bud, our quarterback, called an off-tackle run with himself carrying the ball. As a running guard, I came out and led the interference. And the key to the play was me getting that first man on the secondary; I missed him. But Bud cut back to the sideline, went 65 yards for the touchdown, and we won the game. Now, that stuck with me. I never could figure out: How did he do it with me missing that block?

And the very next season, when I was auditioned to become a sports announcer, and they told me to stand in front of the microphone and imagine a football game and describe it on radio. So I did, and I chose that game because I knew enough of the players' names that I could get by and so forth. And I thought, ``I won't start with the kickoff or anything. I'll start in the fourth quarter.'' I had the chill wind coming in through the end of the stadium. We didn't have stadiums; we had bleachers. But anyway, I did all those things; and then I called that play. And this time I nailed that man in the secondary. [Laughter] I claim this is the first instant replay. Only it wasn't instant; it was a year later. But, no, it was a beautiful, earth-shaking block.

I don't know how long you've been in here, but if you've been in here since before it was snowing, I can tell you it's snowing outside now. [Laughter] They don't have that in California. Well, good morning, and welcome to the White House complex. I'm glad that you could come by to see us and hear our views on the issues that will shape the budget debate in 1986.

The Federal deficit is among the last major obstacles, I think, blocking America's path to literally permanent prosperity. In these past 5 years, we've cut tax rates by nearly 25 percent and then indexed the brackets to protect people from being bumped by inflation up into higher brackets. We've seen inflation itself drop by two-thirds, interest rates tumble by more than half, and we've seen more than 9 million Americans find jobs during 3 straight years of economic growth.

Americans are believers again. But there's one area where no one believes the Federal Government is doing a good enough job, and that is getting Federal spending under control. Even though tax revenues have been growing, spending has been shooting up even faster. And so the Congress passed the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings amendment that mandates steadily declining deficits until we reach a balanced budget in fiscal year 1991. And I want you to know that the budget we submit in a week will meet the deficit target set by that legislation; and it will do so while protecting Social Security and the safety net -- the safety net is the term, you know, in 1981 that we used to talk about those programs to help the truly needy -- and it will go forward with the bare minimum that we need in defense spending growth and without increasing taxes.

But now let me address another issue: defense. I know that there are some who claim that we're spending too much on defense, that defense is somehow being allowed to escape the harsh scrutiny of the budget process. Well, forgive me, but the modest defense growth we're calling for already represents a major compromise with the Congress. Indeed, while doing our best to improve the Nation's defenses, we've compromised with the Congress and given in on every defense budget since September 1981. And we've compromised so much that this year, for the first time in more than 10 years, the defense budget has actually fallen below what it was the year before. But by far the most important point is this: Of all the items in the budget, defense is the only one which must be decided with reference not only to American policy but to the policies of foreign powers who might attempt to terrorize, intimidate, or threaten us and our allies. It's more or less dictated by what someone in some other country is doing.

While our defense fell into disrepair during the 1970's, the Soviets raced ahead with the biggest military buildup in history. And that buildup continues. I had the pleasure when Mr. Gorbachev brought up the point of our military buildup to me -- as if it was somehow aimed at them -- when he finished saying that, I had the pleasure of saying, ``Mr. General Secretary, we're still playing catchup with you.'' And he changed the subject. [Laughter] But the Soviets are engaged in space research, are constantly adding to their nuclear arsenal, and are tirelessly building up their conventional armed forces, especially their navy. To cut the defense budget now any more than we have would put at risk the developing nations of the Third World, including growing democracies like El Salvador and Ecuador, and would endanger the defense of Western Europe. It would cripple our hopes for successful arms talks with the Soviets, and we can't permit this.

Now, of course, there are some in this town who will underestimate this budget and my intention to support it, and that's all right. I got used to being underestimated all the way back in 1966 when I first ran for Governor of California. I was under contract for 13 years to Warner Brothers Studio. And Jack Warner, the head of Warner Brothers, when he heard about the fact that I was in a campaign for Governor, he said, ``No, no. Jimmy Stewart for Governor; Ronald Reagan for best friend.'' [Laughter] Well, the doubters had better really get ready, because we intend to get that budget passed and build a prosperity that will last for all the American people.

The first step to cutting the Federal deficit is cutting the hot partisan rhetoric. If we work together, the American people will be winners because controlling spending will increase economic growth. There's no question that Gramm-Rudman-Hollings is going to demand some hard choices, but I'm confident that our budget makes the right choices and that it deserves your support. So, please, let your voices be heard -- both at home with your neighbors and your friends -- because I found out a great many people just don't understand how ``Mickey Mouse'' the budgeting system in Washington really is. It's confusing. So, tell them, but also let your voice be heard right here in Washington. I've said many times, over and over again, up on Capitol Hill: ``It isn't necessary to make them see the light, just feel the heat.'' [Laughter] If you make your voices heard, Capitol Hill will get the right idea. I thank you all for the support that you've already given us. Together we're participating in history, shaping America's future.

The budget battle promises to be long and hard, but the rewards will be great. For once we bring deficit spending to an end, our nation will enter an era of unparalleled opportunity and growth. And once we, through Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, reach that point where the budget is balanced, then we must have an amendment that says from then on the Federal Government's budget will have to be balanced. And when that happens, I'm going to go right down there to the Jefferson Memorial and see if he's smiling -- [laughter] -- because he's the first fellow in our nation's history that called for that. When they were ratifying the Constitution, Thomas Jefferson said it has one glaring omission: It has no proviso prohibiting the Federal Government from borrowing money. Well, it's about time we caught up to Thomas Jefferson and made that a fact of life.

The President. Well, I'm sure we all realize there's a little change in the procedures. I'd looked forward to coming in here and having a little session with you and some briefing, all very carefully sequestered until 9 o'clock tonight on the State of the Union. But in view of the tragedy that has befallen us, I don't think we'll do that. I know that you're interested in keeping up with this, as I am also, to find out the extent of it and what has taken place. So, I just wanted to say hello and appreciate your coming here and maybe we can do the other thing another time.

The President. Well, what can you say? It's a horrible thing that all of us have witnessed it and actually seen it take place. And I just can't rid myself of the thought of the sacrifice and the families that have been watching this also, the families of those people on board and what they must be going through at this point. I'm sure all of America is more than saddened, feels the great weight of this, and wishes, as I do, that there was something we could do to make it easier for those who've suffered such a loss.

The President. Well, I'm not a scientist. I do have confidence in the people that have been running this program. And this is the first in, what is it, 56-some flights that something of this kind has happened. I certainly want everything done that can be done to find out how this could have happened and to ensure against its happening again. But there again, I have to say I'm sure that the people that have to do with this program are determined to do that right now. And I'm quite sure, also, when you look at the safety measures that sometimes those of us looking on have gotten a little impatient with when flights have been aborted, and it hasn't seemed as if the situation -- well, it seems as if they were taking things too seriously. Now we know they weren't. And so, I'm confident that there will be no flight until they are absolutely as certain as a human being can be that it is safe.

The President. Well, they're all citizens, and I don't think anyone's ever been on there that isn't a volunteer. I know I've heard many times from other people that have tried to give me reasons why they, or someone like them, should be included in flights of this kind. So, no, that is the last frontier and the most important frontier. We have to say that the space program has been most successful, most effective. And I guess we've been so confident of it that it comes as such a tremendous shock when something of this kind happens.

The President. I shouldn't think so, and I would certainly do everything I could to express an opinion the other way. You know, we have accidents in every line of transportation, and we don't do away with those things. They've probably got a better safety record than we have out on the highways.

The President. We were all sitting in there, and I was preparing myself for your questions on the State of the Union Address when the Vice President and [Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs] John Poindexter came into the room. And all they could say at the time was that they had received a flash that the space shuttle had exploded. And we immediately went into the adjoining room where I have a TV set to get on this, because there was no direct word except that word that had been made public also. And there we saw the replaying and saw the thing actually happen. And it just was, as I say, a very traumatic experience.

The President. Yes, I'm sure it does. And certainly there could be no speech without mentioning this. But you can't stop governing the Nation because of a tragedy of this kind. So, yes, we'll continue.

Q. Philosophically, do you take some solace in the fact that over the years the American space program has been remarkably safe, that we've not lost as many people as we've been led to believe have been lost in the Soviet Union?

The President. Well, I think we've all had a great pride in that. And it is a kind of, well, at least something to cling to right now, although it doesn't lessen our grief at what has just taken place.

Q. Mr. President, the sending of civilians in space was based on the assumption that it was routine to go into space, that it was now safe, even a teacher we could send up. Do you think that notion is now gone?

Q.  --  -- so many children have, you know, been a part of this particular space shuttle because of the teacher, and they're doing classrooms. Can you say something that would help them to understand how this happened?

The President. I think people closer to them have got to be doing that. But as I say, the world is a hazardous place, always has been. In pioneering we've always known that there are pioneers that give their lives out there on the frontier. And now this has happened. It probably is more of a shock to all of us because of the fact that we see it happen now and -- thanks to the media -- not just hearing about it as if something that happened miles away. But I think those that have to do with them must, at the same time, make it plain to them that life does go on and you don't back up and quit some worthwhile endeavor because of tragedy.

The President. I can't get out of my mind her husband and her children. But then that's true of the families of the others. Theirs probably more so because the families of the others had been a part of this whole program and knew that they were in a hazardous occupation. But knowing that they were there and watching, this just is -- well, your heart goes out to them.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-eighth day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

The President. I am pleased to make an announcement today with regard to the Department of Agriculture -- that our Secretary of Agriculture is going to be Dick Lyng, who, 19 years ago, came to work for me when I was Governor of California. He served as the director of agriculture there in the cabinet. He also has a background in the field of agriculture -- a very sound one. And then, here, he has served as Deputy Secretary of Agriculture. And so, I have asked him to now serve as the Secretary of Agriculture, and he has agreed.

We have a farm problem. We think the new program that has been passed and the measures that are going to be taken in farm credit are going to help get farming back more into the market economy than it has been and rectifies some of the things that have been wrong with regard to government's imposition on agriculture. And I have every confidence that the farmers are going to have a sound and solid friend in the Secretary of Agriculture, Dick Lyng.

Cardiovascular diseases, which include heart disease, stroke, and other vascular disorders, account for almost as many deaths in this Nation as all other causes combined. In fact, almost one out of every two deaths can be attributed to cardiovascular disease. As recently as 1983, heart and blood vessel diseases killed nearly one million Americans -- more people than cancer, accidents, pneumonia, and influenza combined. Even more tragic is the fact that one-fifth of all people killed by cardiovascular diseases are younger than 65.

Heart and blood vessel diseases are not only deadly -- they are pervasive. More than one-fourth of the current U.S. population, or more than 63 million of our citizens, suffer from some form of these diseases. Their toll in human suffering can never be calculated.

The economic loss to the Nation is also high. Some $78.6 billion will be spent in 1986 for physician and nursing services, hospital and nursing home care, medications, and in lost productivity due to disability related to these maladies.

But progress is being made. The American Heart Association, a not-for-profit volunteer health agency, and the Federal government, through the National Heart, Lung and Blood Institute, have combined forces since 1948 to find better ways both to treat and prevent cardiovascular diseases and to educate the medical community about the most effective techniques.

Doctors are seeking to reduce the risk of heart disease, stroke, and atherosclerosis (hardening of the arteries) in their patients by encouraging them to lower their blood pressure, stop smoking, and reduce the amount of cholesterol and saturated fats in their diets. The American Heart Association has contributed to this effort by its continued support of research and its commitment to educating Americans about the need to adopt healthful habits of living.

The Federal government, meanwhile, continues to support a large array of cardiovascular research projects. It also encourages all Americans to take responsibility for their own well-being by maintaining good health habits.

One hundred fifty years ago, in 1836, what is now the largest and most distinguished medical library and medical communications center in the world was only a small collection of medical books in the office of the United States Army Surgeon General. That transition is an inspiring story -- one that speaks of both the need of health professionals and researchers for rapid access to information and of the response to that need by a succession of dedicated and visionary leaders of the National Library of Medicine.

The National Library of Medicine responded to the need for medical information in part by building an exhaustive collection of the published literature of medicine. Through pioneering research into the latest communications technology, the Library also developed the renowned MEDLARS systems, which provides researchers and health professionals around the world with almost instantaneous access to the biomedical literature. Its publications, like Index Medicus, are essential tools for health sciences research. The Library has developed a network throughout the United States -- the Regional Medical Library Network -- to provide efficient information services to doctors, researchers, students and others, no matter how far they may be from a medical center.

American citizens, for whom the health of their loved ones is always of primary concern, can take great pride in their National Library of Medicine, which takes life-giving knowledge from research, organizes it, and transmits it to those who can best use it to fight disease and disability and to improve the quality of life for all of us.

A special election for President and Vice President will take place in the Philippines on February 7. This election is of great importance to the future of democracy in the Philippines, a major friend and ally of the United States in the Pacific. It comes at a time when the Philippines is struggling with the urgent need to reestablish a political consensus, restructure the economy, and rebuild a sense of military professionalism.

President Marcos has invited the United States to send observers to the election. Because of our respect for the Philippines and our commitment to the sovereign will of a democratic people as expressed through the electoral process, I have decided to send a delegation of official U.S. observers to the Philippines for the election. I would like the delegation to be composed of Members of the Congress from both parties and of distinguished Americans from the private sector. I also note that the party institutes of both the Republican and Democratic Parties have jointly decided to sponsor an international observer delegation for the election in the Philippines. I am confident that both of these efforts will make a significant contribution to this important event.

The United States left a legacy of democratic institutions in the Philippines earlier in this century. Filipinos believe in elections, as long as they are fair, to resolve their political differences. To safeguard the process, the National Citizens' Movement for Free Elections, or NAMFREL as it is called, will field hundreds of thousands of citizen election observers on February 7. Such citizen participation makes Americans proud to have the Republic of the Philippines as a friend and ally.

A free and fair election, if also followed by a genuine reform effort in the economic and security areas, will assist the Philippines along a path of growth, prosperity, and stability that will benefit the entire region. The Communist Party of the Philippines, through its military arm, the New People's Army, and its front organization, the National Democratic Front, is pursuing a classic military and political strategy intended to lead eventually to a totalitarian takeover of the Philippines. The Communist strategy can be defeated, but defeating it will require listening to and respecting the sovereign voice of the people.

I believe this is an important time for America to respond to the problems of a friend and ally at a critical juncture in its history. If the will of the Filipino people is expressed in an election that Filipinos accept as credible, and if whoever is elected undertakes fundamental economic, political, and military reforms, we should consider, in consultation with the Congress, a significantly larger program of economic and military assistance for the Philippines for the next 5 years. This would be over and above the current levels of assistance we are providing.

And in some closed societies, a tragedy of this sort would be permanently disheartening, a fatal setback to any such program, followed not by mourning and national recommitment, but by attempts to evade responsibility. Well, not so in a democracy, and not so in America. John Glenn said the other day that after the pad fire that killed three astronauts in 1967, support for the space program skyrocketed among the American people. And that's because here the Government does not rule the people; it is the people. And ultimately what happens to programs of this sort, and what follows tragedies of this kind, are decisions that belong not to government but to the people. The tragedy of the Shuttle Seven will only serve to strengthen the resolve of America to pursue their dream of ``the stars and beyond.'' And anyone who doubts this does not know the history of our land, the wonder of America and her free people, or the meaning of the words ``the right stuff.'' You know, I called the families yesterday of those seven heroes. Every one of them concluded the remarks between us by saying, ``The program must continue; they would have wanted it that way.'' And it will.

Well, I'm delighted to be here tonight. And I want to extend my heartfelt thanks to the American Conservative Union, along with Human Events, National Review, and Young Americans for Freedom, for putting on this conference and for extending this invitation. Tonight my thoughts cannot help but drift back to another conservative audience of more than 20 years ago and a Presidential campaign that the pundits and opinionmakers said then was the death knell for our movement. But just as the opinion leaders had been stunned by Barry Goldwater's nomination, so too they would be shocked by the resiliency of his cause and the political drama to unfold around it: the rise of the New Right and the religious revival of the midseventies and the final, triumphant march to Washington in 1980 by conservatives.

Well, something has happened in America. In 5 short years, we have seen the kind of political change rarely seen in a generation on nearly every issue: Federal spending, tax cuts, deregulation, the fight against career criminals and for tough judges, military readiness, resistance to Soviet expansionism, and the need for candor about the struggle between freedom and totalitarianism. The old taboos and superstitions of liberalism have collapsed and all but blown away, to be replaced by a robust and enlightened conservatism, a conservatism that brings with it economic prosperity, personal opportunity, and a shining hope that someday all the peoples of the world -- from Afghanistan to Nicaragua to Poland and, yes, to Angola -- will know the blessings of liberty and live in the light of freedom.

Those in this room know how often we were told the odds of accomplishing even a small part of this were all against us. I remember my own first visit up to the Hill after the 1980 election, when issues like the tax cuts came up. I met a Congressman [Thomas P. O'Neill, Jr.] there. He was a kind of a big fellow, as I recall -- [laughter] -- had lots of white hair. [Laughter] He was from the Boston area, I think. [Laughter] Maybe you know him. He smiled very indulgently and told me not to expect too much because I was, to use his words, ``in the big leagues now.'' [Laughter] But you know, as a conservative, I had an advantage. Back in the hard years, the lean years, when we were forming our political PAC's, sending out our fundraising letters, and working for candidate after candidate in campaign after campaign, all of us learned something vital, something important about our country. Something became an article of faith, a faith that sustained us through all the setbacks and the heartache.

You see, we knew then what we know now: that the real big leaguers aren't here in Washington at all; they're out there in the heartland, out in the real America, where folks go to work every day and church every week, where they raise their families and help their neighbors, where they build America and increase her bounty and pass on to each succeeding generation her goodness and splendor. And we knew something else, too: that the folks out there in real America pretty much see things our way and that all we ever have to do to get them involved is be brave enough to trust them with the truth and bold enough to ask for their help. And it's here we find the explanation for the success of the last 5 years, the reason why on issue after issue the liberals in this town have lost and are still losing: They've forgotten who's in charge, who the big leaguers really are.

But I come here tonight not just to celebrate these successes of our past but also to strike a serious, even somber, note to remind each of you not only of how far we have come together but how tragic it would be if we suddenly cast aside in a moment of dreadful folly all our hopes for a safe America and a freer world. My fellow conservatives, I want to speak to you tonight about our movement and a great danger that lies ahead. Now, some of you may think I'm reacting here to claims that 1985 was a disappointing or, at best, a mediocre year for conservatives. In fact, I want to take sharp issue with this, suggest to you that those claims themselves are evidence of the broader problem I'm talking about: the danger of growing soft with victory, of losing perspective when things go our way too often, of failing to appreciate success when it occurs or seeing danger when it looms.

First, let's talk about 1985 and three legislative victories whose strategic significance were both enormous and largely overlooked. Now, some of you who go back with me to that campaign in 1964 can remember how easily the liberals dismissed our warnings then about the dangers of deficit spending. We were told it would bring prosperity. Others of you know how passionately the liberals believed in the use of high and punitive tax rates to redistribute income. And finally, all of us can remember how liberals found in the post-Vietnam syndrome a form of religious exercise, a kind of spiritual ecstasy, however much that syndrome paralyzed American foreign policy and jeopardized freedom.

But consider 1985. We saw a de facto balanced budget amendment passed by both Houses of the Congress. We saw a House of Representatives under liberal leadership agree to cut the top marginal tax rate to the 35- to 38-percent range. And we even saw that same House not only approve funds for an insurgency against a Communist government but spontaneously repeal that symbol of liberal isolationism, the Clark amendment. So, friends and neighbors, salute Halley's comet. Salute that space shot to ``U-ra-nus'' -- I'm too old-fashioned to call it ``Ur-a-nus.'' [Laughter] I just remember politics in 1985 was also a celestial phenomenon, Steven Spielberg all the way. Actually, the remarkable year of 1985 at home was a reflection of a broader, even brighter strategic picture. In Europe and Asia, statism and socialism are dying and the free market is growing; and all across the world, the march of democracy continues.

Yet, even as I think the tide of history is all but irreversibly turned our way and this strategic picture will continue to improve, we must guard at all costs against an unnecessary but costly tactical defeat ahead. I'm talking, of course, about the election in November. Now, this isn't going to happen as long as we conservatives will shoulder the burden of our recent successes, if we'll realize how much is at stake this November, forget for the moment the flowers and the sunshine, and summon once again those deep reserves of will and stamina that won for us our first victories. And bear in mind, this will require a supreme effort; our job is going to be even tougher this year. The very years of prosperity and peace that conservative programs have given America may in a strange way actually help those who fought the hardest against them. Good times, after all, tend to favor incumbents and fortify the status quo. Yet you and I know how unacceptable that status quo is, how much -- on everything from right to life, prayer in the public schools, enterprise zones, aid to anti-Communist insurgents -- still waits to be done. So, we must go to the record, get the facts to the American people.

The Speaker of the House has already indicated a tax increase is the solution to our problems, and recently another important member of the House leadership echoed his sentiments. Not much has changed on Federal spending, either. Sure, the liberals are angry about Gramm-Rudman, but they aren't looking realistically at our bloated expenditures, only talking nonsense about shutting down the FBI and the IRS -- though I do admit that in mentioning that last point they may be tempting me beyond my strength. And as for defense, let me assure you the liberals haven't changed a bit; they're still looking at America's defense budget with lust in their hearts. [Laughter] A lust to strip it bare and use the funds for more of their social experiments.

Yes, this year we have to work even harder at summoning the vigor to tell the American people the truth and the vigor to ask their help, to remind them that what they do this November will decide whether the days of high taxes and higher spending, the days of economic stagnation and skyrocketing inflation, the days of national malaise and international humiliation, the days of ``Blame America First'' and ``inordinate fear of communism,'' will all come roaring back at us once again. More than that, we must tell the American people that the progress that we've made thus far is not enough, that it'll never be enough until the conservative agenda is enacted -- and that means enterprise zones, prayer in the public schools, and protection of the unborn.

And that's why, my fellow conservatives, we have to stop limiting ourselves to talking about holding on to our strength in the Senate and start talking about conservative control of the House of Representatives. That House has been in the hands of our opponents for virtually half a century. Never forget that for those nearly 50 years the liberals had it all their own way in this city and that the loss of such great power is rarely accompanied with graceful acquiescence. Well, the liberals are feeling pretty sorry for themselves, and that's why they're anxious about this election. They know that unless they deliver a telling blow this year to conservatism, the 1988 Conservative Political Action Conference will see major Presidential candidates from both parties demanding a chance to appear here and claim the mantle of conservatism.

So this is our break point; our opponents are pulling out all the stops. And you know, I think it's going to be worthwhile reminding the American people of how desperate the liberals are, how so much of their strength in the House of Representatives, as many as 18 to 23 seats, is due to gerrymandering on a scale unprecedented in modern history. And this is not to mention the outrageous episode in which a legitimately elected Member of the Congress and the people of Indiana's eighth district were disenfranchised in the House of Representatives.

But there's another issue that I also believe vividly illustrates how seriously out of touch the liberals are with the American people. We sometimes forget that no one is more realistic about the nature of the threat to our freedom than the American people themselves. In fact, their intuitive realism is why that bear in the woods ad some of you can remember from the 1984 campaign was so successful. Yes, the American people want an administration that pursues every path to peace, but they also want an administration that is realistic about Soviet expansionism, committed to resisting it, and determined to advance the cause of freedom around the world.

I remember a little booklet that came out a few years back. Although it was by the Republican Study Committee and entitled ``What's the Matter with Democratic Foreign Policy,'' it was really about a shrinking group of foreign policy liberals here in Washington. And I just think that if we were able to get some of those choice quotations on issues like Vietnam, Grenada, and Central America before the American people and they were able to see what the Washington liberals really believe about foreign policy, the naivete and confusion of mind, I believe we would shock the American people into repudiating these views once and for all.

And let me interject here two points that I think can be important this year. First, the question of defense spending. During the last few weeks, there've been a number of columns, editorials, or speeches calling for a slash in the military budget and quoting President Eisenhower as justification. President Eisenhower did warn about large concentrations of power like the military-industrial complex, but what's being left out is the context of that quote. In his farewell address to the American people, yes, he did warn us about the danger of an all-powerful military-industrial complex, but he also reminded us America must always be vigilant because ``We face a hostile ideology -- global in scope, atheistic in character, ruthless in purpose, and insidious in method.'' The pundits haven't been quoting that part of his speech.

In the history of revolutionary struggles or movements for true national liberation, there is often a victory like this that electrifies the world and brings great sympathy and assistance from other nations to those struggling for freedom. Past American Presidents, past American Congresses, and always, of course, the American people have offered help to others fighting in the freedom cause that we began. So, tonight, each of us joins in saluting the heroes of the Lomba River and their leader, the hope of Angola, Jonas Savimbi.

So, let me urge you all to return to your organizations and communities and to tell your volunteers and your contributors that the President said that they're needed now as never before, that the crucial hour is approaching, that the choice before the American people this year is of overwhelming importance: whether to hand the government back to the liberals or move forward with the conservative agenda into the 1990's.

You know, recently Nancy and I saw together a moving new film, the story of ``Eleni.'' It's a true story. A woman at the end of World War II, caught in the Greek civil war, a mother who, because she smuggled her children out to safety, eventually to America, was tried, tortured, and shot by the Greek Communists. It is also the story of her son, Nicholas Gage, who grew up to become an investigative reporter with the New York Times and who, when he returned to Greece, secretly vowed to take vengeance on the man who had sent his mother to her death. But at the dramatic end of the story, Nick Gage finds he cannot extract the vengeance he has promised himself. To do so, Mr. Gage writes, would have relieved the pain that had filled him for so many years, but it would also have broken the one bridge still connecting him to his mother and the part of him most like her. As he tells it: ``. . . her final cry, before the bullets of the firing squad tore into her, was not a curse on her killers but an invocation of what she died for, a declaration'' -- how that cry was echoed across the centuries, her cry was a cry of love -- ```My children!''' A cry for all the children of the world, a hope that all of them may someday live in peace and freedom.

Some 20 years ago I told my fellow conservatives that ``You and I have a rendezvous with destiny.'' And tonight that rendezvous is upon us. Our destiny is now. Our cause is still, as it was then, the cause of human freedom. Let us be proud that we serve together, and brave in our resolve to push on now toward that final victory so long sought by the heroes of our past and present and now so near at hand.

We come together today to mourn the loss of seven brave Americans, to share the grief that we all feel, and, perhaps in that sharing, to find the strength to bear our sorrow and the courage to look for the seeds of hope. Our nation's loss is first a profound personal loss to the family and the friends and the loved ones of our shuttle astronauts. To those they left behind -- the mothers, the fathers, the husbands and wives, brothers and sisters, yes, and especially the children -- all of America stands beside you in your time of sorrow.

What we say today is only an inadequate expression of what we carry in our hearts. Words pale in the shadow of grief; they seem insufficient even to measure the brave sacrifice of those you loved and we so admired. Their truest testimony will not be in the words we speak, but in the way they led their lives and in the way they lost their lives -- with dedication, honor, and an unquenchable desire to explore this mysterious and beautiful universe.

The best we can do is remember our seven astronauts, our Challenger Seven, remember them as they lived, bringing life and love and joy to those who knew them and pride to a nation. They came from all parts of this great country -- from South Carolina to Washington State; Ohio to Mohawk, New York; Hawaii to North Carolina to Concord, New Hampshire. They were so different; yet in their mission, their quest, they held so much in common.

We remember Dick Scobee, the commander who spoke the last words we heard from the space shuttle Challenger. He served as a fighter pilot in Vietnam earning many medals for bravery and later as a test pilot of advanced aircraft before joining the space program. Danger was a familiar companion to Commander Scobee.

We remember Michael Smith, who earned enough medals as a combat pilot to cover his chest, including the Navy Distinguished Flying Cross, three Air Medals, and the Vietnamese Cross of Gallantry with Silver Star in gratitude from a nation he fought to keep free.

We remember Ellison Onizuka, who as a child running barefoot through the coffee fields and macadamia groves of Hawaii dreamed of someday traveling to the Moon. Being an Eagle Scout, he said, had helped him soar to the impressive achievements of his career.

We remember Ronald McNair, who said that he learned perseverance in the cotton fields of South Carolina. His dream was to live aboard the space station, performing experiments and playing his saxophone in the weightlessness of space. Well, Ron, we will miss your saxophone; and we will build your space station.

We remember Christa McAuliffe, who captured the imagination of the entire Nation; inspiring us with her pluck, her restless spirit of discovery; a teacher, not just to her students but to an entire people, instilling us all with the excitement of this journey we ride into the future.

We will always remember them, these skilled professionals, scientists, and adventurers, these artists and teachers and family men and women; and we will cherish each of their stories, stories of triumph and bravery, stories of true American heroes. On the day of the disaster, our nation held a vigil by our television sets. In one cruel moment our exhilaration turned to horror; we waited and watched and tried to make sense of what we had seen. That night I listened to a call-in program on the radio; people of every age spoke of their sadness and the pride they felt in our astronauts.

Across America we are reaching out, holding hands, and finding comfort in one another. The sacrifice of your loved ones has stirred the soul of our nation and through the pain our hearts have been opened to a profound truth: The future is not free; the story of all human progress is one of a struggle against all odds. We learned again that this America, which Abraham Lincoln called the last, best hope of man on Earth, was built on heroism and noble sacrifice. It was built by men and women like our seven star voyagers, who answered a call beyond duty, who gave more than was expected or required, and who gave it little thought to worldly reward.

We think back to the pioneers of an earlier century, the sturdy souls who took their families and their belongings and set out into the frontier of the American West. Often they met with terrible hardship. Along the Oregon Trail, you could still see the grave markers of those who fell on the way, but grief only steeled them to the journey ahead. Today the frontier is space and the boundaries of human knowledge. Sometimes when we reach for the stars, we fall short. But we must pick ourselves up again and press on despite the pain. Our nation is indeed fortunate that we can still draw on immense reservoirs of courage, character, and fortitude; that we're still blessed with heroes like those of the space shuttle Challenger.

Dick Scobee knew that every launching of a space shuttle is a technological miracle. And he said, ``If something ever does go wrong, I hope that doesn't mean the end to the space shuttle program.'' Every family member I talked to asked specifically that we continue the program, that that is what their departed loved one would want above all else. We will not disappoint them. Today we promise Dick Scobee and his crew that their dream lives on, that the future they worked so hard to build will become reality. The dedicated men and women of NASA have lost seven members of their family. Still, they, too, must forge ahead with a space program that is effective, safe, and efficient, but bold and committed. Man will continue his conquest of space. To reach out for new goals and ever greater achievements -- that is the way we shall commemorate our seven Challenger heroes.

Dick, Mike, Judy, El, Ron, Greg, and Christa -- your families and your country mourn your passing. We bid you goodbye; we will never forget you. For those who knew you well and loved you, the pain will be deep and enduring. A nation, too, will long feel the loss of her seven sons and daughters, her seven good friends. We can find consolation only in faith, for we know in our hearts that you who flew so high and so proud now make your home beyond the stars, safe in God's promise of eternal life.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirty-first day of January in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

I am pleased to transmit this report on the adherence of the United States to obligations undertaken in arms control agreements and on problems related to compliance by other nations with the provisions of bilateral and multilateral arms control agreements to which the United States is a party.

In previous reports to the Congress, the United States has made clear its concerns about Soviet noncompliance. The United States Government takes equally seriously its own commitments to arms control agreements and sets rigid standards and procedures for assuring that it meets its obligations. The United States has been and remains in compliance with all treaty obligations and political commitments.

This report is unclassified and suitable for general release. However, a classified attachment, providing information on noncompliance by other nations with provisions of multilateral arms control agreements, is being provided under separate cover.

This 1985 annual report, the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency's 25th consecutive report, provides an in-depth survey of all of the work undertaken during the year in support of negotiating agreements to reduce the number of nuclear weapons, to abolish chemical weapons, to reduce the numbers of U.S. and Soviet troops in Central Europe, to seek correction for Soviet noncompliance with existing arms control agreements, and to continue efforts to enhance peace and security and make possible the reduction of military spending worldwide.

Second, under the terms of section 504(c)(3) of the Act, I am hereby waiving the application of section 504(c) with respect to particular eligible articles from specified beneficiary developing countries. I have received the advice of the United States International Trade Commission as to any industries in the United States which would likely be adversely affected by such waivers, and I have determined, based on that advice and on the considerations described in sections 501 and 502(c) of the Act, that such waivers are in the national economic interest of the United States. The countries to be afforded such waivers for particular eligible articles are enumerated in Annex B opposite the TSUS items applicable to each article.

Finally, after considering various private sector requests for review concerning worker rights in certain beneficiary developing countries, and in accordance with section 502(b)(8) of the Act, I have determined that the following beneficiary developing countries have taken or are taking steps to afford internationally recognized worker rights (as defined in section 502(a)(4) of the Act): Guatemala, Haiti, the Republic of Korea, the Philippines, Suriname, Taiwan, and Zaire. However, I have determined that Romania, Paraguay, and Nicaragua, previously designated as beneficiary developing countries, are not taking steps to afford such internationally recognized worker rights. Therefore, I intend to notify the Congress of the United States of my intention to remove Romania and Nicaragua from the list of designated beneficiary developing countries for purposes of the GSP, and to suspend the GSP eligibility of Paraguay. Finally, I am continuing to review the status of such worker rights in another beneficiary developing country, Chile.

I am writing to inform you of my intent to withdraw Romania and Nicaragua and suspend Paraguay from the list of beneficiary developing countries under the Generalized System of Preferences (GSP) effective 60 days after the date of this letter. This action is being taken in accordance with Title V of the Trade Act of 1974 (the Act), as amended.

Sections 502(b) and 504(b) of the Act require that the President withdraw or suspend from the list of GSP eligible countries any country that he has determined is not taking steps to afford its workers internationally recognized worker rights. After careful review, I have determined that Romania, Nicaragua, and Paraguay are not taking steps to afford their workers internationally recognized worker rights.

Now that the new year is here and the holidays are just about over, Nancy and I, like you, are getting ready to return to work; and for me that means that in just a few days I'll be sending Congress my proposal for next year's Federal budget. You know, when you look at a budget, all you see are long rows of numbers. They go on for pages, and they're not very exciting. But those numbers always add up to something, and it's not just a surplus or a deficit. No, it's also a plan, a hope, a vision of what America is and of where America is going.

Six years ago we began our country on the path to greater growth and opportunity. We said it was time to put the days of tax and spend in the past and trust less in government and more in America's families, communities, and values. Some called the values we talked about radical and even revolutionary. Well, you know, I had to smile when they called it the Reagan revolution, because, yes, those values may have been revolutionary, but they were from a revolution much older than me -- the revolution that started with the Declaration of Independence and the Constitution, the revolution continued by every American who ever plowed the land or worked in a factory, an office, or a store, or built a business or stayed home and built a family.

Those have been the values that shaped this budget as well. What are they? Well, one is that government shouldn't tax away a man or woman's incentives to work, save, and invest, and that taxes should begin only after a family has earned enough to live on. That's why this is a ``no-tax-increase'' budget. Last year America pushed aside the special interests and passed a tax reform bill that was prosavings, proinvestment, profamily. By next year, as a result of tax reform, the top tax rate will be 28 percent; the standard deduction and personal exemptions for your family will have gone up by 60 percent; and most families will pay a rate of no more than 15 percent. But now some in Congress are saying they'd like to take part of this away, even before it goes into effect. They'd rather raise your taxes than cut their spending. Well, not if I have anything to say about it.

This budget cuts spending and leaves your family's paycheck alone, and that's another important value. Like your family, the Federal Government should live within its means. This year we're taking an historic step toward that goal, because the Federal Government is doing less real spending than last year, something that hasn't happened since 1973. That's right -- not in almost 14 years. And with the coming year's budget, we plan to make it 2 years in a row. By the way, Congress wouldn't have achieved these spending cuts without the discipline of the Gramm-Rudman law. That's why those who say do away with Gramm-Rudman are just plain wrong. Gramm-Rudman has begun to put the monster of big spending into a cage, and we won't let that monster out.

The budget I'm proposing will meet the Gramm-Rudman target. It will bring the Federal deficit within the range of our normal peacetime experience, and it will do this without shortchanging important commitments. We will spend more than ever for America's elderly, for law and drug enforcement, for AIDS research, for health care, and for air traffic safety. And in one vital area, defense, we'll be stopping a dangerous slide. For the last 2 years defense spending, after inflation, has dropped, even while our adversaries spent more. To let this decline continue would endanger every family in America and world peace as well. With this budget, we'll give defense a modest but important boost, the minimum I believe is necessary to ensure America's peace and security. But while we'll be spending more in many areas, we'll also be looking at the invoices more carefully than ever. In defense, in health care, and many areas, we've asked: Are we getting what we think we're paying for? And where the answer is no, we plan to make changes, and those changes are reflected in this budget.

All of this will require the help of Congress. That's why I was disappointed to hear that the new Democratic leadership had declared that their first priority is to pass the budget-busting clean water bill that I vetoed last year. Well, now, I'm in favor of clean water, but the only thing clean in this bill is its name. It spends billions more than is needed. If the Democratic leadership decides to push this bill, they'll be sending a clear signal that they've sided with those who want to raise your taxes and take the lid off spending. I am willing to work with congressional leaders for a reasonable bill. But I have a special message to the new Congress: You can't have it both ways. You cannot decry deficits and then pass budget-busting legislation. The American people expect us to work together to eliminate the deficit. I remain ready to do so.

The current economic expansion, now in its 50th month, is already one of the longest of the postwar era and shows promise of continuing to record length. This has not been due simply to chance -- it is the result of successful policies adopted during the past 6 years. Disposable personal income is at an all-time high and is still rising; total production and living standards are both increasing; employment gains have been excellent. Inflation, which raged at double-digit rates in 1980, has been reduced dramatically. Defense capabilities, which had been dangerously weakened during the 1970's, have been substantially rebuilt, restoring a more adequate level of national security. An insupportable growth in tax burdens and Federal regulations has been halted, an intolerably complex and inequitable income tax structure has been radically reformed, and the largest management improvement program ever attempted is in full swing in all major Federal agencies. It has been a good 6 years.

In the past 4 years 12.4 million new jobs have been created, while the total unemployment rate has fallen by 3.7 percentage points. By comparison, jobs in other developed countries have not grown significantly, and unemployment rates have remained high.

Inflation, which averaged 10.3 percent a year during the 4 years before I came to office, has averaged less than a third of that during the last 4 years -- 3.0 percent; inflation in 1986, at about 1 percent, was at its lowest rate in over two decades.

Between 1981 and 1986, numerous changes in the tax code, including a complete overhaul last year, have simplified reporting, made the tax law more equitable, and significantly lowered tax rates for individuals and corporations. Six million low-income taxpayers are being removed from the income tax rolls. The inhibitive effect of our tax code on individual initiative has been reduced dramatically. Real after-tax personal income has risen 15 percent during the last 4 years, increasing our overall standard of living.

Our defense capabilities have been strengthened with modernized equipment and successful recruiting and retention of higher caliber personnel; the readiness, training, and morale of our troops has been improved.

Since 1981, the amount of time spent by the public filling out forms required by the Federal Government has been cut by over 600 million hours, and the number of pages published annually in the Federal Register has been reduced by over 45 percent.

Our continuing fight against waste, fraud, and abuse in Government programs has paid off, as the President's Council on Integrity and Efficiency has saved $84 billion in funds that have been put to more efficient use.

The foundation has been laid for a sustained era of national prosperity. But a major threat to our future prosperity remains: the Federal deficit. If this deficit is not brought under control by limiting Government spending, we put in jeopardy all we have achieved. Deficits brought on by continued high spending threaten the lower tax rates incorporated in tax reform and inhibit progress in our balance of trade.

This budget meets the $108 billion deficit target for 1988 set out in the Balanced Budget and Emergency Deficit Control Act, commonly known for its principal sponsors as Gramm-Rudman-Hollings. Gramm-Rudman-Hollings committed both the President and Congress to a fixed schedule of progress toward reducing the deficit. In submitting this budget, I am keeping my part of the bargain -- and on schedule. I ask Congress to do the same. If the deficit reduction goals were to be abandoned, we could see unparalleled spending growth that this Nation cannot afford.

This budget shows that eliminating the deficit over time is possible without raising taxes, without sacrificing our defense preparedness, and without cutting into legitimate programs for the poor and the elderly, while at the same time providing needed additional resources for other high priority programs.

Although the deficit has equalled or exceeded 5 percent of the gross national product (GNP) in each of the past 4 years, each year I have proposed a path to lower deficits -- involving primarily the curtailment of unnecessary domestic spending. Congress, however, has rejected most of these proposals; hence, our progress toward reducing the deficit has been much more modest than it could have been.

This year there appears to be a major turn for the better. The 1987 deficit is estimated to be about $48 billion less than in 1986 and should decline to less than 4 percent of GNP. As the economy expands, Federal receipts will rise faster than the increase in outlays Congress enacted for the year.

However, there is no firm guarantee that progress toward a steadily smaller deficit and eventual budget balance will continue. On a current services basis the deficit will continue to decline over the next 5 years, but this decline is gradual and vulnerable to potential fiscally irresponsible congressional action on a multitude of spending programs. It is also threatened by the possibility of a less robust economic performance than is projected, for that projection is based on the assumption that the necessary spending cuts will be made.

This 1988 budget can deal the deficit a crucial blow. If the proposals in this budget are adopted and if the economy performs according to the budget assumptions for growth and inflation, then for the second consecutive year the deficit should shrink substantially, by $65 billion, and thus decline to less than 2\1/2\ percent of GNP. Reducing the deficit this far would bring it within the range of our previous peacetime experience and bring our goal of a balanced budget much closer to realization.

Moreover, if Congress adopts the proposals contained in this budget, it will ensure additional deficit reductions in future years, because in many cases the savings from a given action, although small in 1988, would mount in later years. Given the good start made in 1987, Congress has an opportunity this year -- by enacting this budget -- to put the worst of the deficit problem behind us.

Adopting the spending reductions and other reforms proposed in this budget would reduce the Federal deficit an average $54 billion annually for the next 3 years. This represents $220 each year for every individual American and about $600 for every household. I believe this is the appropriate way to deal with the deficit: cutting excessive Federal spending rather than attacking the family budget by increasing taxes, weakening our national security, breaking faith with the poor and the elderly, or ignoring the requirements for additional resources for other high priority programs.

The task of deficit reduction is a formidable one -- but it can and should be achieved with serious attention to the effects on America's economy, businesses, State and local governments, social organizations, and individual citizens. Reducing the deficit will reduce the burden the Federal Government places on private credit markets. The specific deficit reduction measures proposed in this budget would also help make our economy more competitive -- and more productive. These objectives have been major considerations in the formulation of this budget.

Restoring our national security also has been one of my highest priorities over the past 6 years due to the serious weakness arising from severe underfunding during the middle and late 1970's. Nonetheless, defense and international programs have not escaped the effects of fiscal stringency. The defense budget actually has declined in real terms in each of the past 2 years. This trend cannot be allowed to continue. I am proposing in this budget a 3 percent real increase over last year's appropriated level. This request -- some $8 billion less than last year's -- is the minimum level consistent with maintaining an adequate defense of our Nation.

Likewise, my request for our international affairs programs is also crucial to our effort to maintain our national security. I urge Congress not to repeat last year's damaging cuts, but rather to fund these programs fully.

The incentive structure for other Federal programs should be changed to promote efficiency and competitiveness. One of the problems with many Federal programs is that they provide payments without encouraging performance or efficiency. They are perceived to be ``free'' and, therefore, there is potentially unlimited demand. This has to be changed -- and this budget proposes creating needed incentives in critical areas.

Our farm price support programs, under the Food Security Act of 1985, are proving much too costly -- half again as costly as estimated when the bill was enacted just one year ago. The $25 billion being spent on farm subsidies in 1987 is 14 percent of our total Federal deficit and equivalent to taking $415 of each nonfarm family's taxes to support farmers' incomes -- over and above the amount that price supports add to their grocery bills. Some of the provisions of the Act encourage farmers to overproduce just to receive Federal benefits. Other provisions give the greatest benefits to our largest and most efficient agricultural producers instead of to those family farmers most in need of help. My administration will propose amendments to the Food Security Act to focus its benefits on the full-time family farmer by placing effective limitations on the amount paid to large producers and removing the incentive for farmers to overproduce solely to receive Federal payments.

Reform of the medicare physician payment system is also proposed. Under the proposals, medicare would pay for radiology, anesthesiology, and pathology (RAP) services based on average area costs instead of inflationary fee-for-service reimbursements. The current fee-for-service payment distorts incentives and induces inappropriate billing for unneeded services. This initiative would remove the distortions caused by medicare's current reimbursement rules, eliminating a key barrier preventing the restoration of traditional arrangements between RAP physicians and hospital staffs.

The budget proposes continued increases in federally supported basic research that will lead to longer term improvements in the Nation's productivity and global competitiveness. For example, the budget projects a doubling within 5 years of the National Science Foundation's support for academic research. I also propose to increase support for training future scientists and engineers, and to foster greater technology transfer from Government to industry.

Another way of attaching a ``value'' to Government-provided services -- and an incentive to use them only as needed -- is to charge user fees where appropriate. Those who receive special Federal services -- not the general taxpayer -- should bear a greater share of the costs of those services. Accordingly, this budget imposes fees for Federal lending activities, for meat and poultry inspection, for National park and forest facilities, for Coast Guard services, for Customs inspections, and for many other services.

The Government should stop competing with the private sector. The Federal Government interferes with the productivity of the private sector in many ways. One is through borrowing from the credit markets to finance programs that are no longer needed -- as in the case of the rural housing insurance fund, direct student financial assistance, urban mass transit discretionary grants, vocational education grants, the Federal Crop Insurance Corporation fund, sewage plant construction grants, justice assistance grants, the Legal Services Corporation, and rural electrification loans. I am proposing in this budget that we terminate these programs and rely instead on private or State and local government provision of these services.

The budget also proposes that a number of programs that have real utility be transferred back to the private sector, through public offerings or outright sales. Following our successful effort to authorize sale of Conrail, I am now proposing the sale of the Naval Petroleum Reserves, AMTRAK, the Alaska Power Administration, the helium program, and excess real property. In addition, I am proposing legislation to authorize study of a possible divestiture of the Southeastern Power Administration. These ``privatization'' efforts continue to be a high priority of my administration and, I believe, will result in increased productivity and lower total costs of providing these services. The Federal Government needs to provide essential services that are truly public in nature and national in scope. It has no business providing services to individuals that private markets or their State or local governments can provide just as well or better.

The Federal Government should depend more on the private sector to provide ancillary and support services for activities that remain in Federal hands. The budget proposes that the work associated with over 40,000 Federal positions be contracted out to the private sector as yet another way to increase productivity, reduce costs, and improve services.

Federal credit programs should operate through the private markets and reveal their true costs. The Federal Government provides credit for housing, agriculture, small business, education, and many other purposes. Currently, over a trillion dollars of Federal or federally assisted loans are outstanding. Including lending of Government-sponsored enterprises, federally assisted lending amounted to 14 percent of all lending in U.S. credit markets in 1985.

Under current treatment, loan guarantees appear to be ``free''; they do not affect the budget until and unless borrowers default. Direct loans are counted as outlays when they are made, but as ``negative outlays'' when they are repaid; thus, direct loans seem ``free'' too, inasmuch as it is presumed they will be repaid. But neither direct loans nor loan guarantees are free. Besides the better terms and conditions a borrower gets from the Government, there is the matter of default. When a borrower does not repay a direct loan, the negative outlay does not occur, and this is a subsidy implicit in the original loan transaction. When a borrower defaults on a guaranteed loan, the Government has to make good on repayment -- also a program subsidy.

Since these effects are poorly understood and lead to grave inefficiencies in our credit programs, we will ask Congress to enact legislation whereby the true cost to the economy of Federal credit programs would be counted in the budget. By selling a substantial portion of newly made loans to the private sector and reinsuring some newly made guarantees, the implicit subsidy in the current practice will become explicit. This reform will revolutionize the way Federal credit activities are conducted.

The private sector will also be increasingly involved in the management of our huge portfolio of outstanding loans and loan guarantees. Delinquent Federal borrowers will be reported to private credit bureaus, and private loan collection agencies will be used to help in our collection efforts. The Internal Revenue Service (IRS) will expand its ``offsetting'' of refunds to pay off delinquent Federal debts, and Federal employees who have not paid back Federal loans will have their wages garnished.

Increased role for State and local governments. Over the past 6 years I have sought to return various Federal services to State and local governments -- which are in a much better position to respond effectively to the needs of the recipients of these services. To me, this is a question of reorganizing responsibilities within our Federal system in a manner that will result in more productive delivery of the services that we all agree should be provided. Thus, this budget phases out inappropriate Federal Government involvement in local law enforcement, sewage treatment, public schools, and community and regional development. Transportation programs will be consolidated or States will be given greater flexibility in the use of Federal funds for highways, mass transit, and airports.

Federal regulations must be reduced even further to improve productivity. My administration will continue the deregulation and regulatory relief efforts that were begun in 1981. The Task Force on Regulatory Relief, headed by the Vice President, has been reinstated. In the past, excessive Federal regulations and related paperwork have stifled American productivity and individual freedom. We must continue our efforts to streamline the regulatory process and to strike the proper balance between necessary regulation and associated paperwork on the one hand, and the costs of these requirements on the other.

Federal activities should be better managed. The American people deserve the best managed Federal Government possible. Last year, I initiated the Federal Government Productivity Program, with the goal of improving productivity in selected areas by 20 percent by 1992. A substantial portion of total direct Federal employment falls within the program, including such activities as the Department of Agriculture meat and poultry inspection, Navy aircraft maintenance and repair, social security claims processing, National Park maintenance, operation of Federal prisons, and IRS processing of tax returns.

Credit reform, privatization, productivity improvement, and other proposals will be described in more detail in the Management Report to be issued this month. It will also identify further measures to reduce waste, fraud, and abuse; to improve management of the Government's $1.7 trillion cashflow; to institute compatible financial management systems across all Federal agencies; and other initiatives to improve the management of Government operations. These ambitious management reform undertakings, called ``Reform '88,'' constitute the largest management reform effort ever attempted.

The budget also proposes a new approach to paying Federal employees who increase their productivity. I ask that Congress approve a new plan to transform the current system of virtually automatic ``within-grade'' salary increases for the roughly 40 percent of employees eligible each year for these 3 percent hidden pay raises to one that is ``performance-oriented''. This will give Federal employees stronger incentives to improve service delivery.

I include with this budget my recommendations for increases in executive level pay for the executive, legislative, and judicial branches of the Federal Government. The Quadrennial Commission report submitted to me on December 15, 1986 documented both the substantial erosion in the real level of Federal executive pay that has occurred since 1969 and the recruitment and retention problems that have resulted, especially for the Federal judiciary. The Commission is to be commended for its diligent and conscientious effort to address the complicated and complex problems associated with Federal pay levels.

Every one of the Quadrennial Commissions that have met over the past 18 years has recognized that a pay increase for key Federal officials was necessary. Each Commission concluded that pay for senior Government officials fell far behind that of their counterparts in the private sector. They also understood that we cannot afford a Government composed primarily of those who are wealthy enough to serve. Unfortunately, the last major Quadrennial Commission pay adjustment was in 1977 -- a decade ago.

However, I recognize that we are under mandated efforts to reduce the Federal deficit and hold down the costs of Government to the absolute minimum level. In this environment, I do not believe it would be appropriate to implement fully the Quadrennial Commission recommendations.

Accordingly, I have decided to propose a pay increase, but have cut substantially the recommendations made by the Quadrennial Commissioners in their report to me last month. Moreover, I have decided to establish a Career Manager Pay Commission to review and report to me by next August on appropriate pay scales for our elite corps of career Government managers. The pay increases I am proposing to Congress, plus the results of this new Commission, should place Government compensation on a fairer and more comparable footing.

I have become convinced that the only way we can bring our adversaries to the bargaining table for arms reduction is to give them a reason to negotiate -- while, at the same time, fulfilling our responsibility to our citizens and allies to provide an environment safe and secure from aggression.

We have built our defense capabilities back toward levels more in accord with today's requirements for security. Modest and sustained growth in defense funding will be required to consolidate the real gains we have made. Because of severe fiscal constraints, we are proceeding at a slower pace than I originally planned, and the budget I propose provides the minimum necessary to ensure an adequate defense.

I am also submitting, for the first time, a two-year budget for National Defense. This will permit greater stability in providing resources for our defense efforts and should lead to greater economy in using these resources.

The current budget process has failed to provide a disciplined and responsible mechanism for consideration of the Federal budget. Budget procedures are cumbersome, complex, and convoluted. They permit and encourage a process that results in evasion of our duty to the American people to budget their public resources responsibly. Last year Congress did not complete action on a budget for 8 months and 2 weeks -- 2 weeks past the statutory deadline. Except for the initial report of the Senate Budget Committee, Congress missed every deadline it had set for itself just 9 months earlier. In the end, Congress passed a yearlong, 389-page omnibus appropriations bill full of excessive and wasteful spending. Because Congress had not completed action on the annual appropriations bills, at one point I was compelled by law to initiate a shutdown of Federal Government activities. Such abrogation of a responsible budget process not only discourages careful, prudent legislation -- it encourages excessive spending and waste.

Furthermore, since I, as President, do not have a line-item veto, I had to ignore the many objectionable features of the omnibus appropriations legislation and sign it to avoid a Federal funding crisis. I am sure that many Members of Congress do not approve of this method of budgeting the Federal Government.

Last Fall's funding crisis and its slap-dash resolution are only one of the most obvious manifestations of the flaws in the system. Congress passes budget resolutions (without the concurrence of the President) based on functions; it considers 13 separate, but related, appropriations bills based on agencies, not functions; it develops a reconciliation bill; it passes authorizing legislation, sometimes annually; and it enacts limits on the public debt. The words alone are obscure and confusing; the process behind it is chaotic. The process must be streamlined and made more accountable.

Shortly, I will outline specific reforms designed to make the process more efficient and increase accountability, so that we can give the American people what they deserve from us: a budget that is fiscally responsible and on time.

Looking back over the past 6 years, we can feel a sense of pride and satisfaction in our accomplishments. Inflation has been brought under control. Growth and investment are up, while interest rates, tax rates, and unemployment rates have all come down substantially. A foundation for sustained economic expansion is now in place. Our national security has been restored to more adequate levels. The proliferation of unnecessary and burdensome Federal regulations has been halted. A significant beginning has been made toward curbing the excessive growth of domestic spending. Management of the Government is being improved, with special emphasis on productivity.

Important tasks, however, still remain to be accomplished. The large and stubbornly persistent budget deficit has been a major source of frustration. It threatens our prosperity and our hopes for continued economic growth.

Last year, the legislative and executive branches of Government responded to this threat by mandating gradual, orderly progress toward a balanced budget over the next 4 years. The proposals outlined here achieve the 1988 target while preserving legitimate programs for the aged and needy, providing for adequate national security, devoting more resources to other high-priority activities, and doing this without raising taxes.

This budget presents hard choices which must be faced squarely. Congress must not abandon the statutory deficit targets of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings. Honoring the provisions and promises of this legislation offers the best opportunity for us to escape the chronic pattern of deficit spending that has plagued us for the past half century. We must realize that the deficit problem is also an opportunity of a different kind -- an opportunity to construct a new, leaner, better focused, and better managed Federal structure supporting a more productive and more competitive America.

The statute requires that, in the budget next submitted after receipt of the report of the Commission, I set forth recommendations for adjustment of these salaries. Pursuant to section 225(i), as amended by section 135 of Public Law 99 - 190, these recommendations will be effective unless Congress disapproves the recommendations by a joint resolution within 30 days following the transmittal of my budget.

As referred to in my Budget Message, I am recommending increases in executive level pay for offices and positions within the executive, legislative, and judicial branches of the Federal Government. The Quad Commission's report, submitted to me on December 15th, 1986, documented both the substantial erosion in the real level of Federal executive pay which has occurred since 1969 and the recruitment and retention problems that have resulted, especially for the Federal judiciary. The Commission found that Federal executives and legislators have experienced a decline of over 40 percent in real income since 1969. The Quad Commission is to be commended for its diligent and conscientious effort to address the complicated and complex problems associated with Federal pay levels.

Every one of the Quad Commissions that has met over the past 18 years concluded that a pay increase for key Federal officials was necessary. Each Commission found that pay for senior government officials fell far behind that of their counterparts in the private sector. They also surmised that we cannot afford a Government composed primarily of those wealthy enough to serve. Unfortunately, the last major Quad Commission pay adjustment was in 1977 -- a decade ago.

In considering the Quad Commission's recommendations, I recognize that we are under a mandate to reduce the Federal deficit and hold the costs of government to an absolute minimum. In this environment, I do not believe that we can overcome the erosion of real income since 1969 of these senior government officials in one step and thus do not believe it would be appropriate to fully implement the Quad Commission's recommendations at this time.

Moreover, I have decided to establish a Career Manager Pay Commission to review and report to me by next August on appropriate pay scales for our elite corps of career Government managers -- those technically not included in the Quad Commission's mandate. The pay increases I am now proposing to Congress, together with responses to the recommendations of the new Career Manager Pay Commission and the next Quad Commission, are intended to constitute a significant advancement toward placing Government compensation on a fairer and more comparable footing.

During the last week, at the President's direction, administration officials from the national security and foreign policy agencies of government worked with a staff of the Senate Select Committee on Intelligence to make possible the release of a full, declassified staff report of the committee's finding on the Iranian arms sales matter. A declassified version of the staff report, amounting to 150 pages or so, was developed in the process, and we believe it is ready for release to the public. It is the most complete account thus far of how the President's policy concerning Iran was carried out and the most complete compilation of the available facts concerning the alleged diversion of funds to the anti-Sandinista forces in Nicaragua.

This afternoon, the committee will be meeting to consider whether to release this report. The President urges that the report be released to the public immediately. The administration cooperated fully with the committee during its investigation, fulfilling the President's desire that all of the facts concerning this matter be made available to the American people as promptly as possible. The release of a staff report would be a big step in this direction.

The President today announced the appointment of John David Davenport to be a member of the Federal Retirement Thrift Investment Board for a term of 1 year. This appointment is made upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives in consultation with the minority leader of the House of Representatives. This is a new position.

Prior to joining the White House staff, Mr. Danner worked for Armco for 18 years. He served in various marketing assignments for a period of 8 years. After lobbying for 3 years in Ohio, he was transferred in 1979 to Armco's Washington office as manager of legislative services. Mr. Danner has wide experience in the business community and on Capitol Hill.

The attached classified report outlines the ongoing consultative process in NATO. I am confident that we are making steady progress, and that with your continued strong support to fund chemical deterrent and defensive programs, the United States can do its share to strengthen Alliance security.

In celebrating the birthday of the Reverend Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., we honor an American who recognized the great injustice of segregation and discrimination, and made it his life's purpose and toil to right those wrongs in favor of justice, freedom, equality, fairness, and reconciliation.

Dr. King eschewed violence, relying instead on his eloquence and the moral force of his convictions, the cause he led changed not only laws but hearts and minds as well. He braved imprisonment, violence, and threats because, as he said, ``History has proven over and over again that unmerited suffering is redemptive.'' Martin Luther King, Jr., fell victim to the violence he fought so fervently -- but his nonviolent quest had already altered our land irrevocably and for the better.

Russell Lowell: ``Once to every man and nation comes the moment to decide;/ In the strife of Truth with Falsehood, for the good or evil side; . . .'' Dr. King did decide for the good, and the measure of his greatness is that his Nation thereupon did likewise.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 9th day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Soon I'll appear before Congress to give my State of the Union Address, outlining our agenda for 1987 and beyond. We saw earlier this week that one part of our agenda, continued economic growth, is already well under way. On Thursday the Dow Jones Industrial Index closed above 2,000 for the first time in history; indeed, the Dow has gone up more in the past 4 years than it did in the previous 20. New figures showed that the Producer Price Index is at an excellent zero percent; while unemployment dropped to just 6.6 percent, the lowest level in nearly 7 years. And with Congress back in town, another part of the agenda, the Federal budget, has already become an important piece of business here in Washington.

Just this week -- a full month earlier than usual -- our administration submitted to Congress our proposed budget for 1988. This budget reflects sound policy, both foreign and domestic. Mindful of America's world role on behalf of freedom, the budget calls for a strong and innovative national defense, including full funding for our historic Strategic Defense Initiative. After all, it was our strength, not talk, that led to my meetings with Mr. Gorbachev in Geneva and Reykjavik. In an effort to make our economy more competitive with those of other nations, our budget sets out important steps, including training for dislocated workers, the return to the private sector of certain institutions now owned by the Government, and more funding for research and development. And to set an example for the entire country, I've asked Federal agencies to continue to improve their own productivity.

This budget also reflects what accountants might refer to as sound financial management, but what you and I would call common sense. To begin with, the American people understand that it's hard enough to support a family and make ends meet without the Government constantly raising taxes. So, this budget contains no tax increase whatsoever -- none. Regarding the Federal deficit, our budget calls for prudent cuts in programs that have proven wasteful or are no longer needed -- cuts that can be made without harming the poor or elderly. In this way, our budget meets the deficit-reduction goal set out last year in the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings legislation. In other words, this budget will keep the Government on a path of shrinking deficits that would see the Federal budget balanced in just 4 years. In the less than 1 week since we submitted this budget, some in Congress have already begun fumbling in the backfield. There are constant charges that the Federal deficits are somehow the fault of our administration. If Congress had approved reductions we have asked for, the deficit today would be dramatically smaller. During the past 5 years, Congress appropriated almost $67 billion more than I requested for domestic discretionary programs.

Now, there's another point to be made here, perhaps even more important. In the past two decades, defense spending -- the Federal Government's first responsibility -- has fallen as a proportion of our gross national product, while domestic spending in real terms has nearly doubled, pushing total Federal spending as a proportion of the gross national product from under 20 percent in 1967 to almost 24 percent today. In other words, big government has been claiming more and more of the goods and services produced by your own hard work. In the words of a recent Wall Street Journal article, those in Congress who want big government to get even bigger ``are asking the public to ratify, finally and conclusively, the rising domestic spending levels Congress has legislated . . . a process that every Reagan budget has attempted to reverse.'' Almost as if to illustrate this point, in the 4 days that Congress has been in session, it has already considered a huge budget-busting water and sewage treatment bill that would cost $18 billion.

Our administration remains ready to work with Congress in fashioning this budget, in particular to consider any budget proposal that meets the three basic requirements of a strong national defense, a shrinking Federal deficit, and no tax increase. But I have to be frank: If the big spenders want a fight on the budget, they'd better strap on their helmets and shoulder pads. In this fourth and final quarter, I'm determined to go out there and win one for the American people and, yes -- and one for the Gipper.

I met today with Ambassadors Max Kampelman, Maynard Glitman, and Ronald Lehman, our negotiators at the nuclear and space talks (NST), which resumed on January 15 with the opening of round seven in Geneva. I took this opportunity to emphasize once again to Ambassador Kampelman, our head of delegation, and our other negotiators my full confidence in them and the very high priority which I continue to attach to the achievement of deep, equitable, and effectively verifiable reductions in the U.S. and Soviet nuclear arsenals. Such reductions would reduce the risk of war and make a major contribution to our efforts to build a safer world.

In an effort to meet expressed Soviet concerns, the United States also proposed at Reykjavik that neither the United States nor U.S.S.R. deploy advanced strategic defenses through 1996, while conducting research, development, and testing which are permitted by the ABM treaty. This would be coupled with agreement that during the first 5 years of this period U.S. and Soviet strategic offensive arms would be reduced by 50 percent; that during the second 5 years all remaining U.S. and Soviet offensive ballistic missiles of all ranges and armaments would be eliminated; and that at the end of 1996 either side would have the right to deploy advanced defenses, unless the parties agreed otherwise. We have since tabled this new proposal, as well, in Geneva.

In December our negotiators went to Geneva for informal meetings with their Soviet counterparts as part of preparations for round seven. During these informal talks there was no narrowing of differences, although limited progress was made in clarifying some points of agreement between the two sides. The Soviets seemed more interested, at times, in conducting an arms control public relations campaign than in the hard give and take of the confidential negotiating process. Unfortunately, since Reykjavik, Soviet actions to move forward on arms control have not matched our own; indeed, the Soviets sometimes seem to be moving in the other direction. For example, they have backtracked from some of the important points on which Mr. Gorbachev and I reached agreement at Reykjavik.

Furthermore, at Reykjavik they reintroduced their demand that progress in every area of nuclear arms control must be linked together in a single package. This new linkage represents a major step backwards from the agreement Mr. Gorbachev and I made at our summit meeting in Geneva in November 1985 to pursue negotiations in areas where there was already common ground, including the principle of 50-percent reductions in strategic nuclear arms and an interim agreement on INF. This renewed Soviet attempt to hold progress in INF and other areas of arms control hostage to acceptance of the longstanding Soviet effort to cripple our SDI program is unacceptable to the United States and our allies, and we have made this crystal clear to the Soviet Union. Due to the strategic threat posed to the United States and our allies by the continuing Soviet offensive buildup and the extensive and longstanding Soviet programs in strategic defense, it is vital to the future security of the West that the SDI program proceed as expeditiously as possible.

The United States is ready to move forward in this new round. With the solid support of our allies and the continued support of the Congress and the American people, we will seek every opportunity to make meaningful progress towards real arms reductions. If the Soviet Union will return to Geneva with dedication equal to our own, I firmly believe the areas of progress which we have already identified can serve as the starting point from which United States and Soviet negotiators can achieve, for the first time in history, agreements on deep, equitable, and effectively verifiable reductions in our respective nuclear arsenals. Let us hope, therefore, that the Soviets will come to Geneva ready to move with us toward such historic agreements.

As I have said before, real nuclear arms reductions are within our grasp if the Soviet Union will join us in the serious pursuit of agreements which are equitable and stabilizing for both sides and in the interest of the entire world. There is much hard work ahead and many problems remaining, but we will leave no stone unturned in our search for this kind of agreement. The United States is ready; I hope the Soviets are as well.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Marlin Fitzwater to be Assistant to the President for Press Relations effective upon the departure of Larry Speakes. He will serve as spokesman for the President.

The security of the United States and the entire free world, today and for the foreseeable future, depends on the maintenance of an effective and credible nuclear deterrent by the U.S. This is a considerable challenge, in light of continuing efforts by the Soviet Union to undercut the effectiveness of our deterrent. With the support of Congress we have succeeded in meeting this challenge, and together we must continue to do so in the future.

Today I am requesting per my October 10, 1986 letter that the Senate give advice and consent, subject to the condition set out below, to two pending treaties that have significant implications for Western security: the TTBT and PNET. These treaties have the common purpose of limiting individual nuclear explosions to no more than 150 kilotons. The TTBT, which prohibits nuclear weapon tests above 150 kilotons, places significant constraints on the efforts we may undertake in the U.S. nuclear test program to respond to Soviet nuclear and non-nuclear activities aimed at undercutting our deterrent. Hence, it is imperative that we have the necessary provisions that will make the TTBT effectively verifiable and thus assure ourselves that the Soviet Union is fulfilling its obligations and is thereby equally constrained.

Unfortunately, as I have frequently stated and the enclosed study makes clear, the TTBT and PNET are not effectively verifiable in their present form. Large uncertainties are present in the current method employed by the United States to estimate Soviet test yields. I have on several occasions reported to the Congress on the problems with Soviet compliance with the TTBT. Therefore, achieving Soviet agreement to improved verification measures that would provide for effective verification of these treaties has been my highest priority in the area of nuclear testing limitations.

As I stated in my March 14, 1986 letter to General Secretary Gorbachev, effective verification of the TTBT and PNET requires that we reduce the current unacceptable level of uncertainty in our estimates of the yields of nuclear tests. Indeed, leaders in previous Congresses have shared my view that the present large degree of uncertainty in such estimates is unacceptable, as well as my desire for sharp improvements. In this regard, we require -- and have conveyed to the Soviets that we require -- effective verification through direct, on-site hydrodynamic yield (CORRTEX) measurement of all appropriate high-yield nuclear detonations. Further, I informed General Secretary Gorbachev that, if the Soviet Union would agree to essential verification procedures for the TTBT and the PNET, I would then be prepared to request the advice and consent of the Senate to ratification of the treaties. Ratification of the treaties without such provisions would be contrary to the national security interests of the United States.

As written, the TTBT relies solely on teleseismic detection and yield measurement systems and on inadequate, and unverifiable data exchange. The Soviet Union has apparently had problems in correctly assessing the yields of U.S. nuclear tests. Despite our best efforts, the Soviet Union has so far not accepted our practical proposal for achieving the necessary verification improvement of the TTBT and the PNET. We have not yet found any alternative approach which equals the effectiveness of CORRTEX -- we are striving to achieve a yield-estimation accuracy of about 30 percent by this method. We have, nonetheless, advised the Soviets, at three Geneva nuclear testing experts meetings in 1986, that the U.S. is willing to consider any other direct yield measurement method the Soviets might propose, provided it is at least as capable (in terms of accuracy and non-intrusiveness) as CORRTEX. To date, they have not been forthcoming in proposing or explaining alternative verification techniques that would meet our requirements.

I am hopeful we can reach an agreement with the Soviet Union which will allow me to certify that the treaties are effectively verifiable. I will be prepared to ratify the TTBT and the PNET at such time as the condition cited above has been fulfilled.

Further, I informed the General Secretary in Reykjavik that, once our verification concerns have been satisfied and the treaties have been ratified, and in association with a program to reduce and ultimately eliminate all nuclear weapons, I would propose that the United States and the Soviet Union immediately engage in negotiations on ways to implement a step-by-step parallel program of limiting and ultimately ending nuclear testing.

The steps in this program would take into account our long-standing position that a comprehensive test ban is a long-term objective which must be viewed in the context of a time when we do not need to depend on nuclear deterrence to ensure international security and stability, and when we have achieved broad, deep, and verifiable arms reductions, substantially improved verification capabilities, expanded confidence-building measures, and greater balance in conventional forces.

After the War of Independence, Americans continued to live under the Articles of Confederation. Problems of economic recovery and sluggish international trade clouded the horizon. In this climate of economic difficulties and the recent memory of a bitter struggle for freedom, Shays' Rebellion took place.

Unlike many other States, Massachusetts had not passed debt relief laws. In the fall of 1786, some Massachusetts debtors tried to stop court-ordered confiscation of land and property by using force to prevent the courts from sitting. Governor Bowdoin responded by calling out the State militia and asking other States for help.

Although the Continental Congress lacked the power and resources to assist, the uprising eventually was suppressed. On January 25, 1787, Daniel Shays, a captain during the Revolution, led a group of debtors who sought to stop the State Supreme Court from meeting. They attacked the courthouse at Springfield and the Federal arsenal. The State militia repelled this assault, and soon the uprising was over. A new State legislature granted some of the insurgents' demands and pardoned or gave lenient sentences to their leaders. This judicious policy and the return of prosperity soon restored harmony in Massachusetts.

At the Annapolis Convention of 1786, Federalists had publicized commercial disputes among the States. Now they cited the insurgency to bolster their claim that a Federal charter was needed in place of the Articles of Confederation. On February 21, 1787, the Continental Congress called for a Constitutional Convention in Philadelphia in May to amend the Articles. Fresh in the minds of the assembled delegates, Shays' Rebellion was to have a profound and lasting effect on the framing of our Constitution and on our subsequent history.

Greetings. One of the joys of my current job has been getting to know America's young people. I've met you here at the White House, and everywhere I've traveled throughout this land -- on campuses, in churches, on military bases -- young people were there. Your idealism and confidence, your gusto for life, have been an energy source this not-so-young President has been able to tap. I'm proud of each of you and share your desire to ensure that when you're ready to make your mark -- and that won't be many years from now -- that our country is the free and opportunity land that God intended her to be.

I appreciate this chance to speak with you on this special day, the birthday of a man who contributed so much to our way of life. In a few days we'll be honoring his memory with a national holiday, a day for all citizens of all races to reflect on the legacy of Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. I hope each of you will take the time to do just that. His memory should serve not just as an inspiration to black Americans but to each and every one of us to stand firm for our principles and to strive to better ourselves and our country. Martin Luther King, Jr., was born on January 15, 1929, in Atlanta, Georgia, the son of a Baptist minister. He never reached his 40th birthday, yet during his short life span he touched the lives of every American and helped dismantle the legal vestiges of discrimination and racism. He was committed to seeing that our nation lived up to its promise of liberty and justice for all. Ours is a better country today; each of you has more potential, more opportunity, because of the hard work and courage of one remarkable individual.

To me, and probably to your parents, Dr. King is a vivid memory. However, to many of today's high school students he may be little more than a prominent person mentioned in history books. Well, not many of those people described in your history books have national holidays in their memory. Only two other Americans, Washington and Lincoln, are so honored. And just to set the record straight, I may be old, but there's no truth to the story that Abe Lincoln and I walked to school together back in Illinois. Seriously though, Lincoln may have been before my time, but I do remember Dr. King. Even those who had disagreements with Dr. King now recognize that the changes he helped bring about were right and, in the long run, made our country stronger. But the cleansing process is not easy. We needed such an individual to mobilize our people and organize a movement that would touch the conscience of our nation.

Today the job that Martin Luther King, Jr., started is ours to finish. We're counting on you, the young people of the United States, to have the courage and commitment to do what is right. As recent unfortunate events have demonstrated, we cannot be complacent about racism and bigotry. And I would challenge all of you to pledge yourselves to building an America where incidents of racial hatred do not happen, because racism has been banned not just from the law books but from the hearts of the people. You should accept nothing less than making yours a generation free of bigotry, intolerance, and discrimination. If I might be presumptuous enough to offer this suggestion: A good place to start, a tangible contribution each of you can make, is to be totally intolerant of racism anywhere around you. If someone, even a friend, uses an ugly word referring to another's race or religion, let's make it clear we won't put up with it. Racial, ethnic, or religious slurs are vulgar, mean spirited; and there is no place for them in a democratic and free America.

The future of this great country is certainly in your hands. Your leadership and moral standards will determine if the U.S.A. continues to serve as a beacon of hope and opportunity to all mankind. In a democracy like ours, it's not enough just to believe in something; we must get involved and speak out. Dr. King was one such citizen who spoke out, and he did it with such moral conviction that the whole Nation heard his plea. It was 24 years ago when he made one of the great orations of this or any century. I hope each of you've had a chance to hear this historic address. No one in political life could help but admire the talents and dedication of this man when, on the steps of the Lincoln Memorial, before a rally of over 250,000, he so eloquently spoke of his dream. He spoke of a dream that one day the sons of slaves and the sons of slaveowners might sit down at the table of brotherhood.

I couldn't help but think of that speech when I read about a unique gathering that took place in North Carolina. You may have read about it, too. Last August there was a reunion of people, white and black, who trace their ancestry to the Somerset Plantation, near Creswell, North Carolina. The memory of the evil that once was slavery was not and should not be forgotten. But for that day, as Dr. King dreamed, the descendants of slaves and of slaveowners broke bread and had fellowship together, showing the rest of us what good will is all about. The descendants of those families of Somerset have made many contributions to America -- some in the quiet way of raising families and building their communities; others, like Clarence Blount, the majority leader of the Maryland State senate, made a mark in government service. There were those who did well in business; others were ministers, lawyers, or school principals. Some served in the military, side by side with the descendants of slaves and slaveowners; together they protected our country against foreign threats. And that's why freedom for all is so important. It unleashes the best in each of us. Limiting the rights of any citizen is limiting America.

Martin Luther King, Jr., helped tear down the institutions of racism that remained from the days of slavery -- institutions that unconscionably limited black Americans, preventing them from achieving their best. He helped open doors that were bolted and pushed aside roadblocks to personal advancement. We still must remain vigilant that government policies do not intentionally or unintentionally stand in the way of the upward mobility of any citizen. Here again, this isn't just a job for government; it's a job for you. As young people, you can honor Dr. King today by making certain you try your hardest to take advantage of the great opportunities available to you. Certainly that includes being diligent in your studies, but it also means saying no to drugs and keeping clear of other temptations that will undermine your future.

I don't feel as if I can speak for him, but I'm certain Dr. King would also be proud of anything you do to reach out to others who might need some help in getting ahead. I hope each and every one of you will get involved in at least one project that helps others. There are clubs and associations, at school or church, which offer all of us a way to do some good. You may be surprised that by helping others you'll find how much you're also helping yourself by building your confidence and meeting wonderful people. One person I know who agrees with this is Bill Cosby. He's been so successful and has so much, yet he still thinks of others. Last month he gave a substantial contribution to Fisk University, one of America's historically black colleges. His generosity, his caring, is one of the things that makes him someone we admire, and not just for his talent. We all can't give as much as Bill Cosby, but there's something each one of us can contribute to our school, our community, to others in need. The students at Byng High School in Ada, Oklahoma, have a motto: ``How do I know I can't accomplish my goals until I try.'' I think that's a bit of wisdom that all of us in and out of school should always remember.

I'd like to leave you on this special day with a story about a friend of mine who exemplifies the concern and the can-do spirit we're talking about. His name is Bill Lucas. Bill's parents died when he was a child, and he was raised in Harlem by a loving aunt who cared for him as her own. When he was in school his track team was up for the championship, and he was representing the team in the 3-mile race. On the first lap around the track he lost a shoe. Now, other runners might have quit. Bill kept going and finished that race with a foot bloody and torn, but he came in third. And those extra points for third place, added to the rest of the team's score, were just enough to win the championship for his school. Later in life this same spirit helped this man from such a humble background to go on and accomplish great things. He was a teacher, an investigator for the Civil Rights Commission, an FBI agent, and the executive officer of one of the largest counties in the United States. Last year he was a candidate for Governor of Michigan. And although he didn't win and become Michigan's first black Governor, Bill keeps moving ahead, doing his very best. And I can tell all of you, if America is a land of champions, it's because of people like Bill Lucas and because of people like you.

Today is Martin Luther King, Jr.'s birthday. Let us honor him by living the kind of lives that will make this dream -- his dream -- a reality. I appreciate this chance to speak with you. I wish you all the very best. Thank you, and God bless you.

In 1973, America's unborn children lost their legal protection. In the 14 years since then, some twenty million unborn babies, 1.5 million each year, have lost their lives by abortion -- in a nation of 242 million people. This tragic and terrible toll continues, at the rate of more than 4,000 young lives lost each day. This is a shameful record; it accords with neither human decency nor our American heritage of respect for the sanctity of human life.

That heritage is deeply rooted in the hearts and the history of our people. Our Founding Fathers pledged to each other their lives, their fortunes, and their sacred honor in the Declaration of Independence. They announced their unbreakable bonds with its immutable truths that ``all men are created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty and the pursuit of Happiness.'' Americans of every succeeding generation have cherished our heritage of God-given human rights and have been willing to sacrifice for those rights, just as our Founders did.

Those rights are given by God to all alike. Medical evidence leaves no room for doubt that the distinct being developing in a mother's womb is both alive and human. This merely confirms what common sense has always told us. Abortion kills unborn babies and denies them forever their rights to ``Life, Liberty and the pursuit of Happiness.'' Our Declaration of Independence holds that governments are instituted among men to secure these rights, and our Constitution -- founded on these principles -- should not be read to sanction the taking of innocent human life.

A return to our heritage of reverence and protection for the sanctity of innocent human life is long overdue. For the last 14 years and longer, many Americans have devoted themselves to restoring the right to life and to providing loving alternatives to abortion so every mother will choose life for her baby.

We must recognize the courage and love mothers exhibit in keeping their babies or choosing adoption. We must also offer thanks and support to the millions of Americans who are willing to take on the responsibilities of adoptive parents. And we must never cease our efforts -- our appeals to the legislatures and the courts and our prayers to the Author of Life Himself -- until infants before birth are once again afforded the same protection of the law we all enjoy.

Our heritage as Americans bids us to respect and to defend the sanctity of human life. With every confidence in the blessing of God and the goodness of the American people, let us rededicate ourselves to this solemn duty.

Now, Therefore, I, Ronald Reagan, President of the United States of America, by virtue of the authority vested in me by the Constitution and laws of the United States, do hereby proclaim Sunday, January 18, 1987, as National Sanctity of Human Life Day. I call upon the citizens of this blessed land to gather on that day in homes and places of worship to give thanks for the gift of life and to reaffirm our commitment to the dignity of every human being and the sanctity of each human life.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 16th day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The United States Embassy in Quito, Ecuador, has confirmed that Ecuadoran President Leon Febres-Cordero is being held hostage by elements of the Ecuadoran Air Force. One of the pillars of this administration's foreign policy is to support democratic governments and democratic processes in Latin America.

The administration is deeply disturbed by the developments that threaten constitutional and democratic rule in Ecuador. We strongly urge that the democratically elected President of Ecuador be immediately released and unconditionally allowed to resume his constitutional duties.

Today I'd like to begin with an expression of gratitude to all who sent get-well cards and letters after my brief hospital stay 9 days ago. Of course, some of my favorites came from young people. Eight-year-old Colin MacDonald, of Holbrook, New York, told me that he liked my speeches -- except when they preempted his favorite TV shows. And second-grader Jennifer Carl, of Canton, Ohio, was kind enough to draw a picture of me in bed, Nancy standing at my side, serving me a bowl of -- well, of purple soup. Nancy wants the recipe. Jennifer, it's true that my doctors insist I stay home and take it easy for the next several weeks -- which I will -- but I want you to know that I'm out of bed, feeling fine, and looking forward to getting back on a full schedule. Jennifer, Colin, and to all of you, Nancy and I extend our heartfelt thanks.

But to get down to business: This week I met our arms negotiating team, headed by Max Kampelman, before they returned to Geneva to begin a new round of talks with the Soviets. We discovered that all of us shared a sense of anticipation; a feeling that after Reykjavik, where Mr. Gorbachev and I found new areas of agreement, the prospects for genuine arms reductions were better than at any time in years. And we agreed that underlying these hopes for progress toward a lasting world peace -- underlying, indeed, the Soviets' return to the bargaining table -- was the knowledge that, at last, the United States could once again deal with the Soviet Union from a position of strength.

Think back just 6 years: Our Navy had dwindled from more than 1,000 ships to less than 500. Many of our planes couldn't fly for lack of spare parts. And our men and women in uniform were seeing their pay in real terms shrink while pay in the private sector rose. Well, I believed on first taking office, as I do today, that the defense of this Republic is not just one of the duties of the Federal Government, it is the first duty. So, with bipartisan congressional support, we took action at once on the rebuilding of our nation's defenses. Since 1980 we've increased the number of Army divisions from 16 to 18. We've reactivated 4 battleships and purchased 124 new ships for the Navy, including 2 new aircraft carriers and 21 high-technology Aegis-class cruisers and destroyers. We've purchased over 2,500 new tactical fighter aircraft. And just as important, we've more than doubled our vital stocks of spare parts and munitions, stocks that were dangerously low in 1981. Pay and benefits for our Armed Forces has increased substantially. And perhaps most heartening, the proportion of recruits holding high school diplomas has risen from less than 70 percent in 1980 to more than 90 percent today.

At the same time we've been spending the needed funds, we've found important new ways to spend that money better. The Defense Department, for example, has greatly expanded competitive bidding and is this year submitting to Congress the first-ever 2-year defense budget to replace the old, inefficient, year-by-year process. Add to these the changes contained in last year's Goldwater-Nichols legislation, and those set in place at the recommendation of the Packard commission, and you have perhaps the most dramatic defense reforms since the formation of the Department of Defense itself. All of this is having a profound effect. Morale in our Armed Forces has soared. All the world has taken note that the United States has reasserted its role on behalf of freedom. And in the past 6 years, not 1 inch of territory has fallen to Communist aggression; while one nation, Grenada, has been set free.

Now Congress and our administration have the opportunity to continue the vital work of rebuilding our defenses, already so well begun. But I must tell you that we cannot take continued progress for granted. In 1985 and '86 Congress cut the defense budget sharply. Needless to say, we hope that won't happen again. But with up-down, up-down funding, it does look as though some want to turn the Congress' defense budget into a kind of crazy roller coaster. Yet this up-down funding is inefficient and costly, taking money out of the taxpayers pockets. And there could be no thrill in going downhill very fast when what would be going down would be our ability to defend itself. So, I appeal to Congress: In the days ahead, let's work together to provide 2-year defense funding that is both adequate and steady. And I appeal to you, the American people: Join me in letting Congress know that nothing matters more than our freedom and peace. And therefore, the new strength America has achieved in recent years must not be undermined, but built upon.

It is my hope that the Senate will give early and favorable consideration to the two Conventions, and give its advice and consent to ratification so that ratification by the United States can be effected and instruments of ratification deposited no later than June 30, 1987.

During 1985, the Nation's activities in aeronautics and space continued to provide significant benefits. The basis for future space missions has expanded by acquiring new scientific knowledge about the solar system and the physical and life sciences; processing materials and manufacturing new products in space that have commercial potential; and intensifying the concentration of aeronautical research and development programs in potentially high-payoff technologies that will allow the United States to maintain a technological advantage in international competition.

To remind Americans of the need to keep safety in mind while on the Nation's waters, one week out of every year is designated as National Safe Boating Week. This year, it is estimated, over 68 million Americans will enjoy boating on our country's lakes, rivers, streams, oceans, and bays. Boating is fun and relaxing, but the marine environment is not without hazards. Therefore, it is imperative that all boaters learn and practice safe boating techniques.

Because of these developments, it is vital that all boaters understand the courtesies and basic principles of boating safety. Using a boat requires knowledge and experience, just like operating an automobile. Uneducated boaters not only expose themselves to hazards, but also jeopardize their passengers and other boaters. A lack of knowledge, coupled with fatigue, alcohol or drug use, or faulty equipment, can produce fatal results. Since the majority of boating accidents are due to operator error, education is the key to their prevention.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twentieth day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Everett E. Bierman, currently Ambassador of the United States of America to Papua New Guinea and to the Solomon Islands, to be Ambassador to the Republic of Vanuatu. He will be nominated to serve concurrently and without additional compensation. This is a new position.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Joseph Carlton Petrone to be Representative of the United States of America to the European Office of the United Nations, with the rank of Ambassador. He would succeed Gerald P. Carmen.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 21st day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Miss Gray. Mr. President, this is prolife America greeting you today. And as you can see, the determination of prolife America is that we are going to save these babies. We are not letting any elements or anything deter us. And we want to work strongly with the White House and the legislators, because we are going to have the paramount human life amendment. And we await your word, Mr. President.

The President. Well, Nellie, it's evident to me that you're not going to let a little weather stand in the way of this noble cause, and to all of you there in this year's March for Life: Welcome to Washington, and thank you for your commitment to the right to life of America's unborn children.

Today you remind all of us that abortion is not a harmless medical procedure but the taking of the life of a living human being. This tragic and terrible toll continues at a rate of more than 4,000 young lives lost each day. Our national commitment to the dignity of all human life must begin with the respect for our most basic civil right: the right to life. In my State of the Union Address last year, I observed that America will never be whole as long as the right to life, granted by our Creator, is denied to the unborn. Together we can overturn Roe v. Wade, and end this national tragedy.

The President. Well, by your presence here today, Nellie and all of you, you answer the violence of abortion with confidence in our democratic process. Your nonviolent commitment to life can overcome the violence of abortion, and we shall overcome bitterness to reach a greater respect for human life. Many of you've already done much in our legislatures and courts. Others of you've provided counseling and compassionate care for women seeking alternatives to abortion. Each woman who chooses life for her child affirms our reverence for human life and ennobles our society. Each child is a unique, unrepeatable gift, and every child who escapes the violence of abortion is an immeasurable victory for life.

During my administration we've worked together to restrict the use of Federal funds to perform abortions, we've denied government funds to organizations overseas that perform or promote abortion, and we have repeatedly called upon the Congress and the Supreme Court to take those steps necessary to overturn Roe v. Wade. Your prayers and your hard work have brought us a long way since the tragedy of 1973. Together, with God's help, we will finish the task and heal our wounded nation. God bless you all.

Miss Gray. We want to thank you very much for these words, and particularly those which talk about the things that we can do. For instance, we can stop the funding of abortion. And when we were here last year, Mr. President, I asked if I could work with you and your staff on a number of things, one of which concerned the DC appropriation bill. Unfortunately, when that bill went through the Congress, we were trying to stop the funding there, and then I was needing a veto. But we didn't have someone in the White House that we could work closely with. And unfortunately, again, Mr. President, for the fifth year in a row, we have funds for abortion in the District of Columbia approved by our prolife President. And I want to work with you now with a commitment that there is a senior staff member in the White House with whom I personally can work so that we can stop the funds for abortions here in the District and assure that those appropriation bills are vetoed in the White House. Because, Mr. President, when you sign the bill, it's giving a blank check to the District of Columbia, and about 10,000 babies are killed with our tax dollars. Can we work with you to stop the funds for abortion in the District of Columbia, Mr. President?

The President. Nellie, I'll get on that right away to see what can be done. I hope you realize that some of this, with regard to vetoing, runs into the thing that I don't have, but that I've been asking Congress for for these 6 years. And we'll use your help, and that is the right to line-item veto.

Miss Gray. Well, I was thinking, Mr. President, that we veto the whole District of Columbia bill, because if there's one penny in there to kill the preborn babies, then the whole bill is bad. And, Mr. President, on this DC appropriation bill, you are veto-proof. It cannot be overridden, because we prolifers have more people in the Congress, that they will uphold your veto. And I want to work closely with you and your staff personally so that we stop the funds for abortion in the District.

Miss Gray. Thank you, Mr. President. The people who are here today are from very far away. They're from Massachusetts, Wisconsin, those buses have rolled in from New York and Pennsylvania. We're from all over the country.

Miss Gray. As you can hear, we're from all over the country, and we're so committed. And we will stay with you, and we will work to help get the funds stopped plus assure that there are appointments of prolife judges. And then I wanted to tell you, Mr. President, that Congressman [Robert K.] Dornan is introducing the paramount human life amendment today, and we will ask your support for that, too, please.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Charles H. Dallara, of Virginia, to be United States Executive Director of the International Monetary Fund for a term of 2 years. This is a reappointment.

The current Iranian assault on Iraqi forces near Basra is a reminder of the terrible suffering and loss which the Iran-Iraq war has brought to the peoples of the Gulf region. The continuation of this bloody struggle remains a subject of deep concern to the United States and to the entire world. It is a war that threatens not only American strategic interests but also the stability and security of our friends in the region.

As I have emphasized many times, we are determined to help bring the war to the promptest possible negotiated end, without victor or vanquished, leaving intact the sovereignty and territorial integrity of both Iran and Iraq. We cannot but condemn Iranian seizure and occupation of Iraqi territory, and we again call upon the Government of Iran to join the Government of Iraq in seeking a rapid, negotiated solution to the conflict.

We share the concern of our friends in the Gulf region that the war could spill over and threaten their security. We would regard any such expansion of the war as a major threat to our interests as well as to those of our friends in the region. We remain determined to ensure the free flow of oil through the Strait of Hormuz. We also remain strongly committed to supporting the individual and collective self-defense of our friends in the Gulf, with whom we have deep and longstanding ties.

Sec. 3. Cleanup Schedules. (a) The functions vested in the President by Sections 116(a) and the first two sentences of 105(d) of the Act are delegated to the heads of Executive departments and agencies with respect to facilities under the jurisdiction, custody or control of those departments and agencies.

Sec. 6. Litigation. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Order, any representation pursuant to or under this Order in any judicial proceeding shall be by or through the Attorney General. The conduct and control of all litigation arising under the Act shall be the responsibility of the Attorney General.

Sec. 9. Management of the Hazardous Substance Superfund and Claims. (a) The functions vested in the President by Section 111(a) of the Act are delegated to the Administrator, subject to the provisions of this Section and other applicable provisions of this Order.

This coming Tuesday I'll travel up Constitution Avenue from the White House to the Capitol to deliver my State of the Union Address. The House Chamber that night will be crowded -- Members of the House itself, Members of the Senate, the Justices of the Supreme Court, Cabinet officials, the diplomatic corps -- all will have come. Television lights will flood the rostrum from which I will speak, providing added moment, a reminder that the audience will extend far beyond the Chamber to you, the American people, and indeed to much of the world.

In a moment I'd like to share with you some thoughts about the agenda I'll outline to the 100th Congress on that historic night. But if you'll permit me, first I'd like you to join me in considering the State of the Union Address as an important American tradition, a tradition that on Tuesday night will represent the first great public event marking this the bicentennial year of our Constitution.

It's the Constitution itself -- article II, section 3 -- that mandates the President to inform Congress regarding the state of the American Union and to recommend measures that he considers, in the Constitution's words, ``necessary and expedient.'' President Washington appeared before Congress personally each year to offer his account of national problems and prospects. In 1801 President Jefferson was eager to show how different America was from Britain, where Parliament was opened by the monarch, so he put the practice of appearing in person to an end, substituting instead a written message. Presidents continued to send Congress written messages for more than a century, until in 1913 Woodrow Wilson revived the practice of delivering the message in person. Since Franklin Roosevelt seized upon the idea with his customary relish, no President has missed the opportunity to present his proposals before Congress face-to-face.

But whether delivered in person or in writing, these annual messages represent one of our nation's basic historical texts -- a body of writings that show our development from a fledgling Republic to a great bastion of freedom; that present our Presidents as individual men, struggling as best they could with the issues of their day; that in our time -- our own time -- provide continuity, a sense of the proud history that we as Americans have inherited.

In 198 Presidential messages to Congress certain themes reappear. National security -- there is Washington's urging that the Republic remain strong; for, in his words, ``To be prepared for war is one of the most effectual means of preserving peace.'' Economic growth -- there is President Fillmore's satisfaction in 1852 at all that we as a free people had accomplished: ``The population has almost quadrupled. Our boundaries have been extended. Our territory is checkered over with railroads and furrowed with canals.'' And then the great theme, the national experiment in human liberty -- President Monroe wrote in his final message that ``Our institutions form an important epoch in the history of the civilized world.'' And in President Lincoln's second message, we read of America as ``the last, best hope of Earth.'' Freedom, Lincoln stated, is a way that is ``plain, peaceful, generous, just -- a way which, if followed, the world will forever applaud, and God must forever bless.''.

On Tuesday night I'll follow the men who preceded me in office by addressing each of these themes. Of our national security, I will once again stress that no duty of the Federal Government is more important than the defense of this Republic. I will reassert the importance of the American virtues of boldness and innovation -- virtues embodied in our Strategic Defense Initiative. In addressing economic matters, I will announce initiatives regarding jobs, education, and continued economic growth -- measures designed to keep America competitive throughout the world and provide new jobs and opportunities here at home. And, yes, I will address the urgent need for the Federal Government to control its own spending and to do so permanently by amending the Constitution. And in speaking about the great theme liberty, I will state that our national experiment remains proud and successful. Now we must extend liberty to others, providing, in particular, steady and substantial aid to freedom fighters in Nicaragua and elsewhere around the globe..

All this we must do, I will argue, to live up to the best within ourselves and our history, to take our place beside those who have gone before in keeping this Republic ``the last, best hope of Earth.''.

The followup meeting of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe (CSCE) resumes its important work tomorrow in Vienna. It is charged with taking stock of developments in the ``Helsinki process'' and with charting the path ahead. The United States has worked energetically and in concert with our NATO allies to support full implementation of the Helsinki Final Act. All CSCE states must fulfill their commitments if we are to realize the promise of a more secure peace with respect for human rights and with greater cooperation among all the peoples of Europe and North America.

Progress has been achieved in some areas, but the human rights situation within the Soviet Union and other nations of Eastern Europe remains tragic. The resolution of some prominent individual cases is welcome, and we hope it will continue. However, sporadic gestures must be expanded into universal practice. Our attention must not be diverted from the severe abuses of human rights that persist. During the last round of the Vienna meeting, the United States and other allied delegations documented in detail failures by the Soviet Union and its Warsaw Pact allies to keep their Helsinki promises, particularly on human rights.

Looking ahead, the United States continues to believe that the credibility of the CSCE process depends on fulfillment of commitments already undertaken. We seek signs that the East is prepared to take actions -- and not just offer words -- to solve such problems as the treatment of Helsinki monitors and other political prisoners, divided families and spouses, persecution of religious believers, denial of the right of emigration, and radio jamming. Significant progress on these issues would establish the basis for a constructive and balanced outcome at Vienna. Such an outcome would not only give renewed impetus to the Helsinki process but also mark a welcomed step forward in overall East-West relations. I have instructed Ambassador Warren Zimmermann, Chairman of the United States delegation, to work toward these important goals.

All Americans, I know, share my outrage at the latest kidnapings of our citizens in Lebanon. Not only Americans but more than 20 citizens from 9 countries are now being held by terrorist groups there. Today my sympathy goes out to the friends and relatives of all these hostages. The terrorists appear to believe that by trafficking in human lives they can force sovereign governments to give in to their demands. But our government will not make concessions to terrorist groups despite their threats. For to give in to terrorist blackmail would only encourage more terrorism; to yield to their demands now would only endanger the lives of many others later.

I would like to add a special word to Americans in Lebanon. Where U.S. citizens are unjustly deprived of their God-given rights, the U.S. Government has an obligation to try to restore those rights. But there is a limit to what our government can do for Americans in a chaotic situation such as that in Lebanon today. In particular, the situation in West Beirut has deteriorated to total anarchy, with armed criminal groups taking the law into their own hands. For the past 12 years our government has regularly warned American citizens against travel to Lebanon. As recently as last Tuesday we reiterated our assessment that the situation there is ``extremely dangerous.'' The events of the past week provide striking confirmation of that assessment. Americans who ignored this warning clearly did so at their own risk and on their own responsibility. This weekend the U.S. Ambassador to Lebanon again was in contact with remaining Americans and advised them to leave.

Those who hold hostages, regardless of nationality, should release them immediately and unconditionally. Their acts of terror constitute a declaration of war on civilized society. I again join with civilized countries in condemnation of terrorist outrages. In conclusion, let me stress again that our government remains unrelenting and alert in its search for opportunities to secure the release of our citizens no matter how long that may take.

On January 28, 1986, America lost a great flagship, the Space Shuttle Challenger. Our Nation united in grief for the valiant crew and their families and in renewed resolve to move ahead with the peaceful exploration of space.

Our space program, and the scientists, engineers, and astronauts who have made it possible, symbolize the spirit of America: optimism and ingenuity, daring and determination. Their achievements have been an inspiration and a source of national pride. We admire the brilliance, the courage, and the hard work that have contributed to our country's preeminence in space.

Space exploration and the advanced technology that drives it benefit our laboratories, our industries, our farms, our hospitals, and our homes. This great adventure has enlarged our vision. Going outside our world we have come to know our own planet better -- yes, and to love it as a tiny oasis of life in the engulfing vastness and silence of space. Our space program has given us a new confidence in what the future holds. We have seen expanded opportunities for scientific study, for industrial and commercial growth, for security, and for discovery.

We owe an immense debt of gratitude to our space pioneers -- especially to those who made the ultimate sacrifice. The crew of the Challenger -- Michael J. Smith, Francis R. Scobee, Gregory B. Jarvis, Ronald E. McNair, Judith A. Resnik, Ellison S. Onizuka, and S. Christa McAuliffe -- set a high standard in education and training, in skill and courage. We can offer them no finer tribute than a pledge from each of us to strive for excellence in whatever we do -- to extend our grasp by reaching beyond it. For they have taught us that the sky is not the limit -- not for Americans.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-sixth day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

Tonight, I have come personally before the Congress to report on the State of our Union and outline how we can meet the goal of renewing the American spirit -- a spirit of excellence. To achieve this, I have asked all Americans to commence a new Quest for Excellence that will produce the third great American century. I said about America: her best days have just begun.

America's competitiveness in world markets is critical to maintaining and expanding our standard of living and the national security. I have established a national goal of assuring American competitive pre-eminence into the 21st century. Achieving that goal is the responsibility of all Americans.

Businesses must work more efficiently, setting high standards of quality, streamlining operations, discarding outmoded systems and management styles, adapting to change, and building on their tradition as entrepreneurs who saw a better way, had a better idea, worked a little harder. Workers must be enabled to reach their potential by taking advantage of new technologies and investing in education, training, self-improvement, and a pride in their work. Families, in concert with State and local governments, have the greatest responsibility of all -- creating an educational environment that can make our children productive citizens, able to achieve the best both spiritually and materially. We must strive for excellence in education.

I am charging the Secretary of Education with continuing to work with our Nation's governors to identify what works in American education and to seek out places of educational excellence that will serve as national models.

In addition, our colleges and universities should adopt more rigorous standards and higher expectations for academic and student conduct. Our teacher preparation curricula should shift from heavy emphasis on technique to subject matter mastery, and schools overall should do more to help parents form the character of their children. State and local governments also should consider extending the school year, as well as making better use of the time spent in school.

In addition, so that no one is left behind, we must renew our efforts and refocus our resources to help disadvantaged youth to enter the mainstream of our society. The Department of Education will be developing and publishing a What Works on the education of the disadvantaged. Furthermore, my Administration is proposing reauthorization of Chapters 1 and 2 of the Education Consolidation and Improvement Act (ECIA) and targeting resources on the neediest schools and youngsters; fostering greater innovation, experimentation, and parental choice; building accountability into the program; and providing incentives and rewards for success.

To assure that every American -- no matter what age -- learns to speak, read, and write English so as to be able to fully participate in our society and take advantage of the opportunities it affords, I am announcing a goal of raising literacy levels dramatically by the year 2000. In addition, we will be submitting proposals to reform bilingual education, allowing greater flexibility and innovation in federally funded bilingual education programs.

Promoting flexible job skills and greater work force mobility is also an important part of competitiveness. We will be proposing a new program to help all workers who are displaced by adverse economic factors, such as rural economic problems, technological changes at the workplace, or increased imports. This $1 billion program, combining the best elements of the current Trade Adjustment Assistance (TAA) and Job Training Partnership Act (JTPA) programs, will help an estimated 700,000 additional workers each year to adjust to change, learn new skills, or update old ones through retraining and counseling programs developed under the guidance of local private industry councils (PICs). It will also provide incentives for early return to the work force to lessen the burden on our unemployment insurance program.

In addition, we will be proposing necessary legislative changes in the administration of our Employment Service (ES) and Unemployment Insurance (UI) programs. These changes will give States greater flexibility in developing comprehensive approaches to target human capital problems. Specifically, we will ask that we amend our UI laws to devolve the financing, operation, and administration of these programs to the States, and that we amend the Wagner-Peyser Act to enhance State capability in designing and administering community labor exchange services.

Equally as important as helping dislocated workers to adjust to new demands of an increasingly global market is assuring that economically disadvantaged youth are not forgotten. We must assure that they are given the help and opportunities to acquire skills to make them productive citizens in an America that will critically need their talents.

My Administration is proposing an $800 million youth initiative targeted towards improving the skills of children in welfare families. This program would permit States and localities to use Federal funds to provide summer jobs, develop year-round remedial education and job training services, or a mixture of both. In addition, we will propose a new employment and training effort under the AFDC program: Greater Opportunities through Work (GROW). This program will encourage teenage parents and other young recipients of AFDC assistance who do not have a high school education to either stay in or return to school. Services under these programs could include remedial education and skills training that would help these young people break out of the welfare cycle and move towards real opportunities for rewarding careers and jobs.

Finally, I have asked the Secretary of Labor to initiate a study of the private pension system to see how it could be improved to reduce barriers to greater mobility in the U.S. work force. In addition, to enhance the effectiveness of the private pension system in providing retirement income security to American workers, my Administration will propose statutory changes to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA) to make it more flexible in dealing with overfunded pension plans while requiring employers to take needed steps to strengthen underfunded plans.

Science and technology are fundamental to U.S. competitiveness. America's pre-eminence in research and innovation has long been the envy of the world and a critical source of our national strength. Breakthroughs by Americans in such areas as medicine and transportation have consistently set the pace for an improved standard of living around the world, and American developments in communications, space, and even entertainment have captured the imagination of successive generations, setting benchmarks for American excellence in the years to come.

But, we must recognize that our trading partners, in their desire to improve their standards of living and market share, are catching up. We must ensure that adequate incentives are in place that will not only maintain our pre-eminence in initiating ideas and know-how, but also our lead in setting the pace at which these are translated into new products and processes.

We will initiate a number of measures to achieve these objectives. I am proposing that we double over 5 years the budget of the National Science Foundation. My Administration will establish a number of new government-private ``science and technology centers'' based at U.S. universities. These centers will focus on fundamental science that has the potential to contribute to our Nation's economic competitiveness, including areas such as robotics for automated manufacturing and micro electronics, new materials processing, and biotechnology.

We also will initiate a ``People-to-People'' exchange program in which scientists and engineers from Federal laboratories and the private sector will be encouraged to make their expertise available to each other through temporary assignment exchanges.

My Administration will implement a policy permitting all Federal contractors to own software, engineering drawings, and other technical data generated by Federal contracts in exchange for royalty-free use by the government. This will help commercialize non-patentable results of federally funded research.

Because it is important that business have adequate incentives to fund research here in the United States, we are seeking legal and regulatory stability for research and development in the R&D tax credit, as well as Section 861 tax rulings on the allocation of R&D expenditures overseas.

My Administration is also expanding our strong budgetary support for basic research, which has grown in real terms by 42 percent since 1981. Key new or expanded initiatives proposed in my 1988 Budget include design and construction by the United States, in conjunction with our friends and allies, of a permanently manned space station; development of a National Aerospace Plane; development of advanced civil space technology; global geospace science and planetary sciences programs; improved manufacturing technologies; hyper-speed integrated circuits; and mapping human DNA.

The Department of Defense in fulfilling its mission of ensuring our national security, also plays an important role in contributing to U.S. economic competitiveness. I am directing the Department of Defense, whose investment in R&D, testing, and evaluation will increase about 17 percent this year, and has more than doubled since 1982, to accelerate its ongoing efforts to ``spin off'' technologies to the private sector. Previous commercial applications of defense technology have included such things as night vision capability for use in police and rescue work and computer-based reading training programs to develop basic and job skills. Technologies targeted for future potential spinoffs include: ceramic composite materials for more efficient engines; ultra-reliable radar for air traffic control systems and commercial aircraft; and enzymes for improved toxic waste disposal and decontamination. In addition to its primary function of strengthening deterrence, our Strategic Defense Initiative (SDI) should yield important spin-offs. As with the Apollo and space shuttle programs before it, SDI will advance scientific progress across a broad range. The Department of Defense will also work to assist industry in renewing its manufacturing competitiveness in the critical technologies.

Critically related to improving development of science and technology is ensuring protection, both domestically and internationally, of the property rights of inventors of new products and services and creators of new ideas and works of art.

We will seek statutory changes to: encourage patent owners to engage in newer and more novel ways to license their patents by limiting the ``patent misuse doctrine;'' raise protection for products resulting from patented processes to the same level as that accorded such products by our major trading partners; and amend the Clayton Antitrust Act to provide a more flexible standard of review for intellectual property licensing arrangements. Furthermore, we will restore the bargaining power of parties contracting to license technology by codifying and clarifying the Supreme Court holding in Lear v. Adkins; eliminating the current injury requirement from Section 337 ITC proceedings to exclude imports; and restoring the term of patents covering agricultural chemical products and animal drugs up to a maximum of 5 years to account for the period lost due to mandatory Federal premarketing regulatory review and testing. My administration will propose statutory changes to: reduce the cost of defending patent rights by: (1) mandating an award of attorneys' fees in frivolous suits on cases of willful infringement; and (2) requiring challenges to patent validity to first go through an administrative proceeding before going to court.

We will also be proposing the necessary statutory changes to our copyright law to permit the United States to join the Berne Convention for the Protection of Literacy and Artistic Works. Seventy-six countries have signed this treaty; by joining, our country will gain copyright relations with approximately 20 countries with which we currently have none, or relations are unclear.

I will issue an Executive order to better protect business confidentiality under the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) by giving businesses the opportunity to object to the release of commercial information submitted to the government.

My Administration will also propose statutory changes to FOIA expanding the definition of the ``trade secrets'' and ``confidential commercial information'' exemption to permit the government to withhold information that would cause harm to the Federal Government or commercial sector if released.

In addition, the Patent and Trademark Office will be making its technology file of U.S. patents and English language abstracts of Japanese and European patents available as a research tool to business and universities through private contractors or regional search centers.

Outmoded rules, regulations, excessive paperwork, and self-imposed disincentives can place us at a major disadvantage in an increasingly competitive world marketplace. We will propose a number of legal and regulatory reforms to eliminate these obstacles to competitiveness.

We must stop draining off resources from our economy through product liability judgments that have gotten out of hand. We will propose legislative measures to reduce the costly product liability insurance spiral affecting the production costs of U.S. goods while still providing the necessary protections for consumer health and safety.

Businesses in the 21st century will have to compete on a global scale; to do so, they cannot be bound by rules designed to fit the far different markets of the early 20th century. Thus we will be proposing antitrust refinements to allow firms to develop new ways of organizing and operating that take account of the increasingly global nature of markets.

I am directing the Cabinet to undertake a review of the export controls program and report to me by early March, 1987. While preserving U.S. security interests, the Cabinet is to provide recommendations to achieve the following: decontrolling technologies that offer no serious threat to U.S. security; eliminating unilateral controls in those areas where there is widespread foreign availability; and reducing the time necessary to acquire a license by at least one-third and implementing a fair, equitable, and timely dispute resolution process. These actions must be coordinated with efforts by our allies to make procedures more uniform and enforcement more rigorous.

We will reinforce our efforts to improve the competitiveness of American industry through deregulation and paperwork reduction. I have asked Vice President Bush to direct the Task Force on Regulatory Relief to take a fresh look at the Federal regulatory structure from the competitiveness standpoint and to improve or eliminate unnecessary regulatory and paperwork burdens. We will press for legislation to complete the deregulation of the trucking industry and will oppose efforts to re-regulate air and rail transportation. We will continue to pursue legislation to seek full deregulation of the pricing and transportation of natural gas, including repeal of demand restraints in the Fuel Use Act, and to repeal the windfall profits tax. We will also propose legislation to implement oil pipeline deregulation.

The litmus test of whether we will be truly competitive in the 21st century will be our ability to meet the competition head-on -- and win -- in the international marketplace. The Federal Government can play a key role here by helping to shape an international environment in which American knowledge, talent, and entrepreneurship can flourish.

In an increasingly interdependent world, currency flows, foreign government policies with respect to spending, saving and taxes, and trends in foreign investment all have a major impact on the competitiveness of American firms. We must shape these factors in ways that enhance, not inhibit, our competitiveness. This will require improved economic and monetary cooperation on a global scale. We will build on progress over the past year, including the new institutional arrangements we have developed both multilaterally and bilaterally, to guarantee a more stable and realistic value for the dollar, improved growth abroad, and an accompanying growth in markets for American firms.

The developing countries, particularly those in Latin America, represent new, growth markets of the next century. We will work to ensure that these markets meet their full potential by pressing our initiative on the debt problem, with a view towards increasing private investment and encouraging the necessary policy reforms within the developing world.

My Administration has aggressively used the funding provided in last year's ``war chest'' legislation to combat aggressively foreign predatory financing practices. We will focus our efforts on achieving an international agreement limiting these practices. But at the same time, our trading partners and competitors should be on notice that we will use our full authorities to counter foreign subsidized credit offers. To this end, we will be seeking the additional $200 million in ``war chest'' monies promised last year.

We will not tolerate closed markets, trade barriers, and unfair foreign subsidies that disadvantage American firms in the world marketplace. We will aggressively seek to open foreign markets through multilateral and bilateral negotiations and eliminate foreign unfair trade practices whenever and wherever they occur through the active use of our trade laws.

We must ensure that the laws of the trading system recognize the commercial realities of the 21st century. We made major progress this past year in securing the launch of a new round of multilateral trade negotiations in GATT. We will push hard for quick results from the Uruguay Round in areas critical to our competitive future, including agriculture, services, intellectual property, and investment.

We will also seek to achieve a major market opening close to home. More trade passes between the United States and Canada than between any other two countries in the world. We are now engaged in historic negotiations with Prime Minister Mulroney's government on a free trade agreement that will improve commercial opportunities on both sides of the border and serve as a model for trade liberalization on a global scale. We will work with the Canadians and the Congress to conclude an agreement in our mutual interests.

We will continue to assure that bribery to gain markets is deterred with criminal sanctions. However, uncertainty and ambiguity arising from portions of the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act serve as a needless disincentive to American business. My Administration will again propose amendments that eliminate these uncertainties by clarifying the Act's ``reason to know'' and other provisions and reduce its costly and duplicative accounting requirements.

Our trade laws have proven to be effective instruments for opening foreign markets and defending American industries against unfair practices on the part of our competitors. I will propose improvements to these laws that will enhance our ability to meet the challenges from abroad without erecting protectionist barriers at home. Our proposals will emphasize opening markets through multilateral and bilateral negotiation, not closing them; encouraging adjustment while providing improved relief to industries injured by import competition; and tightening our laws to make them more effective in dealing with unfair foreign competition.

Controlling Federal spending remains an essential element of our efforts to strenghten the economy and place it on a firm footing for the future. My Administration is continuing efforts to reduce the deficit. We have proposed a budget that meets the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit target, and does so by reducing spending, not by raising taxes. I urge its passage by the Congress.

Working together, we need to begin to explore ways in which the budget process itself can be reformed and improved. Many Members of Congress feel that the system through which budget decisions are made is not working the way it should, and I share that view. Its deficiencies, unfortunately, are reflected in the results. Deadlines for congressional action too often are missed or ignored; the threat of a government-wide shutdown has become an almost regular feature of the beginning of fiscal years; and the end product of this process remains a Federal budget that provides for excessive spending and a large deficit. I am committed to working with the Congress to establish procedures to encourage cooperation rather than confrontation between the Executive and Legislative branches on the crucial issues of Federal spending and to adopt measures that will help make the budget process more responsible and more accountable.

Finally, I will again propose that the Congress adopt a Balanced Budget Amendment to the Constitution and the establishment of a line-item veto. Adoption of a Balanced Budget Amendment would represent our acceptance of a simple yet fundamental principle -- the Federal government must live within its means. A line-item veto would further enhance our capacity to reduce and eliminate wasteful and redundant expenditures. I strongly recommend that these two reforms be adopted.

From the beginning of this Republic, agriculture has been the backbone of America and is the Nation's largest single industry. We can be proud that each American farmer now feeds 88 of our citizens plus 30 people abroad. Yet in spite of this bounty, all is not well in rural America. Farmers have suffered from events that in many cases have been beyond their control, such as unfavorable currency exchange rates, unfair competition, and government interference. Still, most farmers retain their faith in America and their dedication to our free enterprise system. We must stand by them through these troubled times.

Major farm legislation was put into effect last year to address those concerns. The Food Security Act of 1985 was a significant improvement over previous legislation but has not addressed several continuing problems. Commodity programs still provide too much incentive for overproduction. Our farmers are required to produce to qualify for payments and loans. Program costs are at an historic high, and some farmers receive very large individual payments. In addition, our sugar program is unfair to our consumers, our trading partners, and many developing countries.

We will ask the Congress to make improvements in farm legislation. Our proposal will be designed to break the link between eligibility for payments and production decisions, to further lower target prices and loan rates and to impose tighter limits on farm program payments. We will also ask for an overhaul of our sugar program. These changes will help U.S. agriculture focus more on market forces and less on Washington; net outlays for agriculture will come down gradually and will still be very generous for the next several years. The resulting reduced government influence and greater reliance on the marketplace will be essential to the long-term competitiveness and viability of U.S. agriculture. At the same time, we will continue to press aggressively for comprehensive agricultural negotiations during the Uruguay Round. Our farmers deserve a level playing field in order to compete fairly in international trade and we are committed to make that objective a reality.

The financial services industry must be permitted to keep pace with changing technology, global competition, and consumer demand for expanded services. I am proposing that the Congress implement the recommendations of Vice President Bush's Task Force on the Regulation of Financial Services. We must rationalize our Federal regulatory structure.

A little over 1 year ago, the Congress asked us to devise a plan to rescue the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation (FSLIC). We responded early in 1986 with a plan based on two fundamental principles. First, we have devised a truly self-help plan; the taxpayers will not be required to bailout a profitable industry that, with some measure of sacrifice over time, can help itself. Second, our recapitalization plan has sufficient resources (about $25 - 30 billion over 5 years), available when necessary, to meet the very real problems that exist today. By giving FSLIC the resources to handle the hundreds of insolvent Savings & Loans still in operation, we will protect almost $900 billion of depositors' savings insured by FSLIC.

Both Houses of Congress passed our FSLIC recapitalization plan in the closing days of the 99th Congress, but it was not enacted into law because of disagreements about unrelated amendments. We cannot afford additional delay. I urge the 100th Congress to enact our FSLIC plan quickly and cleanly so that it can get the resources it needs to safeguard America's small savers.

I also urge the Congress to work with us and the rapidly growing coalition of forward-looking financial firms to develop a comprehensive modernized legal structure for the financial services industry. The ``protectionist'' approach of repairing the crumbling walls of 50-year-old financial oligopolies will not work: consumer tastes, technology, the marketplace, and our international competition will move beyond.

Working men and women want to receive the best services at the lowest prices. They also seek safety and convenience. Our businesses and local governments want competitive and innovative financial offerings. Many banks and other firms are pressing for an opportunity to supply these products and services. Our laws should not stop them.

We need to promote a freer, more competitive financial services marketplace, complete with proper supervision and meaningful disclosure. In doing so, we can help this vital American industry to reposition itself on the leading edge of the financial services world.

We will submit proposals to improve the management of the Federal Government. These management reform measures are designed to achieve long-term gains in Federal efficiency and productivity and include proposals to improve existing financial procedures, combat fraud, waste and abuse, and generally make more effective tools available to Federal managers. The Congress should establish productivity improvement as a national goal. There can be no more important task than that of delivering government services to all our citizens in a more efficient, effective, and timely manner.

As part of this effort, we will submit a number of proposals for civil service reform -- proposals that will help our government give the American people what they pay for by deregulating the bureaucracy and by rewarding individual merit and achievement. By straightening out the way our Federal bureaucracy does its work, we can deliver on our promises to the American people quickly and efficiently. The proposed Civil Service Simplification Act will streamline an overly complex system. It will free our public servants from thousands of pages of unnecessary rules and regulations that have made it hard for them to do their jobs. As with deregulation of private business, this proposal will deregulate the public's business; it will provide for a Federal pay system truly based on merit and individual performance; it will, in other words, introduce into our Federal Government the traditional productive values of the American workplace: entrepreneurial freedom, responsiveness to the people, and reward for hard work.

To aid in achieving the goal of a 3 percent annual productivity increase, we will also propose reform of seniority pay for Federal employees. This will introduce pay-for-performance throughout the government by shifting from the current system -- which gives seniority-based salary raises to virtually all Federal employees regardless of personal achievement -- to one based solidly on merit and individual performance. With stronger incentives to deliver, Federal employees will participate more in the program and apply their insights and skills to the development of productivity initiatives.

My Administration will propose that the Congress enact the Health Insurance and Payment Verification Act. This legislation would establish a process to ensure that existing employment based health insurance would pay health care costs before payment was sought from taxpayer funded health programs.

An expiring provision of the Deficit Reduction Act of 1984 allows the Federal Government to recover delinquent debts owed Federal agencies through the offset of income tax refunds otherwise due the taxpayer. This program is very successful and through legislation we will seek to extend this authority for another 2 years.

Last year, significant changes were made in defense procurement processes. My Administration will work with the Congress this year to make numerous needed reforms in the Federal Government's non-defense procurement area. These will include a comprehensive recodification of all existing procurement statutes into one simplified, consistent statute, as well as authority for Federal civilian agencies to enter into multiyear contracts. The Federal Government should depend more on the private sector to provide support services for Federal activities. We will pursue this objective through a variety of initiatives aimed at reducing any adverse effects on government employees from contracting out. For example, we will explore measures to encourage employees to form their own business and take over their government jobs as private contractors.

Government procurement should be competitive in all aspects, including keeping pace with costs and salaries for comparable services procured by the private sector. We will propose legislation to increase the Davis-Bacon and Service Contract Act threshold levels to $1 million for defense contracts and $100,000 for non-defense Federal contracts. This increase is important in light of increases in salaries and other costs over the past several decades.

In order to operate more efficiently to the benefit of taxpayers, the government must take better account of the true budget costs of Federal credit programs. We are proposing legislation to reform government assistance programs by requiring that the present value of federally provided subsidies from any agency making or guaranteeing loans be appropriated in advance into a new central revolving fund within the Department of the Treasury. Newly made direct loans will be sold and new guarantees reinsured in order to establish the market value of federally assisted credit and measure the subsidy. This will improve both the allocation and management of Federal credit.

The private sector should have the opportunity wherever possible to produce goods and services currently provided by the Federal Government in order to reduce government expenditures as well as provide the benefits of market competition to consumers. In light of our successful efforts to authorize the sale of Conrail, we are now proposing the sale to the private sector of the Naval Petroleum Reserves, the Alaska Power Administration, the helium program, and excess real estate, as well as the disposition of certain Amtrak assets. We are proposing legislation to authorize a study of a possible potential divestiture of the Southeastern Power Administration. In addition, my Administration will expand our pilot program of selling existing loan assets without recourse.

Small business is at the cutting edge of America's competitiveness. The 1986 National White House Conference on Small Business has provided us with recommendations on many issues addressed by my legislative agenda. These recommendations are directed towards creating a better environment for our Nation's small business owners who, through their vitality and creativity, contribute significantly towards our prosperity. The recommendations range from tort law and product liability reform to reducing the deficit and improving our international trade position. These views have been incorporated in framing our positions on these issues. In addition, we soon will have a permanent Administrator for the Small Business Administration (SBA), and I can assure you that the small business will continue to have an important voice in the councils of government.

As we work to expand economic opportunity for all Americans, we must also take steps to sustain the traditional cultural and moral values that are the bedrock of American democracy. We must renew our belief in the dignity of self-supporting individuals and families, in safe and self-governing neighborhoods and communities, and in a government that is both limited and close to average citizens. By promoting policies that sustain and enrich these values, we can help to create an environment in which all Americans utilize their individual talents to achieve excellence and contribute to family, community, and nation.

I have already said how important quality education is to our future economic success. But we must also promote policies that recognize the importance of education as the main transmitter of our shared history and values and as the primary means of escape from poverty for America's poor. Following the pattern of What Works and Schools Without Drugs, the practical handbooks issued in 1986, my Administration will prepare a clear and reliable handbook this year to explain what works in the education of the disadvantaged.

A year ago, I asked the White House Domestic Policy Council to evaluate our Federal public assistance programs and to propose a new national strategy for helping poor Americans ``escape the spider's web of dependency.'' This year, I will address the main findings of that evaluation, which was contained in our report, ``Up From Dependency,'' released in December.

Our report shows, clearly and persuasively, that our vast and expensive welfare system is a tender trap: while it rescues many Americans from short-term distress, it also sustains far too many in long-term dependency. Our current welfare system is a complex labyrinth of 59 major programs that cost more than $132 billion in Fiscal Year 1985. Forty other Federal programs for the poor brought total low income spending to $150 billion, yet our poor and our taxpayers receive little in return for this enormous annual investment. The current welfare system is so complex and its incentives so perverse that it demoralizes the poor, undermines the willingness to work, and weakens families and communities.

I will propose a major new national strategy to reform this flawed welfare system. Our goal is to create a system that gives poor Americans the opportunity and aid to escape the tender trap of welfare and become more productive and self-reliant contributors to American society. Our proposal will ask that Federal welfare requirements be waived to allow States to establish a series of demonstrations in welfare policy. We are not proposing to cut Federal welfare benefits for the truly needy. The idea is to begin a process that will tap the hundreds of good self-help and anti-poverty ideas currently blossoming around the country. For too many years our Federal welfare policies have assumed that all of the answers could come from experts in Washington, D.C. Those policies have had 20 years to work and have failed. Our demonstration strategy seeks to find solutions to poverty and welfare dependency in the practical genius of the States, communities, and individuals who must cope with those problems every day.

The problem of welfare dependency cannot be separated from the well-being and solidity of America's families. Both common sense and social science tell us that intact, two-parent families will be far better off financially and socially than will families led by a single father or mother. Family breakup remains the primary reason that family income falls below the poverty line.

My Administration is committed to supporting public policies that strengthen the role and bond of families in American life. Last year at this time, I charged my Domestic Policy Council's Working Group on the Family to study and issue a report on the state of the American family. This year I am endorsing the report, released to the public in November, as a landmark in understanding the ways in which government policies have affected, often adversely, family life in our Nation. My Administration will also work to implement the recommendations contained in the report.

Since 1973, after a divided Supreme Court ruled in Roe v. Wade, nearly 20 million unborn children have perished in our land due to abortion. This toll continues to climb -- despite increasing evidence of the humanity of the unborn child and the growing desire of millions of young couples to adopt. My Administration will submit legislation this year to further my commitment to protect the rights of unborn children. Our proposals would prohibit Federal government funds from being used to: (1) perform abortions, except when the life of the mother is endangered if the unborn baby were carried to term; and (2) support, through Title X family planning grants or contracts, any organization (except a grant or contract directly administered by a State or local government) that provides abortion procedures or referral for abortion, unless the life of the mother would be endangered.

Our Nation's health care system is the finest in the world, yet it is also a very expensive system with costs that are continuing to rise faster than the rate of inflation. My Administration has worked since 1981 to create incentives that would keep health costs down and improve quality by encouraging more competition in health care delivery. In 1987, we will again ask the Congress to pass legislation to expand the use of private health plan options -- paying a fixed, predetermined price for health services -- to the government medical programs of Medicare and Medicaid. My Administration will also propose that Medicare payments to doctors who practice in hospitals be reflected in a set price for each medical diagnosis; this will provide further incentives for doctors to provide quality care at lower costs.

To encourage private health care competition, my Administration will propose an optional Medicaid health plan, offering States fiscal incentives to place Medicaid beneficiaries in private health insurance plans that provide comprehensive, managed care for a predetermined price. We will also ask Congress to pass a Medicare Expanded Choice Act, which will allow the elderly to choose the private health plan that best suits their needs. Each plan would have to offer coverage at least equivalent to that of basic Medicare.

My Administration will also continue to invest in research to cure heart disease, cancer, and other life-threatening diseases. In particular, we will continue our work to find a cure for acquired immune deficiency syndrome, or AIDS. We are also increasing basic research to better understand the causes of AIDS and to find a cure for AIDS or a vaccine to prevent it. Last year the Surgeon General issued a report that was a landmark in public education about AIDS. We will expand that education effort this year, stressing that education about AIDS to schoolchildren must be grounded in the moral and cultural values of parents and communities.

All Americans, and especially our elderly, face a small but significant risk of a devastating illness or accident that will bring with it crushing medical bills. Most of us have adequate financial protection through private or public insurance, but because the risk is small, not all of us pay attention to the implications of a truly disastrous illness. We need to remind ourselves to make sure we were adequately protected, and both private industry and government should continue to work together to be sure that such protection is available to all of us at affordable prices.

With this in mind, I will shortly submit to the Congress a proposal to improve catastrophic illness coverage to the elderly to avoid the fear of an acute care illness so expensive that it can result in having to make an intolerable choice between bankruptcy and death.

Nothing erodes our Nation's basic social fabric more than drug abuse. Last year our Administration made the fight against drug abuse a top priority, working with Congress to pass sweeping legislation to attack this problem both among users and suppliers.

This fight is a top priority again this year. We will continue to implement our six-point program to achieve a drug-free America, through achieving drug-free workplaces and schools, expanding drug treatment and research, greater international cooperation, enhanced law enforcement, and increased awareness and prevention of illegal drug use. We are devoting large and appropriate amounts of money to this fight. From 1981 to 1986, Federal drug enforcement funding increased by 130 percent, and the number of FBI and Drug Enforcement Agency agents assigned to drug investigations nearly doubled. Our task this year is to implement the new legislation and to use our money wisely, even as we continue our public and educational campaign to change, once and for all, any lingering perception that drug abuse is a victimless crime. We will work through the National Drug Enforcement Policy Board, and with our friends and allies in the world community, to implement the enforcement provisions of the anti-drug law aimed at reducing the supply of drugs into our country. Just as important, our Departments of Education and Health and Human Services will expand their efforts to reduce the demand for drugs, especially among our children. The resources in the fight against drug abuse consist of much more than Federal money, however. They include the efforts of all Americans and institutions -- parents, schools, churches, civic groups, and State and local governments. We must continue, as an Administration and as a nation, to encourage every American to ``Just Say No'' to illegal drugs.

Part of the American dream has always included safe and affordable housing, and this Nation's housing quality and rate of home ownership are among the best in the world. Our last 4 years of economic progress have reduced interest rates and raised take-home pay, putting home ownership within the reach of ever more Americans. Industry studies show that more Americans are now able to afford housing than at any time in the last 8 years.

Our challenge now is to bring quality housing within the reach of even poor Americans. To do this, we will continue to expand the use of rental housing vouchers, which increase mobility and housing choices for the poor. Since 1984 more than 141,000 vouchers have been appropriated for poor families. We will also continue our public housing home ownership initiative. On January 8 of last year, a McKeesport, Pennsylvania, family became the first in the country to buy its own home under this initiative, which seeks to give poor Americans the sense of personal pride and responsibility that comes with home ownership. We will also continue our efforts to reduce housing construction costs through the Joint Venture for Affordable Housing, to improve the management and upkeep of existing public housing units, to fight housing discrimination by strengthening government law enforcement, and to better target our public housing aid by asking the Congress to approve a Tenant Income Verification proposal that would make it easier to determine who is truly in need.

Pride in ownership also depends on pride in neighborhood, and once again this year we intend to ask the Congress to revitalize our Nation's poor neighborhoods by passing legislation to create enterprise zones. More than half of the States have already demonstrated how much these zones can contribute to economic growth by removing tax and regulatory obstacles to develop in depressed urban and rural areas. My Administration will also work to help distressed communities by asking Congress to extend the National Flood Insurance Program to 1992, and by seeking legislation to make disaster assistance more timely, cost-effective, and better managed. As part of my Administration's emphasis on strengthening Federalism, we will continue to eliminate excessive Federal directives for State and local community development activities under our Community Development Block Grant program.

In this 200th year of our Constitution, we as a Nation need to reaffirm the basic federal principle that the best form of government is often the one closest to our citizens. In April of last year I signed a ``Statement of Federalism Principles'' to begin this reaffirmation, and last November I reviewed a report on the ``Status of Federalism in America'' prepared by our Administration's Federalism Working Group. The revitalization of Federalism as our system of constitutional government is a return to the vision of an indivisible union of States -- a system in which the national government exercises sovereign authority in accord with the limits of its constitutionally enumerated powers, and the States exercise sovereign authority in all other areas.

This year we intend to implement reforms outlined in our report. We will review proposed legislation and executive actions to identify their constitutional authority and justification and their impact on our Federal system's balance of powers. We will also continue to oppose the use of grants as a means to indirectly regulate States in areas, such as the 55 mile per hour speed limit, in which they have traditionally exercised authority. We will oppose efforts to preempt State laws, except when the Constitution plainly indicates a legitimate Federal concern.

Our Constitution is dedicated to the belief that our system of justice must strike a balance between enforcing the rules of a civilized society and sustaining human liberty. In areas where our laws or court decisions have tilted too far in either direction, we must do what we can to restore the proper balance.

My Administration will work first of all to regain this balance in our criminal justice process. In 1987, I will again support legislation to impose the death penalty in appropriate Federal criminal cases and to modify habeas corpus procedures to reduce delay in State courts and make it clear to criminals and society that justice is swift and sure. I will also submit legislation to modify the exclusionary rule so that evidence seized by police in a good-faith belief that the seizure was lawful may be introduced as evidence at a trial. Based on last year's report of the Commission on Pornography, I have also approved a seven-point program designed to curb the growth of child pornography and obscenity. I call upon the Congress to pass swiftly the legislation we will propose to protect our children from this menace.

In appointing members of the judiciary, I have tried to select women and men committed to justice under law. Chief Justice Rehnquist and Justice Scalia, confirmed last year to their positions on the Supreme Court, understand well John Marshall's insight that our Constitution provides ``a rule for the government of courts, as well as of the legislature'' and the executive. I will ask the Senate to continue working with me to appoint judges who understand the dangers of unrestrained judicial power, and who are committed to legal interpretation based on our Constitution rather than on individual policy preferences.

I will also propose initiatives to reduce the increasing burden of litigation in our society. I have already mentioned that we will again propose tort reform legislation. We will also investigate potential reforms to help with the problems of increasingly high attorneys' fees and damage awards.

My Administration remains committed to enforcing our civil rights laws. We must not be diverted from our pursuit of justice because of government policies that treat individuals differently based on their race or ethnic background, even when those policies are well-intentioned. My Administration will oppose legislation that provides government preferences based on race or other special categories, and not to all Americans. The American ideal is to allow equal opportunity for all, not to enforce equality of results or outcomes.

My Administration has worked throughout its time in office to protect our environment, even as we have worked to develop our enormous natural resource wealth -- on and off shore. Last year I signed bills committing Federal money to clean up toxic waste and to protect the Nation's supplies of drinking water.

This year we will continue to study the issue of stratospheric ozone depletion. We will also continue to work with private industry, the scientific community, and our neighbors in Canada to monitor and find solutions to the presence of acid rain in forests and waterways. We are also developing proposals that make use of market incentives to control air pollution caused by sulfur dioxide and nitrogen oxide emissions and the causes of acid rain. We hope to work with the Congress to ensure that air quality is improved without reducing economic growth or damaging the competitiveness of our Nation's industry.

We recognize the importance of maintaining America's energy security. In 1987 we will consider one of the decade's most important resource management decisions -- the future use of the coastal plain of the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge in Alaska. This area is blessed both with abundant wildlife and potentially enormous oil reserves that are vital to America's energy security. My Administration will recommend to the Congress a management solution that best balances our environmental heritage with the Nation's economic and national security needs. I have received the report of my Commission on Americans Outdoors, and it will be studied by the Domestic Policy Council. We will also continue to fill the Strategic Petroleum Reserve, to reach an eventual goal of 750 million barrels. And once again, we will seek legislation to standardize designs and simplify licensing for nuclear power plants. Our goal is a stable, predictable process that encourages nuclear plant construction that is reliable, cost-effective, and environmentally sound. Our democratic allies in the developed world have proven that well managed nuclear power can be a major source of safe and cheap home-grown energy; thus, America needs to revitalize its own nuclear power industry. I have also ordered a high-level interagency review of U.S. energy security to determine what other actions we can take to avoid overdependence on foreign oil and to strengthen our domestic oil industry.

America's transportation network is the envy of the world, yet the demands of our expanding economy require that we continue making expansions and improvements. For 1987 I will propose legislation to extend and amend the Airport and Airway Improvement Act. This legislation will allow my Administration to continue to modernize the Nation's air-traffic control system, increase the number of air-traffic controllers and aviation inspectors, and improve the Airport Grant program. Last year was one of the busiest but safest ever in America's air transport history, and these new proposals will ensure the continued safety, reliability, and capacity of our national aviation system.

My Administration will also seek continued authorization of Highway and Mass Transit programs through FY 1990, and we will propose legislation to increase both State and local discretion in using Federal highway funds. In accordance with our federalism principles, we believe that State and local governments are usually better able than the Federal government to determine local transportation improvement needs.

In the past 6 years, my Administration has worked to inspire private individuals and companies to play a more active role in their communities. We will continue this successful effort, which is now being copied around the world. If individuals and community groups take more responsibility for public affairs, we are less likely as a Nation to cede our freedom and opportunity to the Federal government.

In the past 6 years my Administration has pursued a foreign policy based on realism -- about the world we live in, about the nature of our adversaries, about the need for American leadership. To close gaps that had opened in the past, we were obliged to undertake a significant rebuilding of our defense capabilities. As a result, our allies have greater confidence in America, and the Soviet Union is more willing to work seriously for arms reduction.

Peace and progress, of course, depend on much more than a sound military balance. That is why, in the same spirit of realism, we encourage democracy, freedom, and respect for human rights by all nations. In this decade democracy has been on the march. Country after country has joined those nations where the people rule. We have supported those freedom fighters who bravely make sacrifices so their nations will enjoy freedom and independence.

The successful conduct of foreign policy rests upon a strong bipartisan spirit in the Congress, and close cooperation between the Legislative and Executive branches. I am pledged to continue this long-held tradition, and hope the Congress will see the importance of doing the same. Toward that end, in the near future, I will send the Congress a full and comprehensive report on American foreign policy.

Last October, my Iceland meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev brought great progress in the area of arms reduction. There is much work to do, and we continue to work in this area. It is, however, only one of several items on our agenda with the Soviets. No fundamental and lasting progress is possible in one area of our relations without improvement elsewhere.

My Administration is engaged in a broad range of bilateral and multilateral arms control negotiations. Our objectives include: deep, equitable, and verifiable reductions of nuclear arsenals; a cooperative transition by the United States and the USSR to a strategic regime based increasingly upon defenses; verifiable limits on nuclear testing; a global ban on chemical weapons; and conventional force reductions to redress imbalances in Europe. In each of these negotiations, we are guided by principles of equity, increased stability, effective verification and strict compliance with both past and future agreements. I look forward to meeting again with Mr. Gorbachev to advance this important work.

Responsible Soviet conduct abroad is essential to a peaceful international environment. I have urged Mr. Gorbachev to withdraw all Soviet forces from Afghanistan and to allow genuine Afghan self-determination, to cease support for Cuban expeditionary forces in Africa, and to promote a withdrawal of Vietnamese forces from Cambodia. In the absence of such actions, the Soviet Union can hardly expect to be treated as a respectable member of the international community.

In the Soviet Union today there is much talk of change. We must hope for a true break with the past, but we see both hopeful and discouraging signs, especially in the critical area of human rights. Certain better-known dissidents have been released while others continue to receive very harsh treatment; tragically, emigration remains at an historic low, and religious persecution continues unabated. My Administration will welcome, and respond to, positive steps toward greater respect for human rights, while expressing our views on the enduring nature of the Soviet system.

One of the most important obstacles to improved East-West relations, which touches on all elements of our agenda, is the continuing unnatural division of the European continent. Toward the states of Eastern Europe, our policy of differentiation remains intact; in particular our trade relations with them will continue to reflect the extent of internal freedom and foreign policy independence from Moscow.

The extraordinary surge of democracy that we have seen in the past 6 years, particularly in the developing world, benefits us politically, economically, and strategically. Democratic transitions are nonetheless fragile; they require constant nurturing and careful support. This Administration will continue to work with and support those nations that share our interests and values. By diplomatic and other means we can help create the peaceful environment in which free institutions flourish.

To help create such an environment, the Congress should support adequate funding levels for economic and security assistance. The year 1987 is the 40th anniversary of the Marshall Plan, a reminder that American commitment and generosity serve our own interests while changing the course of history for the better. Our goal is to foster peace and stability by helping friendly nations to defend themselves and by encouraging market-oriented economic growth abroad. We continue to work toward the elimination of hunger and extreme poverty for both humanitarian and security reasons. Thus, American interests are harmed if our programs in this area are cut by the Congress below adequate levels, as they have been.

The advance of democracy and the strengthening of peace are closely related. Nowhere is this clearer than in our own hemisphere. We must continue to provide support and assistance to freedom fighters in Central America. To that end I will ask the Congress for renewed assistance for the Nicaraguan democratic resistance, which faces a Leninist dictatorship that has received over a billion dollars of Soviet-bloc arms. I also strongly support a supplemental appropriation for the economic development of the Central American democracies.

State-sponsored terrorism has increased dramatically in the last few years. When such incidents go unpenalized, further terrorist efforts are encouraged. We will continue to build our capability to deter and, when necessary, to combat swiftly and effectively state-sponsored terrorism worldwide. In this regard, I am requesting necessary funding to continue the multi-year program to improve the protection and security of our personnel and facilities overseas.

The people of the Philippines, whose history is closely linked with ours, acted last year to reconfirm their democratic traditions. We encouraged them, and applauded their success. This year, my Administration will seek additional support to assist the Aquino Government, as it confronts serious economic and security problems. The rebuilding of political institutions and restoration of investor confidence are Filipino goals that America must support.

My Administration will continue to enforce the Comprehensive Anti-Apartheid Act of 1986. We seek an end to Apartheid and will use our influence to foster a peaceful transition to a truly free, democratic, and multi-racial society. We will offer a special economic assistance program for southern Africa. We will also seek to restructure economic assistance to Africa so as to reinforce positive policy reforms in a growing number of African nations. This approach, whose goal is to promote investment and economic growth in Sub-Saharan Africa, is reflected in the Administration's FY 1988 budget request.

The United States must be able to communicate information and ideas on a worldwide basis. Ongoing expansion of America's international broadcasting capability -- the Voice of America, Radio Free Europe/Radio Liberty, and Radio Marti -- must therefore continue. Increased resources for the United States Information Agency are also needed to reach this goal. In addition, the National Endowment for Democracy and its subsidiary elements -- including free labor, free enterprise, and the political parties -- permit the United States to help strengthen the infrastructure of democracy, particularly in the less developed countries. Funding for this program is very small; the potential return on our investment, very high.

In the past, the ideals of the UN Charter have often been trampled under foot. The United States remains committed to restoring efficiency and impartiality to the United Nations and effectiveness to its peacekeeping activities. We will use our influence to restore respect in the UN for the principles on which it was founded.

My Administration will continue efforts to achieve the fullest possible accounting of our servicemen missing from the Vietnam War. Recent progress can continue with the strong bipartisan support in the Congress for this humanitarian issue. Also, my Administration is committed to aiding refugees and those countries providing first asylum to them. International organization support, multilateral and bilateral programs, and resettlement opportunities in the international community are all required to ensure humanitarian treatment of these homeless and shattered peoples.

The Administration is proud of a path-breaking agreement reached this past year with the Pacific island states over the long-contentious tuna fishing issue, one that our adversaries have tried to exploit. Modest but indispensable funds are needed to meet our obligations under the agreement.

The increased resources we have devoted to national defense in the past 6 years have brought many benefits -- above all, a lasting peace. Our forces have been modernized, the quality and spirit of those in uniform have risen to the highest levels, and we have begun work on new technologies that can protect America in the future and free us from the nuclear balance of terror.

All these efforts must continue. We need realistic and sustained growth in defense funding to consolidate the real gains we have made. The budget I have proposed meets this goal. The alternative is unacceptable: spending less will unavoidably mean less security. We cannot keep America strong without committing the resources that this effort requires.

In keeping with the recommendation of the Packard Commission, and as required by the 1986 Defense Authorization Act, I have submitted a two-year national defense budget for 1988 - 1989. The Packard Commission stressed no point more than the need for greater stability in defense funding. Rollercoaster, surge-and-starve budgeting leads to higher costs and dangerous risks to national security. Furthermore, I want us to get our money's worth from every defense dollar spent. Under the leadership of the Secretary of Defense, with the expert help of the new Under Secretary of Defense for Acquisition, this Administration will continue to take important strides toward improving the acquisition system. Other major changes in DoD organization and the procurement system have been underway, some since the beginning of this Administration. So I hope the Congress will withhold further efforts to legislate defense procurement reform until the effect of these changes can be fully evaluated.

Our Strategic Modernization Program is essential to assuring our national safety in the years ahead. The strength it provides is also the indispensable foundation for negotiating the deep cuts we seek in nuclear arsenals. The Soviets are willing to bargain and make concessions only if they understand that -- in the absence of agreements -- America will provide for her own security.

Strategic Defense Initiative research explores the way to move toward a world in which effective defenses, rather than threats of retaliation, keep the peace. This vital program reinforces our policy for arms reductions -- as an incentive for the Soviets to agree to real arms reductions and as an insurance against cheating on arms reductions agreements. The pace of research to date has been impressive, and I will ask the Congress to increase funding so that we can continue moving forward.

My Administration will continue to maintain an effective nuclear deterrent, but at the same time it is essential that we and our allies modernize and strengthen conventional land, air, and naval forces so they can carry out their missions in the face of a steadily increasing Soviet threat. That will cost more money than the Congress has been willing to vote the last 2 years, but it is essential.

America will continue to deploy military forces throughout the free world as proof of solidarity with our Allies and other friendly nations, and as a deterrent to those who might threaten our peace and freedom. Forward deployments not only underscore our national policies, but also provide valuable exercises and training for Active, Guard, and Reserve Component Forces.

The Soviet Union has the world's only operational ASAT system. The U.S. miniature homing vehicle ASAT system that can deter the Soviets from using their system in times of crisis is in development. Its test program, however, has been blocked by a congressional unilateral ban that prohibits tests against targets in space. The Soviets are under no such prohibition. I will continue to urge the Congress to lift this moratorium as soon as possible. I will strongly oppose its extension beyond October 1, 1987. Such unilateral restrictions on the U.S. leave the Soviets with capabilities that endanger America's security.

Keeping America strong means more than acquiring ships, tanks, and planes. Those who wear the uniforms of our armed forces must receive appropriate recognition for the sacrifices and hardships that they are called upon to endure on our behalf. My Administration will take the necessary steps to continue to improve the quality of life for those in uniform. In this way we can retain the high-quality trained people serving now, all as volunteers, and provide sufficient incentives to recruit the qualified people that we need in the future.

As we revitalize our naval forces, we face the need to build home port facilities that can accommodate our growing fleet and to protect our vital merchant ports in the least vulnerable but affordable way. We must continue to implement and expand our strategic home-porting program.

Last fall I sent to the Congress a classified report on the threat to our security from the activities of hostile intelligence services. The report set out a blueprint of legislative and administrative measures to enhance our ability to meet this threat. I hope the Congress will act on our recommendations.

We must maintain the viability of our technology base and pursue new developments in conventional weapons technology. The armaments cooperation initiative with our Allies helps us to improve acquisition management, share technological advances within the Alliance, and enhance collective defense. The Soviet Union should regard the industrial unity of the West as an unbeatable force. We must not squander our gains through careless or felonious transfers of technology to potential adversaries. My Administration will continue our successful effort to curb the theft of strategic technology by the Soviet bloc.

This year of the 200th anniversary of our Constitution affords us the opportunity to make momentous strides in our quest for national excellence. It will require the efforts of all of us -- not just the government, but all the people. To achieve this greatness really comes down to just being our best. No government plan or program is capable of enacting such sweeping change and reform. All the Federal spending in the land cannot buy excellence. It must occur as part of the natural instinct of free people to compete for the highest standard. The proposals and actions outlined in this message will form the foundation to meet the challenge of the third American century.

I look forward to working with the Congress in a bipartisan fashion in order to achieve this worthy goal. For when it comes to the future of America, there must be no Republicans or Democrats -- only Americans.

Today is a day to commemorate and a day to salute. We commemorate the magnificent Challenger Seven, whom we lost last year at this time, and we salute you, the men and women of America's NASA team. America will never forget that terrible moment a year ago when our elation turned to horror and then to grief and pain. Seven of our finest perished as they reached for the boundaries of space, where Earth ends and the path to the stars begins.

No, we will never forget them. They represented so much of the best that is in our land. There were Dick Scobee and Michael Smith, both heroes of battle, both experienced test pilots, both with the heart and soul the great explorers have always had -- always searching, always reaching. There were Judith Resnik, Ellison Onizuka, Ronald McNair, and Gregory Jarvis. They were pioneers of the mind as well as the stars. From every corner of America, they had come -- and from many backgrounds -- to join hands in a common adventure. Don't they, by their example, tell us just why it is our blessed land has become so great? And of course, there was Christa McAuliffe, whose profession was among humanity's most honored and revered: that of a teacher. She had hoped on that mission to give history's first lessons from space, lessons that were to be beamed to schoolchildren across America and around the world. Well, she never got to give those lessons in space science, but she and the others did teach America's children something, nevertheless, something precious, something enduring, something perhaps more valuable than any other lesson they will ever learn.

I remember in the hours and days following the tragedy there was talk of the permanent trauma the children of America might suffer as a result of viewing the shuttle disaster. And, yes, the events that day did leave their impression on them, but not the one that we feared -- no, instead, one that can make us all proud of the strength and spirit, the courage and love, of our young people. You can see that lesson reflected in one simple fact: The number of new memberships in our Young Astronauts Program has never been higher. This past year I spoke to a meeting of the Young Astronauts, and I can tell you that another place that lesson is reflected is in those Young Astronauts eyes. They know that exploration has its risks. They know that with adventure also goes danger. They know all this, but they also know something far more important: something about the spirit and sense of joy that have kept man reaching through the ages to grasp for the limits of his universe and beyond that, despite hardships and peril, kept explorers like Columbus, Magellan, and Drake sailing into uncharted oceans, that, despite comforts they left behind, kept pioneers like Boone, Carson, and Clark crossing America's frontier, that keep us still reaching for the unknown. Christa McAuliffe and all the magnificent Challenger Seven taught this lesson of courage, spirit, and love to America's children, and now it's for all of us to learn the lesson from them.

This has been a year of careful self-examination at NASA. Under the able leadership of Jim Fletcher, you've moved quickly to implement the recommendations of the Phillips task force and the Rogers commission and have just completed a broad and important reorganization. Everyone on the NASA team has again shown their dedication, their commitment to excellence, and now NASA has begun to resume its forward progress. This year we mark the third decade of space exploration. In those three decades, with NASA in the lead, mankind has received images from the outer reaches of our planetary system, sampled the climate of Mars, learned new and undreamed of truths about our own planet, and landed a man on the Moon.

In the next three decades NASA will again lead in mankind's dreams. In just 2 years Voyager II will pass Neptune and unlock for us the secrets of that distant brother to our own Earth. By the end of the next decade, the Galileo orbiter and probe will tell us more than ever before about Jupiter; and the Hubble space telescope will be in orbit, looking into deep space, helping us understand the creation of solar systems like our own; and in an international project, the Ulysses probe will teach us more about the Sun. These unmanned projects are the scouts for manned space travel of decades to come. In the next decade we in America will continue man's personal adventure into space. You will soon be starting development on the space station to have it ready by the midnineties. The space station will be our gateway to the universe, our foothold in outer space, the keystone of our space program. With it as our base camp, we will be able to reach the planets and, perhaps one day, to the stars. We hope our friends and allies will join us in this great adventure.

Well, the answer to that question is a resounding yes. Perhaps we've been derelict in not doing more to make known the literally thousands of human-oriented technological developments that have spun off from the program and which will affect all our lives and the lives of our children and our children's children. There's every reason to believe these spinoffs will become of tremendous value. Already they include lifesaving technologies like the programmable heart pacemaker, the CAT scanner, and lifesaving fireproof vests for firemen. Space spinoffs have made drinking water safer for communities in developing countries. Technology from the Lunar Rover now makes it possible for paraplegics to drive automobiles, and drive them safely. Our automobile engineers in Detroit are using lightweight, superstrong, plastic-like materials -- outgrowths of space program technology -- to reduce the weight of cars. For consumers that means more miles per gallon. And in the future the space program will be making materials in space, where we can manufacture in 1 month's time lifesaving medicines that it would take 30 years to produce here on Earth. I understand that a project is now being developed to pass on to all Americans specific knowledge of this aspect of the space program. The United States Space Foundation, a nonprofit educational foundation, is preparing a series of TV and radio public service statements so that all Americans will be aware of these achievements and how they will benefit all of our lives. I think this is a worthy effort.

The Challenger crew, lost one year ago on the 25th Space Shuttle mission, dedicated themselves to America's leadership in space exploration. That leadership depends not only on our courage and determination, but also on the knowledge, capability, and inspiration of our students who will be the researchers and the astronauts of the 21st century.

In recognition of the critical need to provide America's students with access to outstanding space science education and to motivate study and excellence in science, the families of the Challenger crew established a Challenger Center for Space Science Education. This Center will honor the memory of the Challenger crew with an ongoing monument to their achievements, to their courage, and to their dedication to future generations of space explorers.

Cardiovascular diseases, including heart disease, stroke, and other vascular disorders, will claim the lives of nearly one million Americans this year. Cardiovascular disease is this Nation's number one health problem -- causing more deaths than cancer, accidents, pneumonia, and influenza combined -- and one-fifth of all people killed by cardiovascular disease are younger than 65.

More than 63 million of our citizens, more than one-fourth of our population, suffer from some form of cardiovascular disease. High blood pressure alone threatens the lives of more than 57 million Americans age 6 and older. Heart disease strikes regardless of age, race, or sex, and its toll in human suffering is incalculable.

But we are making progress against the Nation's number one killer. The American Heart Association, a not-for-profit volunteer health agency, and the Federal government, through the National Heart, Lung and Blood Institute, have been working together since 1948 to find better ways to prevent cardiovascular diseases and stroke and to inform the public and educate the medical community about the most effective techniques to treat the disease.

Medical advances such as new surgical techniques to repair heart defects, improved pharmacological therapies, emergency systems to prevent death, and knowledge to prevent heart disease from occurring have significantly reduced premature death and disability due to cardiovascular disease and stroke. From 1972 to 1984, the death rate has dropped 32.5 percent.

Cardiologists and other health professionals are seeking to reduce the risk of heart disease, stroke, and atherosclerosis (hardening of the arteries) by encouraging Americans to control high blood pressure, stop smoking, and reduce the amount of cholesterol, saturated fats, and sodium in their diets. The American Heart Association, working with two million volunteers, has contributed to this effort through its support of research and its commitment to educating Americans about the need to adopt a sound regimen of proper diet and exercise.

I have today signed H.J. Res. 93, which temporarily prohibits strikes or lockouts with respect to an ongoing dispute between the Long Island Rail Road and certain labor organizations representing its employees. The urgency with which this legislation was passed reflects the enormous hardship visited upon the citizens of the communities served by the Long Island Rail Road that has been caused by the current strike, now in its second week.

In the rush to pass this emergency measure, however, I am advised that the drafters of the joint resolution borrowed heavily from legislation passed during 1986 in the context of a dispute arising under section 10 of the Railway Labor Act. While section 10 deals with rail strikes that threaten essential transportation services of significance to the entire Nation, the dispute this legislation addresses arises under section 9A of the act, which covers rail commuter services that are generally local in nature. The distinction is important because the words ``essential transportation services'' in section 10 are a term of art, used to describe the circumstances in which certain discretionary Presidential actions authorized in the act are warranted.

The current dispute under section 9A, as disruptive as it is to those who commute on the Long Island Rail Road, does not threaten the essential transportation services of the Nation as a whole nor does it threaten the national health or defense. Characterizing the shutdown of the Long Island Rail Road as a threat to essential transportation services could have the undesirable effect of requiring Federal involvement in the future in a multitude of local disputes which should be settled by collective bargaining. I have been informed that the proponents of H.J. Res. 93 attribute the overly broad language in the bill to the exigencies of hurriedly redrafting the earlier legislation used as a model. I am satisfied from the remarks on the floor of the Senate immediately prior to passage of the joint resolution that the references to ``essential transportation services of the Nation'' and to the ``national health and defense'' are intended to have no effect whatsoever in determining the appropriate circumstances for the exercise of Presidential discretion under section 10 of the Railway Labor Act.

There is one additional respect in which I hope that this legislation will not serve as a precedent. The passage of this legislation marks the first time that the Congress has intervened in a labor dispute under section 9A of the Railway Labor Act. Even in those cases where the national well-being and safety are directly affected, the Congress and this administration agree that the Federal Government should be reluctant to interfere in the collective bargaining process. This is especially true in the case of rail commuter services that serve discrete localities. The integrity of the administrative procedures under the Railway Labor Act depends upon the willingness and ability of the parties to settle disputes themselves within the time-frames mandated by the act, and subject to the discipline of the marketplace. While the temptation to intervene in local disputes such as these will always be great, the consequences for the collective bargaining process counsel strongly that we do so in only the rarest of circumstances.

For 6 years, my Administration has pursued policies to promote sustained, noninflationary growth and greater opportunity for all Americans. We have put in place policies that are in the long-term best interest of the Nation, policies that rely on the inherent vigor of our economy and its ability to allocate resources efficiently and generate economic growth. Taming the Federal Government's propensity to overtax, overspend, and overregulate has been a major element of these policies.

Our market-oriented policies have paid off. The economic expansion is now in its fifth year, and the growth rate of the gross national product, adjusted for inflation, should accelerate to 3.2 percent in 1987. By October, the current expansion will become the longest peacetime expansion of the postwar era.

Since the beginning of this expansion, the economy has created more than 12 million new jobs. In each of the past 2 years, the percentage of the working-age population with jobs was the highest on record. Although I am encouraged by the fall in the overall unemployment rate to 6.6 percent in December 1986, I will not be satisfied until all Americans who want to work can find a job.

Our efforts to reduce taxes and inflation and to eliminate excessive regulation have created a favorable climate for investing in new plant and equipment. Business fixed investment set records as a share of real gross national product in 1984 and 1985, and remains high by historical standards.

Despite the economy's tremendous gains in employment and production, inflation has remained below or near 4 percent for the past 5 years and, in 1986, declined to its lowest rate in 25 years. Although last year's low inflation rate in part reflected the substantial decline in energy prices during 1986, we expect inflation in 1987 to continue at the moderate pace experienced during the first 3 years of the expansion. The financial markets have acknowledged our progress in reducing inflation from its double-digit levels, and interest rates declined during 1986, reaching their lowest levels in 9 years. To sustain these developments, the Federal Reserve should continue to pursue monetary and credit policies that serve the joint goals of growth and price stability.

In short, since 1982, we have avoided the economic problems that plagued our recent past -- accelerating inflation, rising interest rates, and severe recessions. Production and employment have grown significantly, while inflation has remained low and interest rates have declined. This expansion already has achieved substantial progress toward our long-term goals of sustainable economic growth and price stability.

Government should play a limited role in the economy. The Federal Government should encourage a stable economy in which people can make informed decisions. It should not make those decisions for them, nor should it arbitrarily distort economic choices by the way it taxes or regulates productive activity. It should not and cannot continue to spend excessively, abuse its power to tax, and borrow to live beyond its means.

The Federal Government should provide certain goods and services, public in nature and national in scope, that private firms cannot effectively provide -- but it should not try to provide public goods and services that State or local governments can provide more efficiently. When government removes decisions from individuals and private firms, incentives to produce become dulled and distorted; growth, productivity, and employment suffer. Therefore, to the greatest extent possible, the Federal Government should foster responsible individual action and should rely on the initiative of the private sector.

My 1984 State of the Union Message set tax reform as a national priority. After more than 2 years of bipartisan effort, we achieved our goal last fall when I signed into law the Tax Reform Act of 1986. Tax reform broadens the personal and corporate income tax bases and substantially reduces tax rates. These changes benefit Americans in at least three ways.

First, by reducing marginal tax rates, tax reform enhances incentives to work, save, and invest. Second, by reducing disparities in tax rates on income from alternative capital investments, tax reform encourages more efficient deployment of investment funds. Investment decisions will now reflect the productive merits of an activity more than its tax consequences, leading to a more efficient allocation of resources, higher growth, and more jobs. Finally, tax reform makes the tax system more equitable. The simpler, lower rate structure will make compliance easier and tax avoidance less attractive. Americans will know that everyone is now paying his or her fair share and is not hiding income behind loopholes or in unproductive shelters. Tax reform will especially benefit millions of working poor by removing them from the Federal income tax rolls.

We have successfully reformed the tax code, controlled inflation, and reduced government intervention in the economy. The result has been an expansion of production and employment, now in its fifth year, which we fully expect will continue with greater strength in 1987. Although much has been accomplished, we must and will address the remaining challenges confronting the economy. We must continue to reduce the Federal budget deficit through spending restraint. We must reduce the trade deficit, while avoiding protectionism. We must strengthen America's productivity and competitiveness in the world economy. And we must reform our costly, inefficient, and unfair agricultural programs.

Deficit reduction must continue and must be achieved by restraining the growth of Federal spending -- not by raising taxes, which would reduce growth and opportunity. Large and persistent Federal deficits shift the burden of paying for current government spending to future generations. Deficit reduction achieved through spending restraint is essential if we are to preserve the substantial benefits of tax rate reduction and tax code reform; it is also essential for reducing our international payments imbalances. Finally, spending on many programs exceeds the amounts necessary to provide essential Federal services in a cost-effective manner.

Besides exercising spending restraint, we must reform the budget process to build a check on the Federal Government's power to overtax and overspend. I support a constitutional amendment providing for a balanced peacetime budget, and I ask the Congress to give the President the same power that 43 Governors have -- the power to veto individual line items in appropriations measures.

Maintain Free and Fair Trade. -- One of the principal challenges remaining for the U.S. economy is to reduce our trade deficit. However, we cannot accomplish this, or make American firms more competitive, by resorting to protectionism. Protectionism is antigrowth. It would make us less competitive, not more. It would not create jobs. It would hurt most Americans in the interest of helping a few. It would invite retaliation by our trading partners. In the long run, protectionism would trap us in those areas of our economy where we are relatively weak, instead of allowing growth in areas where we are relatively strong.

We cannot gain from protectionism. But we can gain by working steadfastly to eliminate unfair trading practices and to open markets around the world. This year, I will continue to press to open foreign markets and to oppose vigorously unfair trading practices wherever they may exist. In addition, I will ask the Congress to renew the President's negotiating authority for the Uruguay Round under the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade. These talks offer an important and promising opportunity to liberalize trade in areas critical to the United States; trade in services, protection of intellectual property rights, fair rules governing international investment, and world trade in agricultural products.

More remains to be done to end our trade deficit. We must sustain world economic growth, increase productivity, and restrain government spending. For U.S. exports to grow, the economies of our trading partners must grow. Therefore, it is essential that our trading partners enact policies that will promote internally generated economic growth. At the Tokyo Economic Summit last year, the leaders of the seven largest industrial countries continued efforts, begun at the Versailles Economic Summit in 1982, to increase international coordination of economic policies. We must also continue to encourage developing countries to adopt policy reforms to promote growth and restore creditworthiness.

Here in the United States, we must restrain government spending. Our trade deficit in goods and services reflects that, over the past several years, we have spent more than we have produced -- and we have spent too much because of the profligacy of the Federal Government. As the Congress reviews my proposed 1988 budget, it should remember that a vote for more government spending is a vote against correcting our trade deficit.

Strengthen Productivity and Competitiveness. -- We must work to improve our international competitiveness through greater productivity growth. The depreciation of the dollar since early 1985 has done much to restore our competitiveness. However, we do not want to rely on exchange-rate movements alone. Productivity growth provides the means by which we can strengthen our competitiveness while increasing income and opportunity. Since 1981, U.S. manufacturing productivity has grown at a rate 46 percent faster than the postwar average. This is a solid accomplishment, but still more remains to be done. We must encourage continued productivity growth in manufacturing and in other sectors of our economy.

One way to strengthen our global competitiveness is to free American producers from unnecessary regulation. My Administration has sought to deregulate industries in which increased competition will provide greater benefits to consumers and producers. It has also streamlined the Federal Government's regulatory structure. Americans have benefited significantly from the deregulation of airlines, financial services, railroads, and trucking. I will resist any attempt to reregulate these industries. Our economy will benefit further if we eliminate natural gas price controls, remaining trucking regulations, and unnecessary labor market restrictions. Also, without compromising the Nation's air quality, we should eliminate the bias that exists in current air pollution regulations against cleaner and more efficient new factories and power facilities. Where regulation is necessary, its costs should be balanced against its benefits to ensure that regulatory efforts are applied where they do the most good and to avoid placing American firms at a competitive disadvantage in the world marketplace.

Privatization shifts the production of goods and services from government ownership to the private sector. Privatization can also improve American competitiveness because private firms can produce better quality goods and services, and deliver them to consumers at lower cost, than can government. For these reasons, Americans benefit when government steps aside. Like deregulation and federalism, privatization embodies my Administration's belief that the Federal Government should minimize its interference in the marketplace and in local governance. We must return more government activities to the competitive marketplace by selling or transferring government-owned businesses. In 1986, the Congress authorized the Department of Transportation to sell Conrail in a public offering, which we hope will take place this year. Other businesses suitable for privatization include the Naval Petroleum Reserves, the Alaska Power Administration, and Amtrak.

Reform Agricultural Policies. -- Another high priority in 1987 must be to reform our agricultural programs. Besides costing taxpayers $34 billion this year alone, these programs divert land, labor, and other resources from their most productive uses. Most farm programs are costly and unfair because they give literally millions of dollars to relatively few individuals and corporations while many family farmers -- who are those most often in need -- receive little. In the process, farm programs raise the prices of many food items for all Americans, rich and poor.

Farm income support should not be linked to production through direct subsidies or propped-up prices for agricultural products. My Administration will seek a market-oriented reform package with two goals: gradually separating farm income support from farm production, and focusing that income support on those family farmers who need it most.

The economic policies of my Administration have created greater economic freedom and opportunity for men and women, private firms, and State and local governments to pursue their own interests and make their own decisions. These policies have produced a sustained economic expansion with low inflation, lower tax rates and a simpler tax code, the unshackling of industries from regulation, a surge in investment spending, and more than 12 million new jobs.

The American people demand a sound, productive, growing economy. Therefore, I shall continue to pursue policies to encourage growth, reduce the Federal budget deficit, correct the trade deficit, and strengthen the competitiveness of American producers. The American people will not tolerate a replay of the failed economic policies of the past. Therefore, I shall resist proposals to adopt any economic policy that abandons the accomplishments of tax reform, stymies growth, fuels inflation, perpetuates needless government interference in the marketplace, or fosters protectionism. With the help and cooperation of the Congress, we can sustain and strengthen the current economic expansion, and preserve and extend the economic achievements of the past 6 years.

The United States has traditionally been in the forefront of efforts to codify and improve the international rules of humanitarian law in armed conflict, with the objective of giving the greatest possible protection to victims of such conflicts, consistent with legitimate military requirements. The agreement that I am transmitting today is, with certain exceptions, a positive step toward this goal. Its ratification by the United States will assist us in continuing to exercise leadership in the international community in these matters.

The Protocol is described in detail in the attached report of the Department of State. Protocol II to the 1949 Geneva Conventions is essentially an expansion of the fundamental humanitarian provisions contained in the 1949 Geneva Conventions with respect to non-international armed conflicts, including humane treatment and basic due process for detained persons, protection of the wounded, sick and medical units, and protection of noncombatants from attack and deliberate starvation. If these fundamental rules were observed, many of the worst human tragedies of current internal armed conflicts could be avoided. In particular, among other things, the mass murder of civilians is made illegal, even if such killings would not amount to genocide because they lacked racial or religious motives. Several Senators asked me to keep this objective in mind when adopting the Genocide Convention. I remember my commitment to them. This Protocol makes clear that any deliberate killing of a noncombatant in the course of a non-international armed conflict is a violation of the laws of war and a crime against humanity, and is therefore also punishable as murder.

While I recommend that the Senate grant advice and consent to this agreement, I have at the same time concluded that the United States cannot ratify a second agreement on the law of armed conflict negotiated during the same period. I am referring to Protocol I additional to the 1949 Geneva Conventions, which would revise the rules applicable to international armed conflicts. Like all other efforts associated with the International Committee of the Red Cross, this agreement has certain meritorious elements. But Protocol I is fundamentally and irreconcilably flawed. It contains provisions that would undermine humanitarian law and endanger civilians in war. One of its provisions, for example, would automatically treat as an international conflict any so-called ``war of national liberation.'' Whether such wars are international or non-international should turn exclusively on objective reality, not on one's view of the moral qualities of each conflict. To rest on such subjective distinctions based on a war's alleged purposes would politicize humanitarian law and eliminate the distinction between international and non-international conflicts. It would give special status to ``wars of national liberation,'' an ill-defined concept expressed in vague, subjective, politicized terminology. Another provision would grant combatant status to irregular forces even if they do not satisfy the traditional requirements to distinguish themselves from the civilian population and otherwise comply with the laws of war. This would endanger civilians among whom terrorists and other irregulars attempt to conceal themselves. These problems are so fundamental in character that they cannot be remedied through reservations, and I therefore have decided not to submit the Protocol to the Senate in any form, and I would invite an expression of the sense of the Senate that it shares this view. Finally, the Joint Chiefs of Staff have also concluded that a number of the provisions of the Protocol are militarily unacceptable.

It is unfortunate that Protocol I must be rejected. We would have preferred to ratify such a convention, which as I said contains certain sound elements. But we cannot allow other nations of the world, however numerous, to impose upon us and our allies and friends an unacceptable and thoroughly distasteful price for joining a convention drawn to advance the laws of war. In fact, we must not, and need not, give recognition and protection to terrorist groups as a price for progress in humanitarian law.

The time has come for us to devise a solution for this problem, with which the United States is from time to time confronted. In this case, for example, we can reject Protocol I as a reference for humanitarian law, and at the same time devise an alternative reference for the positive provisions of Protocol I that could be of real humanitarian benefit if generally observed by parties to international armed conflicts. We are therefore in the process of consulting with our allies to develop appropriate methods for incorporating these positive provisions into the rules that govern our military operations, and as customary international law. I will advise the Senate of the results of this initiative as soon as it is possible to do so.

I believe that these actions are a significant step in defense of traditional humanitarian law and in opposition to the intense efforts of terrorist organizations and their supporters to promote the legitimacy of their aims and practices. The repudiation of Protocol I is one additional step, at the ideological level so important to terrorist organizations, to deny these groups legitimacy as international actors.

Therefore, I request that the Senate act promptly to give advice and consent to the ratification of the agreement I am transmitting today, subject to the understandings and reservations that are described more fully in the attached report. I would also invite an expression of the sense of the Senate that it shares the view that the United States should not ratify Protocol I, thereby reaffirming its support for traditional humanitarian law, and its opposition to the politicization of that law by groups that employ terrorist practices.

During this period U.N. Secretary General Perez de Cuellar continued his mission of good offices to achieve a negotiated Cyprus settlement. U.N. Under Secretary General Goulding visited Cyprus from November 6 to 12 to follow up on the Secretary General's discussions with Greek and Turkish Cypriot leaders in September and to explore with them how best to move forward.

According to the Secretary General's December 2 report to the Security Council on the U.N. operation in Cyprus (enclosed), Mr. Goulding discussed with the two Cypriot sides the Secretary General's approach to his mission of good offices and his effort to help the two parties achieve a negotiated settlement. He told the parties that the Secretary General was determined to pursue his efforts, preserving all that had been achieved so far and building on it for future progress.

The two Cypriot sides reiterated to Mr. Goulding their positions on the draft framework agreement submitted by the Secretary General last March. They also expressed their support for the Secretary General's good offices mission.

The President has consistently urged the release by the Senate Select Committee on Intelligence of its report on the Iran matter and the alleged diversion of funds to the anti-Sandinista forces and is pleased that this has now occurred. The committee's report is an important step toward getting to the bottom of this matter, as the President has promised. Toward this end, the President will continue to work with the select committees in Congress, the Tower board, and the Independent Counsel.

The Presidential Citizens Medal was established by Executive Order 11494 of November 13, 1969, for the purpose of recognizing citizens of the United States of America who have performed exemplary deeds of service for their country or their fellow citizens. The medal may be bestowed by the President upon any citizen of the United States at the sole discretion of the President. The announcement of the granting of the medal and the presentation ceremonies may take place at any time during the year.

In journalism, politics, and Government, Larry Speakes has faithfully served the cause of truth and, in doing so, has served the cause of America. Veteran of the White House press office for 9 years under three administrations, conducting some 2,000 daily press briefings during this Administration, Larry Speakes has become a familiar sight to all of us. America has come to know him as a man cool under pressure, conscientiously working to get the facts out -- a man whom the American people could always count on to tell them the truth. America is more knowledgeable because of Larry Speakes.

The report is consistent with the President's position that, from its inception, the Iran initiative was an effort to open a dialog with top officials of a strategically important country. Numerous documents summarized in the report indicate that this was the view of Iranians, as well as those on the American side. In implementing this policy, the release of hostages was an important preliminary step intended to show that the Iranians would no longer support terrorism and the sale of arms was a gesture of good faith on the part of the United States in pursuing this strategic opening. To be sure, the linking of arms sales to the release of hostages at several points during this 15-month episode could be interpreted as a trade of arms for hostages, but this was not the policy approved by the President.

The report contains no evidence whatsoever that the President was aware of, let alone approved, any diversion of funds to the contras. The report brings to light for the first time statements by Lt. Col. Oliver North -- in his initial interview with Attorney General Meese -- to the effect that he did not believe that the President was aware of the alleged diversion. In addition, Admiral Poindexter's statements to Mr. Meese and Donald Regan -- that he had not inquired into the matter because ``he felt sorry for the the contras'' -- substantiates the President's statements that he was never told of this plan.

The President today announced the appointment of Charles D. Hobbs to be Assistant to the President, with primary responsibility to develop and implement reforms of the Nation's public assistance system. He will assume his duties immediately.

The President. Welcome to the Old Executive Office Building. I'm still trying to find out how they got this thing built, because I think it was built before they had those big derricks. [Laughter] Well, it's good to see so many old friends and allies from the many battles of the budget that we've fought together. Despite the momentum of 30 years of steady growth in Federal spending, we've made, in these past 6 years, dramatic progress. For the first time in more than a decade, in real terms, the Federal Government this fiscal year is spending less than a year ago. And they said it couldn't be done.

Well, with Federal spending gradually being reined in, we've been able to reduce tax rates, bring inflation under control, and unleash the greatest antipoverty engine known to man: the free enterprise system of the United States of America. In the last 50 months almost 13 million new jobs have been created; 61 percent of the population over 16 years old -- the highest on record -- has gone to work. The stock market has doubled in value. And we've embarked upon what could become the longest peacetime expansion since the Second World War. These are tremendous accomplishments, accomplishments that must be protected. Which brings me to the subject of this gathering today.

In the last 2 weeks, as its first major official act, the 100th Congress enacted an $18 billion sewage treatment program that is so loaded with waste and larded with pork I cannot in conscience sign it. Not only is this act of Congress unacceptable as written, it is sad and deeply troubling for what it portends. Let me give you a brief history of this legislation. In 1985 we proposed a generous $6 billion program to carry on and win the fight against pollution in America's estuaries, lakes, rivers, and streams. Both political parties long ago agreed on the need for this legislation, and I felt that the executive branch and the Congress could surely agree on the amount. Well, last fall, however, as the campaign began to heat up, Congress tripled our proposal to $18 billion; and I was forced to use a pocket veto to protect the budget gains that we had made.

Early in the new year, in a spirit of compromise, we offered to Congress a doubling of the spending that we had proposed -- in other words, splitting the difference. We would go to $12 billion, and we found ways and means to achieve this within the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit targets. By offering to split the difference, we felt we could solve the problem to everyone's satisfaction and get on with the business of government. Not only, however, did the new Congress spurn our compromise, it sent down the same old $18 billion budget-buster with virtually unanimous support, defying me to veto again a piece of legislation that had something in it for most of the Members of both Houses.

Well, I accept that challenge, and I am vetoing this legislation. And let me tell you why. First, countless projects in this bill have less to do with water than they do with the politics of the pork barrel, with enabling Members of Congress to go home to their districts and say: Look how I brought home the bacon. Second, if this legislation is allowed to pass without my protest, it'll send a powerful signal to the markets of the Nation and the world that the United States has, once again, abandoned the high road of fiscal responsibility, that we're, once again, starting down the same dismal and discredited path of spend and spend that led to the near ruination of our economy less than a decade ago.

Now, I know this veto is going to be overridden. I know I do not have the votes to sustain it. But it's time we did the right thing -- all of us -- regardless of the political fallout. Just 3 nights ago, the Congress of the United States rose in unanimous applause when I declared from the Speaker's podium that the U.S. budget deficit was unacceptable and outrageous. Well, I'm now asking them to stand with me in the first great battle of the deficit in the 100th Congress. My friends on Capitol Hill, you cannot have it both ways. You cannot vote to radically increase deficits one day and decry them before the Nation the next. It's time for a little more political courage, a little more political consistency on the part of all of us.

With this veto I am imploring the Congress, once again, to stop, reflect, and reconsider before plunging ahead on this course. Do you really want to return to the politics of spend and spend? Do you really want to put at risk the immense progress that we've made together? Do you really want to aggravate a budget deficit as the primary cause of a trade deficit that has already cost thousands and thousands of American jobs? Let's not belly up to the same old bar, and let's not drive down that dangerous road again. Let's work together, both for clean water and responsible government.

In closing, let me say to both the Congress and the American people: I trust that this budget-busting water and sewer bill, the first major legislation of the new 100th Congress, proves to be an exception to the rule, an isolated error, and not a harbinger of things to come. For if it is, then Congress will not only have chosen to embark on a collision course with the executive branch, it would have risked, one day, being held fully accountable for derailing perhaps the greatest recovery the American people have ever known. Now, one bad test does not mean failing grades. So, let's hope that this is not a trend. And with that said, I shall take pen in hand.

I am returning herewith without my approval H.R. 1, the ``Water Quality Act of 1987.'' Because all regulatory, research, enforcement, and permit issuance activities are continued under permanent law and current appropriations -- including grants to finance the construction of sewage treatment plants -- I emphasize that my veto will have no impact whatsoever on the immediate status of any water quality programs.

The cleanup of our Nation's rivers, lakes, and estuaries is, and has been for the past 15 years, a national priority of the highest order. This Administration remains committed to the objectives of the Clean Water Act and to continuing the outstanding progress we have made in reducing water pollution. But the issue facing me today does not concern the ensuring of clean water for future generations. The real issue is the Federal deficit -- and the pork-barrel and spending boondoggles that increase it.

The Clean Water Act construction grant program, which this legislation funds, is a classic example of how well-intentioned, short-term programs balloon into open-ended, long-term commitments costing billions of dollars more than anticipated or needed. Since 1972, the Federal government has helped fund the construction of local sewage treatment facilities. This is a matter that historically and properly was the responsibility of State and local governments. The Federal government's first spending in this area was intended to be a short-term effort to assist in financing the backlog of facilities needed at the time to meet the original Clean Water Act requirements. When the program started, the cost of that commitment to the Federal taxpayer was estimated at $18 billion. Yet to date, $47 billion has been appropriated. H.R. 1 proposes to put still another $18 billion of taxpayers' money into this program. Despite all this money, only 67 percent of all municipalities have actually completed the construction needed to comply with the Clean Water Act pollution limits. On the other hand, non-municipal treatment systems, which have received no Federal funding, have completed 94 percent of the construction needed for compliance with Federal pollution standards. I want a bill that spends only what we need to spend and no more -- not a blank check. For these reasons I must disapprove H.R. 1, a bill virtually identical to S. 1128, which I disapproved last November.

Money is not the only problem with this legislation. In my November 6th memorandum of disapproval, I noted that S. 1128 was unacceptable not only because it provided excessive funding for the sewage treatment grant program, but also because it reversed important reforms enacted in 1981, for example, increasing the Federal share of costs on some projects that municipalities were going to build anyway. Furthermore, both S. 1128 and this bill would also establish a federally controlled and directed program to control what is called ``non-point'' source pollution. This new program threatens to become the ultimate whip hand for Federal regulators. For example, in participating States, if farmers have more run-off from their land than the Environmental Protection Agency decides is right, that Agency will be able to intrude into decisions such as how and where the farmers must plow their fields, what fertilizers they must use, and what kind of cover crops they must plant. To take another example, the Agency will be able to become a major force in local zoning decisions that will determine whether families can do such basic things as build a new home. That is too much power for anyone to have, least of all the Federal government.

Specifically, the Dole substitute that was voted on by the Senate was identical to all provisions of H.R. 1 for programs other than sewage treatment, with one important exception -- its program for non-point source pollution was not an open end for Federal regulators. It kept Federal environmental regulators off of our farms, off of our municipal zoning boards, and out of the lives of ordinary citizens. The Dole substitute would have given States complete discretion over participation in the non-point source pollution program and complete discretion over how they used Federal funds in the program. Let me repeat -- controlling non-point source pollution has the potential to touch, in the most intimate ways, practically all of us as citizens, whether farmers, business people, or homeowners. I do not believe State programs should be subject to Federal control.

The $12 billion requested in the Dole substitute would have financed the ``Federal share'' of all of the treatment plants that have already been started. It would also have provided the ``Federal share'' of financing for all facilities needed to meet the July 1, 1988, compliance requirements in the Clean Water Act. It was as much money as we needed to get the job done -- period.

The Dole substitute offered the Congress a genuine compromise that met all of the national objectives and goals. Nevertheless, the Congress chose to ignore that proposal, forgoing even the normal hearing process, and repassed last year's legislation with virtually no changes. The House Rules Committee even prevented consideration of this compromise by the full House. They sought to challenge me. But in so doing they are sending a message to the American people and the world that those who want to raise taxes and take the lid off spending are back again. This is perilous.

H.R. 1 gave the Congress the opportunity to demonstrate whether or not it is serious about getting Federal spending under control. The Congress should fulfill its responsibility to the American people and support me on these important fiscal issues. Together we can cut the deficit and reduce spending. But by passing such measures as H.R. 1, the Congress divides our interests and threatens our future.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Paul C. Sheeline to be a member of the Presidential Board of Advisors on Private Sector Initiatives. This is a new position. The Board reports to the President through the White House Office of Private Sector Initiatives. The mission of the Board includes raising awareness, stimulating new private sector initiatives, removing barriers to public-private partnerships, and promoting the long-term development of private sector initiatives.

The President today accorded the personal rank of Ambassador to Stephen R. Hanmer, Jr., in his capacity as Deputy United States Negotiator for Strategic Nuclear Arms. He is a member of the United States delegation to the arms reduction negotiations in Geneva. He will succeed Ronald F. Lehman II in this capacity.

A few days ago, when I arrived in the House Chamber for the State of the Union Address, I also hand delivered a formal legislative message. Today I thought I would share with you some of our goals and objectives for this Congress.

In the State of the Union Address, I spoke of our quest for excellence, especially in education. To achieve this, I've suggested to Congress that we target our Federal resources on the neediest schools and youngsters, that we set a goal of dramatically raising the literacy levels in America by the year 2000, and that we permit greater flexibility and innovation in federally funded, bilingual education programs.

Education, of course, is not just schooling, and it is not just for the young. We'll be proposing to Congress a new program to help workers displaced by the rapid changes going on in our economy. Our billion-dollar effort will provide the education and training needed to help an estimated 700,000 additional workers each year restructure their lives to keep them and America competitive in world markets. For less fortunate families, we're also proposing a new emphasis on employment and training through a program we call Greater Opportunities through Work, or GROW for short. Complementary to that, we are asking that $800 million be spent for improving the skills of children from welfare families, giving these youngsters a road map to a life out of poverty.

To keep our country on the cutting edge of change, I am proposing to Congress that we double the budget of the National Science Foundation over the next 5 years and that we establish a number of new science and technology centers based at U.S. universities, centers that would reflect a partnership in basic research between government, business, and the academic community. Since 1981 our budgetary support for basic research has grown 47 percent in real terms. We are committed to keeping our country leading the way in the era of science and technology. Meeting the competitive challenges of today and tomorrow won't be easy. Vice President Bush, who led the deregulation drive early in the administration, is taking a fresh look to see what can be done, from a competitiveness standpoint, to clear away unnecessary Federal regulation and paperwork burdens. One thing that will help is coming to grips with the costly liability insurance spiral. Legislation to do that, while still providing the necessary protections for consumer and health safety, will soon be proposed.

One of our greatest challenges is to accomplish our goals while still reducing the level of deficit spending that so threatens our future. Now is the time for discipline and restraint in the halls of power. You might remember, in the State of the Union I asked Congress for a line-item veto, ratification of a balanced budget amendment, and reform of the budget process. If we're to put our fiscal house in order -- and that's essential -- it requires fundamental, structural change. And I'm willing to work with Congress to get it done.

One of our priorities, one of the top, continues to be the fight against drug abuse. There've been claims that we've backed off our commitment this year. Nothing could be further from the truth. With all due respect to those who suggest otherwise, our commitment to the battle against drugs is stronger than ever. Since 1981 the funds budgeted for this effort have been tripled, and some of the funds already appropriated will actually be spent next year. So, even though next year's antidrug budget request is a bit lower, more funds will actually be spent in the battle than ever before.

On another point, you should also be aware that the amount spent on education in America has increased every year of our administration. Instead of taxing it away from local people and giving it back to them along with Federal guidelines and controls, we've left that revenue in local coffers and in your hands, so you the people, working with your local school boards, can determine how your children will be educated. As for higher education, the Federal Government will be spending less, but with the changes we've proposed, fewer dollars are needed to help the same number of students.

The changes we've made in these last 6 years have kept us on a steady course, have maintained the peace, and promoted healthy growth in our economy. The state of the Union is good, and together we're going to keep it that way.

I know that in the Soviet Union, as it is all around the world, this is a season of hope and expectation, a time for family to gather, a time for prayer, a time to think about peace. That's true in America, too. At this time of year, Americans travel across the country -- in their cars, by train, or by airplane -- to be together with their families. Many Americans, of course, came to the United States from other countries, and at this time of year, they look forward to hosting friends and family from their homelands.

Most of us celebrate Christmas or Hanukkah, and as part of those celebrations, we go to church or synagogue, then gather around the family dinner table. After giving thanks for our blessings, we share a traditional holiday meal of goose, turkey, or roast beef and exchange gifts. On New Year's Eve we gather again, and like you, we raise our glasses in a toast to the year to come, to our hopes for ourselves, for our families, and yes, for our nation and the world.

We're thinking of our nation, because in the year ahead, we Americans will choose our next President. Every adult citizen has a role to play in the making of this decision. We will listen to what the candidates say. We will debate their views and our own. And in November we will vote. I'll still be President next January, but soon after that, the man or woman leading our country will be the one the American people pick this coming November.

I said, we Americans will also be thinking about the future of the world this year -- for the same reasons that you'll be thinking of it, too. In a few months, General Secretary Gorbachev and I hope to meet once again, this time in Moscow. Last month in Washington, we signed the intermediate nuclear forces treaty, in which we agreed to eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear weapons. It was a historymaking step toward reducing the nuclear arms of both sides, but it was just a beginning.

Today both America and the Soviet Union have an opportunity to develop a defensive shield against ballistic missiles -- a defensive shield that will threaten no one. For the sake of a safer peace, I am committed to pursuing the possibility that technology offers.

General Secretary and I also anticipate continuing our talks about other issues of deep concern to our peoples -- for example, the expansion of contact between our peoples and more information flowing across our borders. Expanding contacts and information will require decisions about life at home that will have an impact on relations abroad.

This is also true in the area of human rights. As you know, we Americans are concerned about human rights, including freedoms of speech, press, worship, and travel. We will never forget that a wise man has said that: ``Violence does not live alone and is not capable of living alone. It is necessarily interwoven with falsehood.'' Silence is a form of falsehood. We will always speak out on behalf of human dignity.

Americans are also concerned, as I know you are, about senseless conflicts in a number of regions. In some instances, regimes backed by foreign military power are oppressing their own peoples, giving rise to popular resistance and the spread of fighting beyond their borders. Too many mothers, including Soviet mothers, have wept over the graves of their fallen sons. True peace means not only preventing a big war but ending smaller ones, as well. This is why we support efforts to find just, negotiated solutions acceptable to the peoples who are suffering in regional wars.

There is no such thing as inevitability in history. We can choose to make the world safer and freer if we have courage -- but then courage is something neither of our peoples have ever lacked. We have been allies in a terrible war, a war in which the Soviet peoples gave the ages an enduring testament to courage. Let us consecrate this year to showing not courage for war but courage for peace. We owe this to mankind. We owe it to our children and their children and generations to come.

Ladies and gentleman, friends, as we celebrate the New Year, I am glad to address the citizens of the United States of America and to convey to you season's greetings and best wishes from all Soviet people.

The first of January is a day when we take stock of the past year and try to look ahead into the coming year. The past year, 1987, ended with an event which can be regarded as a good omen. In Washington, President Reagan and I signed a treaty on the elimination of intermediate and shorter range missiles.

That treaty marks the first step along the path of reducing nuclear arms, and that is its enduring value. But the treaty also has another merit: It has brought our two peoples closer together. We are entering the New Year with a hope for continued progress, progress towards a safer world.

We are ready to continue, fruitfully, the negotiations on reducing strategic arms with a view to signing a treaty to that effect even in the first half of this year. We would like, without delay, to address the problem of cutting back drastically conventional forces and arms in Europe. We are ready for interaction in resolving other problems, including regional ones.

I think it can be said that one of the features of the past year was the growing mutual interest our two peoples took in each other. Contacts between Soviet and American young people, war veterans, scientists, teachers, astronauts, businessmen, and cultural leaders have expanded greatly. Like thousands of strands, those contacts are beginning to weave into what I would call a tangible fabric of trust and growing mutual understanding. It is the duty of Soviet and American political leaders to keep in mind the sentiment of the people in their countries and to reflect their will in political decisions.

Soviet people are getting down to work in the New Year with an awareness of their great responsibility for the present and for the future. There will be profound changes in our country along the lines of continued perestroika, democratization, and radical economic reform. In the final analysis, all this will let us move on to a broad avenue of accelerated development.

We know that you Americans have quite a few problems, too. In grappling with those problems, however, I feel that both you and we must remember what is truly crucial: Human life is equally priceless, whether in the Soviet Union, the United States, or in any other country. So, let us spare no effort to affirm peace on Earth.

Ladies and gentlemen, during the official departure ceremony in Washington, I said with regret that on that visit I had had little chance to see America. I feel, however, that I did understand what is most important about the American people, and that is their enormous stock of good will. Let me assure you that Soviet people, too, have an equally great stock of good will. Putting it to full use is the most noble and responsible task of government and political leaders in our two countries. If they could only do that, what is but a dream today would come true: a lasting peace; an end to the arms race; wider ranging trade; cooperation in combating hunger, disease, and environmental problems; and progress in ensuring human rights and resolving other humanitarian issues. May the coming year of 1988 become an important milestone as we move down that road.

Happy New Year! And as Americans, we do indeed have much to be happy about as this New Year commences. Our nation is at peace. Our economy is growing with new jobs being created at the rate of more than 200,000 a month. But of course, there is still much to be done. Join me then in considering some of the issues that we'll be facing as 1988 gets under way.

The first matter I want to mention is one already before the Congress: the confirmation of Judge Anthony Kennedy to a seat on the Supreme Court. The Senate hearings on Judge Kennedy have already taken place. You may have seen portions of the hearings on television. He made clear his belief that it's a judge's job to interpret the law, not make it. And on an issue that affects every American -- crime -- Judge Kennedy's testimony and record are clear.

Judges must respect the rights of the accused, but they must also keep firmly in mind the rights of crime victims and of society itself. The Supreme Court has been one Justice short for many months now. So, I urge the Senate to confirm Judge Kennedy with all due speed.

The next item I want to discuss with you is one that touches on my recent summit meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev of the Soviet Union. You will remember that Mr. Gorbachev and I signed a treaty on the first day of that summit, and now our administration will forward that treaty to the Senate for its advice and consent. You will hear me speak more about this treaty, the intermediate-range nuclear forces treaty, in the days ahead.

For now, let me just say this: Under this treaty, for the first time in history, an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles will be eliminated. The Soviets will be forced to destroy four times as many deployed warheads as will we. And the verification procedures in the treaty are the most stringent in the history of arms control negotiations. What does this add up to? A good deal for the United States and our allies and a step toward a more secure peace for all the world. I welcome the hearings the Senate will hold on this treaty. Yet here again, I urge the Senate to move forward on ratification.

Next, the economy -- I don't want to delve into ancient history as this New Year begins, but it's important to keep in mind what the economy our administration inherited some 7 years ago was like: double-digit inflation, the highest interest rates since the Civil War, rising unemployment. Our economic program changed all that and changed it so dramatically that today America has completed its 61st month of economic growth with low inflation. And just what was our economic program? We cut the number of government regulations and slowed the rate of growth of government itself. But most important, we reformed the tax code and cut individual income tax rates, restoring incentives for hard work, risktaking, and innovation.

In an hour, I will be signing the U.S.-Canada free trade agreement, a truly historic pact that will create more jobs and lower prices for consumers on both sides of the border. It is a win-win situation for both countries. Even more importantly, the agreement is an example of the market-opening steps the entire world should be pursuing and which the United States will push in the new Uruguay round of the GATT [General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade negotiations]. Protectionist measures, some of which are in the trade bills passed by the House and Senate, are backward looking, not forward looking.

Finally, of course, 1988 is an election year, a year in which we will choose new officials at all levels and, yes, a new President. To tell you the truth, I've always loved election years -- the rallies, the excitement, all of it so American. But more than the excitement, something of immense importance will be taking place, for this year we will be taking stock of ourselves as a nation and deciding in a free and peaceful democratic election -- that is still the marvel of much of the world -- where our highest hopes and dreams will lead us.

I am pleased to announce that Prime Minister Mulroney and I have today entered into an agreement to establish a free trade arrangement between the United States and Canada. In the truest sense, this is an historic agreement for both sides. We will strengthen what is already a deep friendship between our people by enhancing economic opportunities and creating jobs in both countries. Moreover, the agreement firmly establishes that the trade environment between the two countries will in the future be founded on the principle of free and open trade.

This comprehensive agreement will benefit many sectors of the U.S. economy. Canadian and American tariffs will be phased out completely, saving consumers hundreds of millions of dollars while also improving our export opportunities. It will secure access to Canada's market for American manufacturing, agriculture, financial services, and high technology; improve national security through energy sharing; and provide important investment opportunities. Canada will benefit from the agreement in many of these same ways; the pact is truly reciprocal. As the agreement goes into effect, Canada's access to our large domestic market will grow, and Canadian industrial centers will gain opportunities to develop even more important roles in the economy of North America.

The agreement to establish a free trade area has important international implications, as well. It will encourage supporters of free trade throughout the world by demonstrating that governments can remove trade barriers even in the face of protectionist pressures. We hope that the U.S.-Canada example will help set the tone for the Uruguay round multilateral trade negotiations.

Our negotiations with the Canadian Government leading to this agreement incorporated advice from Congress, industry, agriculture, and labor. Our Congress, as well as the Canadian Parliament, will review the agreement fully over the next several months. As this process begins, both sides should be mindful that the decisions they make will help shape the relationship between our countries in the years to come and will send a signal to the rest of the world.

The creation of the world's largest free trade area will be a mark of leadership and presents an historic opportunity to the United States and Canada. We must not let this opportunity slip from our grasp.

Thank you very much. I just, in the last few minutes, have made a decision to tell you a little incident in the world of the theater and entertainment. I have told it on a couple of occasions, but I don't know that anything could be more appropriate for that story than this occasion and this beautiful place.

It was some years ago, and someone in the entertainment world had violated the social codes to such an extent that there was quite a hue and cry about it. But it spread to where it was being leveled against all the people in the world of entertainment, and they charged show people with being childish in their thinking, childish in their attitudes -- complete children in their ways.

Tonight marks the inauguration of a bright new home for the preservation and development of culture in America, a special place to house the lively arts. It also marks the inauguration of an award presented by the American people to honor a lifetime of service and achievement. It's appropriate that the first award should go to a gentleman who has practiced the liveliest of arts -- comedy -- for over six happy decades. Bob Hope has given generously of his valuable time and voluble talent in support of worthy causes, perhaps more than any human being alive today.

Part of the responsibility of my current job is being Commander in Chief of our Armed Forces. As such, I have a special place in my heart, as do all Americans, for all that Bob Hope has done to entertain our servicemen and women overseas, especially in times of conflict and crisis. Bob recently returned from the Persian Gulf, where he let some of our finest young people know how much we love them and how proud we are of the job they are doing. So, you see, this award is not only in recognition of accomplishments past but is also an incentive to future generations to be inspired to carry on the tradition established by Bob Hope.

America has always been a land of optimism and opportunity -- a grand combination that has seen us through trying times. Bob Hope has chronicled those times on radio and television and in motion pictures and, through his perceptions and sense of humor, has given us the most precious gift of all: the gift of laughter.

I appreciate this opportunity every year to honor and reward a special group of individuals who provide the creativity and energy that ensure the people of the United States the Government they deserve and the Government they pay for. Well, each of you is a tribute to the fact that throughout our government we've got top quality professionals getting the job done.

Jefferson once said that one of the toughest tasks of any President was finding the right person for the right job. Well, I'm grateful that those of you we honor today are people who worked your way into positions of responsibility and have taken that responsibility seriously.

I guess whoever was running that zoo was certainly employing innovative problemsolving. [Laughter] Seriously though, I know that many of you've saved the Government -- and that really means the taxpayers -- considerable money. You've done it by your diligence and your intelligence. But you've also done more than that: You've provided leadership. And more often than not, that's worth more than money. Today's awards are designed as a way of saying thank you and letting you know that you are appreciated.

This is my seventh year of being part of this ceremony, and I believe your service warrants my personal congratulations, and I want each of you to know that. This year there are 58 distinguished and 267 meritorious winners, almost double the number that was approved in prior years. Large and small agencies are represented, from civilian executives in the military service to executives in the National Science Foundation.

Thirteen award winners this year come from outside the Washington area. I want to welcome all of you to the Capital, which in so many ways is a company town. But none of us should ever forget the real business of the company takes place in the far reaches of our country and even the world. In fact, 88 percent of the Federal work force is located outside the Washington area.

I were the CEO of a giant corporation, I couldn't find a better group of executives to run my operation than the nearly 7,000 members of the Senior Executive Service whom you represent here today. America's lucky to have men and women such as yourselves, and I'm proud to have worked with you over these last 7 years. I look forward to a productive year ahead.

So, thank you from the bottom of my heart, and God bless you. And now, Connie Horner, who worked with me at the Office of Management and Budget and has been doing a fine job as Director of the Office of Personnel Management, and Kirke Harper, our Director of Executive Personnel, will help me present the awards.

The President. Thank you all very much. Before saying anything else, I want to thank Senator Lugar. As ranking minority member on the Agriculture Committee, he was instrumental in helping to give this legislation its final shape. Senators Boschwitz, Leahy, and Boren, and Congressmen Madigan and Dingell, as well as other Representatives you see here today, also deserve special mention. And we should thank the members from the House Banking and Energy and Commerce Committees for their hard work.

But unfortunately, in the past our nation's farmers have had to contend not only with the usual, God-given variables, such as the weather, but with other uncertainties and hardships that were manmade right here in Washington. Many of America's farmers are still suffering from the aftershocks of the runaway inflation of the seventies. As inflation pushed up the price of land, farmers were too often encouraged to overextend themselves in debt. At the same time, in the 3 years prior to 1980, farm costs shot right through the roof -- nearly a 50-percent increase, or it amounted to about $44 billion.

Now, that doesn't paint a completely rosy picture for agriculture, however. There are still pockets of financial stress, and high debt and low-income growth in many foreign importing countries combined with global agricultural protectionism still adding to farmers' woes.

The act ensures that the Farm Credit System will continue as a principal source of private credit to America's farmers, while at the same time implements many needed reforms to the System to ensure its long-term viability.

Unfortunately, the Congress declined to require the System to provide as much self-help as we believed was appropriate and created new and potentially expensive Federal support mechanisms for secondary markets for private sector agricultural loans.

The Congress also added other costly provisions that were not necessary to the health of the Farm Credit System. Of principal concern is the additional forbearance provided to producers that have been substantially delinquent on loans issued directly by the Farmers Home Administration of the United States Department of Agriculture. It makes little sense to add on new and unnecessary spending in this time of deficits, and I urge Congress to reconsider and to take its responsibility for the deficit seriously and to work with us to amend or remove these provisions as soon as possible.

Apart from this bill, there are two encouraging developments for agriculture on the horizon. First, trade negotiations are underway to reform the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, to break through the protectionist stranglehold on agriculture and to make the world market in agriculture a free market. American farmers will prosper under these reforms not only because of new access to markets now closed to them but also because trade reform will boost worldwide growth, especially in the less developed countries, where the agricultural trade growth prospects are greatest. As demand increases, American farmers are in a solid position to compete in a more open and expanding world market.

Second, as you know, over New Year's weekend, Prime Minister Mulroney and I hooked up by telephone as we signed a free trade agreement between the United States and Canada. Now, that agreement must be ratified by both nations. This agreement will be vital as we fight back against global protectionism. By persuasion and example, we will show the world what free trade really means: job creation, opportunity, improved international relations, and an upward cycle of prosperity for all nations and their people.

Sec. 2. The Secretary of Defense is authorized to perform the function, vested in the President by Section 111(a) of the Act, of designating the accounts from which unobligated funds, made available by the Department of Defense appropriations acts for the Fiscal Year 1987 or prior fiscal years, are transferred.

I have signed H.R. 3395, I want to note my serious objection to a non-germane provision that was added in the Senate immediately before final congressional passage without hearings or the opportunity for the Executive branch or other concerned parties to evaluate and comment on it.

This provision will effectively erect barriers to air carriers that want to provide mail transportation service to rural areas in Alaska, and, in some cases, may well discriminate against existing air carriers. Such restrictions on transporting mail are costly and inefficient and could cause service delays.

Had this provision been presented to me in separate legislation, I would have disapproved it. I therefore strongly urge the Congress to reconsider and repeal this amendment at the earliest opportunity.

If someone were to ask us as a nation who our best friends are, what would be the answer? It's difficult to imagine any better friends than our neighbors, the Canadians. Our two peoples have lived, side by side, in peace and with the spirit of good will for the better part of two centuries.

Churchill once noted: ``That long Canadian frontier from the Atlantic to the Pacific Oceans, guarded only by neighborly respect and honorable obligations, is an example to every country and a pattern for the future of the world.'' Churchill, as usual, was as profound as he was eloquent. It wouldn't surprise him to find out that the citizens of Canada and the United States are moving together toward a truly historic achievement. Last week Prime Minister Mulroney and I entered into a free trade agreement, which once approved by the United States Congress and the Canadian Parliament will establish our two countries as the world's largest free trade area.

U.S.-Canadian free trade agreement is the culmination of 18 months of strenuous negotiations between our governments. Both Prime Minister Mulroney and I played an active role in the process, keeping the negotiations on track and ensuring that the outcome would be absolutely fair and equitable. Frankly, I think we've come up with a winner, a winner for people on both sides of the border. Canada and the United States are already each other's largest trading partners. Our bilateral trade in goods and services exceeded $150 billion in 1986. The economic health and national security of our countries are linked. This well-honed treaty will build on these ties that already exist and open up tremendous new potential.

The treaty will, over a 10-year period, eliminate the tariffs and bring down most of the trade barriers that now serve only to tax or impede the commerce between our two peoples. What will this accomplish? Numerous studies have shown that the agreement will mean billions of dollars in new economic growth for both countries each year. This means thousands of new jobs, increased investment, and expanding opportunities. And it's not just the export industries which will reap the rewards. The most easily recognized beneficiaries of this pact will be the consumers of both countries. With enhanced competition, lower prices can be expected as well as greater consumer choice. As for industry, eliminating the obstacles to doing business and wiping out tariffs is going to be a great boon to manufacturing on both sides of the border. Markets will open that have been restricted, sources of raw material and parts that are now made more expensive by tariffs will be available at a lower cost. In short, this treaty is going to be overwhelmingly positive for both Canada and the United States.

This, however, does not mean that there will be no opposition. Whenever there is change, even for the better, there are segments of society that resist -- small groups that have a special interest in keeping things the way they are -- even at the expense of keeping everybody else from moving forward. Benjamin Franklin, our much venerated Founding Father, saw this, even in his day.

Well, in approaching the U.S.-Canadian free trade agreement, I would hope that the national interest will overcome the pressure of the private interest, on both sides of the border. I would hope that our peoples, of Canada and the United States and their elected representatives, are able to keep their eyes on the long-term growth and opportunity that will be forthcoming with this agreement rather than short-run dislocation that comes with any change.

Canada there are those who fear that their national identity might be damaged by a closer association with such a large country as the United States. Well, experience says otherwise. European countries have for decades cooperated closely on trade, yet the national character of each member nation still remains vital and distinctive. Canada, too, has a national character that will not only survive but flourish in an environment of free trade and expanding opportunity.

I have no doubt that history will prove this agreement a boon to both our peoples. And through it, we will be an example to all the world of what free people can accomplish and demonstrate that the path to economic growth, job creation, and security is through negotiation and cooperation, not protectionism.

But before then, however, I want to talk to you about an area in which freedom is just as vital as speech and, as the years go by, will become more and more important. I'm talking about the developing economy of the future, an economy of great challenges and even greater opportunities, if only we have the courage to embrace them, to jettison the prejudices and small-mindedness of the past and open our arms to economic freedom on a world scale.

I spoke of the economy of the future, but it's forming right now in the minds and imaginations of entrepreneurs around the globe. It's taking shape in businesses, large and small; in factories and universities; in research and development centers. Powered by an explosion of technological invention and linked by a global network of investment and communications, it is transforming our lives so fast that the so-called conventional wisdom can barely keep up.

I will speak of the practical and immediate effects on our economy in a moment, but first it's important to understand that this technological revolution is in a fundamental sense a moral revolution. At its heart is a rejection of the counsels of despair we heard so often in the seventies. Remember the seventies?

The West, in those years, experienced what can only be described as a crisis of confidence in its most fundamental values. We increasingly heard talk about the so-called convergence of the free world and the Communist bloc. Some said our freedoms were a luxury we could no longer afford. Expert opinion talked of limited resources in a shrinking world. In this future of scarcity, we were told, the free nations would have to sacrifice more and more of their economic and political freedoms and accept increasing government control.

But, as I said, the American people rejected this counsel of despair. They saw that the crisis was not in their values, but in the leadership that no longer believed in them. And they demanded a return to our basic principles -- those principles of freedom and enterprise that had always made this country great.

Well, the road back is well-mapped now. We cut taxes, we quashed inflation and deregulated the economy, unleashing the creative energies of the American people. The result never would have been imagined by ``expert opinion'' 8 years ago -- some 14\1/2\ million new jobs -- more jobs than Europe and Japan created combined. Last year alone, 3 million new jobs were created. Employment -- the percentage of all working Americans over 16 years of age, male and female -- is at record highs.

New business creations are going strong. Manufacturing productivity, one measure of the health of an economy, has reversed its decline of the seventies and is now racking up historic gains averaging an annual growth rate of nearly 5 percent since 1982 -- more than 1\1/2\ times the average of the postwar period. But these numbers, impressive as they are, do more to disguise than to reveal the real nature of our progress. The change is qualitative, not quantitative. We're not merely accelerating the processes of the Industrial Revolution; we're fundamentally transforming them.

Let me give you just one example -- the semiconductor, or computer chip. One scientist makes this comparison. If automotive technology had progressed as fast as semiconductor technology in the past 20 years, he says, a Rolls Royce would now cost less than $3, get 3 million miles to the gallon, deliver enough power to drive an ocean liner, and 6 of them would fit on the head of a pin.

Think again of that little computer chip. Those chips, the driving force of the modern economy, are made from the silicon in sand, one of the most common substances on Earth. Their value doesn't come from the physical material that makes them up, but from the microscopic architecture designed into them by ingenious human minds. More and more in this new economy, mind replaces matter, human invention makes physical resources obsolete. Take a typical telecast via satellite like Saturday's Browns' game. That satellite -- the product of human invention -- replaces thousands of tons of copper dug from the Earth and molded into wire. Rather than being imprisoned in a world of shrinking natural resources, we're transcending them, moving to a new era of seemingly limitless horizons.

Now, this is good news for humanity, but it's bad news for statism. The centrally planned state can dig metal out of the ground or pump oil. Though less efficiently than a free economy, it can operate huge factories and run assembly lines. But it cannot fabricate the spirit of enterprise. It cannot imitate the trial and error of free markets, the riot of experiment that produces knowledge and progress. No government can manufacture the entrepreneur or light that spark of invention. All they can do is let their people go -- give them freedom of mind and spirit. A recent issue of Fortune Magazine summed it up in an article called ``The Death of Socialism.'' Even Socialist governments in Western Europe are now cutting tax rates, while the Soviet Union struggles with economic reforms in an attempt to keep from falling farther and farther behind.

So, instead of convergence, we see an increasing divergence between the free and the unfree. Statist economies stagnate, while the free-market, low-tax countries vault ahead into a new era of growth -- into a new world economy. Even more than in the past, this new world economy is a one-world economy. With Americans in the lead, entrepreneurs have created a global electronic network, on line 24 hours a day, sending capital, ideas, goods, and services around the world at near the speed of light. Research, development, manufacturing, marketing, and investment now all take place on a global level.

Take the example of Boeing. Headquartered in Seattle, it builds its new 767 with airframe parts from Japan and Italy, its engines assembled by American workers in Ohio with parts from Sweden, France, West Germany, and Italy. Or take the example of Honda. They're now building cars in Marysville, Ohio, for sale in Taiwan, and they're now studying the possibility of selling their American-made cars in Japan. In this new world economy, national boundaries are increasingly becoming obsolete. In this new global information age, entrepreneurs follow their investments, and they all flow where there is the greatest stability, the greatest opportunity.

We hear talk about the trade deficit, but we must beware of single-entry bookkeeping. The other side of the ledger shows that the growing, dynamic United States economy has attracted $159 billion in foreign capital into the United States. Trade deficits and inflows of foreign capital are not necessarily a sign of an economy's weakness.

Now, some people call this debt. By that way of thinking, every time a company sold stock it would be a sign of weakness, and it would be much better to be a company nobody wanted to invest in rather than one everybody wanted to invest in. Take the case of high-tech, high-growth California. Milton Friedman argues that California's external debt -- to other States and other countries -- almost certainly dwarfs the external debt of the United States. Does this augur bad days ahead for California? On the contrary, one might argue it's a sign of strength.

Historically, fast-growing economies often run deficits in the trade of goods and services, experiencing net capital investment from abroad. This predictable and, up to a point, desirable process has been accentuated by slow growth in parts of Europe and the need for debt-ridden Third World nations to generate trade surpluses to service their debt. Germany, which has actually lost half-a-million jobs in the last 10 years, has a trade surplus in goods. Mexico has a trade surplus in goods. The United States, which has been the engine keeping the world economy moving forward, has a trade deficit because our growing economy enables us to buy their goods.

Over time, however, these imbalances should be reduced, and there are two ways to do it: We can become more like them, or they can become more like us. We can raise taxes, reregulate our economy, and adopt protectionist legislation of the kind now being considered in Congress. That will effectively slow growth in this nation and stifle international trade. We won't be able to buy their goods and, certainly, no one will want to invest in the United States. The world can all shrink together, and we can all look forward to hearing the experts once again pontificating about convergence and the limits to growth.

The other solution is for them to become more like us: to adopt low-tax, progrowth policies; to encourage trade, not discourage it -- to make it freer and fairer and more plentiful; to join with the other nations in a cooperative, upward cycle of growth in which all participate; to embrace the possibilities of the new world economy. In fact, we're beginning to see this happen. Several major industrialized countries have followed the U.S. lead in cutting high marginal tax rates to spur growth. These changes and other market forces are already causing the volume of U.S. exports to boom, with continued growth expected.

I just interject right here that where some people, complaining about the deficit -- and no one complains about it louder than I do -- when they complain about it, they cite our reducing taxes in these last several years. Well, I think someone should pay attention to the fact that every time we have reduced the rates, we have increased the total revenue paid in taxes by the people to the Government because there is an incentive for people to earn more and to go out and to experiment, and so forth. And so, no, the deficit has not been caused by the cut in taxes. The deficit would increase if we yielded to those who want us to increase taxes.

I'm not saying there aren't problems. The one that sticks out like a sore thumb is that United States budget deficit. It's an embarrassment and a shame -- most dangerous, perhaps, because it signals the complete breakdown of one of the most basic functions of the United States Government. Now, we've made some progress. For the first time in 14 years, the Federal Government spent less, in real terms, last year than the year before.

We took $75 billion off of last year's deficit, and the bipartisan congressional leadership joined with me in signing on a 2-year deficit reduction plan. Now, those are steps in the right direction, putting us on the path toward a balanced budget and doing it without the severity of the across-the-board cuts in the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings act.

But there's more to be done. If we're not careful, we'll slip once more into the errors of the past -- broken promises and unchecked spending. It's time to get at the root of the problem. It's time to fix the busted budget process. Just before Congress -- or Christmas, I should say -- Congress delivered a large package to my door. It was the 1,000-page continuing resolution that contained all of the spending authority for the United States Government. It should have been called a continuing irresolution. For the second year in a row, the Congress failed to pass even 1 of the 13 appropriation bills on time; they just bundled them together in a trillion-dollar bonanza.

How about a New Year pledge: a budget that is credible and reliable, a spending plan that is timely and enforceable and does not leave the Government on the brink of default? Thirteen manageable bills and not one gigantic catchall -- I will take the pledge, and I hope 535 people who represent you in the Congress of the United States will take the same pledge.

Even in this time of Gramm-Rudman, when the national defense is being pared to the bone, Congress has decided that we have a pressing national need for asparagus research. Stone fruit was also provided for generously, but the really big money went to the usual pork-barrel spending projects -- roads, highways, and dams -- which puts me in mind of another story.

It's about a Congressman, present company excepted -- [laughter] -- who was sitting in his office one day when a constituent comes by to tell him why he must vote for a certain bill coming up. The Congressman sat back and listened. And when he was done, he said, ``You know, you're right. You're right, you're absolutely right.'' And the fellow left happy. And a few minutes later, another constituent came by, but this one wanted him to vote against the bill. The Congressman listened to his reasons, sat back, and said, ``You know, you're right. You're right, you're absolutely right.'' And the second constituent left happily.

President should be faced with the all-or-nothing proposition. The time is here for giving the President the same thing that 43 Governors have -- a line-item veto. Until that occurs, it's time for the Congress to take the responsibility for seeing that unwarranted appendages are not part of necessary legislation that comes to my desk.

In these years, our country has come together to celebrate the signing and ratification of our Constitution. The more I reflect on that noble document, the more I'm drawn to the same conclusion as George Washington, that it is more than the product of human invention -- that divine providence, as Washington believed, must have also lent a hand.

Two hundred years later, this document will serve as a guide not just for this nation but for the world as we enter the 21st century. We sometimes forget that the original purpose of the Constitutional Convention was to find some solution to the trade disputes that were then tearing the States apart. The Connecticut Gazette in 1787 warned that trade disputes between Georgia and Virginia may ``impoverish or fatally crush'' the commerce of Virginia. Fighting had actually broken out between some States. Blood had been shed. Perhaps as great as the new political unity they achieved in Philadelphia was the economic breakthrough -- the principles that would enable America to become the world's largest free trade zone, a continental economy.

When the Constitution was written, it took longer to travel from Washington to Richmond, Virginia, than it does today to travel from Washington to Tokyo. The needs of the new world economy are transcending political boundaries. As many of you know, over New Year's weekend, Prime Minister Mulroney and I signed an historic free trade agreement between the United States and Canada -- an agreement, it is my profound hope, that will help pave the way into that new world economy in which national boundaries become like the border between the U.S. and Canada: meeting places rather than dividing lines.

The changing economic realities -- in which products are increasingly information and can be transmitted around the world at the speed of light -- these new economic realities dictate a world economy. Because of our experience with a continental economy, we are uniquely situated to lead the world into a new era of economic cooperation, to make this ``city on a hill'' that is America, a global city. The watchword of this new era will be freedom -- free enterprise, free trade, freedom to travel, freedom of emigration. Freedom -- the emancipation of peoples' creative energies around the world. That's the challenge that has opened up to us in the 1980's. All we need is the courage to meet it.

Akers. Mr. President, one of the great traditions of the City Club is the spontaneous, unrehearsed question-and-answer period following each speaker's formal remarks. We are extremely gratified that you have graciously agreed to continue that tradition. Therefore, prior to your entering the room, we held a random lottery and selected eight members of the City Club who'll have the opportunity to pose questions to you at this time. We'll start with the first question at the microphone to the right.

Mr. President, my name may be Sam Donaldson, I'm not sure. [Laughter] Roughly quoting a famous Washington secretary: ``Sometimes we must act outside the law.'' Is there ever a time when an administration, or individuals within an administration, can or should act outside the law? And because Sam asks followup questions, I think I will.

The President. I would have to tell you that first of all, with the special investigators still going forward with their investigation, it would be too early for me to comment on anything of that kind or to make a decision in advance. I would have to wait to see what takes place, whether someone is deemed breaking the law or not. And so, I can't answer your question that directly.

I would have to say that in all of the investigation that went on I did not see any -- what I considered lawbreaking that was taking place on the part of anyone in the administration. There were some individuals that had not informed me completely of what was going on in the meetings that were being held with some representatives from Iran. They weren't representatives of the Government, may I add. These were people that contacted us through Israel and wanted to talk to us about better relations with the United States in the event of a new government in Iran, because of the health of the Khomeini. If you'll remember, at that time the Khomeini -- almost every other day they were proposing that he wouldn't live out the week.

I checked that out beforehand -- that the law did give me the permission to do that and to withhold information from the Congress if I thought it was necessary, particularly for the protection of human lives. And we felt that the people who had asked to meet with us -- their lives would be endangered if it became known what they were doing.

The President. If aid is cut off to the contras, I have to believe that the actions of the Sandinistas, right down to the present, are such that they are proving that they have no intention of completely accepting the proposed peace agreement. We have, and we think that that could be a solution. But we believe that the only thing that can bring the contras -- or bring the Sandinista government, which is a totalitarian Communist government -- that can bring it to the negotiating table, is the threat of the contras -- who are the people of Nicaragua.

I was interested to note this morning that 10,000 Nicaraguan citizens in the capital, in Managua, yesterday demonstrated against the Sandinista government. And maybe the peace process is the reason why they weren't attacked or arrested and thrown into prison, as anyone else doing that has been in the past. But I believe that right now we're asking for nonlethal help to the contras. But I do believe that just as we're helping the people of Afghanistan try to restore freedom to their country, that we -- or the Sandinista government is establishing what would be a Soviet satellite state on the soil of the Americas. And I don't think we should tolerate that for one minute.

My question pertains to the Soviets reinviting China to participate in a summit with them. In your opinion, is this an attempt by the Soviets to align themselves with another world power in order to have greater bargaining leverage with the West, or is it Gorbachev's genuine concern to further your and his interest in world peace and begin dealing with the silent giant of the East? And as a typical press tactic, I have a followup.

What is your plan in dealing with China? Will you encourage greater trading with them so that the American businesses can tap the tremendous markets in China not only to help them modernize but also help our economy flourish, as well as promoting a free market? Thank you. Sorry for the length.

Gorbachev's mind as to what his motives might be. But I do know this: that historically, the Soviets -- it's almost been an obsession with them, of the great size on their border of China and what a great threat that could be. And right now they have some 53 divisions on the Chinese border, and before the INF agreement, they were trying to maintain some of those weapons that they could continue to have aimed at China. But maybe it is defensive with him; maybe it is simply trying to restore what once was an alliance. But if so, the Chinese have put down some pretty valid considerations that they have got: the Soviets must stop supporting the Vietnamese in their domination and takeover of Cambodia. And there are some other things: again, the removal of the 53 divisions and so forth. The world would be a better place if all those things came about.

On the other hand, I was visiting China at a time when they first began the change in their own system. It was quite thrilling to be there at a time when a Chinese family became the first family to buy an automobile.

All the automobiles were government-owned; they didn't belong to the private people. And you waited to see what might happen. And the Government of China put them on television to tell the people what they had done and said to the people, see, work, earn more money. You, too, can buy an automobile.

They're making moderations of the same -- at least it seems the same kind that is being proposed in glasnost by Gorbachev. But there's no question that if the intent is peace and not what looked for a time like an arms unit, back before the Chinese broke out of the arrangement with them, why, this could well be something that we should not question, but go along with.

Good afternoon, Mr. President. My question is in keeping with your speech's theme: the economy. In recent months, we have seen the U.S. dollar decline in value against foreign currency and the stock market fall drastically. Many economists predict that we are heading into a recession. I would like for you to comment, please, on what you see to be the immediate fate of the economy and what immediate actions you would recommend to avoid a recession.

The President. Well, for one thing, with regard to the dollar, we have an agreement with the most potent trading partners of ours, a number of other nations, about together working to maintain the stability in the ratio of all our currencies. And we are working at that.

And that is borne out in the report that has been presented to me by the commission that I appointed, the Brady commission: that what took place was a panic as a result of -- well, there were no more than, he says, about 15 firms that were involved in the great change that was taking place in the market; but that it was induced within the marketplace and not from some factor outside.

As to recession, I have to say we have just completed 62 months of expansion. That is the longest period, I think, in the history of our country, certainly the longest period since World War II. Every indices is that we're going to continue to expand; there's going to continue to be an increase in productivity and all. When I spoke about the jobs -- just think of this -- with 3 million new jobs this last year, as I said, and 14\1/2\ million in these 62 months. The potential employment pool of America for statistics is considered to be everyone, male or female, from 16 years of age up. That includes all the people getting an education; that includes all the people retired, not looking for a job. And today the highest percentage in our history, 62.3 percent of all that population's segment, are employed. And I don't think the signs of recession are there.

I'll tell you what does frighten me: When I see sometimes in the media all this great emphasis in quoting people about pessimism and that -- well, this looks like there's a recession coming. That could bring on bad times and a recession.

If enough people get frightened and say, well, let's not buy a new car this year; let's put it off until next year; or let's not put that new carpet down or buy a refrigerator, let's make the old one do for a while. If enough people do that, you have a recession. They just go on strike and quit buying.

I think that we should, more and more, look at the economic facts. And all of the facts about our economy are up and higher than they have been in years and years. And we're continuing to create about a quarter-of-a-million new jobs every month. So, I don't anticipate a recession unless some of those doomcriers scare the people into one -- just talk it up.

Good afternoon, Mr. President. Your Commission on American Outdoors provided wide-ranging opportunities for the American public to speak to recreation resource needs and issues, and as you know, their report was finalized and published in 1987. My question to you is: Now that this report has become a reality, expressing that today's recreational needs are more of a necessity than a frill in today's world, what are your thoughts as to the Federal funding responsibility in seeing that these needs are met?

The President. I think you're talking about government landowning and so forth, for recreational purposes and so forth. There has been an increase in that. And I have a map -- I wish everyone could see it. It's a map of the United States. And the land owned by the Government is in red, and the rest of the map is white. West of the Mississippi River -- your first glance at that map, you think the whole thing is red, the Government owns so much property.

That is so American, and we should be so proud of it. This last year, we were asked to send some people to Paris, France, to an international meeting to tell those countries in Europe and others how we supported things of this kind -- charities, good causes -- privately, because in all those other countries, they thought that was the Government's task -- the Government should do it. Well, the Government isn't as good at doing it as the private sector is. Wetlands in this country that are supported by the very people who hunt ducks -- and doing it to keep their own sport intact -- all kinds of things.

Where there is a specific need, I don't think you can generalize. But I know that we have vastly upgraded our national parks in the last few years, and we're continuing to do that. If there is a particular need in a particular place, fine, but at the same time, I think we should think twice about government ownership and how far it can go in dominating this land of ours. It's something like -- what is it now -- it's hundreds and hundreds of millions of -- well, I'm not going to risk this, because I have the figures, and I can't spin them off the top of my head right now. But I don't know anyplace other than the Soviet Union where the Government owns more than ours does. But it is also land that is deemed to be used for the sport and recreation and outdoor life of the people, and we'll continue to be cooperative with that private sector.

The President. I have no quarrel with the fact that government overspending -- deficit spending -- is a drag on our economy, and it must be eliminated. The first man who ever proposed no deficit spending was Jefferson, who said it was the great omission of our Constitution that it did not place a limit on the Government's ability to borrow money.

Now we're trying, and it's been a goal of mine. But when I hear them call it a stepchild of mine, I would like to point out something: The President of the United States can't spend a dime; only the Congress can do that. I have submitted, as I'm required by law, every January 4th a budget to the Congress. We have not had a budget since I've been here. We've had continuing resolutions. They call my budget dead on arrival.

And then the only place they're willing to cut is defense spending. But when I came into office, on any given day, 50 percent of our warplanes couldn't fly for lack of spare parts. And almost as many ships in the Navy could not leave harbor for the same reasons. Well, we have rebuilt our military, and one result of that is the INF treaty. The Soviet Union didn't come to the table to bargain with us on arms because they had changed their ways. They know they can't win an arms race if we keep on building and furbishing our defense.

I was out on the mashed-potato circuit for years as a private citizen making speeches about deficit spending, because back in -- well, for more than 50 years before 1980, there's only been 4 years in which there was a Republican Congress. And the other 46 years in that half-century has been a Democratic Congress. But there have also been only 8 years in which the budget was balanced out of those. And every time people like myself out on the mashed-potato circuit complained and said we should start balancing the budget, their defense was -- and maybe some of you can remember this -- they would say deficit spending is necessary to our prosperity, and it's no problem, because we owe it to ourselves. And that was their argument for going on with what they were doing.

You can't do it in 1 year, but we can set ourselves on a course that will reach at year-certain. And then if the Lord is smiling on us -- and I hope He'll smile on us -- the American people will force the Government to have a balanced budget amendment -- that the Government henceforth cannot deficit spend.

Club and the people of Cleveland, but it's also, I think, wonderful that you're going to do a little politicking for Mayor Voinovich, who many of us are hoping will be our next Senator. And my question revolves -- we all know our current Senator [Howard M. Metzenbaum] is effective in getting publicity and getting his name in the paper, but I wonder how effective he is as far as representing the people of the country and the best interest of the country. And I'd really, sir, like your unbiased opinion. [Laughter] Who do you think would make the best Senator and try to help out the people of Ohio?

The President. Thank you all, and I'm sorry I talked so long here. I've got all kinds of stories about speakers who should not take too long as after dinner or after lunch speakers, and I've violated all of it with my answers here, but you tempted me beyond my strength.

Joe Clark, and the Secretary of State, George Shultz, today concluded an agreement on cooperation between Canada and the United States in the Arctic. The agreement affirms the political will of the two countries to cooperate in advancing their shared interests in Arctic navigation, development, and security. It signals the importance which the two countries attach to protection of the unique and fragile environment of the region and the well-being of the inhabitants of the north.

Well, the word for today is: Congratulations! You've put together a beautiful building and an historic treasure. I'm amazed at your outstanding collection of art, particularly the De Welden sculptures. I've always wondered where old generals and admirals went when they ``just faded away.'' And now I know.

But nothing is more important than keeping alive the gallant tradition of our armed services -- a tradition that adds up to a word not just for today but for all time: patriotism. As you know, I've visited our men and women in the armed services and their families all around the world -- from Camp Liberty Bell on the demilitarized zone in Korea to Tempelhof Air Force Base in West Berlin -- and the one thing that's always struck me the most about them is their dedication to country. They take a little bit of America with them every place they go, no matter how far, to make it more like home. And these men and women are willing to be away from this home that they love so that other countries may remain free. That's one of the great sacrifices they make for our country.

I've got a report to bring you from the front. I've talked to admirals and generals alike, on bases from Iceland to Guam, and they've told me stories about how their troops, U.S. troops, are the best trained, best equipped, and best educated troops around. To sum it up, what we have right now is the best darn group of young men and women in uniform that this nation has ever seen, and we're proud of them.

I was honored when you invited me to dedicate your new clubhouse, as the Army and Navy Club begins its second century. General Hittle assures me that I'm among friends. Then, I knew that already. No group of men and women has given more steadfast support to the Commander in Chief, no matter what his name was, no matter what party he represented.

And I know I'll never forget the support that you've given me during some of my toughest hours as President. And so, I salute you not only for the help you've given me over the past 7 years but for the help your club has given my predecessors and will give my successors for generations to come.

Hittle told me, too, that Gary Cooper filmed many of the scenes of ``The Billy Mitchell Court Martial'' right here at the club. But he says that the members wouldn't let the cameras in until after midnight, after the members had gone to bed. Well, I'm grateful that you didn't impose that kind of schedule on me. [Laughter] And I think Nancy would feel the same way.

December of 1885, according to your records, after the founders signed the papers of incorporation, they retired to a warm room to drink a toast: ``To the club.'' I'd like to repeat that salute with you today. For a century, the Army and Navy Club has played an important role in the life of the Republic. May the second century eclipse the first. And so, ladies and gentlemen, a salute: ``To the club.'' Thank you.

We're here today to honor a man who dedicated his life to the pursuit of a dream. In honoring one man's commitment, we're also rededicating ourselves to the fundamental principle behind that dream. That principle, which goes to the very essence of America, is simply this: that it is self-evident that all men are created equal and that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable rights.

Today we still cherish these rights and values upon which our country was built and for which our forefathers gave their lives, for which Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., gave his life. The fight for genuine equality of opportunity goes on. It still continues for many Americans today, yet let us not ignore the strides that have been made and the great strides that are being made toward ending discrimination and bigotry in our towns and communities, in our government, and most important, in our own hearts.

And there are many reasons for hope. Advancements in employment and education should not escape our attention. Black employment has risen 26 percent during our expansion. That's more than twice the rate of the job gain of whites. The unemployment rate for black youths has declined dramatically.

Great strides are being made in education, as well. The publication we released last spring, ``Schools That Work,'' describes many schools that are doing a good job educating disadvantaged children. One shining example is the Garrison Elementary School in the South Bronx in New York City. The student population is half black and half Hispanic. The school lies in one of the poorest sections of New York. Yet for the past 5 years, Garrison has ranked in the top 12 percent of New York City schools in reading achievement. By the time they reach the sixth grade, nearly every student performs at or above grade level in both reading and math.

You know, James Madison once said: ``A well-instructed people alone can be permanently a free people.'' Together we strive to ensure that every American receives a sound education and that, in so doing, we secure our freedom, as well. Secretary of Education William Bennett has been leading the charge for higher standards and more discipline. We can give no better gift to our young people than giving them the basic skills needed to reach their potential and fulfill their dreams.

The value of a good education was not lost on Dr. King. He entered Morehouse College at the age of 15 and earned a Ph.D. 11 years later from Boston University. Martin Luther King, Jr.'s own life was one of dreams. It's fitting that we honor the man who went from being a minister in the Ebenezer Baptist Church in Atlanta to being the recipient of the Nobel Peace Prize.

And he's allowed me to go to the mountain. And I've looked over, and I've seen the promised land . . . so I'm happy tonight. I'm not worried about anything. I'm not fearing any man.'' These are the words of a man at peace with God and himself, content in the knowledge that what is right will inevitably triumph. He gave his life, as so many of our forefathers did, for his principles. And it is thanks to his strength of character and his God-given talents that the dream he spoke about so eloquently will live on forever.

Twenty years ago this coming April, Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., was slain by an assassin in Memphis, Tennessee. Violence and hatred, the enemies against which he offered an uncompromising message of brotherhood and hope, had claimed another victim in a decade of tumult that plumbed the very spirit of this Nation. Martin Luther King was martyred not only for his beliefs, but for the passionate conviction and consistency with which he espoused them.

Luther King's words were eloquent because they were borne not by his tongue alone but by his very being; not by his being alone but by the beings of every one of his fellow black Americans who felt the lash and the sting of bigotry; and not by the living alone but by every generation that had gone before him in the chains of slavery or separation. He brought light to the victims of segregation, but he brought light as well -- in a way, illumined by faith, more sorely needed -- to its perpetrators. He saw how evil could crush the spirit of both the oppressor and the oppressed, but whereas ``unearned suffering'' was redemptive, those who were motivated by hatred and inflicted pain had no recourse but to abandon the instruments of prejudice and to change heart.

Through his evocation, by his words and his presence, of transcendent ideals, Martin Luther King pierced to the heart of American society and changed it, irrevocably, for the better. He, and all those who marched with him, overcame.

As they did so, so too did the America that Lincoln had said could not stand divided -- transmuted now through the toil and blood of its fallen heroes into a land more wholly free. The work of justice and freedom continues, but its goal is less distant, its hardships more tolerable, and its triumph more sure.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 12th day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Department of Commerce or the Department of Transportation implementing aspects of Executive Order No. 12543 that relate to exports of U.S.-origin commodities and technical data and air transportation, respectively.

Company. The Libyan bank had sued in London for release of the funds, and the Commercial Court issued a ruling in Libyan Arab Foreign Bank v. Bankers Trust, finding no basis under British law for withholding payment of funds held in London and New York under the British deposit contract. In October, after completion of interagency consultation, the Treasury Department licensed Bankers Trust to comply with the London judgment by authorizing the release of approximately $292 million to the Libyan bank, in addition to interest for pre-sanctions breach of contract damages. This licensing action affected only the funds involved in this particular lawsuit.

Three immediate family members of Libyan nationals registered their eligibility to enter into transactions related to travel to, and residence within, Libya. Two licenses were issued authorizing U.S. persons to obtain services in connection with Libyan patent, trademark, copyright, and other intellectual property protection.

Various enforcement actions mentioned in my last report are being pursued, and one case has been brought to trial involving prosecution of persons who allegedly exported petroleum equipment from the United States to Libya through a European conduit.

The policies and actions of the Government of Libya continue to pose an unusual and extraordinary threat to the national security and foreign policy of the United States. I shall continue to exercise the powers at my disposal to apply economic sanctions against Libya as long as these measures are appropriate and will continue to report periodically to the Congress on significant developments, pursuant to 50 U.S.C. 1703(c).

Administration has been dedicated to encouraging free trade and to removing regulatory impediments that inhibit the development of our Nation's natural resources. Proven natural gas reserves in the Prudhoe Bay area of Alaska's North Slope represent approximately 15 percent of total U.S. gas reserves. In addition, undiscovered, recoverable supplies of natural gas from Alaska's North Slope may exceed 100 trillion cubic feet. There can be no doubt the development of Alaskan oil has played an important role in ensuring adequate energy supplies at reasonable prices for American consumers. I believe efficient development of Alaska natural gas will provide similar benefits. Leaving this resource undeveloped benefits no one.

Efficient development of Alaska natural gas on the basis of market financing could encompass the export of some of this gas to other countries. Because world energy markets are interrelated, our Nation will benefit from an enlarged international gas supply. Production of Alaska reserves will increase the amount of secure energy sources available at market prices and, thus, displace less secure or more expensive energy sources, including oil from the Persian Gulf.

There exist adequate, secure, reasonably priced supplies of natural gas to meet the demand of American consumers for the foreseeable future. This demand can be met by lower-48 production and already-approved Canadian imports. If necessary, this demand also can be met at lower delivered energy cost by coal, oil, imported liquified natural gas (LNG), natural gas from Mexico, and other energy sources.

Given these facts, exports of Alaska natural gas would represent a judgment by the market that the energy demands of American consumers can be met adequately from other sources at comparable or lower prices. Exports of Alaska natural gas would not diminish the total quantity or quality of energy available to U.S. consumers because world energy resources would be increased and other more efficient supplies would thus be available. Finally, exports would not increase the price of energy available to consumers since increased availability of secure energy sources tends to stabilize or lower energy prices.

I find that exports of Alaska natural gas in quantities in excess of 1,000 Mcf per day will not diminish the total quantity or quality nor increase the total price of energy available to the United States.

This finding removes the Section 12 regulatory impediment to Alaskan natural gas exports in a manner that allows any private party to develop this resource and sets up competition for this purpose. It is my belief that removal of this impediment to private sector development of Alaska's vast natural gas resources, using private sector resources with no government subsidy, will benefit our entire Nation.

This finding represents a determination that the effects of exports of Alaska natural gas on American consumers would comply with the market criteria of Section 12 in the context of current and projected future energy markets and that such exports would be consistent with our comprehensive energy policy. It does not assess the merits or feasibility of a particular project, but rather lets the marketplace undertake a realistic consideration of various options concerning Alaska natural gas. The operation of market forces is the best guarantee that Alaska natural gas will be developed efficiently and that there is an incentive to find additional reserves.

I do not believe this finding should hinder completion of the Alaska Natural Gas Transportation System (ANGTS). This Administration supports the timely, economic development of Alaskan natural resources. To this end the Administration has removed all regulatory barriers to the private sector's expeditious completion of this project. In particular, I want to reaffirm our support for the special regulatory treatment of the ``prebuild'' portion of ANGTS, including the minimum revenue stream guarantees.

The President. It has been a great pleasure to welcome Prime Minister Takeshita on his first visit to Washington since taking office in November. He is the leader of one of the world's great nations and one of America's most valued friends.

Our meetings were constructive and amiable. We discussed the vital issues of the day and established an excellent personal rapport. Good personal relationships between the leaders of Japan and the United States are essential as our two nations strive to confront the challenges of this century and the next.

During our discussions today, Prime Minister Takeshita and I found that our views on international questions coincide to a remarkable degree. We share an abiding commitment to democratic institutions and to free markets to protect freedom and human rights. We are dedicated to improving the economic well-being not just of our own people but of all mankind.

In this regard, I was especially pleased with the Prime Minister's global economic perspective. He outlined significant plans for expanding Japanese domestic demand and stimulating growth. He reviewed Japan's plans to increase its foreign assistance budget next year to an amount second only to that of the United States. And he expressed Japan's determination to continue the process of economic adjustment. The Prime Minister and I discussed and affirmed our support for the economic policy coordination process adopted at the Tokyo and Venice economic summits. A joint statement concerning our bilateral undertakings in that regard will be released shortly.

U.S.-Japan treaty of mutual cooperation and security is the foundation upon which our relationship is built. I was satisfied to note that U.S.-Japan cooperation in the national security area is strong and growing and that Japan's recently announced budget provides for continued significant increases in the area of national defense. Japan's growing contribution to the maintenance of U.S. forces in Japan is of immense value to the United States. I might add that Japan's national defense program is entirely consistent with the concept of self-defense and in no way poses any threat to others.

During our meetings, I briefed the Prime Minister on the details of last month's summit. We agreed on the benefits of the INF treaty, and he was encouraged by the possibility of even further arms cuts with the Soviet Union. I was gratified that the Prime Minister expressed Japan's fullest support of our actions, and I assured him that we would consult fully with all of our allies as we continue our discussions with the Soviet Union.

Prime Minister and I recognized the danger posed to our mutual security in the export of certain kinds of high technology. The Prime Minister assured me that Japan has taken the necessary legislative and administrative measures to prevent technology leakage. I told the Prime Minister that I appreciated his actions and his commitment to the vigorous implementation of controls over exports of sensitive technology. The Prime Minister and I concur on the importance of the new nuclear cooperation agreement. We believe it to be a good agreement, and we will exert our best efforts to have it come into force expeditiously.

Prime Minister noted that Japan's global trade surplus is declining and underlined his determination to address bilateral issues. I was pleased with his assurance that he intends to resolve a particularly difficult trade issue -- the problem of access for the U.S. construction industry -- in a satisfactory manner. We agree the Uruguay round [of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade] must succeed and that revision of the world trading system should include a comprehensive reform of trade in agriculture and services. I expressed appreciation for the Prime Minister's efforts on trade, stressing the urgency of expanding opportunities for U.S. farmers and other exporters at a time of increasing pressure for protectionism here in the United States. We concurred on the importance of keeping trade flowing and barriers down. For our part, I intend to continue my efforts to reduce our budget deficit, improve American competitiveness, and combat protectionism.

We reaffirmed our determination to conclude a new science and technology agreement, with equitable and expanding research benefits for scientists of both countries. I expressed appreciation for Japan's initiatives to provide more than $4 million in science fellowships to American researchers. We also reaffirmed the spirit of the 1983 U.S.-Japan joint policy statement on energy cooperation.

Prime Minister and I noted with satisfaction political developments in the Republic of Korea and our intention to help make the 1988 Olympic games a success. We also pledged to do our utmost to help the Philippine Government and its people in this period of economic adjustment.

President, the historic INF treaty was signed last month. I look forward to its expeditious entry into force. And as one representing a member of the West, I am determined to firmly support the President in his pursuit of substantive progress in East-West relations, where much remains to be done across a broad spectrum of areas.

President and I confirm that the cooperative relationship between Japan and the United States, with the unshakable security arrangements as its cornerstone, is essential for the peace and stability of the Asia-Pacific region. I will continue my efforts, with the cooperation of the President, for further strengthening the credibility of the Japan-U.S. security arrangements.

I explained to the President that the Government of Japan has continued to provide the funds necessary for achieving its current defense program. Japan has also continued to increase its host nation support for U.S. forces in Japan, whose stationing is an indispensable part of the Japan-U.S. security system. Moreover, in view of the recent economic conditions adversely affecting the financial situation of U.S. forces, I noted to the President that the Government of Japan has decided on its own initiative to increase further Japan's share of such expenditures.

President and I agreed that today, more than any other time in history, policy coordination among major countries is required to ensure sustained growth of the world economy and to correct external imbalances. In this respect, we agreed that the roles to be fulfilled by Japan and the United States are of vital importance. We shared the recognition that, together with the measures taken by individual countries, stability of exchange rates is indispensable to the achievement of these goals as described in our joint statement.

Fully aware of the heavy responsibility commensurate with Japan's status in the international economy, I am determined to carry out a vigorous economic management policy with emphasis on domestic demand expansion to promote structural adjustment to the improved market access and to strive for a further steady reduction of the current account surplus.

In this connection, I explained to the President that despite an expected drop in net exports, Japan's growth for fiscal year 1988 is now projected at 3.8 percent, a rate higher than the previous fiscal year, through the formation of the fiscal '88 budget geared toward domestic demand expansion with a substantial increase in public works spending.

I also explained the prospect for a $10 billion reduction in Japan's current account surplus for fiscal '88 through these measures. The President highly appreciated my explanation. The President, on the other hand, explained that the measures for budget deficit reduction have been enacted based upon the recognition that deficit reduction is essential to the stability of today's world economy. I paid tribute to the President for his endeavors.

With regard to various economic and trade issues which arise as a matter of course between two increasingly interdependent economies of Japan and the United States, the President and I confirmed the basic posture that their solutions should be sought in the spirit of cooperation and joint endeavors and with the aim of expanding, and not contracting, economic exchanges. I expressed my hope that a mutually satisfactory solution will be reached on the pending issue of access to major Japanese public works on the basis of the proposal that Japan has recently made. I also stated to the President the need for early resolutions of the pending issue of Japan-U.S. semiconductor trade.

President and I exchanged views on the trade bill currently under deliberation in the U.S. Congress, and I expressed my firm support to the President's determination to contain protectionism. The President and I shared the recognition that this year is especially important for the success of the Uruguay round and agreed that our two countries should take the lead in its promotion.

I explained Japan's intensive efforts to prevent the recurrence of illegal diversion of high technologies. The President highly appreciated the measures which Japan has taken for this purpose. In this connection, I expressed Japan's deep concern about moves in the U.S. Congress toward sanctions against foreign companies, including Toshiba Corporation. The President and I agreed on the importance of enhancing the cooperation in the field of science and technology. I explained about my government's initiatives to increase the number of American scientists who will be invited to Japan for research. The President welcomed these initiatives.

I expressed my views concerning the recycling of funds to the developing countries, including the quantitative and qualitative improvement of our official development assistance, in particular, and stated that in the draft budget for fiscal '88, an increase of 6.5 percent over the previous year was secured for ODA [official development assistance]. In this connection, I was encouraged that the President appreciated highly my recent participation in the ASEAN [Association of South East Asian Nations] summit and my subsequent visit to the Philippines. The President and I affirmed, in particular, to continue our support to the Aquino government and to welcome the Republic of Korea's firm stride along the road of democracy, as evident in the recent Presidential election, as well as to cooperate closely towards the success of the Seoul Olympics this fall.

President and I agreed on the importance of the new Japan-U.S. nuclear cooperation agreement and its prompt entry into force. The President and I, looking forward to a successful Toronto summit, agreed to meet again in Toronto.

I wish to express my heartfelt appreciation to President and Mrs. Reagan for the warm welcome extended to me and my wife as well as our gratitude to the American people for their kindness and consideration during our stay.

Reagan and Prime Minister Takeshita reaffirmed their support for the economic policy coordination process adopted at the Tokyo and Venice Summits. The President and Prime Minister endorsed the economic goals and policies set forth in the December 22 statement of the G - 7. They agreed that the achievement of sustained non-inflationary growth and reduced trade imbalances remains a top priority of their economic policies. They welcomed the recent actions of other industrial countries in support of these objectives, and called on the newly industrialized economies to play a more constructive role in fostering a strong world economy with reduced external imbalances.

President stressed his determination to continue the progress that has been made in reducing the U.S. budget deficit. He indicated that the fiscal 1989 budget to be transmitted to the Congress will continue the effort to reduce the budget deficit and will meet the deficit reduction objectives established in the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings budget legislation. The President also reiterated his pledge to veto protectionist trade legislation while seeking authority for the Uruguay Round of trade negotiations.

Minister Takeshita indicated that Japan will pursue economic policies to continue its strong growth in domestic demand and to reduce its trade surplus. The Prime Minister reaffirmed his commitment to carrying forward structural reform of the Japanese economy through implementation of the recommendations of the Maekawa Report and by accelerating liberalization of domestic financial markets, including deregulation of domestic interest rates. To achieve sustained growth as well as to foster exchange rate stability, the Bank of Japan agrees, under the present stable price conditions, to continue to pursue the current policy stance and to make efforts to accommodate declining short-term interest rates.

President and the Prime Minister believe that the close coordination of their policies within the framework of the arrangements adopted by the Venice Summit is establishing the fundamental economic conditions for greater stability of exchange rates and that a further decline of the dollar could be counterproductive. In addition, they noted that their authorities are cooperating closely on exchange markets and have developed arrangements to assure the adequacy of resources for their cooperative efforts.

Well, tonight, Roger, we're giving your entire life a review, and it's a rave. Born in Detroit, educated at Choate, Roger's schooling ended with the advent of the Depression. He spent 5 years at odd jobs. He pumped gas. He worked on the assembly line in a Ford factory. He spent 6 months in real estate and earned not a penny. And some say he kept himself in pocket money mainly by playing blackjack and poker. [Laughter] Then in 1934 Roger sensed that certain old apartment buildings were undervalued. He put money into them and launched his first brilliant career in real estate.

Soon he had holdings across the country -- Detroit, New York, Seattle. And during the war, he spent 2 years at a naval air station in Florida and took the opportunity to look into Florida real estate. When the war ended, he and his colleagues bought three hotels in Florida and one in South Carolina.

Today marks the opening in Geneva of round nine of the nuclear and space talks between the United States and the Soviet Union. Our objective in these talks remains unchanged -- achievement of equitable and effectively verifiable arms reduction agreements with the Soviet Union, which lessen the risk of war and make the world safer.

This treaty is truly historic. For the first time, an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles will be eliminated. Through this treaty, we and our NATO allies achieve the goal we set forth in 1979: elimination of the threat posed to our security by Soviet INF missiles.

Under this agreement, the Soviets are required to eliminate deployed INF missile systems capable of carrying almost four times as many nuclear warheads as the deployed systems we will eliminate. Furthermore, the INF treaty provides for the most stringent verification in the history of arms control. The asymmetrical reductions to achieve an equal U.S.-Soviet level and the comprehensive verification provisions of the INF treaty provide important precedents for future arms reduction agreements. The INF treaty is in the security interests of the United States and our allies.

The treaty now goes to the Senate for its advice and consent as to ratification. I welcome the debate the Senate will hold, and I hope the Senate will move expeditiously in carrying out its important constitutional role. The INF treaty is not, however, an end in itself. It is part of our overall strategy for strengthening peace and ensuring strategic stability. Our focus now will be on achieving 50-percent reductions in U.S. and Soviet strategic offensive nuclear arsenals. We particularly seek to reduce the most destabilizing nuclear arms: fast-flying ballistic missiles, especially heavy intercontinental ballistic missiles with multiple warheads.

Our negotiators returned to Geneva with my instructions to expedite work on a joint draft treaty which meets these objectives. This draft START treaty reflects progress already achieved in Geneva and the areas of agreement that General Secretary Gorbachev and I reached during our meetings in 1985 and 1986. This includes a ceiling of 6,000 warheads on 1,600 delivery vehicles for each side, a ceiling for heavy intercontinental ballistic missiles and their warheads, and counting rules for heavy bombers and their armament.

Secretary and I made further progress. We reached agreement on a sublimit of 4,900 for the total number of ballistic missile warheads, a counting rule for existing ballistic missiles, and guidelines for effective verification of the treaty.

Despite the progress we have made, important differences remain, including such issues as mobile intercontinental ballistic missiles, sea-launched cruise missiles, and the details of effective verification. A START agreement can be reached this year if the Soviets return to Geneva ready to apply themselves with the same seriousness as the United States. The United States seeks a sound agreement, and we will not negotiate against arbitrary deadlines. It remains my operating principle that we would rather have no agreement than accept a bad one.

Our negotiators will also continue work at Geneva on strategic defense issues. In accordance with my agreement with General Secretary Gorbachev last month, I have instructed our negotiators to work out with the Soviets a separate new treaty calling for observing for a specified period of time the ABM treaty, as signed in 1972, while both countries conduct research, development, and testing as required, which are permitted by the ABM treaty.

During our meetings last month, I made clear to General Secretary Gorbachev my firm commitment to move forward with our Strategic Defense Initiative. I believe that he understands our insistence on investigating fully the feasibility of strategic defenses, especially since, as he acknowledged, the Soviet Union itself has long been conducting its own program in this vital area. SDI offers the best hope of a safer world, one in which Western security would rely less on the threat of retaliation and increasingly on defenses, which threaten no one. SDI is the cornerstone of our security strategy for the 1990's and beyond. SDI is not a bargaining chip but our path to a more secure future.

Our negotiating team -- led by Ambassadors Kampelman, Cooper, and Hanmer -- returns to Geneva fully prepared to make progress on the difficult issues remaining in both offensive reductions and strategic defense.

In my many appointments to the Federal bench, I have attempted to select men and women of uncommon intellect, unimpeachable integrity, and a strong, steady temperament -- men and women with special gifts for communication and reasoning and with an abiding courage of conviction. You, Bob, epitomize these virtues at their very finest -- which is why I turned to you to fill Justice Lewis Powell's seat on the Supreme Court.

The unprecedented political attack upon you which resulted in the regrettable Senate action was a tragedy for our country. All Americans are the poorer today for not having your extraordinary talents and legal skills on the High Court.

And yet, as I read your letter of resignation, I cannot help but feel a warm admiration for the difficult decision you have made. There is, as you state, a lively public debate brewing in this country, fueled in no small part by your confirmation hearings -- a debate over the proper role of the judiciary in our system of representative self-government. That debate has advocates who view the courts and the Constitution as mere instruments for political advantage.

Effective advocacy of a more traditional approach to the judicial function occurs too infrequently. Your recent experience, against a background of unswerving commitment to the doctrine of judicial restraint, makes you uniquely well suited to carry that debate forward.

For your many years of dedicated public service, especially the last six on the Court of Appeals, your country and I thank you. For your courageous adherence to conviction and refusal to forsake your ideals, your country and I salute you. For daring to embark on this new course in selfless service of the cause of truth and justice in the public arena, your country and I remain in your debt.

While your public service on the Court of Appeals will be sorely missed, I am confident that your writings and other contributions as a private citizen are destined to have a most profound and lasting impact on the Nation.

Six years ago you appointed me to the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit. That was a great honor and I continue to be grateful to you for it. The task of serving the law and the ends of justice has made the last six years absorbing and fulfilling.

Americans who have written to me in the last six months to express their support, and, indeed, to all Americans our system of justice serves. Because I recognize these debts and obligations, I want to explain the course I have chosen.

The crux of the matter is that I wish to speak, write, and teach about law and other issues of public policy more extensively and more freely than is possible in my present position. As a sitting judge on a very busy court, I cannot devote the time and energy I wish to public discourse. Moreover, constraints of propriety and seemliness limit the topics a federal judge may address and the public positions he may advocate. My experience as your nominee for Associate Justice of the Supreme Court of the United States made me acutely aware of the restrictions on my ability to address issues. For several months various highly vocal groups and individuals systematically misrepresented not only my record and philosophy of judging but, more importantly, the proper function of judges in our constitutional democracy. This was a public campaign of miseducation to which, as a sitting federal judge, I felt I could not publicly respond. What should have been a reasoned national debate about the role of the courts under the Constitution became an essentially unanswered campaign of misinformation and political slogans. If, as a judge, I cannot speak out against this attempt to alter the traditional nature of our courts, I think it important to place myself where I can.

It is a view that goes back to the founding of our nation and was ably articulated by, among others, James Madison, Thomas Jefferson, Alexander Hamilton, and Joseph Story. It has been espoused by the greatest judges in our history. That view, simply put, is that a judge must apply to modern circumstances the principles laid down by those who adopted our Constitution but must not invent new principles of his own.

The sole task of the latter -- and it is a task quite large enough for anyone's wisdom, skill, and virtue -- is to translate the framer's or the legislator's morality into a rule to govern unforeseen circumstances. That abstinence from giving his own desires free play, that continuing and self-conscious renunciation of power, that is the morality of the jurist.

That was my view then. It is my view now. Though there are many who vehemently oppose it, that philosophy is essential if courts are to govern according to the rule of law rather than whims of politics and personal preference. That view is essential if courts are not to set the social agenda for the nation, and if representative democracy is to maintain its legitimate spheres of authority. Those who want political judges should reflect that the political and social preferences of judges have changed greatly over our history and will no doubt do so again. We have known judicial activism of the right and of the left; neither is legitimate.

My desire to participate in the public debate on these matters is what prompts my decision to leave the bench at this time. I had considered this course in the past but had not decided until the recent confirmation experience brought home to me just how misfocused the public discourse has become. A great many supporters have written to urge that I continue in public service. The decision I have made will, I believe, allow me to do just that. My views on these matters are of long standing. Because of my experience as your nominee, I am now in a better position to address the issues than ever before.

I am sure this decision is the correct one, I find, as the time of my departure draws near, that the prospect of leaving the federal judiciary fills me not merely with reluctance but with sadness. Any lawyer should be deeply honored to be a federal judge and to serve with a nationwide corps of the most dedicated men and women one is likely ever to meet. The work of an appellate judge may be the aspect of the legal profession for which I am best suited. I have actively enjoyed the day-to-day work of judging -- the exchanges with lawyers at oral argument, the discussions with colleagues and clerks in arriving at a correct decision, and the effort to craft the best opinion one can. Trying with all one's capacities to do justice according to law is a deeply satisfying experience, both intellectually and emotionally. I will miss it more than I can say. I find some consolation in leaving behind a record of which I believe I may be proud, and one by which I am content to be judged.

In choosing a date for my departure, I have considered, among other factors, the desirability of leaving time for the nomination and confirmation of my successor as well as the importance of beginning my new work without undue delay. It will, however, take a few weeks to complete work on hand. I ask, therefore, that you accept my resignation as Circuit Judge, United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit, effective at the close of business, Friday, February 5, 1988.

America has given a great gift to the world, a gift that drew upon the accumulated wisdom derived from centuries of experiments in self-government, a gift that has irrevocably changed humanity's future. Our gift is twofold: the declaration, as a cardinal principle of all just law, of the God-given, unalienable rights possessed by every human being; and the example of our determination to secure those rights and to defend them against every challenge through the generations. Our declaration and defense of our rights have made us and kept us free and have sent a tide of hope and inspiration around the globe.

One of those unalienable rights, as the Declaration of Independence affirms so eloquently, is the right to life. In the 15 years since the Supreme Court's decision in Roe v. Wade, however, America's unborn have been denied their right to life. Among the tragic and unspeakable results in the past decade and a half have been the loss of life of 22 million infants before birth; the pressure and anguish of countless women and girls who are driven to abortion; and a cheapening of our respect for the human person and the sanctity of human life.

We are told that we may not interfere with abortion. We are told that we may not ``impose our morality'' on those who wish to allow or participate in the taking of the life of infants before birth; yet no one calls it ``imposing morality'' to prohibit the taking of life after people are born. We are told as well that there exists a ``right'' to end the lives of unborn children; yet no one can explain how such a right can exist in stark contradiction of each person's fundamental right to life.

That right to life belongs equally to babies in the womb, babies born handicapped, and the elderly or infirm. That we have killed the unborn for 15 years does not nullify this right, nor could any number of killings ever do so. The unalienable right to life is found not only in the Declaration of Independence but also in the Constitution that every President is sworn to preserve, protect, and defend. Both the Fifth and Fourteenth Amendments guarantee that no person shall be deprived of life without due process of law.

All medical and scientific evidence increasingly affirms that children before birth share all the basic attributes of human personality -- that they in fact are persons. Modern medicine treats unborn children as patients. Yet, as the Supreme Court itself has noted, the decision in Roe v. Wade rested upon an earlier state of medical technology. The law of the land in 1988 should recognize all of the medical evidence.

Nation cannot continue down the path of abortion, so radically at odds with our history, our heritage, and our concepts of justice. This sacred legacy, and the well-being and the future of our country, demand that protection of the innocents must be guaranteed and that the personhood of the unborn be declared and defended throughout our land. In legislation introduced at my request in the First Session of the 100th Congress, I have asked the Legislative branch to declare the ``humanity of the unborn child and the compelling interest of the several states to protect the life of each person before birth.'' This duty to declare on so fundamental a matter falls to the Executive as well. By this Proclamation I hereby do so.

Therefore, I, Ronald Reagan, President of the United States of America, by virtue of the authority vested in me by the Constitution and laws of the United States, do hereby proclaim and declare the unalienable personhood of every American, from the moment of conception until natural death, and I do proclaim, ordain, and declare that I will take care that the Constitution and laws of the United States are faithfully executed for the protection of America's unborn children. Upon this act, sincerely believed to be an act of justice, warranted by the Constitution, I invoke the considerate judgment of mankind and the gracious favor of Almighty God. I also proclaim Sunday, January 17, 1988, as National Sanctity of Human Life Day. I call upon the citizens of this blessed land to gather on that day in their homes and places of worship to give thanks for the gift of life they enjoy and to reaffirm their commitment to the dignity of every human being and the sanctity of every human life.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 14th day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Today we honor a man who dedicated his life to the pursuit of a dream -- a dream not just for himself but for you, for all of us, for America. And in honoring his commitment, his dedication, his life, we rededicate ourselves to the fundamental principle behind that dream and to the challenge that history has given every American from the founding of our country to the present: the challenge of making that principle and that dream, the American dream, an enduring reality.

Our nation's founders first stated the principle to which Reverend Martin Luther King, Jr., dedicated his life when they wrote: ``We hold these truths to be self-evident, that all men are created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable Rights, and that among these are Life, Liberty and the pursuit of Happiness.'' Today we continue to cherish those truths and the rights and values upon which our country was founded and for which Americans have, for 200 years, worked and fought and, yes, for which many have given their lives -- for which Reverend King gave his life.

Many years ago, from the steps of the Lincoln Memorial, Reverend King reminded us of what America stands for. He reminded us that America has issued a promissory note of full rights for all its citizens. Yes, he reminded us that the destinies of all Americans were tied to one another, that the freedom of all Americans was inextricably bound together. He said that the day must come when all Americans are judged not by the color of their skins but by the content of their character.

You know, one of our Founding Fathers, James Madison, once said: ``A well instructed people alone can be permanently a free people.'' That's why it's so important that every American receives a sound education. That's why it's important that you stick to your studies, work hard, and get your diploma.

You'll be doing it for yourself, yes, but also for your family, your friends, your community, and your nation. Make it your first contribution to preserving the American dream for the generations to come.

To move the world towards enduring love and brotherhood is the continuing vocation of the human soul. But we in America are vastly closer today to realizing our national ideals because of Reverend King's life and work.

Let us each, on this day, dedicate ourselves to preserving and expanding the American dream. Let us resolve that future generations will know a new birth of freedom and that this land that Reverend King loved so well and gave so much to will continue to shine with the brilliant hope of all mankind.

The President. Well, thank you, and welcome to all of you. You know, today is the birthday of a great American hero, Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., after whom your school was named. So, I thought that if there was any occasion which would justify my interrupting the fine work that you, the students and the faculty, are doing at King Elementary, to have a brief chat, this would be it.

King was a man who dedicated his life to the pursuit of the dream that one day all Americans would be judged not by the color of their skin but by the content of their character. He was committed to seeing that our nation lived up to its promise of liberty and justice for all. Now, much remains to be done, but ours is a better country today, and each of you has more opportunities because of the hard work and courage of this remarkable man.

King's dream by making certain that you try your hardest to take advantage of the great opportunities available to you. Most certainly, that includes being diligent in your studies, and it also means saying no to drugs and those of you who are in any way involved in drugs.

White House and your school -- has been very rewarding to all of us, and we're very proud of this relationship that we have with you and your fine students there at the school. And I appreciate very much this chance to speak to you again and wish you all the very best.

I have a brief statement here to read. And I want to warn you now; I cannot take any questions, because already we're pressing our appointment at the hospital, there, for the checkup. So, I will have to go. And besides, you all ought to get in out of the cold.

Industrial production is up, inflation is down, and this country continues on a long trend of sustained growth with low inflation. The trade deficit for November fell 25 percent from the October level, and exports increased to an all-time record.

Much of the improvement came from our manufacturing sector, again indicating that our competitive position in the world is steadily improving. This news has had a positive impact in the financial markets around the world, but we should not pay undue attention to any one month's trade numbers. The real significance is that over the past 61 months a trend for the American economy has been sustained growth with low inflation, and today's signs indicate that it will continue well into the future.

President today signed and sent to Congress waivers to the law that would require a cutoff in aid to Pakistan under the Symington and the Solarz amendments because of activities in the nuclear weapons development area. This waiver action was based on the recognition that disrupting one of the pillars of the U.S. relationship with Pakistan would be counterproductive for the strategic interests of the United States, destabilizing for South Asia, and unlikely to achieve the nonproliferation objectives sought by the sponsors.

Government of Pakistan is aware of our continuing concern over certain aspects of its nuclear program. Despite these problem areas, there are crucial nonproliferation criteria which Pakistan continues to honor. The United States will insist on the maintenance of these restraints even as we work with Pakistan on progress in the areas of concern.

Congress. We have achieved an understanding on the general approach which is reflected in approval by Congress of a 30-month waiver of the Symington amendment and near-full funding for Pakistan for FY '88. The administration pledged to continue pressing Pakistan away from a nuclear weapons option and is obliged to certify annually that Pakistan does not possess nuclear weapons.

The reasons which convinced the administration to waive the Symington amendment also apply to the Solarz amendment, where the waiver applies only retroactively. The Government of Pakistan has pledged that procedures will be tightened to ensure an end to procurement activities in the United States. We will continue to monitor procurement activities in this country to ensure compliance with Pakistan's new procedures.

There is no diminution in the President's commitment to restraining the spread of nuclear weapons in the Indian subcontinent or elsewhere. We will continue to urge Pakistan and India to discuss measures which might be taken to reduce the threat of a nuclear arms race in South Asia. As arms control negotiations between the United States and the Soviet Union begin to bear fruit and set an example, the administration will be seeking still further ways to make this commitment effective.

This week something happened here in Washington that makes me proud, and I expect you'll feel the same way. It had to do with a report that our Secretary of Health and Human Services, Dr. Otis Bowen, released on Wednesday.

Now, most of the time government reports, with all their statistics and dry language, are not particularly interesting. But this one is different, because it has to do with something of deep concern to every American family: attitudes about drug use among America's young people.

For each of the last 13 years, the Government has surveyed America's graduating high school seniors. Every year thousands of seniors in hundreds of schools across America have been asked about the drugs they've used and about what they think of drug use. For many years, what we found out proved pretty discouraging. In the seventies students told of ever more frequent drug use. Many of them said that some drug use, even drugs like cocaine, was okay, nothing to be afraid about. We had a drug epidemic, and too often our national leaders, in government and the media, didn't seem to care.

Drug use, some said, was a victimless crime. No one got hurt. No one suffered. So, what was the big deal? Well, I've often thought that this message that drugs weren't all that bad was part of a larger message. The same people who winked at us about drugs also told us that America's future was bleak. Too often they said that the traditional values of family and community were old fashioned and out of date. It was as if they'd lost faith in the future and wanted the rest of us to lose it, too.

But in communities around America, families, teachers, and young people themselves were finding out that those who said drug use was no big deal, whether they knew it or not, were telling a big lie -- and a dangerous one. Just how dangerous we all saw 2 years ago when a promising athlete, a young man whose future could have been written in headlines and in gold, died of a cocaine overdose. Len Bias never got to play professional basketball. But today his mother says that his death may have been a message from God to America's young people: Stay away from drugs -- all drugs -- all the time.

Well, as you know, others have carried that message, too. For 6 years now, Nancy has been traveling around the country spreading the word. On one trip out West, a student asked her how to turn away from drugs when they were offered. She replied: ``Just say no.'' Since then, thousands of Just Say No clubs have been started in schools around the Nation. Students got the message, in many cases, long before adults.

That brings me back to the report I was telling you about. Maybe you've heard the best news in it already. Last year for the first time since the surveying began, a substantially smaller proportion of high school seniors -- one-third smaller -- acknowledged current use of cocaine than acknowledged it the year before. But that's not all.

Students are no longer buying the old line that experimenting with cocaine and other illegal drugs is safe. For many years, only about a third of them said that using cocaine once or twice was dangerous. Last year almost half did, and nearly 90 percent said regular use was dangerous. And cocaine use is no longer the ``in'' thing. In fact, almost all the seniors surveyed -- 97 percent -- disapproved of regular cocaine use. And whether they thought one or two experiments dangerous or not, 87 percent disapproved of even trying cocaine.

Use of marijuana and amphetamines is also dropping. More than 10 percent of the members of the class of 1978 said they used marijuana daily. In the class of 1987, it was only about 3 percent, still too many, but much better than it was.

So, the message is out, and America's young people have heard it: Drugs hurt, drugs kill, drug use is nothing to brag about, stay away from drugs. A few minutes ago, I said all this makes me proud. Well, the one thing I've found you can always count on is that when we Americans get a message and decide to do something -- watch out -- there's nothing that can stop us! I'm proud, as I know you are, of Nancy and of the many adults who've worked against this plague. But most of all, and I know also you join me in this, I'm proud of millions of young Americans who -- one by one, or together with their friends -- just say no to drugs.

Thank you very much. My goodness, if they'd have done this for ``Bedtime for Bonzo,'' I never would have left Hollywood. [Laughter] Well, thank you all very much, and a special thanks to the members of the Army Band and the Herald Trumpeters -- thank them for the spirit and energy they contribute to this event and other events throughout the year.

When we came here 7 years ago, we pledged to the American people that we were not here to conduct business as usual, that we intended to bring about a fundamental change of direction for our beloved country. First, we turned around an economy racked by inflation and uncertainty, an economy that was headed into an abyss. We put America back on the high road to growth and expanding opportunity, to hope and improving living standards.

However, I can assure all of you that the great economic expansion our country has enjoyed has had more to do with low tax rates, deregulation, and responsible Federal policies than with leprechauns. In fact, the only people who still seem to believe in tooth fairies and leprechauns are those who've tried to tell us that if we only raise taxes the budget deficit will disappear.

Well, luck, as it is said, is where preparation meets opportunity. And for the first 2 years of our administration, we prepared America for better times. We cut the tax rates. We streamlined government and cut useless regulations.

Through our block grant program, we returned power and authority for a number of programs back to the States. But most significant, we turned to the people themselves. We left resources in their hands that others would have taken away.

We took the yolk of overregulation off their shoulders. We looked to the entrepreneur instead of the Federal planner, the free enterprise system instead of the bureaucracy. And they proved something I've always believed in, and that is, more often than not, the best thing government can do for a free people is get its hands out of their pockets and get out of their way.

I think we can be proud that our policies, based on an abiding faith in the people, have worked. America is still enjoying the fruits of the longest peacetime expansion in history. The real gross national product, which is the value of all the goods and services produced in the United States, has risen more than 21 percent during this expansion. Inflation, running at double-digit, killer rates in 1979 and '80, has averaged some 3.3 percent since the recovery began. The prime interest rate, which was 21 percent just before we got to Washington, is down to -- last month -- 8.75.

It means the median after-inflation income of the American family, which was dropping when we got to Washington, increased 4.2 percent in 1986. Homes are again affordable to the average citizen. In March of last year, America built its 100 millionth home.

You know, I wonder sometimes where certain candidates for an office of the other party -- why they haven't found out all these figures. [Laughter] Don't let anyone tell you that this expansion has excluded the poor and the minorities, as some of them are saying. The poverty rate, which was rising precipitously when we got here, is now declining. That tragic trend we inherited has been reversed. Among minorities, the news is also good. Teenage black unemployment, for example, though still far too high, has been cut dramatically in recent years; and the percentage of blacks in the group of Americans who make over $50,000 has almost doubled since 1982.

Are you involved in any charity or social service activities, such as helping the poor, the sick, or the elderly? And furthermore, we know that between 1980 and 1986 charitable giving shot up 77 percent. So much for the so-called era of greed.

This has been a time of people getting involved and helping one another without waiting for government. It's been a time of increasing hope, of rising standards of living, of economic expansion. And don't let anyone tell you it's all over. We were told it couldn't be done even before we started. The doomsayers then claimed it could never last, yet it has been one of the longest, as I said, peacetime expansions in history.

On the network news we saw story after story that would lead one to conclude that poverty was increasing, and when the statistics finally came out, we found there'd been a significant decline in the poverty rate. We heard the professional pessimists telling us America was being deindustrialized, and then we found out that our industry was making record gains in productivity and that our manufacturing industries were making a big comeback. And now we even hear highly touted analysts telling economic movers and shakers that a report heralding the good news that unemployment is going down is actually bad news.

I don't think the American people believe good news is really bad news. We can be proud of what's been accomplished. The doomsayers, who can't make the front page or network news unless they've got something bad to say, have been wrong for the last 7 years. And in 1988 we and the American people are going to prove them wrong again.

In the year ahead, we're not going to be on the defensive, shoring up problems and answering our critics. We are moving forward, and I have no doubt that when we look back 1988 will be a year of great accomplishment toward our goals. This is the year when Judge Anthony Kennedy will be confirmed and the Supreme Court will again be brought up to full strength. The Federal judiciary is too important to be made a political football. I would hope, and the American people should expect, not only for Judge Kennedy's confirmation but for the Senate to get to work and act on 27 other judicial nominations that have been left in limbo for quite awhile now.

This is also the year that the United States will strongly affirm that democracy, not communism, is the future of Central America. In a few weeks, Congress will determine if we're to provide the democratic resistance in Nicaragua what they need to survive. The Guatemala peace plan can succeed only if the Sandinistas have reason to compromise and institute democratic reforms. We must have the courage to stand behind those who continue to put their lives on the line for democracy in Nicaragua.

We've learned on another front that standing firm -- that strength, not weakness -- is the best way to achieve results with our adversaries. Nearly 7 years ago, I proposed the zero option, suggesting the elimination of an entire class of U.S. and Soviet intermediate-range nuclear armed missiles. Many of our opponents called for the so-called nuclear freeze, which would have left Soviet intermediate-range missiles threatening both Europe and Asia. Against great outcries, we and our allies installed our cruise and Pershing II missiles. It was this determination which finally convinced the Kremlin to bargain realistically. I believe we can all be proud that at last month's summit we signed the first agreement between the Soviet Union and the United States that actually reduced our respective nuclear arsenals.

Senate will begin its review of the INF treaty next week, and while there will be a thorough examination, there should be no reason to delay ratification. Let us note that one stand we took in this arms reduction process concerned our commitment to the Strategic Defense Initiative. SDI will give us the possibility to base deterrence increasingly on defenses which threaten no one rather than on the threat of nuclear retaliation. I would hope that Congress does not, in the months ahead, take away in the committee room what the Soviets were unable to get at the bargaining table. We must push forward in the SDI research and testing.

Progress continues to be made, as well, toward strategic nuclear reductions, and another summit may occur in the near future. But let me note: Arms reductions cannot and will not be pursued in isolation from other areas of deep concern to the American people and the other free people of the world. If relations with the Soviet Union are to improve, if we're to enter into a new period of rapprochement with our adversary, we must see greater respect for human rights. We need to see more freedom and a further opening of the emigration door. We also need to see a peaceful resolution to regional conflicts which Soviet weapons, personnel, and policies now help to prolong.

In particular, the Soviet Government needs to realize that relations with the United States cannot be expected to flourish while Soviet troops remain in Afghanistan. And I can promise all those who love freedom and whose hearts must be with those freedom fighters who struggle for their national survival that the Soviet troops must leave Afghanistan and the United States will never agree to any steps that would put the freedom fighters and Afghan hopes for self-determination at risk.

Clearly, the people of the world are bounding rapidly into a new era of technology and enterprise. Tremendous advances are being made that are opening up vast new potential. Communist societies, in contrast, stagnate under the heavy hand of repression and the failure of socialism. They must change; relations with the West must improve, or Communist governments will simply be left behind. It's that simple.

And here in this continent, we are about to undertake one of the most truly visionary steps of the 20th century. Early this month, Prime Minister Mulroney and I signed, and I fully expect the Congress to approve, an agreement that will eliminate the tariffs and tear down the barriers that have frustrated and taxed trade and commerce between the United States and Canada. What we are putting in place is the largest free trade area in the world. This historic step will be a source of growth and prosperity on both sides of the border for years to come and be a lasting legacy of which we all can be immensely proud.

The only thing that can keep America back is an unwillingness to do what needs to be done, to do what is within our ability to do. Congress, for example, needs to act to make good on the second year of its agreement to bring down Federal deficit spending. Nothing could give greater confidence to the investing community than responsible action by Washington to bring down the level of deficit spending.

And finally, I'd like to discuss with you personally something that's been of utmost concern to Nancy and me during our stay at the White House. Of all we've been able to do, I'm perhaps the proudest of what we've done to change attitudes in America about the use of drugs.

We've spent much time and money on interdicting drugs, on arresting the traffickers and stopping the flow of drugs from their source. Yet we cannot ignore that as long as there are users the problem will persist. Progress has already been made. The number of daily marijuana users among high school seniors, according to some reports, has dropped from 1 in 9 in 1978 to 1 in 30 in 1987.

In the time left in our administration, I would hope that you'll do everything possible to eliminate drug abuse from the Federal workplace. The Federal Government is the Nation's largest employer, and it should be an example to the rest of the Nation. We've got to make it an example. Can I count on you?

You've changed and are changing the direction not only of American history but of world history. We have been revolutionaries, and for 7 years the so-called sophisticates have at every turn said our revolution had failed. But again and again they've been wrong, because they've forgotten our secret weapon -- the human spirit.

I thank you, and God bless you for all you've done and will do this year. And you've already applauded, so I won't wait for that, because I had something else to follow my speech. And that is I would like to introduce to you some of my small friends from the Young Americans for [Citizens of] America who have a big message for you.

Note: The President spoke at 11:30 a.m. at DAR Constitution Hall at the seventh annual Executive Forum for political appointees of the administration. Following his remarks, a group of children representing Young Citizens of America sang a short medley of patriotic songs.

Central American Presidents presents important opportunities to further peace and democracy in this troubled region. At the San Jose summit, there was a clear consensus among the four Central American democratic Presidents that the Sandinistas had not complied with the peace accord. By making his last-minute promises, President Ortega implicitly acknowledged the accuracy of that judgment.

City plan aims at peace and democracy for all of Central America. Its objectives, in combination with the pressures from the Central American democracies and the Nicaraguan democratic resistance, have prompted the Sandinistas to reluctantly promise to diminish their tight control over the Nicaraguan political system and to provide a glimmer of hope to the Nicaraguan people that democracy and freedom may eventually be established.

The key issue is whether Daniel Ortega is really committed to genuine democracy or just seeks the elimination of the Nicaraguan democratic resistance. The Sandinistas' track record is clear and must be considered in evaluating the latest Sandinista offer. There is a need for openmindedness and hope, along with skepticism. We welcome the new promises but note that while Daniel Ortega was in Costa Rica making them his government was arresting prominent democratic leaders inside Nicaragua.

The focus is where it belongs: on the Sandinistas -- their promises and their actions. The President believes that continued support for the Nicaraguan democratic resistance will keep the pressure on the Sandinistas to move forward with genuine and enduring democratic reforms. The Nicaraguan democratic resistance is the best insurance policy for keeping the peace process on track and producing a democratic outcome in Nicaragua. This is not the time to falter in our support for the freedom fighters.

The President. Well, Brooke and ladies and gentlemen, good afternoon, and welcome to the White House. We've gathered here today to bestow an honor upon a woman we all know and admire: Brooke Astor. I'll read a citation in just a moment, but that citation is awfully official sounding, and I'd like to add a personal note. You see, Brooke is a friend of ours. Nancy has known Brooke since Nancy was 14. I've known Brooke for a good many years.

There's no way a document can capture her wit, her warmth, no way express her energy and her extraordinary vitality. And, Brooke, there's just no way that Nancy and I can ever thank you enough for all the wonderful moments that you've given us.

I herewith transmit my determination and certification under Section 111(b)(2)(A) of the Joint Resolution making further continuing appropriations for the fiscal year 1988, and for other purposes (P.L. 100 - 202), relating to efforts to achieve a cease-fire agreed to by the Government of Nicaragua and the Nicaraguan democratic resistance. I am also transmitting herewith copies of reports to me by the Secretary of State which discuss the negotiation process and describe the failure of the Government of Nicaragua to progress toward the establishment of genuine democracy.

The time for Sandinista compliance with the accord has come and gone and the Nicaraguan people and the Central American democracies have waited in vain for the Sandinistas to carry out their promises. It has become increasingly clear that, without the pressure created by a strong Nicaraguan democratic resistance, the Sandinistas will not change their conduct to comply with the promises they have repeatedly made and broken since 1979.

To succeed in bringing democracy to Nicaragua and security to all of Central America, the United States must maintain a steady course in its Central America policy, including its support for the Nicaraguan democratic resistance.

United States remains fully committed to the achievement of democracy in Nicaragua and security in all of Central America as the essential conditions for a just and lasting peace in the region. The events which have unfolded since the signing of the Guatemala accord on August 7, 1987, have demonstrated once again that a strong Nicaraguan democratic resistance remains essential to the achievement of those conditions.

Before we turn to matters of policy, let me express to you my condolences on the untimely loss of the president of the Mainichi Newspapers, Mr. Daisuke Yamauchi. Mr. Yamauchi knew the United States well, and as Mainichi's bureau chief in Washington, and before that as one of the first Japanese participants in the Fulbright fellowship program, he fostered the close ties that have come to mark our countries' mutual relations over the years. He was also one of the founders of the Fulbright Alumni Association in Japan and its first president. Mr. Yamauchi was an outstanding journalist and a great friend of the United States. He will be missed.

Now, how would you assess the present status of the START negotiations? Will the treaty be ready for signature when you visit Moscow? On the other hand, some of us in Japan feel that the advent of the new superpower relationship might mean the United States and the U.S.S.R. are starting to talk over our heads, so to speak. Would you tell me how you look at the superpower relationship from now on as well as its implications to the U.S. allies?

General Secretary Gorbachev in Washington resulted in considerable progress toward implementing our goal of 50-percent reductions in U.S. and Soviet strategic offensive arms. We agreed that we would instruct our negotiators in Geneva to work toward the completion of a treaty and related documents at the earliest possible date -- if possible, in time for signature during our meeting in Moscow in the first half of 1988.

I don't wish to underestimate the difficulties of this task. In particular, a START agreement presents difficult verification challenges that go well beyond those we faced in INF. However, a START agreement has always been a high priority of mine and would constitute an historic achievement. If the Soviets show a similar commitment to reductions in strategic offensive arms and don't attempt to hold such reductions hostage to restrictions that would cripple SDI, we can conclude an effectively verifiable START agreement.

I firmly believe the achievements to date in U.S.-Soviet relations would not have been possible without the close consultations and unity of purpose between the United States and our allies, both in Europe and in Asia. Through this cooperation we have been able to send a clear message to Moscow that the Western alliance -- and when I use that term I have very much in mind our allies in Asia as well as NATO -- remains solid and committed to a realistic security policy vis-a-vis the Soviet Union. We have always valued highly the advice and support of your government as we have pursued our dialog with Moscow and will continue to do so in the future. Prime Minister Takeshita and I had a full exchange of views on the appropriate strategy for dealing with Mr.

The President. In the coming year, as our trading sectors more fully adjust to the strong exchange rate signals of the last 2 years, we expect to see continued adjustments in real external imbalances, greater stability in exchange rates, a reduction in uncertainties facing traders, and an improved outlook for investment in our respective economies.

In the United States, we are reducing the budget deficit and the private sector is expanding exports. United States fiscal and monetary policies are encouraging real economic growth, a decline in the trade deficit, and a more stable dollar.

We would ask other countries to pursue the best interests of their consumers by breaking down the structural and policy barriers to imports that prevent them from enjoying a higher standard of living. Other nations also need to build up their domestic infrastructure and generally invest more in their own economies.

The President. Prime Minister Takeshita and I achieved a reaffirmation of the importance of U.S.-Japan relations not only to our two countries but to the world. We continued to demonstrate to the world the value of U.S.-Japan cooperation as allies and partners to global peace and prosperity.

I met with Prime Minister Takeshita when he was Minister of Finance, and since he became Prime Minister we have communicated on several occasions and exchanged personal messages. So, it is fair to say we had already established a personal relationship before our recent meeting. If I were to characterize that relationship, I would describe it as the sort of personal relationship one would expect between the leaders of two of the world's largest democracies and the two largest free economies, a relationship based on shared values and interests and mutual trust and respect.

States-Japan relations are solid. There is hardly an important issue, multilateral or bilateral, on which we do not consult closely and cooperate. We have certain trade differences, but we are addressing them cooperatively, as friends and allies. We will continue to do so.

Not only do we share values and interests, our economies are inextricably entwined, and neither country wants to see relations unravel. I can assure you we are working hard to make sure the bonds between us remain strong.

Retaliatory measures hammered out by the Congress against Kansai Airport issue, as well as Toshiba and semiconductor sanctions, and demands for liberalization of import of rice and other agricultural products are proving to be highly sensitive in Japan, imbued with emotional undertones, making it difficult for Prime Minister Takeshita to implement necessary policy changes. Would there, after all, not be any possibility of compromise conceivable, such as a linkage of sorts between Japan's adoption of a decidedly domestic expansionist policy and lessening of these U.S. demands?

The President. Trade issues in both our countries are often highly sensitive. In dealing with these issues, we should seek solutions that are in the overall best interest of each nation and the international economy and not allow protectionist pressures to hold sway. Japan's expansionary economic policy is part of a coordinated effort to reduce external economic imbalances.

The President. I would welcome a trade bill that is not protectionist. However, the current trade bill in Congress still contains a number of protectionist proposals. I will veto any bill that restricts trade, favors special interests to the detriment of the broader national interest, or includes procedural changes that are protectionist. I have urged Congress to jettison the protectionist features of the trade bill.

They made little sense when originally proposed, and they make even less sense today. In my view, trade policy should not be confrontational but should help open markets, increase market incentives and efficiency, and make a positive contribution to world economic stability.

The impact of recent economic developments is difficult to predict. It is encouraging that monthly U.S. trade data have begun to show significant progress toward reducing the deficit. Of course, eliminating the deficit will take time. Because of that, protectionist sentiment will not go away quickly. There is also a deeply held view that U.S. markets are far more open to the exports of our trading partners than are their markets to United States exports. Our trading partners should understand and support the need of the United States to significantly increase exports if protectionism is to be contained.

How the U.S. Congress will react to economic developments is even more difficult to predict. I would hope that Congress will reconsider certain protectionist proposals that have passed one or both Houses. My opposition to such protectionist measures is as strong as ever.

The President. We were pleased that the Republic of Korea conducted its Presidential election and arrived at a democratic outcome. We look forward to working with Mr. Roh Tae Woo, the President-elect, and will keep open our channels to the opposition. Preparations for the Olympics are on track. I am pleased to see that East-bloc nations and the Soviet Union have accepted invitations. I know that the Republic of Korea remains open to compromise on the Olympics and hope that North Korea will join in this great celebration.

In the Philippines, President Aquino's government offers the best chance for establishing a stable democracy and a prosperous economy. President Aquino enjoys broad popular support, and Filipinos perceive her government as honest and committed to justice. There have been many accomplishments in the Philippines, including adoption of a new constitution, successful conduct of congressional elections, and restoration of economic growth. Prime Minister Takeshita's decision to attend the December ASEAN [Association of South East Asian Nations] ministerial conference in Manila, thereby visiting the Philippines before any other country, was an admirable demonstration of his government's support for the Aquino government and the ASEAN nations.

I am optimistic regarding prospects for the East Asian nations in 1988. I expect peaceful and stable relations within the region, though Vietnam's continuing occupation of Cambodia is unacceptable and should be ended without delay. We all hope for a relaxation of tensions on the Korean Peninsula and a successful Olympic games, developments that could contribute to better East-West relations. We must support the Aquino government's efforts to promote democracy, stability, and economic reform in the Philippines. We must remain resolute in maintaining our military preparedness against the steady Soviet buildup of forces deployed in East Asia. I foresee continuing economic growth and dynamism for the nations of East Asia in 1988. Given our mutual interest and desire to cooperate in trade and other matters, I see no reason why the East Asian nations cannot join with other nations, especially the United States and Japan, to achieve unprecedented prosperity for the betterment of all mankind.

U.S.-Japan relationship, in terms of the development of the Pacific rim area, as well as for the well-being of the world as a whole? At the same time, how would you see changes in the roles of China and the U.S.S.R. in the Pacific area as well as in the whole world of the 21st century?

The President. I am very optimistic -- and with good reason -- about the future of U.S.-Japan relations in the coming century. Already we are close allies. We maintain the largest overseas trading relationship in the history of the world, and our global interests coincide in most areas. The reason this remarkable relationship exists is no accident; rather, it stems from the fact that our two nations share a common set of democratic goals and principles and because we both believe in the virtues of an open economic system. I am confident that these shared principles and goals will continue to guide our two nations, and therefore I am equally confident that the excellent relations which now exist between the United States and Japan will continue to flourish in the coming century. In fact, the future of the Pacific rim area as a whole appears very bright in the next century. The principles of free trade and democracy are spreading throughout the world, even into once-dark corners of the Socialist world. America and Japan can work together to advance this trend.

Are you satisfied with Japan's effort to build up her self-defense capabilities? And in view of the present level of our defense spending, are you satisfied with Japan's efforts to increase official development assistance and other aids to the Third World? What sort of contribution would you like to see from Japan to the protection of the shipping in the Persian Gulf?

The President. We consider it very important that Japan increase its capability to defend its homeland, territorial seas and skies, and sealanes out to 1,000 nautical miles -- goals incorporated in Japan's defense planning. We welcome, therefore, the increase in Japan's defense budget for the coming year, which will enable Japan to fund fully the third year of its current 5-year defense plan. We are also pleased that the budget provides additional funding to increase Japan's support for United States forces stationed in Japan.

We welcome efforts of the Government of Japan to increase aid flows and other financing for Third World countries. In particular, we applaud the plan to double official development assistance by 1990 and the commitment to recycle $20 billion over 3 years to developing countries.

We are pleased with measures undertaken by the Government of Japan to enhance navigational safety and promote peace in the Persian Gulf region. Provision of a navigational aid system, increased aid to Jordan and Oman, and funding for United Nations peace efforts are concrete signs of Japan's political commitment to Western solidarity in our common efforts to assure safe navigation and bring peace to the Gulf.

Well, now we've heard Principal Hairston and others tell us how this transformation has taken place. And before taking your questions, I'd like to discuss with you how we might work this same transformation in schools all across America. The first point to make is that money alone isn't the answer. From 1963 to 1980, for example, the amount our nation spent on education in real terms more than doubled. Yet during precisely that same period, college board scores fell by almost 90 points. Consider, too, the State of New Hampshire. New Hampshire spends less on education per student than almost every State in the Union. Yet for a number of years now, New Hampshire students have had the Nation's highest SAT scores.

Now, please don't misunderstand me, funding is important, very important. In fact, the amount our country will devote to education this year at all levels of government -- local, State, and Federal -- will total over $300 billion. But money is only money. Unless it represents genuine commitment -- a willingness to work hard at improving American education, to become involved -- then money by itself is all but meaningless. You know, I've thought more than once that -- back when we were throwing money at education -- well, we were sort of like the parent who will buy his child expensive toys and clothes, who will give his child just about anything, except his own time and commitment.

There are too few rewards. We need to change that. We need to reward excellence in education as we reward excellence in other fields. We need, in other words, to introduce education to some free-market principles, things like incentives and accountability. An example of incentives is programs now under consideration in some areas, programs that reward teachers and administrations for improved student performance. As for an example of accountability, well, you needn't look any further than Superintendent Murphy's ``Applied Anxiety Room.'' Posted in his office are the test scores showing the performance of all the schools in Prince George's County.

Educational excellence also means getting parents involved. It means taking innovative steps to attract and reward good teachers based on their performance. And it means alternate certification: opening up the teaching profession to allow more qualified men and women to enter the field. Excellence means community involvement, and your Advisory Council for Business and Industry, as we've heard, is a fine example of this.

And of course, educational excellence depends on choice. I've long argued that parents should have more choice in determining the schools that their children will attend. I've long argued that more choice would lead to better education.

And so, I've advocated tuition tax credits and education vouchers. One form of choice, magnet schools, is one of the things Prince George's County is most noted for and is one of the great success stories of the education reform movement.

In helping to foster magnet schools, we help foster improved education. In 1987 a $4 million Department of Education grant was made to Prince George's County for magnet school programs, such as the kind that you have here at Suitland High School. It's been a good investment. Come to think of it, I wish all Federal dollars got that kind of return. And since I'd like to see magnet schools programs expanded, I'm going to ask the Congress to increase the size of the current program next year by over 50 percent, from $72 million to $115 million. With these additional funds, we can help more schools do what you've done so well in Prince George's County.

It is here, in Suitland High and schools like it around the country, that our future is being shaped. Recently the headlines have been full of a term called ``superconductivity,'' as papers struggle to keep up with the seemingly daily breakthroughs in the lab. Only a year ago superconductivity was considered a scientific backwater, a phenomenon with little practical purpose. Now scientists are saying it may change our lives. ``It shows all the dreams we have had can come true. The sky is the limit,'' said one theorist. We're moving from an age of things to an age of thoughts, of mind over matter. It is the mind of man -- free to invent, free to experiment, free to dream -- that will shape the economy and the world of the future.

Permit me to offer in closing one final message, and it's a message from my heart. If you heard my radio talk last Saturday, then you'll know about a new report on drug use by America's students, including high school students like you. We've had so much bad news about drugs lately, but if you want some good news, just listen. According to the report released by our Secretary of Health and Human Services, Dr. Otis Bowen, last year, for the first time since these surveys began, a substantially smaller number of high school students -- one third smaller -- acknowledged current use of cocaine than acknowledged it the year before. And cocaine is no longer fashionable -- far from it. Ninety-seven percent of the students surveyed disapproved of regular cocaine use, while 87 percent disapproved of even trying it. The use of marijuana and amphetamines is also down.

What it all means is this: America's young people are getting the message. Drugs are ugly. Drugs are nothing to brag about. Drugs kill. And this is so important as you look to the future. You see, in the 21st century, staying employed will mean more than just knowing something. It will mean being able to keep on learning. It will mean having character and discipline and being proud of yourselves.

My young friends, you've done so much already, turning this school around, learning to learn, and learning to look to the future with confidence. I can't tell you how proud I am of you. Keep it up. Keep on saying yes to life. And when it comes to drugs, take a tip from a friend of mine who just happens to be named Nancy Reagan: Just say no.

Association. One of the most important questions facing high school seniors today is what college they plan to attend and what career goals they plan to pursue. When you were a high school senior, what career goals did you want to pursue? And how did you plan for it? And what advice can you give young people today as they embark on their careers?

The President. You've asked a question, and I know you're expecting an answer saying something about having decided to do something or other. No, I'm delighted to answer this and encourage you -- don't be concerned because you haven't made up your mind. I graduated from college with a degree in economics and sociology and still had not been able to pin down exactly what I wanted to do. Now, at that time, I must say, the demand was just maybe to get a job of any kind, because I graduated at the very depth of the Great Depression -- 1932. And so, you thought anything might be -- but it wasn't until I went back to my summer job to get a little money to go job hunting after I graduated.

My summer job was lifeguarding at a river beach in my hometown. And there were people who came out from the city and corporate heads and so forth with their families every summer. And I taught their children to swim and so forth. And there weren't as many by 1932 with the result of what had happened in the Crash. But one was there, and he told me that if I could tell him what I wanted to do he had contacts with a number of businesses and areas. He would do what he could to get me a job. But he said, ``You've got to come back and tell me.'' And I went home, and I thought, and I finally realized that in spite of my degree in economics and sociology I wanted the theatrical world.

Now, there in the middle of Illinois, I didn't have the nerve to say I wanted to be an actor. [Laughter] But radio was pretty new, and I said I wanted to be a sports announcer in radio. Well, he told me then, he said, ``Well, I don't have any contacts. There's nothing I can do to help you there.'' But he said, ``Maybe that's better. Let me give you some advice.'' He gave me the best advice I've ever had. He said, ``Now that you've determined that, what you want to do,'' he said, ``you start out knocking on doors, telling people at those doors what you want to do -- businesses. And someplace along the line, even in this Depression, you'll find someone in a radio station who knows that his business is going to depend on bringing younger people into the business to carry on. And then you'll get a job.'' And he says, ``Don't get discouraged if you knock on a lot of doors.

He stood me in front of a microphone in a studio. He said, ``When the red light goes on, you start broadcasting an imaginary football game.'' He said, ``I'll be in another room listening.'' And I remembered a game we played the year before, my senior year. We won in the last 20 seconds of the game with a long touchdown run and so forth. And I could remember enough of the names so that I wouldn't have to fish for names in broadcasting it. So, I started us out in the fourth quarter, with the long, blue shadow settling over the field, and back in our own 35 yard line. Here's the play -- has the ball going wide out to the right, cuts back in over -- so forth and so on. [Laughter] He walked back into the studio, and he said, ``Be here Saturday. You're broadcasting the Iowa-Minnesota football game.'' And that's how I started my career as a sports announcer.

I know I've taken a long time here, but I know that this is a problem at your age -- that you're thinking so hard, so many of you, what do I want to do? And don't let it bother you that you haven't made that decision yet. You'll change your mind many times before it comes -- the right moment. But then when it comes, just knock on the door, whatever you've chosen to do, and ask until you find somebody that will let you in.

Now, government of that kind can only work if people participate. So, whether you're interested in ever becoming involved in politics yourself, participate by that most fundamental thing of voting. But also when you make up your mind, the thing that you believe in, and whether it's party or what philosophy, then participate. Volunteer in campaigns to be of help, to really participate in what the Government -- or who is going to be in the Government. And then, if from that experience you find that you want to actually engage in the issues of the day and having a say about them, then you look around and pick where is the nearest and most available way or level of government and office that you can begin by seeking public office.

And then, when you get that public office, make up your mind -- I have told a Cabinet as a Governor of California and a Cabinet as the President of the United States, in discussing all the issues and what we're going to do about something, don't anyone tell me what the best political way is. I don't want to hear what is right or wrong politically. I want to hear what is right or wrong morally about the issue and what we should do, and make that your goal as a participant in government.

Good morning, Mr. President. My name is Larry Bradford. I'm a student with the visual and performing arts program. My question to you today is: Based on what you learned of our school today, what educational programs and policies will your administration be advocating?

The President. Well, I probably should turn that question over to the Secretary of Education, who is experienced in it, but I would just take a chance myself -- if he wants to add anything to this. I think that the first thing we at the Federal level must recognize is that our great system of education is managed by and run by the people at the local and State level. And the Federal Government should be of help where it can, but it should not involve itself in trying to dictate to the schools of America.

President. I think you will see emphasis from us on the point that we heard from this table: accountability, choice, high expectations to help the kind of local effort we see here be duplicated all around the country.

The President. Well, having seen four of them in my lifetime, I'm hoping and praying that we can avoid one. But I do know this: We have to be practical. We have to be realistic. We have to be totally in favor of peace ourselves and doing all that we can to maintain peace.

My first words in my meeting with Gorbachev in Geneva, Switzerland -- when he and I met in a room, just the two of us and -- well, with interpreters -- I said to him that we were in a unique situation, the two of us from these two great powers, that we could perhaps bring on a war or we could bring on peace for the world. And I said I think what we have to recognize is we mistrust each other, and we are both heavily armed. And I said we don't mistrust each other because we're armed. We're armed because we mistrust each other. And so, our goal -- even though we're going to talk about trying to reduce weapons and lower the military threat -- that our main goal must be to eliminate the mistrust that has caused us to build those armaments. And I think that this country -- we have an order now to maintain peace.

Great Seal of the United States, with the eagle and its head turned -- in one claw has arrows and in the other claw has the olive branch, designating peace. The older seal, the one on my desk in the Oval Office -- because it's an old, old desk -- the eagle is looking at the claw with the arrows. On the ceiling -- because the building is newer -- on that seal, the eagle is looking at the claw with the olive branch.

Good morning, Mr. President. My name is Keith Emory, and I'm a senior in the comprehensive school program. My question for you deals with a major issue in the United States: the issue of the balance of trading. What steps do you think the U.S. Government can take to correct the many trade imbalances that we have with foreign countries?

The President. We're taking those steps as much as we can. But let me point something out. I happen to be one who believes that the imbalance in trade is not the terrible thing that it has been portrayed. Granted that we would like to export more, but for 100 years -- while this country of ours was becoming the great economic power that it is -- for all those 100 years, we had an imbalance of trade, as we have now. We're the greatest exporter in the world. Now, I could caution you, too. Sometimes our statisticians don't use all the figures they should. For example, by the number of dollars of exports that we have does not include services, just things that are made to sell. I think there might be a little difference if we realized how much money comes in from abroad to insurance companies that sell insurance abroad, the services of that kind. And it would balance up a little better.

But if we're going to be the greatest exporter, we must recognize the right of other countries to export, too, and therefore we're an importer. And I've always -- this comes, I guess, from that degree in economics I got -- I've always believed that people in America who feel free to buy foreign products, import foreign goods of some kind or another -- that's their right to do that.

And those people, at the same time that they're sending money abroad, they're replacing that money with a product that has an actual money worth. And it's not that the Government is involved in that. Where the Government is involved is -- we have people in our Congress today who want protectionism, high tariffs that will keep people from being able to sell goods in our country without realizing that they can retaliate and then have high tariffs against us selling abroad.

Back in that Great Depression that I mentioned earlier, in 1932, two great mistakes were made in this country and by this country. One, we introduced a thing called the Smoot-Hawley tariff, which made it virtually impossible for anyone to sell anything in America, and that simply spread the Great Depression around the world. And the only thing that ended the Great Depression was World War II.

And that was one lesson. The second lesson was the Congress of the United States also then increased the income taxes tremendously from one bracket of 1\1/2\ percent to 9 percent, from something like around 20 percent to 63 percent. And immediately, the total amount of revenue that the Government was getting was reduced, even though the rates were higher.

And so, what we're fighting for is free and fair trade around the world, and we've made great progress with some of our trading partners who did have restraints and restrictions. But that open, free trade and, as I continue to insist, low tax rates here on ourselves in our own country, to increase the incentive of people to earn more -- we have reduced the taxes in our administration, and the total amount of revenue the Government is getting from that tax has increased mightily. About 1,000 years ago, a man named Ibn-Khaldun said in the beginning of the empire, the rates were low and the revenue was high. At the end of the empire, the rates were high and the revenue was low.

Good morning, Mr. President. I am Len Walder, a freshman in the University High School. My question to you is this: What do you feel was your major accomplishment as President, and what would you most like to be remembered for as President of the United States?

The President. Well, just one line to finish now, and I appreciate very much and apologize for the length of my answers. But this thing about America -- I got a letter from a man the other day, and I'll share it with you. This man said you can go to live in Turkey, but you can't become a Turk. You can go to live in Japan, but you cannot become Japanese -- or Germany or France -- and named all the others. But he said anyone from any corner of the world can come to America and become an American.

Thank you all very much, and welcome to the White House. I often like to start this sort of an event with a joke or an anecdote, but somehow I don't think that's appropriate today. The issue we're here to discuss is perhaps one of the most serious we'll have to face and make a decision on. As you know, Congress will be voting soon on continued aid to the democratic resistance forces in Nicaragua, the contras, as they call them, or freedom fighters, as I call them. And if aid doesn't pass, those in Congress who oppose aid to the freedom fighters have made it very plain that they will not allow another vote on this issue to come to the floor. We're at a critical juncture: If Congress votes down aid this time, the decision may well be irrevocable. And if that happens, it's my great fear that we will have abandoned all hope for democracy in Nicaragua and peace in Central America.

Last weekend the leaders of the five Central American nations met to examine compliance with the Guatemala accord. There's no doubt as to their conclusion: The Sandinistas are the biggest obstacle to fulfillment of the plan and to peace and democracy in that region. While the four Central American democracies are in substantial compliance, the Sandinistas are nowhere near. Even the Sandinistas had to admit as much, issuing a separate declaration that outlined additional steps they felt compelled to announce so as to put their behavior in a better light.

I want to talk to you today about why we must keep the pressure on the Sandinistas so that they can't reverse course, so they keep walking down that road to democracy. Because each step they have taken, each reluctant reform, is still easily undone. Daniel Ortega has said that his revolution is irreversible. Our goal in Nicaragua must be to make democracy irreversible.

We welcome the Sandinistas' new promises to abide by the peace plan, and we must hold them to their word. We must make sure that each time the Sandinistas walk through a new door toward democracy we close it behind them -- and keep it closed. Only the freedom fighters can do that, only they can be our insurance policy for democracy in Central America. Some say that the freedom fighters are not necessary to keep the pressure on, that the spotlight of world opinion and the Sandinistas' sworn commitment to the Guatemala accord are enough.

It's simply stating the obvious to point out that the Sandinistas have not honored a single one of those promises to the other nations of the Organization of American States. What isn't as widely understood, however, is that we now have documented proof that they never intended to. Barely 2 months after assuming power, the Sandinista leadership met secretly to draft a report known as the 72-hour document, outlining their plans to establish a Communist dictatorship in Nicaragua and spread subversion throughout Central America.

Sandinistas and their supporters say it was the belligerence of the United States that forced them to go back on their promises, just as they now put all of the blame for their shortcomings on the freedom fighters. But again, let's examine the historical record. Only a day after the Sandinistas finished meeting secretly to draft the 72-hour document, President Carter received Daniel Ortega in the White House and offered his new government our friendship and help. But while we sent the Sandinistas over $100 million in aid -- more than any other country -- and arranged for hundreds of millions of dollars of loans, the Sandinistas were busy carrying out their plans to eliminate human rights and impose a Marxist totalitarian regime in Nicaragua.

Six months after the meeting in the White House, while the United States aid was still flowing, several Sandinista comandantes took their first official trip to Moscow, the first of many, and signed a communique with the Soviet Communist Party, expressing support for the foreign policy goals of the Soviet Union. But that, one might say, was merely the paperwork; already Soviet military planners were in Nicaragua. Over 30 new military bases were either built or in the process of construction by the time I came into office in 1981. The Sandinista army was becoming the largest, best supplied in all Central America, and the Sandinistas were already assisting the Communist guerrillas in El Salvador -- all while American aid flowed to Nicaragua, while our hand was extended in friendship.

I could go on to detail the systematic crushing of all human rights, the torture of dissidents, and the swelling population of political prisoners, the tragedy of hundreds of thousands of Nicaraguan refugees flooding into Costa Rica and Honduras nearly -- 1 out of every 10 Nicaraguans is now a refugee. But the record of Sandinista totalitarianism is well known by now. The human destruction of communism on the American mainland is well documented and acknowledged by all sides in this debate. My purpose here is to ask a simple question: How can we expect a regime that has compiled such a history of broken promises, of outright deceit, to abide by the terms of the Guatemala accord unless we keep up the pressure by continuing to aid the freedom fighters?

Congress, giving them assurances of his commitment to the Guatemala accord. But we know now, from the testimony of a high-level Sandinista defector, Major Roger Miranda, that even while Daniel Ortega was making those promises, the Sandinistas were planning with the Cubans and Soviets to increase their armed forces to 600,000 -- that's one out of every five men, women, and children in the country.

Shortly after Major Miranda made his revelations public, Defense Minister Humberto Ortega confirmed them, including Sandinista plans to acquire advanced MiG fighter planes, missiles, and artillery. ``Several thousand Nicaraguans,'' he said, ``are now taking courses in the Soviet Union and other Socialist countries to learn to operate the new weapons systems.'' And the Sandinistas are now developing military facilities that could serve as a launching stage for the Soviet Tu - 95 BEAR bomber, a bomber whose range reaches well inside the continental United States. All this, it now turns out, while Daniel Ortega was in the halls of our Congress talking peace.

Now the Sandinistas have made more promises. We welcome their promises to lift the state of siege, meet face-to-face with freedom fighters, hold local elections, and release some political prisoners; and we must hold them to those promises.

Guatemala accord, were taken with extreme reluctance and only after the Sandinistas had been told by certain U.S. Congressmen that failure to do so would result in renewed aid for the freedom fighters.

Was there ever a better argument for aid? It's only the freedom fighters, and the pressure they've brought to bear on the Sandinistas, that has brought us this far. It's only the freedom fighters that can push the Sandinistas so far down the road to democracy that they never go back. The fact is that even if they carry out the steps they've announced, the Sandinistas are still a long way from compliance with the Guatemala accord.

Those who want to cut off funding for the freedom fighters are going to have to explain how Daniel Ortega doesn't really mean what he says. They're going to have to explain that the Sandinistas don't really mean what they say when they talk of turning all of Central America into one ``revolutionary fire'' and boasting of carrying their fight into Latin America and Mexico. Because right now, what stands between the Sandinistas and their stated intentions, what stands in the way of a Soviet base camp in Central America, are the Nicaraguan freedom fighters. It's clear that it's the freedom fighters, and only the freedom fighters, that have brought the Sandinistas to the negotiating table and have wrung from them the limited reforms they've made. Without the freedom fighters, the hope of democracy in Nicaragua would be lost. The consolidation of totalitarian power would be complete, and the Soviets would have already succeeded in establishing another Cuba -- this time on the American mainland.

Soviets have made their choice. They and their allies have poured billions of dollars of military aid into Nicaragua, at least 20 times more than the United States Congress has given to the forces of the democratic resistance. Next month the American Congress and the American people will have to make their choice, too. As I said, this is the moment of truth, the make-or-break vote on the freedom fighters. If we abandon them now, if Congress votes down aid, we will be abandoning the only real cause for peace and freedom in Nicaragua. We will be consigning the peace process to an obscure footnote in history and handing the Soviet Union one of its greatest strategic victories since World War II.

Throughout history, one of our greatest fortunes and greatest strengths as a nation has been that we're protected on either side by two vast oceans. For almost two centuries, we have not experienced the tragedy of foreign aggression on our mainland. And today we can boast that the thousands of miles of borders that separate us and our neighbors lie unarmed and unfortified. Yes, we've been blessed by history, but that should not make us complacent now that a real -- and if we don't act to stop it -- irreversible danger is developing to our south.

Imagine the effect on U.S. national security if the Sandinista vision of a Communist Central America is realized and Mexico is threatened. Imagine if, for the first time in this century, we had to concern ourselves with a security threat on our southern border. Imagine our vital sealanes through the Gulf put in jeopardy. The kind of turmoil that exists in the Persian Gulf cannot be allowed to exist in the Gulf of Mexico.

It is willfully naive to think the Soviet Union, beset by a crisis in its own economy, would be pouring billions of dollars into a country on the other side of the world if they didn't see great opportunities there. It's time to realize that the Sandinista Communists and their Soviet mentors are serious people with serious objectives. It's time we got serious, too.

Of course, the consequences for Latin America would be even worse. An emboldened Communist left would once again step up the offensive in El Salvador, Costa Rica, Guatemala, and Honduras. The tide of democracy would be reversed as the region descended into a cycle of leftwing violence and military repression. Democracy, caught in the crossfire, would not survive long.

But all this is unnecessary. If we support those fighting for freedom and democracy in Nicaragua, we can keep the peace process on track. We can keep pressure on the Sandinistas to honor the peace plan. We can keep the forward movement of democracy in Latin America safe. And we can prevent the crisis in U.S. national security I described from taking place.

You know, we've heard a lot about how the freedom fighters will never be an effective fighting force. Well, the latest operation against the Las Minas area disproved that once and for all. Over 7,000 freedom fighters took part in a surprise attack on major military targets and Sandinista gold and silver mines -- a source of hard currency for the bankrupt Sandinista economy. In the process, they demolished enemy barracks and overran enemy headquarters. They blew up ammunition dumps and petroleum tanks, destroyed hydroelectric plants, and decommissioned permanently a radar installation the Sandinistas had used to coordinate air strikes against the freedom fighters.

If the Communist guerrillas in El Salvador mounted such a successful attack, you can imagine the headlines, all the people calling for us to cut our losses and get out, to accept the ``will of the people.'' That the freedom fighters can count [mount] such a major operation, moving thousands of troops in secret throughout the length of the country, demonstrates their support among the Nicaraguan people. With our support, the cause of freedom and democracy can prevail.

Probably the most important revelation of Major Miranda was the extent of corruption in the Sandinista regime. While the people go ragged and hungry, denied even basic foodstuffs, the Sandinistas milk their country for huge profits. Humberto Ortega alone has skimmed $1\1/2\ million and put it into a secret bank account in Switzerland.

No, it's the corrupt dictators of the Sandinista regime that have no popular support. That's why they must be sustained by billions of dollars of Soviet-bloc aid. The true sentiments of the Nicaraguan people were seen recently when 10,000 people thronged the streets of Managua to demonstrate against the Sandinistas. And believe me, it took real courage for those brave souls to openly defy such a brutal regime.

The freedom tide that has swept Latin America is pushing up against the borders of Nicaragua. It can go either way, and this vote coming up in 2 weeks will be decisive. We have seen with the recent treaty we signed on INF missiles what we can accomplish if we negotiate from a position of strength. We have seen in Afghanistan how the brave resistance of the Mujahidin is forcing the Soviet Union to look for a political solution. We must keep the pressure on in Nicaragua. We must not let up until democracy has taken such firm root that no one can ever pull it out.

The majority of the aid that I will be requesting from Congress is for nonlethal assistance to keep the freedom fighters a viable force until democracy is irreversible in Nicaragua. As I said, the Communist Sandinistas have made their choice. Now we must make ours: a future of freedom and democracy for Nicaragua and its neighbors and peace throughout the region, or turmoil, revolution, and unrest, and a steady advance of Soviet military might toward our southern border. That's the choice.

Let's make certain that those who come after us say we made the right choice, that when it came time to decide we stood up for freedom and peace -- we acted before it was too late, while the costs were still small, to do what was necessary to support democracy and protect the national security of the United States. Thank you all very much, and God bless you.

For more than half of this century, diseases of the heart and blood vessels, collectively called cardiovascular diseases, have been our Nation's most serious health problem. Last year, these diseases claimed 973,000 lives, and they caused serious and sometimes permanent illness or disability in still more Americans. Within this family of diseases, the leading killers remained coronary heart disease, which accounted for 524,000 deaths, and strokes, which accounted for 148,000 deaths.

Grim though these statistics may be, other statistics indicate that a corner may have been turned in 1965. Since then, mortality rates for all cardiovascular diseases, and especially for the two leading killers -- coronary heart disease and stroke -- have been moving steadily downward. For example, since 1972, mortality rates for all cardiovascular diseases combined have fallen by 34 percent, and those for coronary heart disease and stroke have declined by 35 percent and 50 percent respectively.

One major reason for the decline in cardiovascular mortality rates is that more and more Americans are modifying their habits in the direction of better cardiovascular health. Research has identified factors that increase vulnerability to premature coronary heart disease or stroke, and millions of Americans are acting on that knowledge to eliminate or ameliorate the risk factors that can be modified. These include high blood pressure, diabetes, obesity, and sedentary living. The National Heart, Lung, and Blood Institute, encouraged by the success of its National High Blood Pressure Education Program, has now launched similar programs against two other major risk factors: cigarette smoking and elevated blood cholesterol.

More and more of the stricken are reaching the hospital alive, thanks to better recognition of ominous symptoms, widespread teaching of cardiopulmonary resuscitation by the American Red Cross and the American Heart Association, and better-equipped emergency vehicles with better-trained crews.

Many individuals and organizations have contributed to the past four decades of progress against cardiovascular diseases. However, two organizations -- the federally funded National Heart, Lung, and Blood Institute and the privately supported American Heart Association -- have been in the forefront of this national effort. Since 1948, the two have worked in close cooperation to foster and support increased basic and clinical research in the cardiovascular field, to train new research scientists and clinicians, and to participate in a wide variety of community service and public and professional information activities. Through their efforts, Americans have become more aware of what they can do to live healthier lives.

America, do hereby proclaim the month of February 1988 as American Heart Month. I invite all appropriate government officials and the American people to join with me in reaffirming our commitment to finding new or improved ways to prevent, detect, and control cardiovascular diseases.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-first day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Secretary General underscored the need for the parties to foster an atmosphere that would reduce tensions and to cooperate fully with his new Special Representative. We share the Secretary General's concerns and fully agree with his urgings on cooperation and reducing tensions.

We continued active consultations with parties and individuals interested in the Cyprus dispute during the past 2 months. Special Cyprus Coordinator M. James Wilkinson responded to requests for meetings from Cypriot Presidential candidate George Vassiliou and from a delegation of the Cypriot Committee of Relatives of Missing Persons on November 18 and 20, respectively. Special Cyprus Coordinator Wilkinson and Department of State Deputy Assistant Secretary Robert W. Farrand also held separate meetings on December 3 and 4 with a delegation from the Committee for the Restoration of Human Rights throughout Cyprus.

Today the President directed our negotiators at the nuclear and space talks in Geneva to table a draft treaty in the defense and space forum of the negotiations. This step is in fulfillment of the agreement which the President and General Secretary Gorbachev reached at their recent summit in Washington.

In the joint statement following the summit, the United States and Soviet delegations in Geneva were instructed to work out an agreement that would commit the two sides to observe the ABM treaty as signed in 1972 while conducting their research, development, and testing as required, which are permitted by the ABM treaty, and not to withdraw from the ABM treaty for a specified period of time. It was also agreed that such an agreement must have the same legal status as the treaty on strategic offensive arms, the ABM treaty, and other similar legally binding agreements.

U.S. draft treaty we tabled today would accomplish and advance these goals. It calls for a separate and new treaty that faithfully embodies the elements of agreement reached at the summit. It would help to provide a jointly managed, predictable, precise, and stable basis for developing, testing, and -- when proven feasible -- deploying advanced defenses against strategic ballistic missiles. Such defenses would decrease the risk of war.

We hope that the Soviet delegation will join us in serious discussions to conclude a defense and space treaty that achieves the important goals which the two leaders identified at the Washington summit. At the same time, we will press ahead with our negotiations to conclude a treaty providing for 50-percent reductions in U.S. and Soviet strategic offensive arms. We hope, with today's tabling of a draft defense and space treaty, to hasten progress toward a safer and more stable world, one with reduced levels of nuclear arms and an enhanced ability to deter war based on the increasing contribution of effective strategic defenses against ballistic missile attack.

Gray. Mr. President, I wanted to welcome you to this 15th March for Life. The prolife Americans are coming here from every State of the Union. We appreciate so much your prolife words, but we do want to mention that we are somewhat disappointed that once again in December you unfortunately were assigning some public monies for abortions here in the District of Columbia. And we do want to ask today, as we join -- that even though we have spent a lot of time lobbying with the White House, unfortunately, those monies were appropriated to kill the preborn children in the District of Columbia. We would love to hear from you today, Mr. President, that we will not have any more appropriations for abortions in the District or anywhere else.

The President. Well, Nellie, sometimes these things happen, because, as you know, there are people that are in great disagreement with us. But we are continuing to work and to do our best to end any Federal funding.

The President. Well, all right. The first of your noble marches came just one year after the Supreme Court issued its decision in Roe v. Wade. And for a decade and a half, you've worked to end the tragedy that -- since that day when the Court, in the stroke of a pen, legalized abortion across our nation -- has claimed the lives of more than 20 million infants.

Twenty million -- that's more than twice the population of New York City and close to the population of all of California. And yet our opponents tell us not to interfere with abortion. They tell us not to impose our morality on those who wish to allow or participate in the taking of the life of infants before birth. Yet no one calls it imposing morality to prohibit the taking of life after a child is born. We're told about a woman's right to control her own body. But doesn't the unborn child have a higher right, and that is to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness? Or would our critics say that to defend life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness is to impose morality? Are we to forget the entire moral mission of our nation through its history?

Well, my answer, and I know it's yours, is no. America was founded on a moral proposition that human life -- all human life -- is sacred. And this proposition is the bedrock of our national life, the foundation of our laws.

Well, you know, I couldn't help noticing, that letter received far less coverage than the many derisive attacks that preceded it. Modern medicine treats unborn children as patients. Mothers are advised to calm the fetus with music. Some say that Mozart is particularly soothing. Isn't there enough evidence for even skeptics to admit that those who assert the personhood of the fetus may be right? And if we are to err, shouldn't it be on the side of life? I believe it's time the law caught up with science.

I'm going to ask your support on a few things. We have sent up to Congress the prolife bill. It states that abortion is the taking of a human life and stops all Federal funding of abortion by making the Hyde amendment permanent. It needs your support, and it deserves your support.

Well, our new regulations will put an end to this conflict of interest in cases where title X funds are involved. They will prohibit using title X money for any program that performs abortions, or counsels or refers for abortions, or promotes abortion through the media, the courts, or anyplace else. They will require family planning programs to be both financially and physically separate from facilities that use abortion as a method of family planning -- no mingling of silver. We are getting title X back to Congress' original intent: reducing the number of abortions. But as you know, original intent is controversial these days. We'll need your help in defending these regulations.

Now, before I hang up, let me suggest that we all take a moment for a silent prayer -- prayer for wisdom and, since ours is a merciful cause, that we ourselves will know mercy for the suffering of women who have had abortions and for the troubled mind with which so many Americans meditate on this issue. Shall we pray?

Gray. We thank you, Mr. President. And we want to join with you, and we will work to perfect those bills. We also want to include in our prayers and our silent prayers the prisoners of conscience who are in the jails because they have tried to stop the abortions, and we are sorry that Joan Andrews is not with us today. Thank you, Mr. President.

Note: The President spoke at 12:02 p.m. from the Oval Office via a loudspeaker hookup with the rally site. Participants had gathered on the Ellipse for a march to the Supreme Court on the 15th anniversary of the Court's decision in "Roe v. Wade," which legalized abortion. Nellie Gray was president of March for Life. In her closing remarks, she referred to Joan Andrews, who was convicted in Florida of illegal antiabortion activities.

Well, good afternoon, and welcome to the White House. I know that you're going to be briefed today on the situation in Central America, so I thought I'd use our time together not in giving you a great deal of background but, very simply, to tell you why I asked the Congress to provide aid to the Nicaraguan democratic resistance, the freedom fighters. Providing aid to the freedom fighters will do much to decide whether the people of Nicaragua ever possess the liberty that we Americans cherish so much. What I'd like to do is tell you four stories -- and they're four true stories. Among them, I believe, they express everything that needs to be said.

By a week ago Sunday, when this march took place, it had been a full 8\1/2\ years since the Marxist Sandinistas had overthrown Somoza and established their own regime. We in the United States rightly ask whether the Sandinistas have the support of the Nicaraguan people, and 8\1/2\ years is certainly long enough for a people to get to know the true nature of their rulers. Those 10,000 marchers answered our question. Rejection of the Communist regime is not, as some would have it, limited to a few reactionary holdovers from the Somoza years. It runs deep -- very deep -- among the people themselves. When you hear the second story I'd like to share with you, I think you'll begin to understand why.

Well, the people in Nicaragua need our help. That's the meaning of this coming congressional vote. For there can be no doubt that under the Sandinistas the people of Nicaragua are suffering -- suffering from the suppression of civil liberties, suffering materially from a national economy that has collapsed under Communist interference and control. It's my firm belief that these are grounds enough for helping the freedom fighters: that when our nation sees neighbors who need help and when it's within our power to extend that help, then it is our duty to do so. Yet as I tell you the third story, you'll see that there is still another reason for us to assist the freedom fighters of Nicaragua. Simply put, the security of Central America and our own nation is at stake.

October 25th of last year, a high-level member of the Sandinista staff entered the American Embassy in Mexico City and requested political asylum. Major Roger Miranda had been a top aide to Humberto Ortega. Humberto Ortega is in charge of the Sandinista military and the brother of the President, Daniel Ortega, the leader of the Communist regime in Nicaragua. American officials spent weeks debriefing Major Miranda. And then, last December, he was interviewed by a number of news organizations. When the Sandinistas learned that Major Miranda's revelations would be made public, they apparently decided that they had nothing to lose by admitting to them. At a gathering in Managua, Humberto Ortega confirmed some of Major Miranda's most damaging disclosures.

The meaning of what Major Miranda and Humberto Ortega have stated is clear. The Communist regime in Nicaragua represents a threat to the entire region of Central America. And if it represents a threat to the region that adjoins our southern borders, it represents a threat to us. Already, hundreds of thousands of Nicaraguan refugees have left their country. It is by no means difficult to visualize a situation in which hundreds of thousands of Central Americans seek to escape violence and instability by streaming toward the American Southwest.

My fourth story occurred just last weekend, when the leaders of the five Central American nations met to examine compliance with the Guatemala accord. There's no doubt as to their conclusion: The Sandinistas are the biggest obstacle to fulfillment of the plan and to peace and democracy in the region. While the four Central American democracies are in substantial compliance, the Sandinistas are nowhere near. Even the Sandinistas had to admit as much, issuing a separate declaration that outlined additional steps they felt compelled to announce so as to put their behavior in a better light.

It is clear, as you can see, why we must keep the pressure on the Sandinistas so that they can't reverse course, so that they keep walking down that road to democracy, because each step they've taken, each reluctant reform, is still easily undone. The Sandinistas have said their revolution will spread. Our goal in Nicaragua must be to make sure it's democracy and freedom that spreads.

We welcome the Sandinistas' new promises to abide by the peace plan, but we must hold them to their word. We must make sure that each time the Sandinistas walk through a new door toward democracy we close it behind them -- and keep it closed. Only the freedom fighters can do that; only they can be our insurance policy for democracy in Central America.

And let me add something else: Once a cease-fire is in place in Nicaragua and significant progress is being made toward a real and lasting political settlement, the United States is prepared to join in regional security discussions. Our goal is the same as those democracies we've seen emerge in the other Central American countries, the same as those who've been fighting for the freedom they were promised 8\1/2\ years ago: an opportunity for all people in that region to have the right to peace, freedom, and democracy.

What isn't as widely understood, however, is that we now have documented proof that they never intended to. Barely 2 months after assuming power, the Sandinista leadership met secretly to draft a report known as the 72-hour document, outlining their plans to establish a Communist dictatorship in Nicaragua and spread subversion throughout Central America.

Only a day after the Sandinistas finished meeting secretly to draft the 72-hour document, President Carter received Daniel Ortega in the White House and offered his new government our friendship and help. But while we sent the Sandinistas over $100 million in aid -- more than they received from any other country at that time -- the Sandinistas were busy carrying out their plans to eliminate human rights and impose a Marxist totalitarian regime in Nicaragua.

Six months after the meeting in the White House, while U.S. aid was still flowing, several Sandinista comandantes took their first official trip to Moscow -- the first of many -- and signed a communique with the Soviet Communist Party expressing support for the foreign policy goals of the Soviet Union. But that, one might say, was merely the paperwork. Already, Soviet military planners were in Nicaragua. Over 30 new military bases were either built or in the process of construction by the time I came into office in 1981. The Sandinista army was becoming the largest, best supplied in all Central America, and the Sandinistas were already assisting the Communist guerrillas in El Salvador -- all while American aid flowed to Nicaragua, while our hand was extended in friendship.

I could go on to detail the systematic crushing of all human rights, but my purpose here is to ask a simple question: How can we expect a regime that has compiled such a history of broken promises and corruption to abide by the terms of the Guatemala accord unless we keep up the pressure by continuing the aid to the freedom fighters?

Some in this country talk as if the Sandinistas would reform if we would just let them alone, but that's not what the Sandinistas themselves say. Just 5 weeks ago, Daniel Ortega made his true intentions clear: Even if there were elections in Nicaragua and the Sandinistas lost, he said, they would never give up power. The Soviets have made their choice. They and the allies have poured billions of dollars of military aid into Nicaragua -- at least 20 times more than the U.S. Congress has given to the forces of the democratic resistance.

In less than 2 weeks, the American Congress and the American people will have to make their choice, too. As I said, this is the moment of truth, the make-or-break vote on the freedom fighters. If we abandon them now, if Congress votes down aid, we will be abandoning the only real cause for peace and freedom and democracy in Nicaragua.

We have the testimony of brave men and women who are speaking to us of things they've seen and heard, the testimony of the 10,000 who marched in Nicaragua, of Prudencio Baltodano and Major Miranda. The freedom fighters are fighting for all of these and, yes, for us, for our own security.

This week was the start of the eighth year of my Presidency. And so, as we all do at the beginning of a new year, I'd like to take a few minutes to look ahead at some of the challenges before our nation this year.

By the way, I'll be doing a lot more looking ahead on Monday night, when I'll go up to Capitol Hill to deliver the annual State of the Union Address. The State of the Union is the only statement that the Constitution itself requires the President to give. Almost all Presidents since Woodrow Wilson have delivered States of the Union in person, not just sent up written messages. This will be my seventh time. And let me tell you, the thrill of standing in that place where so many great Presidents have stood and of continuing a tradition that stretches back to George Washington and signifies our determination that, as Lincoln said, a government of, by, and for the people shall not perish from the Earth -- well, that thrill never goes away. I'm looking forward to Monday night. I hope you'll tune in.

I'll tell Congress then, we in Washington have a lot of work ahead of us -- for starters, preserving the economic growth of the past 5 years. Last week we had good news on this front. Our trade deficit dropped by 25 percent, but more importantly our exports, which have been climbing for more than a year, shot forward nearly 10 percent in 1 month and reached the highest levels in American history. Yes, American industry is in an export boom, and our economy is strong -- in fact, it's the envy of the world.

But we all know that there are still unanswered questions in our economic future -- the biggest: Are we going to keep working to reduce our budget deficit? The administration and Congress have made progress, in the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings legislation and in this year's budget compromise, but we need to do more. On Monday I'll remind Congress of some good ideas that are past due for action, like the line-item veto and a balanced budget amendment. And I may have a surprise, too, a way, right now, for Congress to show it's serious about putting the Government's house in order.

No issue that we will take up in the year ahead is more significant than the issue of peace with freedom, whether in this hemisphere or around the world. On Monday I will formally submit to the Senate for advice and consent to ratify the Intermediate Nuclear Forces treaty that General Secretary Gorbachev and I signed in December. It's a good treaty, a solid one with the most extensive verification provisions in history. It will make America and its allies more secure. Monday evening I will remind the Congress that this step toward enduring peace with freedom would never have come if the forces of democracy hadn't been strong, and I'll ask for expeditious Senate action.

Some say if you're for aid to the freedom fighters in Nicaragua you're against the peace process. Phooey! Even the Sandinistas admit they're talking peace and democracy because of the freedom fighters. Yet to date, the Sandinistas haven't gone through with one concession to democratize that they can't easily reverse once the pressure of the freedom fighters is off. At stake here is whether Nicaragua becomes a Soviet base camp on the mainland of this hemisphere. Imagine if the Sandinista vision of a Communist Central America is realized and Mexico is threatened. The next vote on aid to the freedom fighters may be the most important this Congress casts. On Monday I'll ask Congress to vote yes.

There are great challenges and opportunities in the year ahead. On Monday I will also talk about continuing to bring greater excellence to education. I'll mention ways to raise the quality of our schools. But I'll remind Congress that the most important thing is not to throw quantities of money at education but to tie funding to results and to have a commitment to quality and to State and local control of schools.

So, that's a glimpse of the year ahead. And as I said, you'll hear more Monday night. That's the Nation's future, but let me turn for a minute to something more personal. You may have read about Tabatha Foster. She's 3 years old, was born with a severe birth defect, and recently, in an operating room in Pittsburgh, received five new organs. It will take time and money, as much as $1 million, to return Tabatha to full health. Her parents have exhausted their medical insurance, so a Tabatha Foster Fund has been set up to help them. I know you join me in praying that Tabatha will someday be able to lead a normal life.

Canadian counterparts toward completion of a bilateral air quality accord. He reiterated his commitment to implement the recommendations of the 1986 Special Envoys' report, committing fully to proceeding with the Innovative Control Technologies Program.

Preferential treatment, under the Innovative Control Technologies Program, for projects in States that, for ratemaking purposes, treat innovative technologies the same as pollution control projects. This treatment would recognize the additional risk inherent in demonstration of innovative technologies.

Environmental Protection Agency (1) encourages the States to consider achieving greater ozone reduction through interpollutant trading and other measures that substitute less expensive nitrogen oxide emissions reductions for more expensive volatile organic compound emissions reductions, (2) encourage the use of ``bubbles'' between recently built emissions sources, (3) expand commercial demonstration permits for innovative control technologies, and (4) encourage complementary use of emissions ``bubbles'' and waivers for innovative technology applications.

I am transmitting herewith, for the advice and consent of the Senate to ratification, the Treaty between the United States of America and the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics on the Elimination of Their Intermediate-Range and Shorter-Range Missiles (the Treaty). The Treaty includes the following documents, which are integral parts thereof: the Memorandum of Understanding (the MOU) regarding the establishment of a data base, the Protocol on Elimination governing the elimination of missile systems, and the Protocol on Inspection regarding the conduct of inspections, with an Annex to that Protocol on the privileges and immunities to be accorded inspectors and aircrew members. The Treaty, together with the MOU and the two Protocols, was signed at Washington on December 8, 1987.

In addition, I am transmitting herewith, for the information of the Senate, the Agreement Among the United States of America and the Kingdom of Belgium, the Federal Republic of Germany, the Republic of Italy, the Kingdom of the Netherlands, and the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Ireland Regarding Inspections Relating to the Treaty Between the United States of America and the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics on the Elimination of Their Intermediate-Range and Shorter-Range Missiles (the Basing Country Agreement), which was signed at Brussels on December 11, 1987. The Basing Country Agreement confirms that the inspections called for in the Treaty will be permitted by the five Allied Basing Countries. The Report of the Department of State discusses in detail the terms of the Basing Country Agreement. Also attached for the information of the Senate are the notes exchanged between both the German Democratic Republic and Czechoslovakia and the United States. The notes acknowledge that these countries agree to the United States' conducting inspections, under the Treaty, on their territory. Identical notes also are being exchanged between the Soviet Union and the five Allied Basing Countries.

Treaty is an unprecedented arms control agreement in several respects. It marks the first time that the United States and the Soviet Union have agreed to eliminate, throughout the world, an entire class of their missile systems.

Significantly, the eliminations will be achieved from markedly asymmetrical starting points that favored the Soviet Union. The Treaty includes provisions for comprehensive on-site inspections, including the continuous monitoring of certain facilities, to aid in verifying compliance. To a much greater extent than in earlier arms control agreements between the United States and the Soviet Union, detailed information has been, and will continue to be, exchanged by the Parties in order to facilitate verification of compliance. Finally, the United States and the Soviet Union have agreed on cooperative measures to enhance verification by national technical means.

The missile systems to be eliminated consist of all U.S. and Soviet ground-launched ballistic missiles and ground-launched cruise missiles having a range capability between 500 and 5500 kilometers. The launchers for such missiles and unique elements of their related support structures and support equipment also will be eliminated. The shorter-range missiles to be eliminated under this Treaty are those with a range capability between 500 and 1000 kilometers. They must be eliminated within 18 months after the entry into force of the Treaty. Intermediate-range missiles, having a range capability between 1000 and 5500 kilometers, are to be eliminated in two phases within three years after entry into force of the Treaty. Elimination will take place at designated locations and will be subject to on-site inspection as an aid to verifying compliance.

In the MOU, the United States and the Soviet Union have provided detailed information on the location of all missiles, launchers, and related support structures and support equipment subject to the Treaty. Each Party is required to provide updated data on a routine basis after the Treaty enters into force.

Treaty provides that on-site inspections are permitted at specified locations in the United States and the Soviet Union as well as in the Basing Countries in Western and Eastern Europe where U.S. or Soviet missiles, launchers, and related support structures and support equipment subject to the Treaty are or have been located. The different types of ``short-notice'' on-site inspections for which the Treaty provides are designed to contribute to our ability to verify Soviet compliance, while protecting all U.S. and Allied nuclear and conventional forces not subject to the Treaty as well as other sensitive intelligence and defense facilities.

Treaty is the result of Allied solidarity in support of the fundamental objectives established by NATO's ``dual-track'' decision in 1979. Our Atlantic and our Asian and Pacific Allies have been closely involved throughout the period of negotiation, and they fully support the Treaty. The Treaty enhances our collective security by eliminating an entire class of Soviet missile systems that has been a major concern for over a decade. Our European Allies will continue to be well protected by the significant U.S. nuclear forces remaining in Europe, by the independent British and French nuclear deterrents, and by conventional forces, which include over 300,000 U.S. troops.

INF treaty, when fully implemented, will substantially increase the security of the United States and our European and Asian friends and allies. By eliminating all Soviet ground-launched INF missile systems, a substantial element of the Soviet military threat and an instrument for political pressure and intimidation will have been removed.

INF treaty, with its asymmetric reductions favoring the United States, provides the first necessary step toward a more secure and stable balance of military forces between the United States and the Soviet Union, which will benefit all mankind. The treaty demonstrates the rewards of negotiating from a position of strength and with the firm support of our allies.

The six purposes listed in the Preamble for establishing the Constitution serve as a lasting measure of the legitimate role of government. An American President has no more sacred duty than to ensure that the government stays within the constitutional limits that protect individual liberty. In assessing this Administration's policies and proposals now and for the future, the fundamental blueprint remains the Preamble of the Constitution.

In the past 7 years, our Administration has worked to restore a vision of government that was the Founders' own -- a vision of a free and self-reliant people, taking responsibility for its own welfare and progress through such time-tested means as individual initiative, neighborhood and community cooperation, and local and State self-government. The return of responsibility and authority to the individual American is now leading to a virtual renaissance in America of liberty, productivity, prosperity, and self-esteem.

Our foreign and defense policies are geared to protect American freedom against external threats, to guarantee that our liberties are secure from the aggressions of those whose values are not founded in human freedom. Protection of liberty today means not just a strong America, but also a common defense with our allies of the free world. It gives me pride to report that our mutual efforts are being rewarded with a new growth of democracy and a renewed respect around the world for this country and what it stands for. At home our challenge remains to achieve full participation in the longest peacetime economic expansion on record -- in the almost unlimited prosperity which flows from genuine human freedom.

In setting aside the Articles of Confederation for a new Constitution, the Framers acknowledged that the governmental deficiencies of the new Nation were of their own making. They understood that if the American republic were to endure and prosper, its organizing principles would have to be revised. The constitutional system the Framers produced has been the wonder of the free world, but after 200 years some aspects of that system are in need of repair and reform.

Before the Great Depression, the idea that the Federal government should balance its budget on a yearly basis was treated as though it were part of the Constitution. The economic crisis, and later World War II, forced the abandonment of this policy. But what may have been necessary in those national emergencies is now a permanent feature of the Federal government.

There is no question that continued Federal budget deficits, fueled by higher spending, are bad for the economy. Unfortunately, our political system makes it extremely difficult to reduce the deficit. The public interest in spending restraint is a generalized one, diffused among the entire citizenry. The special interests favoring spending on any particular program are smaller, but they fight much harder to maintain or increase spending.

Certainly, there are constructive proposals that would help control spending. Since 1981, our budgets have sought billions of dollars in reductions of outdated and outmoded programs. Members of the Congress and private think tanks have also identified wasteful spending. But the political process's inability to overcome inertia, along with the persistence of special interests, has led many Americans to despair of achieving budgetary balance without constitutional reform. That is why 32 States have applied to the Congress to call a constitutional convention for the purpose of proposing a constitutional amendment to require a balanced budget -- only two States short of the number required by Article V of the Constitution.

In previous years, the Senate has approved such a balanced budget amendment that would obviate such a convention, but the House has failed to support it. This is clearly the option I prefer to achieve the consitutionally mandated balanced budget desired by the overwhelming majority of the American people.

It is widely acknowledged, by the Congress, the press, and the American people, that the current budget process is not working. The Budget Act of 1974 was purported to streamline and rationalize the budget considerations by the Congress. The new process was to ``force'' the various committees to consider their recommendations in the context of the entire budget and ensure that proper attention was paid to the bottom line -- the deficit.

In both substance and form, the process has failed. Deadlines are routinely missed or ignored. Enforcement mechanisms are rarely employed. Debates over the same issue occur three and four times a year. And from the size of the deficit, the process has obviously failed to provide fiscal discipline.

Over the last 7 years, total revenues paid to the Federal government have increased by over $250 billion. But total expenditures have increased by some $325 billion. Part of the increased spending, $125 billion, or half of the increase in revenues, was devoted to rebuilding our national defenses. But last year, the government spent $140 billion more on domestic programs than in 1981 and $70 billion more on interest payments due to the deficit. And for every dollar the Congress has cut from my defense request, they have added $2 to domestic spending.

Nowhere is the failure of the budget process more evident than in the annual process of developing the appropriations bills that establish discretionary spending levels making up just under one-half the total budget. The regular process requires that 13 separate appropriations bills be sent to the President well in advance of the October 1 beginning of a new fiscal year. But the norm has been anything but normal -- during the last 7 years, the Congress sent only 10 of the 91 required bills on time. In the last 2 years, not one bill has been on time and all 13 have been collapsed into one massive piece of legislation.

These increasingly large spending bills, passed at the last moment before existing funding expires, deny the Congress and the Executive the ability to adequately examine their contents. The Congress cannot truly vote on their merits and the President has little ability to employ a veto.

The product of this breakdown is a concurrent resolution, requiring neither consultation with the Administration nor the signature of the President. As a remedy, I propose that henceforth the Congress and the Executive collaborate on a joint resolution that sets out spending priorities within the revenues available. The requirement of a Presidential signature would force both branches of government to resolve most policy issues before formulating appropriations measures. The budget process could be further improved by including in the budget law allocations by committee as well as by budget function.

Individual Transmittal of Appropriations Bills. The current practice of transmitting full-year omnibus continuing resolutions oversteps appropriation committee/subcommittee jurisdictions. More important, it does not permit the Legislative and Executive branches to exercise proper scrutiny of Federal spending. Therefore, I propose a requirement that appropriations bills be transmitted individually to the President.

Strict Observance of Allocations. During the 1980s, an unacceptable budget practice evolved of disregarding congressionally approved function allocations. Funds regularly were shifted from defense or international affairs to domestic spending. I strongly urge that each fiscal year separate defense and non-defense allocations be made and enforced through a point-of-order provision in the budget act.

Court in the Chadha decision (1983) effectively moots even this limited authority. I propose a change of law that would cure the legislative veto defect and require the Congress to vote ``up or down'' on any Presidentially proposed rescission, thereby preventing the Congress from simply ignoring the rescission or avoiding a recorded vote.

Biennial Budgeting. The current budget process consumes too much time and energy. A 2-year budget cycle offers several advantages -- among them, a reduction in repetitive annual budget tasks, more time for congressional oversight and consideration of key spending decisions in reconciliation, and fewer gimmicks, such as shifting spending from one year to the next. I am calling on the Congress to adopt biennial budgeting, beginning with a trial 2-year Defense budget.

Federal Spending.'' Soon I will transmit legislation that will require any future legislation creating new Federal programs to be deficit-neutral; this will be done by requiring the concurrent enactment of equal amounts of program reductions or revenue increases. Additionally, my proposed legislation would require that all future legislation and implementing regulations be accompanied by financial impact statements detailing the measure's likely economic impact, including the effect on State and local governments. Enactment of this proposal would be an important step toward reassuring the American people that the Congress is serious about controlling government spending.

President should have the same tools to control spending that 43 governors have. I will forward my proposal for a line item veto. It would allow future Presidents to remove from spending bills those items that are extraneous -- without threatening the continuation of vital government programs. The Congress could override each veto by a two-thirds vote in each House. The budget crisis, however, also demands immediate action. For example, last month the Congress presented me with a catchall spending bill with many extraneous and costly provisions, some of which had been considered for the first time in conference.

Founding Fathers knew that without economic freedom there can be no political freedom. Even before our Nation was full-born, nine colonies assembled in a ``Stamp Act Congress'' and worked their will to oppose taxation without representation. Today, we must once again resolve to put an end to irresponsible taxation and spending. We have fallen into a costly and dangerous habit, which could threaten our future prosperity, burden future generations, and reduce the incentive of individuals and businesses to create more goods and services.

It is clear that we need a mechanism to control expenditures of Americans' hard-earned money. To this end, I will send to the Congress a proposed constitutional amendment to require a super-majority vote in the Congress in order to increase the tax burden on our citizens. I urge the Congress to act expeditiously in approving this amendment and to send it to the States for ratification.

At the time of my first State of the Union address, it was apparent that the limited national government envisioned by the Framers had been replaced by a national government whose involvement in domestic affairs was limited only by its own will. The Founders understood that unchecked central authority threatens individual liberties. Accordingly, they constituted a Federal system of government, with all powers not specifically granted by the Constitution to the national government reserved to the States and to the people.

We have sought to revitalize the principle of federalism by reforming the institutional processes of the national government. This past October, I signed Executive Order 12612, which requires Executive officials to ensure that all proposed policies and legislation comply with federalism principles and to conduct a formal federalism assessment as appropriate, and which restricts Federal preemption of State laws. The Congress should review its legislative procedures to determine whether reforms similar to those in Executive Order 12612 are warranted.

Relations, as well as State and local officials, have been examining possible amendments to the Constitution that would restore the structural balance of power between the national government and the States. If we in Washington are unsuccessful in reviving the constitutionally crucial principle of federalism, it may become necessary to consider such proposals.

Our written Constitution, adopted and ratified by the people 200 years ago and amended several times since, is our fundamental law. Every government official takes an oath to abide by its provisions. For members of the Congress, this should mean enacting laws only in pursuance of the powers set forth in the Constitution. As President, this means taking care that the laws are faithfully executed. To the courts falls the task of adjudicating cases or controversies according to the Constitution and the laws made under it. In so doing, judges must faithfully interpret the text of the Constitution, as well as laws passed by the Congress, as written, in accordance with their original meaning. To do otherwise would constitute a usurpation of legislative power never intended by the American people. With this in mind, I have been careful to nominate only judges faithful to this principle. I urge the Senate to be guided by the same standards in exercising its constitutional duty in the confirmation process.

Part of faithfully interpreting the law is seeing to it that those convicted of crimes are dealt with fairly but firmly. In this respect, I am particularly proud of my judicial appointments. Federal court records indicate that between 1981, when I first took office, and 1984, the average sentence handed down by a Federal court per conviction increased dramatically -- by over 100 percent for rape, over 100 percent for burglary, and over 60 percent for murder. I will continue to nominate judges who are tough on crime. When the Senate adjourned last year, 27 judicial nominations were left pending -- an unprecedented number -- and other vacancies are yet to be filled as well. The Chief Justice of the United States has stated that the high number of vacancies is contributing to an enormous backlog for the Federal courts. The Senate must act expeditiously to confirm these judges.

Discrimination based on religion is equally invidious. This Administration has held high the banner of equal opportunity for all Americans, and we will not retreat from the fight against discrimination wherever it exists.

Our achievements have been significant. We have successfully prosecuted racial hate groups and have achieved more convictions for criminal civil rights violations than any previous administration. We have moved aggressively to enforce our Nation's voting rights laws, thereby securing for thousands of citizens the most fundamental of all rights -- the right to help shape their future with a ballot.

I am particularly proud of our successes in moving America closer to the constitutional ideal of a color-blind society open to all without regard to race. In the workplace, we have rejected the use of quotas and have insisted on fair treatment in hiring and promotion decisions. And after 3 years of effort by this Administration, the Fair Housing Initiatives Program has finally been authorized. The Federal government will now be able to provide direct assistance to State and local governments, as well as public and private organizations, investigating complaints of housing discrimination. The 20th anniversary of the Fair Housing Act of 1968 is an appropriate time to strengthen the statute by increasing the penalties for those convicted of housing discrimination and by extending the protections of the Act to handicapped persons. This Administration will submit appropriate legislation to achieve this purpose. Every American is entitled to freedom from discrimination -- to be judged on the basis of qualification and performance, not on stereotypes and unfair assumptions.

Currently pending in the Senate, however, is a bill whose vague and sweeping language threatens to subject nearly every facet of American life -- from the corner grocery to the local church or synagogue to local and State government -- to intrusive regulation by Federal agencies and courts. Ironically it does so in the name of civil rights. This Administration opposes this overreaching legislation known as the Civil Rights Restoration Act of 1987 (S. 557). In its stead, I have proposed a bill that provides institution-wide coverage under the appropriate civil rights statutes of educational institutions receiving Federal aid while avoiding an unwarranted expansion of Federal jurisdiction. My proposal, the Civil Rights Act Amendments of 1987 (H.R. 1881), also ensures adequate protection of religious tenets under Title IX and makes clear that no institution must provide insurance coverage for abortions or perform abortions as a condition of the receipt of Federal aid.

In establishing justice we must be ever mindful that our cherished constitutional freedoms cannot be distorted to protect activities that exploit the innocent and defenseless. The production and distribution of obscene materials, as well as child pornography, are such activities. Our Administration has made the elimination of these materials a top domestic priority.

Attorney General's Commission on Pornography report has resulted in several new law enforcement efforts, foremost among these being the establishment of a special enforcement unit within the Department of Justice. In a single operation in 1987 more purveyors of child pornography were federally indicted than at any time in history, and the first Federal obscenity racketeering convictions were recently returned in Virginia. However, much more can be done to protect our children and families if the Congress enacts my proposed Child Protection and Obscenity Enforcement Act of 1987. It would criminalize buying and selling children for use in pornography, and it would also prohibit dial-a-porn and cable obscenity. It would strengthen our laws against organized crime traffic in hard-core obscenity.

Provision of needed legal services for those who cannot afford them is an important goal of our society. Unfortunately, the current system administered by the Legal Services Corporation (LSC) is not working. Each year the Congress has mandated that a large portion of these funds be allotted to a group of ``National and State Support Centers.'' Since 1975 these law reform think tanks have been criticized for political involvement and have not provided any day-to-day service to the poor -- the original intent of the LSC.

Instead, they have concentrated on social ``law reform,'' without regard to a particular client's needs. I call on the Congress to disallow LSC funds for political think tanks or ``support centers'' and through strong and specific legal language to limit any political lobbying by LSC grantees. All LSC funds should be used to assist directly the poor in need of legal help.

There is another way in which the needy are being badly served by LSC. A congressionally mandated policy of ``Annual Presumptive Funding'' precludes the possibility of awarding LSC grants on a competitive basis. LSC must be able to demand results from grantees or give other prospective grantees opportunity better to serve the poor. While stability is desirable, we must be able to weed out inefficient or incapable grantees.

The leading threat to domestic tranquillity comes in the form of criminal offenses of citizen against citizen. When I took office crime rates were soaring. The public, with good reason, felt unsafe in our streets and often even in homes and places of work. Determined to give America back to its law-abiding citizens, our country is in the midst of the most vigorous crime-fighting effort in its history. Passage of the Comprehensive Crime Control Act of 1984, appointment to the bench of Federal judges who are tough on crime, and an unprecedented attack on organized crime are efforts that have paid off.

Except in the case of the air piracy statute, enacted in 1973, these death penalty provisions are not accompanied by appropriate procedures required since the Supreme Court's 1972 decision in Furman v. Georgia to prevent disparate application. In this respect, the Congress has lagged well behind the State legislatures, more than 40 of which have acted to adopt appropriate death penalty procedures since the Furman decision.

Fortunately a solution is at hand. The Comprehensive Crime Control Act of 1984 created the United States Sentencing Commission to promulgate sentencing guidelines to insure consistent, tough, and equitable sentencing. The Commission should go forward now to set in place procedures to permit the constitutional imposition of capital sentences for the most serious Federal offenses.

To protect further society from criminals, the Congress should act promptly on the Criminal Justice Reform Act, which I transmitted last year. By statute it would establish uniform procedures that would allow death penalty provisions in current Federal statutes to be enforced according to recent Supreme Court decisions. It also contains important reforms to curb the abuse of habeas corpus by convicted criminals and to promote truth in the courtroom by ensuring that evidence obtained by the police through reasonable searches and seizures can be used at trial. These important protections for the public will complete the anti-crime effort we began with the Comprehensive Crime Control Act of 1984. They were approved by the Senate in 1984 and in part by the House of Representatives in 1986. The time has come -- this year -- to enact them into law.

Administration is considering a series of legislative proposals designed to strengthen our hand against terrorists. These include proposals for the expeditious removal of aliens from the United States who are engaged in terrorist activity and proposals providing for criminal and civil forfeiture of terrorists' assets.

State-sponsored terrorism, fomented by governments whose conduct and support for such acts put them outside the community of nations, remains a scourge on the international scene and a particular threat to our citizens and interests. We must further develop the rule of law against these criminals by denying terrorists the legitimacy of international instruments condoning their activities. The Senate should give its advice and consent to ratification, with certain reservations, of Additional Protocol II to the 1949 Geneva Conventions, which would serve to promote basic human rights. The Administration has rejected Additional Protocol I, which would give combatant status to terrorist organizations, and I welcome congressional support of this decision.

For over a half-century this Nation has been plagued by organized crime. Due to vigorous efforts by Federal investigators and prosecutors, some of the most infamous leaders of organized crime are now facing long jail terms. This progress has come through a new strategy aimed at penetrating crime syndicates and targeting their leadership for prosecution. Strike forces have focused on several major cities such as Cleveland, Kansas City, and Boston. One of our most recent successes was in March of 1987 when a jury in New York returned 18 guilty verdicts in the ``Pizza Connection'' case involving $50 million in laundered proceeds from heroin sales by an organized crime group. In addition, our Administration's Comprehensive Crime Control Act of 1984 has enabled police to detain pending trial certain organized crime figures who previously could have made bail and has dramatically expanded our ability to seize and forfeit the assets of mob members.

Yet, mob-run crime is still a grave problem. Obscenity, extortion, drug importation and sales, loan sharking, illegal gambling, and murder are all crimes that we intend to hit hard during the remainder of this Administration. Our goal is to put ``the mob'' out of business through vigorous use of both criminal and civil statutes, by purging organized crime elements from labor organizations, and by targeting the newer, ``emerging'' organized crime groups to ensure that they never wield the mob's power and influence.

One result of our increased efforts to fight crime is that the number of criminals serving time in Federal prisons has increased dramatically -- nearly 80 percent since 1981. We anticipate that the Federal inmate population will continue to increase in the future, particularly in light of the enhanced criminal penalties contained in the Anti-Drug Abuse Act of 1986 and the new sentencing guidelines. One of my top priorities for the next year will be to increase substantially the construction of new prison space to accommodate the increased number of criminals being removed from our streets.

In the past 7 years, the Nation has made tremendous gains towards a drug free America. Today, public attitudes are clearly against the use of illegal drugs, and drug awareness is increasing. The national prevention effort has taken off with its own strong momentum. Individuals and communities, businesses and schools are taking a firm stand against the use of illegal drugs. Most important, the number of drug users is down; and our children are showing us that they are willing and able to say ``no'' to drugs.

We are on our way to a drug free future. Still, illegal drugs continue to destroy the lives and the hopes of hundreds of thousands of Americans each year, especially young people whose future lies before them. Since the beginning of my Administration, I have committed the Federal government to provide national leadership and support to the national crusade, encouraging and assisting private sector efforts and aggressively pursuing Federal responsibilities to stop the supply and use of illegal drugs. The National Drug Policy Board, which I established by Executive order on March 26, 1987, has ensured that our Federal agencies work together effectively and efficiently. The Board has named lead agencies for all facets of the anti-drug program to improve coordination throughout the government and enable us to achieve maximum impact with our resources. To this end, the Board has developed a series of nine interrelated strategies.

Five strategies are aimed at reducing the supply of illegal drugs: enhanced international cooperation; stepped-up interdiction of drugs coming into the country; improved intelligence on drug activities; stepped-up investigations to eliminate drug trafficking organizations; and targeting prosecution of top drug organizations. Simply put, we are working with our allies throughout the world to reduce the amount of illegal drugs produced or processed; making sure that as little as possible of those illicit drugs enter this Nation; and Federal, State, and local officials are working together to investigate and prosecute to the fullest these merchants of destruction.

And we are working to reduce the demand for drugs. Nancy and I join the millions of parents across the country who know too well that real progress toward the goal of a drug free America will best be measured by preventing individuals who do not use drugs from beginning to use them and by convincing those who do use to stop.

Our four strategies to reduce demand are: prevention education to keep young people from becoming drug users; reduction of drug use by high-risk youths; improved community-based treatment for addicts whose drug habits have removed them from the American mainstream; and fostering attitudes of intolerance toward drug use on the part of mainstream adults.

American should be able to enjoy a drug free workplace. Schoolchildren should have drug free schools. Every citizen should be able to rely on a Federal work force free from drugs. And every American should be able to enjoy a drug free transportation system. This Administration is working in partnership with private employers and State and local governments to ensure all four.

We are proceeding with a cooperative national effort to reduce and eventually eliminate drugs from government housing projects. The Department of Education issued Schools Without Drugs and has mobilized school, parent, and community efforts to take drugs away from young people and give them back their lives.

These efforts have already begun to produce results. In 1987, for the first time since the National Institute on Drug Abuse began its annual survey of high school seniors in the early 1970s, a significant drop -- one-third -- in current cocaine use was revealed. Ninety-seven percent of the seniors polled disapproved of regular cocaine use, and 87 percent disapproved of even trying it -- strong evidence that cocaine use is no longer ``in'' among young Americans.

Finally, as the Nation's largest employer, the Federal government is committed to establishing a model for a drug free workplace that deals constructively with illegal drug use. We are establishing a broad drug education training program for all employees. The program includes testing of employees holding safety-sensitive positions. For example, the Department of Transportation has already implemented drug-testing programs for employees in such positions, including air-traffic controllers and airline safety inspectors. Indeed, fair and accurate drug testing is one of the few effective ways to ensure that illegal drug users begin the process of rehabilitation. Agency programs that include random testing to identify these drug users will be ready for implementation in 1988. We are putting our money where our heart is. In the past 7 years, there has been a three-fold increase in Federal spending to fight drugs, bringing the total close to $3.5 billion this year.

I worked closely with the Congress to enact the Anti-Drug Abuse Act of 1986, which embodies a national commitment to fight drug abuse through: increased criminal penalties, improved criminal investigation and prosecution, demand reduction, better international cooperation, and more effective interdiction.

The Act also established the White House Conference for a Drug Free America. Already it has hosted six regional forums to facilitate information gathering and interchange on various aspects of the drug issue. The Conference will hold a national assembly in Washington next month that will expand upon the findings of the regional conferences, showcase the best of the Nation's efforts, and highlight new proposals for combatting drug use in this country. I look forward to the group's final report this spring in order to work with the Congress to implement its recommendations and promote our vision of a drug free America.

In our constitutional framework, the President and the Congress share the vital responsibility for ensuring our national security. Within this same constitutional framework, however, the President has important independent powers. Both of these constitutional principles apply to the agenda of national security issues we will face in 1988 and beyond.

Our two branches of government clearly share powers in such areas as planning and budgeting for the maintenance of our defense capability; the ratification of treaties, as in the case of the INF Treaty; and foreign economic and security assistance, that vital instrument of our foreign policy. At the same time, the Congress must respect the constitutional wisdom that only the President can act as the effective Executive agent in the conduct of foreign relations. This truth is long established in our constitutional law and practice. And the President, in order to act effectively in the Nation's behalf, needs the flexibility to respond, within the framework of law, to often unpredictable and fast-moving challenges.

On the basis of our renewed strength, and a policy of realism in the pursuit of peace, we have in the past 7 years taken great strides toward a world in which freedom can flourish. In the coming year, we face new challenges and new opportunities, and I hope that the Congress will be my partner in addressing both.

Their Intermediate-Range and Shorter-Range Missiles. This INF Treaty is the first agreement ever to reduce and not simply limit the buildup of nuclear weaponry, and it provides for the elimination of an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles. It contains the most stringent verification regime in the history of arms control. This treaty represents the culmination of 6 years of hard negotiation. After the West showed strength and solidarity, the Soviets joined us in an agreement to ban such weapons on both sides.

On the basis of similar strength and fortitude, and support from the American people and the Congress, we are engaged in serious negotiations with the Soviet Union on an agreement that could reduce strategic nuclear offensive forces by 50 percent. The United States and Soviet Union are negotiating for effective verification measures that would make it possible to ratify the U.S.-U.S.S.R. Threshold Test Ban Treaty of 1974 and Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty of 1976.

These accomplishments depend on maintaining our strength. It should now be unmistakably clear that our determined program to rebuild our military strength and my Strategic Defense Initiative have spurred major advances in arms reduction, as well as strengthening our own and allied security. These efforts must not be undercut.

The issue between East and West, of course, is not simply arms control. Efforts by the Soviet Union and its surrogates to suppress freedom are major sources of international tensions. Experience shows these efforts to be significant obstacles to improvements in U.S.-Soviet relations.

Human rights and regional conflicts are key issues on my agenda with the Soviet Union. Unfortunately, I can report to you only very limited improvement in both of these areas. For instance, while a few Soviet political prisoners have been released, and there has been some increase this past year in the emigration of Soviet Jews, many more prisoners remain, and many thousands of Soviet Jews are still denied the basic right to emigrate. Furthermore there has been no significant change in Soviet involvement in or provocation of regional conflicts, despite the repeated Soviet lip service to the need for peaceful solutions.

Our defense budget proposals represent an essential program for maintaining our defensive strength. The defense budget has already been reduced to levels that will require us to delay the achievement of important defense objectives.

With this in mind we must continue with the Strategic Modernization Program as an essential guarantor of Free World security at the same time as we seek clear-cut and effectively verifiable strategic arms reductions. We must also continue the modernization of nuclear, conventional, and chemical deterrence forces supporting our commitments to our allies. Additionally, we must ensure that the conventional force disparities between NATO and the Warsaw Pact are redressed through a combination of negotiated reductions and the strengthening of NATO capabilities.

Strategic Defense Initiative (SDI) is not simply a program of research and development of new technology. It offers hope of a reorientation of strategy -- hope for a world in which strategic defenses, which threaten no one and can block a ballistic-missile attack, play a greater role in maintaining deterrence. This is a vital program. It is an investment in a safer world for our children, and it is insurance against violations of arms reduction agreements.

It reinforces our negotiating efforts. I will ask the Congress to provide increases in funding necessary for essential SDI research, development, and testing. It is a cornerstone of our security strategy for the 1990s and beyond.

We will maintain, where necessary, the deployment of U.S. military forces throughout the Free World as a deterrent to those who might act to threaten peace and freedom and as evidence of solidarity with our allies and other friendly nations.

We must continue to develop and to exercise our capabilities to respond to low-intensity conflict. These simmering confrontations below the threshold of large-scale conventional war undermine the political, economic, and security interests of the United States and its allies and friends.

Similarly, we need a vital and effective intelligence capability. We must ensure that this capability is effectively managed and that the President has the ability to employ it flexibly. I will not accept legislation governing the conduct of intelligence activities that does not preserve the flexibility that is required if our intelligence community is to do its job. To improve the military intelligence support to U.S. military commanders, especially in the vital area of human intelligence collection, I am seeking legislation to authorize the Secretary of Defense to establish commercial entities to provide cover for certain Department of Defense foreign intelligence collection activities.

As we address the resource requirements for our defense efforts, we must also streamline the process of resource allocation. For this reason, I urge the Congress to shift fully to a 2-year defense authorization and appropriation cycle. This Administration continues to press initiatives that streamline and strengthen the Federal procurement process to dramatically increase competition in the award of Federal contracts. We are placing particular emphasis on the findings of the Blue Ribbon Commission on Defense Management (The Packard Commission) and especially those recommendations having government-wide effect.

America's goal is both peace and freedom. Americans have always believed that liberty was not the birthright of a fortunate few but of all mankind. And we are inspired in this period by the stirring sight of democracy flourishing anew in many regions of the world -- from Latin America to the Philippines to the Republic of Korea.

I strongly support the cause of the brave Freedom Fighters of Nicaragua. On this issue there have been differences between the Executive branch and the Congress, but there are also shared principles: that there must not be a Cuban or a Soviet-bloc military base in Nicaragua, because such a base would threaten the United States and the other nations in the Hemisphere; that Nicaragua must not pose a military threat to its neighbors or provide a staging ground for subversion or destabilization; and that Nicaragua must respect the basic freedoms and human rights of its own people, including the original pledges the Sandinista regime made to the Organization of American States in 1979.

It is now widely accepted that democracy within Nicaragua is the core issue in the conflict in Central America. It is the attempt of the Communist Sandinista regime to consolidate its monopoly of power that has led to armed rebellion. The Guatemala Peace Accord, reached last August, recognizes the importance of democracy within Nicaragua -- of total amnesty for political prisoners, of negotiations with the armed resistance for a cease-fire. The outcome of the January 15 San Jose meeting to evaluate compliance with the Guatemala Peace Accord presents important opportunities to further peace and democracy in the troubled Central American region.

At the San Jose Summit there was a clear consensus among the four Central American democratic presidents that the Sandinistas had not complied with the Peace Accord. By making his last-minute promises President Ortega acknowledged the accuracy of that judgment.

Nicaraguan Democratic Resistance is the best insurance policy for keeping the peace process on track and producing a democratic outcome in Nicaragua. This is not the time to falter in our support for the Freedom Fighters. The United States must not abandon those fighting for democracy in Nicaragua until true democracy is attained.

Afghanistan, we maintain our firm and unwavering support for the heroic struggle of the Afghan Resistance against the Soviet occupation. We will never agree to any steps that put the Afghan Resistance, or Afghan hopes for self-determination, at risk.

We support a peaceful solution, but such a solution can be achieved only if the Soviet Union withdraws its forces promptly and completely and allows Afghans themselves to determine their political future. As I reminded Secretary General Gorbachev during the December Summit, a prompt and permanent Soviet withdrawal would open the way to further improvements in U.S.-Soviet relations. Let 1988 be the year that sees an end to the Soviet occupation of Afghanistan.

We shall continue our policy in the Persian Gulf to promote stability in the region, maintain freedom of navigation, and promote peace between Iran and Iraq. This bloody conflict has been prolonged because of Iran's intransigence and its attempts to intimidate and threaten the countries of the area and disrupt freedom of navigation. As a result of our policy, we have broadened and strengthened our relationship with the countries of the Gulf Cooperation Council, and our vital interest in the free flow of oil in and out of the Gulf has been protected. We are actively pursuing an arms embargo resolution against Iran, which has refused to comply with the cease-fire demand of the United Nations Security Council.

The violence in the West Bank and Gaza is a vivid reminder of the dangers of the status quo. We, along with those in the area, must work together to give the Palestinians a reason for hope, not despair. Stability in the Middle East requires a just and lasting settlement of the Arab-Israeli conflict -- a settlement that both assures Israeli security and recognizes the legitimate rights of the Palestinians. We are committed to achieving such a settlement.

The cause of democracy and freedom worldwide is promoted by our program of economic and security assistance to our allies and friends. Central to our security and to the preservation of peace are our ties with allies and friends, including NATO and our East Asian allies -- Japan, Korea, the Philippines, and Thailand. Enormous progress has been made in this decade in restoring America's influence in the world and in expanding the horizons of democracy. To further reduce our foreign assistance programs would be a tragic mistake. Economic assistance, especially when coupled with wise internal policies, helps friendly countries prosper; security assistance helps them carry the burden of their self-defense, often in regions of strategic importance for the Free World. In many cases, our aid programs help countries on whose territory there are facilities that support the mutual defense or whose democratic aspirations we wish strongly to support -- such as the Philippines. Our assistance programs have also been vehicles for encouraging structural economic policy reforms that promote prosperity, in part through greater reliance on free markets. This crucial support for basic American goals must be restored.

Since the enactment of comprehensive reform of our Nation's immigration laws in the fall of 1986, the flow of illegal aliens across our southern border has been reduced significantly. Our Nation continues to provide open avenues of legal immigration that each year allow 600,000 people to join our ranks as permanent residents. As in the past, a significant portion of these new arrivals are individuals seeking refuge from oppression in their home countries. I am pleased to report the Department of Justice has taken two important steps toward fairer, more expeditious consideration of the asylum applications of persons suffering persecution because of their religious and political beliefs.

An Asylum Policy and Review Unit, charged with reviewing asylum cases, has been created directly within the Department. In addition, a change has been proposed in the Immigration and Naturalization Service that would give specially trained Asylum Officers jurisdiction to interview applicants and render decisions, while preserving for each applicant an opportunity for a new hearing before an independent immigration judge. Our Administration is also studying a further restructuring of the asylum process to ensure that asylum and refugee cases are considered from a humanitarian perspective.

Caribbean Basin Initiative (CBI) for an additional 12-year period and enhance the program's duty preferences. While not supporting every specific provision in the bill, such as the one concerning sugar, the Administration shares the goal of strengthening the CBI and is proposing modifications and alternatives to reach that goal. In addition, the Senate should give its advice and consent to the ratification of the Bermuda Tax Treaty, and the Congress should enact the complementary tax law changes. These actions would help regularize our economic ties with this strategically important island.

United States has been in the forefront of Western nations helping Africa to alleviate food shortages due to drought, war, and destructive economic policies as in Ethiopia. For example, in June 1987 I set a common goal for all U.S. economic policies and programs for Sub-Saharan Africa -- to end hunger there through economic growth and private sector development, and I am now implementing that decision. At the same time, we have had some success in promoting economic policy reform in Africa, which is now bringing the benefits of investment incentives and free markets to a number of countries that began their independence burdened by stultifying centralized structures. Senegal, Ghana, Cameroon, Botswana, and Malawi are some of the countries adopting market-oriented reforms.

To meet future oil supply disruptions that might develop, it is important that additional oil reserves be placed in the Strategic Petroleum Reserve to meet our 750-million-barrel target. In the section ``Strengthening America's Energy Security,'' which follows, I outline several steps that will strengthen America's overall energy security.

I am proud that our Administration has instituted an effective and prudent system of safeguarding our strategic interests in East-West trade. We cannot let our adversaries acquire through trade vital technology that would strengthen their military capability against us. At the same time we are determined to harmonize trade control practices with friends and allies both to enhance their effectiveness and to avoid undermining the competitive position of U.S. exports.

James Madison observed in The Federalist, No. 41, the meaning of the ``general welfare'' is restricted to that public happiness which the government may promote by its clearly enumerated powers. Permitting general and unlimited powers to government, even though these might be used with the best motives, would render the Constitution useless as a safeguard for individual freedom.

The preservation of freedom, the highest value in our Republic, requires placing the rights of individuals above the power of government. The great challenge of our national government is to use only its carefully enumerated powers in promoting the general welfare by empowering individuals to help themselves.

Tax Policy. Experience has shown that higher taxes ultimately fuel higher spending and do not improve the deficit. During the past 7 years, tax revenues generally have increased, but spending has still increased 27 percent more than tax revenues. This is the true source of the deficit.

Those who favor higher taxes ignore the impact of such taxes on the economy. By reducing and reforming taxes we have seen unprecedented economic growth, high rates of job creation, and increasing productivity for over 60 months. During this period of time, the Administration has lowered income tax rates and removed the automatic tax increases caused by inflation. Future tax policy must preserve these and other gains made on behalf of the American taxpayer. Tax increases should also be opposed on the basis of their burden on economic growth. These include, but are not limited to, returning to higher marginal rates for individuals or corporations; repealing indexing; creating a value-added tax or increasing excise taxes; increasing taxes on capital or energy sources; and levying new taxes on securities transfers or corporate takeovers.

Reduction of Capital Gains Tax Rate. The tax reforms accomplished in 1986 did much to remove provisions that inhibit economic prosperity. The most important piece of unfinished business is to reduce the capital gains tax rate to the level that will generate the savings and investment necessary for future economic growth.

Past experience demonstrates that lowering the capital gains tax rate will mean increased realizations of capital gains upon which taxes are paid. When capital gains tax rates increase, investors tend to hold rather than sell their assets.

If investors hold their assets until death, they can pass their untaxed gains on to their children, resulting in no income taxes paid on those gains. When the capital gains tax rate was increased in 1969, for example, it led to an immediate reduction in the amount of capital gains realized. By contrast, a reduction in the capital gains tax rate in 1978 and again in 1981 led to significant increases in capital gains realizations.

Reducing the capital gains tax rate to an agreed-upon optimum should be a cornerstone of tax reform for the 1990s. I will consult with the Congress about achieving this rate reduction as soon as possible.

Raising new revenues must be confined to areas where they will not burden productivity. I believe that user fees for services are a sensible alternative to a policy where revenues are unrelated to expenditures, where some citizens are singled out for gain while others are excluded. Additionally, user fees promote efficiency by encouraging individuals to use the proper level of government services.

Spending Restraint. We all recognize that reducing the size of the Federal deficit is a top priority. The 2-year budget agreement that the Congress and I worked out last fall is a first step. But we must go further and reduce the size and the cost of the Federal government. I will apply the following principles in considering new appropriations and authorization legislation, which I urge the Congress also to follow: eliminate pork-barrel spending that uses national funds to benefit local interests; work toward subsidy-free business and agriculture marketing; avoid creation of new entitlement programs and additional cost-of-living increase provisions; direct public assistance to the needy; and provide for necessary discretion to promote efficient administration of Federal programs. Moreover, the Congress should avoid attaching appendages to spending bills that authorize unnecessary programs and go beyond the enumerated powers of the national government.

President, one of my earliest priorities was to try to reestablish the proper relationship between the Federal government (which had grown much too large and too powerful) and the State and local governments; and between government and the private sector. In 1981, through our federalism and deregulation initiatives, we placed greater responsibility at the State and local level and in the private sector. We are continuing those efforts.

But as we look forward to the beginning of the 21st century, we need to update our perspective on the proper role of the Federal government and examine what needs to be done to prepare for the changes that will take place. For example, we expect the population to grow to over 268 million people. Changes in technology and communication will link the world's economies, trade, capital flows, and travel as never before. I have asked the Office of Domestic Affairs to work with the President's Council on Management Improvement to conduct an in-depth review and recommend to me by August what further adjustments have to be made in the Federal role to prepare for these anticipated changes. This summer I look forward to receiving their report, ``Government of the Future,'' which will also incorporate plans of my ``Reform '88'' program.

Meanwhile, those responsibilities that legitimately fall within the enumerated powers of the Executive branch should be managed to deliver quality service to all of our citizens. Our government has a major effect upon the daily lives of all of us through the direct delivery of services, the payment of financial assistance through various entitlement programs, the collection of taxes and fees, and through regulating commercial enterprises. My 1988 management priorities will be to complete the ``Reform '88'' management improvement program I started 6 years ago; to overhaul the administrative, financial, and credit systems in our Federal government; to implement productivity and quality plans in each agency; and to direct the Office of Personnel Management to examine the needs of the Federal work force of the future.

Social Security Reports to Participants. Virtually all workers are required to participate in the social security system. But the average worker does not know the level of benefits that would be paid his family should he die, become disabled, or retire. As a result he cannot make plans for any supplemental benefits and insurance he may need.

I am pleased to announce that before the year is over the Social Security Administration will begin providing upon request reports similar to those frequently provided to employees who receive private sector benefits. The social security report will contain a clear and detailed statement that outlines a participant's credited earnings and social security taxes for each year; indicates his current eligibility status; and sets forth an estimate in current dollars of the current and future benefits available to him.

Reducing Welfare Dependency Through Opportunity. The current welfare system has trapped too many Americans in a dependency on welfare that is hard to break and easy to pass on to succeeding generations. In recent years, a consensus has emerged that it is through work and the acceptance of responsibility that people develop the self-esteem to pull themselves up from dependency.

Last year I launched a major effort to encourage the States, working with established community self-help groups, to undertake a wide range of ``workfare'' and other responsibility-building reform experiments.

Experience has clearly shown that it is in the States that real welfare reform will occur. This was true back in the 1970s in California when we started this movement; it is increasingly the case today. The States' and my objective is to make work and self-sufficiency more attractive than welfare. However, because the current welfare system is so complex and restrictive in its endless rules and restrictions, we need legislation to give the States added flexibility and encouragement to undertake truly innovative and individualized reform experiments.

August I endorsed H.R. 3200/S. 1655, legislation that represents a constructive and fiscally responsible approach to reducing welfare dependency. This legislation would help more people become self-sufficient through mandatory participation requirements and a flexible work and training program. It would strengthen our ability to require absent parents to support their children. It also contains the broad waiver authority States need to implement their own ideas and make the welfare system more responsible to the needs of each particular State. I call on the Congress to enact this legislation and not use the present consensus on the need to reform our welfare system as an opportunity simply to expand the benefit levels, which would lead to increased dependency.

Even under the limited authority of current law, many States have undertaken or are planning such experiments. To assist them I have established the Interagency Low Income Opportunity Advisory Board to facilitate ``one-stop shopping'' for the States as they deal with the Federal government and to advise my Cabinet on the impact of the State proposals on the Federal welfare system.

Recently this Board facilitated multi-program waivers of Federal programs to the States of Wisconsin and New Jersey, enabling them to launch broad-based welfare reform initiatives. Wisconsin's program restructures benefits to make participation in work and training programs more attractive than simply collecting welfare. New Jersey's Reaching Economic Achievement (``REACH'') program employs widespread mandatory work requirements, together with the services intended to make long-term employment a reality, and promises savings through reduced case loads. We need more such experiments, emphasizing the close tie we know exists between achievement through work and the feelings of self-worth essential to personal economic independence.

Removing Barriers to Home Ownership. Historically our freedom has been symbolized by the opportunity for every American family to own and occupy housing. The success of our economic recovery program has caused inflation and mortgage interest rates to decline, making it easier for more Americans to buy homes. To make housing even more affordable, this Administration is working with home builders and local officials to overcome government delays and cost-adding regulations. I am also pleased that the recently passed housing bill granted permanent authority for the FHA mortgage insurance program that increases the availability of credit to American home buyers. The bill also accepts my recommendations for extending the availability of rental housing vouchers to rural as well as urban areas. These vouchers will give meaningful choice to the individuals intended to be beneficiaries of housing programs. Moreover, the bill endorses the concept of tenant ownership of public housing. In order fully to empower occupants of public housing to own their own homes, I will be acting on the recommendations of the President's Commission on Privatization to develop a proposal to sell at a discount existing public housing to the current occupants, thus mirroring the success this approach has enjoyed in Britain.

Strengthening the Family. It is one of our country's most basic principles -- where there are strong families, the freedom of the individual expands. The strength and stability of the American family provide essential armor for individuals in the fight against poverty. Only a few years ago, the American household of persons related by blood, marriage, or adoption -- the traditional definition of the family -- seemed in peril.

I have sought to further policies that recognize the importance of a stable family life. For example, the tax reforms of 1986 contributed to family stability by increasing personal exemptions. Last fall I issued an Executive order on the Family requiring that every department and agency review its proposed activities in light of seven standards designed to promote and not harm the family. The Offices of Management and Budget and Policy Development are charged with the responsibility of reviewing future Executive branch activity to ensure that it meets these standards. In addition, the Congress should require a statement that determines the impact legislation will have on the American family.

March, I will receive a report from the Office of Policy Development on the impact of existing policies and regulations on the family. At that time I will take administrative action and propose legislation necessary to correct policies that do not conform to the family criteria.

Despite the economic prosperity enjoyed by most of the Nation, some regions remain economically depressed. The key to revitalizing these areas is not new or expanded government programs, but free enterprise. In 1981, I proposed the creation of enterprise zones in which economically depressed areas could receive tax and regulatory relief in order to expand private economic activity and opportunity within the zones and create jobs in the process.

More than half the States have set up their own enterprise zones, even without Federal incentives. These zones have created new jobs and spurred billions of dollars in capital investment. Their success is testimony to the power of this concept and is just a small indication of how much could be accomplished if Federal incentives were added to those of States and localities. Adding Federal incentives would make existing zones far more economically attractive and successful and would also encourage more State and local zones. Accordingly, I am renewing my call to the Congress to take up effective Federal enterprise zone legislation that will complement the State programs.

Excellence in Education. Individuals well instructed in basic skills, important knowledge, sound values, and independent reasoning are better equipped to participate in America's continued freedom and prosperity. In 1981, however, our educational system was suffering from a 20-year decline in academic achievement. Yet spending per pupil had nearly doubled since 1970, and Federal spending for education had increased over 3,000 percent since 1960. It has now risen to more than $20 billion. But while funding is very important, money without genuine commitment does not lead to educational excellence.

Last month the Secretary of Education unveiled a model curriculum in a report entitled James Madison High School. This report outlined a year-by-year slate of courses in English, social studies, math, science, foreign language, fine arts, physical education, and health, and proposed that they be made graduation requirements for all students. Four years of English would include American, British, and world literature. Three years of social studies would include western civilization, American history, and Principles of American Democracy, with a hefty dose of geography throughout. This is the kind of curriculum that will help America's young people meet the challenges of the next century. Although a public high school curriculum must be set at the State or local level, I hope school officials will examine the model curriculum proposed in James Madison High School.

In addition to ``back to basics'' reforms, American education would benefit from greater parental involvement. In July 1987, as part of my Economic Bill of Rights, I stated that we must recognize the right of parents to have their children educated, publicly or privately, without unreasonable regulation or interference from State or Federal governments. To that end, I am establishing a working group in the Domestic Policy Council that will examine the parental role in education and make recommendations for strengthening parents' rights.

Study after study has found that when parents have a say and are involved in their children's education, the children do better in school. For example, the Congress should authorize a program of giving parents a choice of schools when providing Federal funds to benefit students.

I will continue to encourage efforts to advance parental choice through expansion of the magnet schools program, as well as in the compensatory education programs financed through Chapter 1 of the Education Consolidation and Improvement Act. Compensatory education programs provide additional services to children most in need of extra help in mastering basic skills. Enhancing parental choice is particularly critical in the education of disadvantaged children, who are the focus of the Chapter 1 program.

I do not intend to stop there. Polls show that millions of Americans would like, but do not have, the ability of choosing the education program and institution that is best for their children. A voucher system at the State level would empower parents. I will ask the Department of Education to develop model voucher legislation and make it available to the 50 States, so that they can implement programs that promote choice in education.

A college education is part of training for tomorrow's challenges. However, since 1980 the cost of a college education has risen more than twice as fast as the Consumer Price Index, and many Americans are wondering whether their children will ever be able to go to college. Colleges set tuition, not the Federal government. It is my hope that our Nation's universities will act to reduce the cost of higher education without sacrificing quality in core fields. To help college students from families of limited means, I propose an increase in the maximum Pell Grant to $2300.

I will also ask the Congress to approve creation of College Savings Bonds. These bonds will offer an incentive for lower- and middle-income families to save now for the future education of their children. Interest on bonds used for this purpose will be free from taxation.

While we do our part to help finance college education, students must do their part and act responsibly. Most do, many do not. The taxpayers will spend over $1.6 billion this year to pay off student defaults. To ensure that tomorrow's students do not lose out because Federal guarantees are abused, the Department of Education will propose a rule holding schools and colleges accountable for excessive rates of default on Guaranteed Student Loans. Schools in which there is a disproportionately high number of student defaults will face the loss of eligibility for student aid.

Other policies addressing this problem include: providing better information to students on their duties when they borrow and when their debts are due; use of the IRS to take money owed out of tax refunds; use of collection agencies and litigation to go after the worst offenders; and increasing the incentives for lenders and guarantee agencies to do a better job of collecting loans.

Protecting the Health of Citizens. Government promotion of public health has enabled many individuals to participate fully in society. The Federal government now has the opportunity to assist elderly persons who fall victim to catastrophic illnesses and to lead the fight against diseases such as AIDS.

I am asking the Congress to enact my proposal for Federal coverage of catastrophic health care costs incurred by Medicare beneficiaries. This legislation, which I negotiated with the Senate, would provide affordable catastrophic coverage.

Additionally, the Office of Personnel Management has a new proposal before the Congress to help Federal workers deal with long-term health care needs -- both nursing home and home health care. This proposal will serve as an example for privately funded long-term health care. No new government funds will be needed to provide this additional insurance. It will be made available through the already-existing life insurance program for Federal employees, with a small additional premium from employees enrolled in the program.

However, the primary responsibility for avoiding AIDS lies with the individual. As the Surgeon General, the Secretary of Health and Human Services, and the Secretary of Education have been reminding us all, the best way to prevent AIDS is to abstain from sex until marriage and then to maintain a faithful relationship, as well as to avoid illicit drugs altogether. If the American people follow this wise and timeless counsel, if our schools and families and media communicate it effectively, the spread of AIDS can be greatly diminished.

For our young people, education is crucial for AIDS prevention, and parents have the primary responsibility for this. The Department of Education released AIDS and the Education of Our Children last October to assist parents and educators in this effort. This publication reflects my conviction that educational efforts in the schools should be determined locally with deference to parental values.

I have directed the Public Health Service to undertake a comprehensive program to determine the extent of HIV infection and full-blown AIDS. We need to know more about the dynamics of this disease, its prevalence, and its rate of spread.

Deregulation of Key Industries. Back in 1980, I promised to get the government off the backs of all individual Americans -- working men and women, consumers, and businessmen and women. More than 7000 new regulations were issued in my predecessor's last year in office. This had to stop. At my direction, various departments have acted to reduce the scope and cost of Federal regulation. We have accomplished a great deal. For example, we have expedited Federal approval of experimental drugs, making them available to treat serious or life-threatening diseases when other treatments do not work.

Americans have access to more goods and are able to travel more easily and at less cost because of deregulation. Today, for the first time in 30 years, the railroad industry is financially stable because of economic deregulation.

Shippers and consumers across the Nation benefit from real cost reductions brought on by more competition. And, despite some problems inevitable in a large, dynamic industry, airline consumers now enjoy about $11 billion per year in lower fares, a great number of flight options, and a safe, efficient air transportation system unequaled by any nation. Our free market policies have worked. Although we must continue our vigilance to assure safety, we must not, in any form, re-regulate these industries.

The current relaxation of Federal regulation of the trucking industry has demonstrated the tremendous potential of individual Americans. Now is the time to complete the deregulation process. I ask that the Congress pass the Administration's Trucking Productivity Improvement Act of 1987 to remove the last vestige of Federal regulation of the interstate trucking industry and ensure that the States do not re-regulate the interstate and intrastate operations of interstate trucking firms. Already the progress of rail and trucking deregulation has made the Interstate Commerce Commission an anachronism. It should be abolished as proposed in legislation sent to the Congress last year.

Administration has sought to promote the free flow of information among individuals by freeing the telecommunications industry from intrusive government control. In this ``Age of Information'' America risks losing its position as the world's leader in information and telecommunications technology -- not because we lack the talent, the resources, or the will, but because we have needlessly regulated our telecommunications industry.

Another area in which deregulation has promoted individual freedom is the broadcasting and cable industries. I have strongly supported the elimination of the so-called ``Fairness Doctrine'' as an unconstitutional infringement upon the freedom of the press, and I will continue to resist any legislation that attempts to reverse this Federal Communications Commission (FCC) action. This Administration has also insisted in the courts that the cable industry receive the same First Amendment protection as the print media. This is particularly imperative in light of recent technological changes in the industry. One area where First Amendment rights have been dealt a severe blow is the recent codification of the ``cross-ownership'' rule. This last minute appendage to the Continuing Resolution prevents owners of newspapers and broadcast stations from even seeking a waiver of the rule and thus violates their First Amendment rights. This change could force the closing of newspapers. I strongly support measures to repeal legislative cross-ownership restrictions that inhibit rather than enhance the free market of ideas.

Where the government does regulate economic activity, this Administration has sought to use market-oriented approaches. For example, in the case of airline landing rights, it is important that individuals be able to freely transfer rights to operate within the regulatory regime. Despite the progress we have made on deregulation, more needs to be done. The Office of Management and Budget therefore will continue to assure that agencies, as they develop proposed regulations, evaluate and make public their findings concerning the effect of proposed Federal regulations on private sector employment and commerce.

Reducing Government Reporting Burdens. Since 1982, my Executive Office has actively sought to reduce the burden of Federal reporting requirements on every individual and business. Each year we have made sizable reductions in paperwork burdens, totalling 560 million man-hours from Fiscal Year 1981 through Fiscal Year 1986. To improve our efforts, the Office of Management and Budget will issue regulations that will provide a more timely and complete description of proposed reporting burdens. Citizens will be encouraged to report back to OMB when, in their experience, the reporting requirement is unduly onerous. The Office of Management and Budget is systematically simplifying Federal procurement regulations and reducing the paperwork burden imposed upon those who want to compete for contracts with the Federal government.

Similarly, the Census Bureau has substantially improved the questionnaires to be used in the 1990 decennial census. These improvements will reduce the paperwork burden on all American households by using a significantly abbreviated ``short'' form and by making sure that no more households than absolutely necessary are asked to complete the ``long'' form. These changes will also improve the quality of the information collected.

Strengthening America's Energy Security. The economic well-being and future security of this Nation depend upon maintaining and building long-term energy security and strengthening the domestic energy industry. We have made considerable progress. While our economy has greatly expanded, we are using no more energy and less oil than we did 10 years ago, and our strategic oil stocks are five times higher. But more needs to be done.

The windfall profit tax has raised little or no revenue since the collapse of oil prices in 1985, yet it discourages long-term investment in new domestic oil production. Moreover, it causes oil producers to engage in purposeless record-keeping. It should be repealed.

May I signed legislation eliminating restrictions on natural gas use. The Congress should now act to decontrol the wellhead price of natural gas and provide for open access pipeline transportation. Both measures would lead to less demand for imported oil. I also urge action on the Administration's proposal to deregulate many oil pipelines.

This year the Congress will consider our recommendation concerning oil and gas activities on the coastal plain of the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge -- the most outstanding onshore oil and gas frontier in this Nation. The Department of the Interior would manage exploration, development, and production of these potentially vast resources while assuring that environmental safeguards are carefully maintained. The Congress should move expeditiously to enact legislation implementing our recommendation.

Development of our offshore energy resources continues to be vital to our economic and energy security. Last year we developed and implemented a 5-year Outer Continental Shelf (OCS) leasing program. Unparalleled in its responsiveness to State and local concerns, this program meets America's need for domestic energy supplies while it continues to provide protection for our important coastal resources.

Lastly, to ensure the future viability of nuclear power in the United States, the nuclear licensing process should be reformed and the Price-Anderson Act should be reauthorized. I urge responsible congressional action in these areas.

Government Intrusion. I have always believed that this Nation does not have to choose between a clean, safe environment and a productive economy. Of course, sometimes trade-offs exist and choices have to be made.

And our environmental accomplishments are impressive. We have dramatically reduced air pollution in our cities and restored thousands of miles of waterways without hampering economic growth. We have cut levels of lead in urban air by nearly 90 percent and cleaned up more than 1000 hazardous dumps and spill sites. And we have made impressive strides in the Superfund hazardous waste cleanup program. Work has been completed at almost 200 sites this year, including many that posed immediate threats to human health and the environment.

We have recognized the global nature of some environmental challenges and played a leadership role in the world community to meet them. In December, I submitted to the Senate for advice and consent to ratification an international protocol to reduce chemical emissions that may be depleting the stratospheric ozone layer, and I urge early congressional action on this initiative. This protocol is the first time nations of the world have agreed to specific action in order to address a global environmental problem.

Strengthening Financial Markets. With a view to empowering people to engage in productive activity for mutual gain, I am taking steps to reduce arbitrary second-guessing of markets by government regulators who can scarcely hope to administer financial services more efficiently or fairly.

I reassert my support for the pro-competitive Financial Modernization Act of 1987, which would repeal Sections 20 and 32 of the Glass-Steagall Act prohibiting affiliations between commercial banks and securities firms. It would permit bank holding companies, with Federal Reserve Board approval, to own affiliates that underwrite or deal in securities. I welcome the bipartisan initiatives of the Senate and House Banking Committees in this area, and I encourage the Congress to consider additional reforms that keep financial services open and competitive and allow the development of innovative services to benefit individuals, businesses, and government. In today's global economy, America's financial institutions must be released from this outdated legal framework so that they will be able to remain on the leading edge in the world marketplace.

The market for corporate control is a vital component of our free enterprise economy. This Administration opposes legislation that would have the effect of making takeover activity more costly and difficult. Such efforts prevent the free flow of capital and make American firms less responsive to competitive forces, often at the expense of shareholders.

Fathers and free Englishmen before them that the right to own and control property was the foundation of all other individual liberties. To protect these rights, the Administration has urged the courts to restore the constitutional right of a citizen to receive just compensation when government at any level takes private property through regulation or other means. Last spring, the Supreme Court adopted this view in Nollan v.

In the wake of these decisions, this Administration is now implementing new procedures to ensure that Federal regulations do not violate the Fifth Amendment prohibition on taking private property; or if they do take a citizen's property for public use, to ensure that he receives constitutionally required just compensation.

Trade and Competitiveness. To enable individuals to enjoy the benefits of trade with other countries and to engage in productive activity without the burdens of retaliatory trade barriers, I will continue to encourage a free and fair trade policy. U.S. trade policy must reflect the fact that we live and work in a global economy and that our future prosperity lies in establishing stable, open relationships with our trading partners abroad and competitive, unrestrained markets at home. An effective trade policy, therefore, must pursue two interrelated goals: to extend, by example and by negotiation, the benefits of free trade to the world economy and to enhance, through deregulation and privatization, the free operation of the domestic economy. Only in such a competitive environment will American business reach its productive potential and American workers enjoy the just rewards for their labors.

There were six elements to that program, each critical to ensuring America's future economic preeminence: increasing investment in human capital; promoting the development of science and technology; better protecting intellectual property rights; enacting essential legal and regulatory reforms; shaping the international economic environment; and continuing to eliminate the Federal budget deficit by reducing domestic spending. Taken as a whole, this program recognized that government must not interfere with the marketplace but should ensure that the underpinnings of American economic success, such as a well-educated work force and a technological edge, remain strong.

Unfortunately, the Congress has failed to recognize the broad nature of the competitiveness problem and instead has placed too much emphasis on protectionist measures that may defer short-lived adjustment pains but harm the future health of the economy. Protectionism serves as a hidden tax on the American economy, crippling once prosperous industries, throwing Americans out of work, and raising costs for consumers. American business comes to rely more heavily on government and less on the marketplace, while Americans watch their standard of living slip away. Despite the soothing words of its advocates, protectionism represents the triumph of special interest over the general interest.

Department of Commerce is taking two important steps to boost U.S. exports. First, it will launch Export Now, an intensive new effort, supported by the private sector, to inform small, medium, and large businesses of the current opportunities to expand exports. This effort will encourage American business to take advantage of favorable exchange rates, of the market-opening actions of this Administration, and of the support our government agencies can give them in entering new overseas markets. Second, the Department will begin the Malcolm Baldrige Quality Awards program to help restore ``Made in the U.S.A.'' as the symbol of the very best products throughout the world.

No sector of our economy would benefit more from international trade reforms than agriculture. One of my proposals to the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) for negotiations under the Uruguay Round is to eliminate worldwide all subsidies that distort agricultural trade and all agricultural import barriers.

I propose that these subsidies and restrictions be phased out over 10 years. We are striving for an agreement on agriculture by the end of this year, in order to hasten access of U.S. farmers to export markets now closed to them. I also propose an international harmonization of health and sanitary measures affecting agricultural trade with the aim of eliminating foreign countries' use of them as disguised trade barriers.

Nation benefits from the excellence of our scientists, engineers, and researchers. Because it is important that business have adequate incentives to fund research here in the United States, we are seeking enactment of a permanent tax credit for firms engaging in research and experimentation to replace the tax credit that expires at the end of this year. In addition, we are seeking legislation that would permit the allocation of at least 67 percent of a U.S. company's research expenses to its domestic income for purposes of the foreign tax credit.

During this Administration, we have also shifted the focus of Federal investment in R&D to basic research, allowing the private sector to transform this fundamental knowledge into technologies and processes necessary to develop products and services that meet the demands of the marketplace. Federal investment in basic research has grown in real terms by 40 percent since 1981.

Last year, I issued an Executive order to facilitate citizens' access to such federally funded basic research. In addition, I am asking the Congress to fund incentives to spur American innovation. I am requesting that we now provide monetary awards to accompany our National Medals of Science and Technology. In addition, I am proposing a new Thomas A. Edison Prize that will challenge Americans from all walks of life to use technology to improve the quality of life in the United States and the world.

Administration has also proposed construction of a Superconducting Super Collider, which is essential to continued U.S. leadership in high-energy physics and America's scientific and technological competitiveness. Presently, the Department of Energy is studying locations in seven States, and late this summer the Secretary of Energy will select the preferred site for the project. We hope that our allies will share the cost of construction and operation of this facility, as well as the benefits it will afford for new discoveries in basic physics.

Our antitrust statutes were intended to protect this freedom. Sadly they have been transformed into weapons that competitors use against each other and tools for inappropriate government interference in the marketplace. Additionally, American firms find themselves at a competitive disadvantage with foreign competitors because of the burden and uncertainty fostered by some outdated aspects of our Nation's antitrust statutes. Therefore, I again urge the Congress to adopt my proposed antitrust reforms, particularly those that remove disincentives to pro-competitive mergers. In addition, I am asking the Congress to amend the National Cooperative Research Act to permit some types of joint production ventures. While retaining the protection of the antitrust statutes, this change will help U.S. manufacturing firms develop innovative ways to produce goods and services at competitive prices both here and overseas.

For example, the domestic automobile manufacturing industry has made major strides in improving its competitive position, producing higher quality and more fuel-efficient vehicles. Despite these gains in fuel efficiency, the industry remains restricted by current law, which requires automobile manufacturers to ``balance'' their line of automobiles to include cars and light trucks that meet corporate average miles-per-gallon fuel economy (CAFE) standards. These standards make it more difficult for U.S. firms to produce automobiles that consumers want to buy. This Administration has proposed the Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act of 1987 to eliminate this requirement for future model years. This legislation would remove a competitive disadvantage for American firms at a time when the purpose of the CAFE standard has been largely realized and would remove the incentive for domestic auto manufacturers to export U.S. jobs.

Another factor affecting U.S. competitiveness is our civil justice system. During the past 2 years, 47 of the 50 States have enacted tort reform legislation. We strongly supported many of these State initiatives, and we will work closely with the States to achieve further reforms wherever possible. In addition, the Administration is encouraged by the progress of the legislation to reduce the costly product liability insurance spiral and will work with the Congress towards the enactment of effective and meaningful reform of product liability law.

Key to promoting investment in ideas, innovation, and research is ensuring that those investments will be protected. Accordingly, I have proposed as part of my superconductivity legislation to raise legal protection for products resulting from patented processes and to prohibit foreign nations from using the Freedom of Information Act to acquire intellectual property developed by the U.S.

Government. Additional measures planned include joining the Berne Convention, which provides international protection for intellectual property, demanding adequate protection of intellectual property rights when negotiating treaties, and pushing hard in the GATT Round for high standards for intellectual property protection worldwide.

Free Trade Agreement that, when enacted, will mark the beginning of a remarkable new era. It eliminates all tariffs between the United States and Canada over the next 10 years, promotes free trade in energy, and greatly reduces restrictions on investments. The agreement goes beyond most trade agreements and covers services and investment. It is a ``win-win'' agreement for both the United States and Canada. Moreover, it sends a signal to the rest of the world: protectionism is not inevitable. Rather, with the political will and commitment, all nations can promote freer trade to the benefit of each and every citizen. I will soon transmit a bill to implement this agreement and I urge prompt enactment to ensure that the agreement takes effect on January 1, 1989.

November, the United States Trade Representative, on my behalf, signed a framework agreement with Mexico for discussions on trade and investment. This framework agreement is an important step forward in our bilateral trade relationship that will enable us to work together to address problems, reduce barriers and, thus, increase trade and investment between our two countries.

Freeing the Individual to Work. Few laws that a government may impose are more injurious to liberty than restrictions on the right to work, as outlined in my Economic Bill of Rights. Today, we are in the 6th year of an economic recovery that has created 14.5 million jobs. In order to continue and to build on that record of growth, we need policies that recognize the changing nature and changing needs of the work force.

These policies include enhanced training for dislocated workers, so that they are able to adjust to a world requiring new and different skills. Our proposed Worker Adjustment Program will address this need in a comprehensive way while increasing the role of States and localities in determining how these funds are best spent. In addition, we are preparing to give States and localities the flexibility to provide remedial training to disadvantaged youth. For thousands of low-skilled young people, this initiative holds the potential to provide a way out of poverty and into a job.

Indeed, the changes in our work force present other challenges as well. More people are working than ever before in our history. There is fuller work force participation across all sectors, and more women are working than ever before.

While this has helped power our tremendous growth, it has also created tension between demands of work and demands of child-rearing. We need to work with State and local governments and the private sector to identify and develop effective solutions, consistent with our efforts to strengthen the family, to foster practical, voluntary ways to ease this tension.

Several threats to our continued job growth can be found in a range of initiatives pending in the Congress, such as employer-provided health care and health insurance; parental leave; advance notification of plant closings; risk notification; an increase in the minimum wage; labor protective provisions; and a ban on employers using polygraphs to prevent theft. Many of these initiatives have been called ``mandated benefits,'' but a more accurate description would be ``mandated costs'' or ``mandated unemployment.'' Such mandated costs are particularly harmful to our Nation's small businesses, which are leading the way in job creation in our economic recovery. While many of the objectives sought by such legislation are laudable, they are not the proper subject for Federal mandates.

While well intentioned, the added employment costs would reduce job opportunities, lower wages generally, weaken economic growth, and hinder our competitiveness in world markets. In short, they are efforts to make individuals and companies pay for new government programs, mandated by the government but implemented by the private sector. Rather than forcing employers to provide such coverage, with possible serious adverse side effects for some workers, these decisions should be left to voluntary negotiation between employers and employees.

The adoption of ``comparable worth'' pay standards, another intrusive form of government intervention into the labor market, has also been proposed. The objective is not to provide equal pay for equal work, a concept I fully support and which I enforce as the law of the land. Rather, ``comparable worth'' proposals seek to determine the worth of completely different jobs and then empower government panels to assign ``fair'' and ``comparable'' wages. Proposals that would establish panels of ``experts'' to determine how much workers can earn would create the kind of planned economy that has stifled economic growth in other parts of the world. Such wage fixing completely ignores the fact that in a free enterprise economy market forces should determine wages.

We should seek to eliminate existing barriers to employment. For example, when I took office I inherited a rule that, for over 40 years, prohibited individuals from working in their homes to produce knitted garments such as sweaters, caps, and scarves. In 1984, we dropped that rule and permitted employers to hire home workers after obtaining a certificate from the Department of Labor authorizing such employment, thus ensuring that the home workers receive the protection of the Fair Labor Standards Act. The restrictions still apply to six other categories of products, and the Department of Labor will be working to extend the certification procedures for five of the six remaining home work industries.

Another proposal in the Congress would raise the minimum wage, thereby creating additional barriers to employment. Today most people who work at the minimum wage are teenagers and others with limited experience who need these jobs to begin their climb up the economic ladder. Few are heads of households. Higher minimum wages will surely force young and inexperienced workers into unemployment. We should permit a special minimum wage differential for teenagers that would increase employment, on-the-job-training, and future wage growth for the least-skilled workers. Reform of other Federal wage statutes, such as Davis-Bacon, is also needed.

One enduring legacy of American frontier society has been a love of bold challenges and wide open vistas. Some 30 years ago we crossed a ``new frontier'' with a shot into space. Today we continue to face new opportunities and new challenges in opening a limitless universe beyond our tiny globe to exploration and commercial enterprise. But here on Earth as well, whole new sectors of discovery and productivity lie waiting for development through individual creativity and initiative.

Privatization of Government Activities. Over time, government has accumulated numerous commercial operations, many of which could be performed more efficiently by the private sector. Where such opportunities exist to provide better services at lower cost, we will seek to transfer such services and operations to the most efficient enterprises. This does not imply the abrogation of government responsibility for these services. Rather, it merely recognizes that what matters the most is the cost and quality of the service provided, not who provides it. In addition, there is an important moral consideration -- individual liberty would be enhanced and the debilitating effect of public sector growth on human freedom would be reduced.

Even now, government relies extensively on the private sector to provide basic government services in many key programs: the G.I. Bill, Medicare, Medicaid, student loans, food stamps, and many other programs. Further, the government benefits from private sector assistance in disbursing funds electronically, assessing credit worthiness of loan applicants, servicing and collecting payments due the government, and relying on finance accounting systems from the private sector to bring about an extensive upgrading of Executive branch financial management throughout the government. Thus privatization can make government operations more efficient and at the same time provide more convenient service to our citizens.

Administration sold over $5 billion in government loans to private investors last year, with plans to sell an additional $4 billion in government loans this year. Additionally, we sold the government-owned freight railroad, CONRAIL, to private investors at a price tag of almost $2 billion.

As part of my Economic Bill of Rights, I established the President's Commission on Privatization to accelerate our program of placing greater reliance on the private sector. In its interim report covering government housing programs the Commission recommended expanded use of housing vouchers, tenant management of public housing projects, and sales of public housing units to tenants. The Congress has already enacted a major housing bill that endorses housing vouchers and facilitates the Administration's efforts to encourage tenant management and public housing ownership. Similarly, the Commission has endorsed the sale of government loan assets. The Commission's final report is expected in March and will cover many more opportunities, including prison construction, military commissaries, AMTRAK, Naval Petroleum Reserves, and urban mass transportation. After a careful review of these proposals, legislation will be developed to implement the most promising proposals.

To pursue administrative measures within the Executive branch and implement the findings of the Commission on Privatization, I have created an Office of Privatization within the Executive Office of the President. I have given it the responsibility to investigate and propose privatization opportunities that can be included in my recommendations for the Fiscal Year 1989 Budget.

I will recommend that a comprehensive study be conducted to measure the likely benefits that would occur if we permit the private sector to perform some functions now performed by the United States Postal Service and other government entities.

I will also recommend a series of pilot projects to determine if privatization is the best way to go in other government programs, including operation of minimum security Federal prisons, Federal prison industries, regulatory audits by the U.S.

I am further recommending the direct privatization of all or some of several existing government programs where the benefits of privatization are believed to be significant or where studies have already been completed. Included in this category are the Naval Petroleum Reserves, AMTRAK, Federal Crop Insurance, arbitration of tax disputes, government employee housing, the Railroad Retirement Board, the National Finance Center, the National Technical Information Service, the Alaska Power Administration, and the collection of overdue loans to the Federal government. I will also ask for substantially expanded authority to allow individuals to use their private sector credit cards to pay money owed to the government.

In addition, I have recently promulgated an Executive order to foster greater contracting out of services currently provided by the government to private providers, many in America's vital small business community. Study after study, many conducted by the General Accounting Office, demonstrate that savings of between 30 to 40 percent can be achieved by contracting out government work to private business. If all agencies took advantage of contracting-out opportunities, the total savings would amount to $7 billion per year.

New Opportunities in Space. Nearly 2 decades ago, with courage and bold technological innovation, America pushed back the frontier of space by landing a man on the moon and safely bringing him back. This breakthrough created untold opportunities for scientific discovery and commerce and advanced mankind's age-old dream of exploring space beyond its planetary home.

America is to continue its leadership in space, we must now forge ahead, exploring space's vast frontier and expanding our free enterprise system to Earth's orbits and beyond. And we must build our long-term space future on a sound foundation that will ensure reliable and economical access to and use of outer space.

I recently adopted an enhanced comprehensive national space policy. This policy reaffirms America's commitment to space leadership as a fundamental national objective and recognizes the importance of both private sector and governmental space activities in achieving critical national goals. And while acknowledging the importance of returning the Space Shuttle to safe, reliable operations, it also stresses that access to space, so vital to America's security and prosperity, must never be limited to any single system.

As a matter of special note, my policy also specifically recognizes the importance of extending the reach of American private commerce to space and establishes goals to guide both civil and national security space efforts in achieving cost-effective, resilient, and reliable means of access to space.

I am no less deeply committed to the long-range goal of expanding human presence and activity beyond earth orbit and into the solar system, and I invite the Congress to join with me in endorsing and supporting this new long-term goal.

As the first step, I have directed the National Aeronautics and Space Administration to begin a systematic development of space technologies called Project Pathfinder, which will aid us in deciding where this new adventure should take us, and when. The funding proposed for Fiscal year 1989 is $100 million.

I am asking the Congress to maintain our strong national commitment to a permanently manned space station. The Fiscal Year 1989 Budget request includes $1.0 billion to achieve this goal, along with a request for a 3-year appropriations commitment from the Congress totalling $6.1 billion.

I will soon announce a major Commercial Space Initiative that includes administrative and legislative action to nurture entrepreneurship in space. By taking advantage of the private sector's innovative excellence, we can maintain and extend America's leadership in space.

My initiative will have three goals: (1) promoting a strong commercial presence in space -- we need the private sector to begin to lay the infrastructure necessary for research and manufacturing in space; (2) assuring a highway to space by building on my previous efforts to promote a strong private expendable launch vehicle industry; and (3) building a solid technology and talent base.

Removing Government Interference with the Political Process. The right to free speech and the right to participate in the democratic process are two of our most fundamental freedoms. In Buckley v. Valeo, the Supreme Court held that limits on how individuals spend their own resources in the political process can violate the First Amendment. This is a sound principle. We should make sure ``campaign reform'' will not have the effect of reducing popular participation in the political process or impairing constitutional rights. Today, there are proposals to restrict certain parts of our electoral process. A more beneficial reform would be the requirement of full disclosure of all campaign contributions, including in-kind contributions, and expenditures on behalf of any electoral activities, including those in the context of membership communication.

We do not want to risk a situation in which Federal employees come to believe that their advancement depends on espousing particular views, perhaps the political views of their superiors. Neither should electoral campaigning be allowed to mar cooperation between the political appointees of the President and the civil service establishment, a cooperation crucial to good government. As I have said in the past, the Hatch Act should not be changed or repealed.

Improving the Civil Service. The past 7 years have witnessed an increasing commitment by the Nation's Federal civil service to quality in their work and pride in their performance. The abilities of this work force, from the most recently hired clerical worker to the most senior member of the managerial corps, are ready not only to continue the effort to serve the American people, but to take that service to new levels of excellence.

At present, however, the Federal civil service is overregulated by a system that discourages employee initiative and hamstrings government managers with thousands of pages of restrictive rules and regulations. With the major reforms encompassed in my proposed Civil Service Simplification Act, we can provide substantial incentives for top performance, introducing into our Federal government the classic productive values of the American workplace: entrepreneurial freedom and reward for hard work.

None are more powerless than the unborn. Since the legalization of abortion-on-demand in 1973, there have been an estimated 21 million abortions in this country. I am committed to reducing the number of abortions in this country and reaffirming life's sacred position in our Nation.

Congress should pass expeditiously my Human Life Bill. The first section of the bill contains a finding that abortion takes the life of a human being and that Roe v. Wade was wrong not to recognize the humanity of the unborn child. The second section would enact, on a permanent and government-wide basis, the Hyde Amendment restriction prohibiting Federal dollars from going for abortion unless a mother's life is endangered. In addition, the Congress should pass the Human Life Amendment.

At my direction, the Department of Health and Human Services is about to issue regulations prohibiting the use of Title X funds (approximately $140 million) for any program that performs abortion, counsels for abortion, or promotes abortion through lawsuits, lobbying, or other such activities. The regulations also require that Title X programs separate themselves from programs that engage in abortion activities. It is clear from the legislative record surrounding the passage of Title X that its purpose, far from promoting abortion, was one of offering an alternative to abortion and indeed reducing the number of abortions. For some time the program as enforced was standing its essential purpose on its head, effectively promoting abortion instead of reducing the incidence of abortion as intended by the Congress.

Another loophole often used to circumvent prohibitions on using Federal funds for abortions is the use of psychiatric recommendations. Currently the law allows for Federal funding only when an abortion is necessary to save the life of the mother. This law reflects the consensus that abortion may be considered when there is a physical threat to the mother. I am directing the Secretary of Health and Human Services to issue regulations that reflect this consensus and make it clear that only when there is physical danger to the life of the mother can Federal funds be used for abortion.

August 1987 I formed an Interagency Task Force on Adoption that delivered its final report to me on November 13. I will act to implement the Task Force recommendations and propose legislation where necessary. Each year over 140,000 children are adopted, yet thousands of childless families still wait for children to adopt. There are 36,000 children awaiting adoption, of which about 60 percent are ``special needs'' children. Many have physical or emotional handicaps, belong to sibling groups, or are older children; they are generally more difficult to place.

Administration will also work with the States to encourage model legislation that promotes adoption. California's Pregnancy Freedom of Choice Act, for instance, allows the State to reimburse licensed nonprofit maternity homes for the costs of maternity care and other pregnancy services. Michigan contracts out special needs adoption to private agencies, reimbursing them for the full cost of adoption services up to $10,000. These are exemplary efforts to provide families for children in need of parental love and care.

First Amendment protects the right of Americans to freely exercise their religious beliefs in an atmosphere of toleration and accommodation. As I have noted in the past, certain court decisions have in my view interpreted the First Amendment so as to restrict, rather than protect, individual rights of conscience. I have repeatedly affirmed my belief that school prayer on a voluntary basis is permissible, indeed desirable, in the public school. In my State of the Union addresses in 1986 and 1987, I expressed my support for a constitutional amendment that would make it clear that the Constitution does not prohibit voluntary prayer in public schools.

One disturbing development in this area of the law has been the exclusion of religiously affiliated organizations from federally funded programs. A recent lower court decision held unconstitutional my Adolescent Family Life Program because the program included religious organizations among those carrying out its implementation. That decision, if upheld, would effectively require the government to discriminate against religious charitable organizations, even when their participation in a program only serves to further its legitimate secular purpose. The Department of Justice is appealing this ruling that I believe to be inconsistent with the First Amendment. Our forefathers came to this land in large part to secure the rights to freedom of religion and individual conscience that they would later establish as bedrock provisions of our Constitution. We must avoid such perversion of the First Amendment. Rather, as we prepare for the 21st century, we must continue to foster the free exercise of religion that our forefathers understood would provide the moral foundations for American society.

These then are the legislative and administrative policies that the Administration will pursue in furtherance of the six purposes for which the American people first ordained and established our Constitution. They have been carefully chosen. For obviously not every policy that a President or a Congress may put forward is compatible with our Constitution, even though that policy might be popular. In order to secure the liberty of individuals and political minorities, the Constitution places a number of carefully considered restrictions on the Federal government. The Congress does not, for example, possess a general legislative power, nor the President the power of decree. The Framers proscribed both as inconsistent with limited, constitutional government. Thanks in large measure to their wisdom, America has enjoyed the blessings of liberty for 2 centuries. It is my belief that the policies presented in this message will contribute to the continuing restoration of the Federal government to a sound constitutional footing and thus preserve these same blessings for our posterity in the 21st century.

The President. No, I think he has been exactly right, that that would set a precedent with regard to private conversations between Presidents and Vice Presidents, and I don't think we have a right to do that.

I transmit herewith, for the advice and consent of the Senate with a view to acceptance by the United States, amendments to regulations 47 and 48 of Annex II of the International Convention on Load Lines, 1966. The report of the Department of State is also transmitted for the information of the Senate in connection with its consideration of these amendments.

International Convention on Load Lines establishes uniform principles governing the safe loading of ships on international voyages. The annexes, which form an integral part of the Convention, embody the regulations for determining the location of ships' load lines. The annexes also divide the world's oceans into regions in which particular load lines must be observed depending on the season of the year in which the vessels operate. The amendments to regulations 47 and 48 of the Convention, proposed by the Government of Chile, would redefine the boundaries of the seasonal zones intersecting the coast of Chile. The effect would be to extend the tropical and summer zones toward the south to the advantage of both the Chilean coastal trade and visiting foreign trade.

I believe that the proposed amendments will not be detrimental to United States shipping and should be accepted. I recommend that the Senate give early and favorable consideration to these amendments, and give advice and consent to their acceptance by the United States.

While you will note that extensive investigations of the phenomenon are in progress, we do not plan to establish an International Year of the Greenhouse Effect as suggested in the language of Public Law 99 - 383.

How would you describe Egyptian-American relations at the moment, with particular reference to the Egyptian economic situation and the problem of the Egyptian FMS [foreign military sales] debt to the United States? How do you see the future of the relationship?

The President. Our relationship with Egypt today is particularly strong. It is a special partnership, deriving its strength from our similar views and interests on so many issues, most notably our mutual commitment to peace and stability in the Middle East. We share the determination to advance the Arab-Israeli peace process, to reduce tensions in the Gulf, to contain the threat of terrorism from which we have both suffered so much, and to promote development and better lives for the people of the region. The bonds between the Egyptian and American peoples are strong, built on many years of cooperation in military, economic, educational, and cultural fields.

We are doing a great deal to help alleviate Egypt's difficult economic situation and its heavy debt burden. We are encouraged by Egypt's efforts to develop a stronger and more vibrant economy. In recognition of these efforts and Egypt's requirements, I recommended to Congress that our assistance levels to Egypt be maintained, despite severe cuts in both overall foreign assistance and U.S. domestic programs. As a result, in fiscal year 1988, Egypt will receive one-fourth of our total worldwide economic support fund assistance and nearly one-third of all foreign military sales assistance, all on a grant basis.

Our official assistance programs have financed power stations, water facilities, and telecommunications equipment, health services, and over 500 schools -- all of which have helped raise living standards for many Egyptians and build the base for future economic growth. Looking ahead, I hope we can rely more on our private sectors to generate growth. Experience around the world has shown that this is the best approach to increasing employment and production.

I believe the future of Egyptian-American relations is bright and that our common vision of peace will enable us to continue to work together to meet the many challenges on the horizon in the Middle East and around the world. President Mubarak is a strong and determined leader, and I look forward to discussing a wide range of issues with him when we meet this week.

The President. Egypt has always occupied a leadership position in the Arab world. This position has recently been reaffirmed publicly by the Arab summit in Amman and the prompt reestablishment of relations with Egypt by the majority of the members of the Arab League. President Mubarak's recent tour of the Gulf States is a further demonstration of the central role Egypt plays in the pursuit of stability and security in the Middle East. I value the counsel of President Mubarak as an Arab leader committed to peace.

In September 1982, you presented the ``Reagan plan'' for peace in the Middle East. The current situation is clearly explosive, but some elements in Israel favor peace negotiations. Are you considering any new initiatives? Would you support an international peace conference, and do you foresee such a conference taking place before the end of your administration?

The President. Recent events in the West Bank and in Gaza make it clear that the status quo is unacceptable. We must work together with those in the area to give the Palestinians a reason for hope, not despair. Conditions must be improved in the territories, and real movement toward a political settlement of the Arab-Israeli conflict is essential. However, without a new sense of realism on the part of all the parties, this will be difficult. Flexibility must be demonstrated by practical suggestions, and not just by rhetorical posturing.

With my full encouragement and support, Secretary of State Shultz has been working actively to find a way to bridge the gaps on substance and process that have prevented the advent of negotiations. He made some headway during his October 1987 trip to the region but found that important differences remain on both the format and the agenda for bilateral negotiations.

We have not ruled out any means of reaching bilateral negotiations. For nearly 3 years, we have devoted much time and effort to seeing how an international conference could be structured that would result in such negotiations -- the only kind that are likely to be productive and meaningful. A conference must facilitate such negotiations, not be a vehicle for avoiding them. We are committed to trying to find a basis that meets the needs of all the parties and gives us a reason to believe that the negotiations can be successful. Our aim, after all, is a comprehensive peace, not just a negotiating process.

The fact that 1988 is an election year in the United States will not reduce our commitment to continuing our efforts on behalf of Middle East peace. The enemies of peace will not rest in 1988; therefore, the proponents of peace must not, either.

The President. The human rights situation in the West Bank and Gaza remains extremely complex. The United States recognizes that Israel, as the occupying power, has legitimate security concerns and responsibilities as well as an obligation to protect the human rights of Palestinians. The United States has a regular dialog with the Government of Israel on human rights, as with other governments. We are, indeed, just as concerned with the human rights of Palestinians as of other peoples and have made it very clear that we oppose deportations and any denial of the due process of law.

Over the past few years, the United States has actively sought to engage the Soviets in a frank exchange of views in the search for constructive and peaceful solutions to conflicts and problems in various regions around the world. Through patience and persistence, we have succeeded in establishing a regular cycle of meetings between U.S. and Soviet experts and policymakers. These discussions have helped each side to understand the other's positions and perspectives. Unfortunately, in many cases we continue to differ on the best means to achieve peaceful solutions.

Americans are particularly troubled by the use of Soviet forces abroad, as in Afghanistan, and by wars waged by regimes supported by the Soviet Union against their own peoples or their neighbors. In the course of our dialog, the Soviets have expressed a political commitment to withdraw their forces from Afghanistan and have said this could be completed in 1988. We hope this happens.

Please explain your Afghanistan policy; particularly, is there any connection between the proposed U.S. reduction of forces in the Arabian Gulf and the Soviet withdrawal from Afghanistan? Are you planning to reduce arms shipments to the Mujahidin to encourage a rapid Soviet withdrawal? Are you close to agreement with the Soviets on an interim government in Kabul, and how would you feel about a future alliance between Kabul and Tehran?

The President. We, and the 122 other governments who voted for the Afghan resolution in the last U.N. General Assembly, seek a fair and comprehensive settlement based on the rapid and complete withdrawal of Soviet troops. It must provide for self-determination for the Afghan people, return of the refugees in safety and honor, and a restoration of Afghanistan's independence and sovereignty. It is entirely up to the Afghan people to decide what form of government they have and how they run their country. We sincerely hope that 1988 will be the year in which all Soviet troops leave Afghanistan. Until then, however, we and other governments will continue to provide full support for the Afghan cause.

Afghan conflict is Moscow's problem. The Soviets must make the necessary decision to get out. Once this has clearly occurred, we would of course use our influence to be helpful. We would favor a neutral, nonaligned Afghanistan, free from foreign interference.

The President. The United States has pushed hard for the full implementation of U.N. Security Council Resolution 598 since its unanimous adoption on July 20, 1987. Six months after the adoption of Resolution 598, it is clear that, while Iraq has accepted Resolution 598 in all its parts and without imposing conditions, Iran has no intention of negotiating its implementation in good faith. Iran has used the time since the adoption of 598 to build up forces for another offensive against Iraq and to increase attacks upon nonbelligerent shipping in international waters in the Gulf.

Together with other permanent and nonpermanent members of the Security Council, we are discussing an arms embargo resolution which we hope will receive the unanimous support of the Security Council as soon as possible. We note that the Soviet Union has so far resisted the adoption of an arms embargo, preferring instead to call for further delay and discussion of separate U.N. action related only to the Gulf, ignoring Iran's continuation of the land war.

We have no plans to change the mission of our forces in the Gulf. Our Navy, which is charged with carrying out that mission, continually reviews the composition of our forces there to perform in the best and most efficient way. Our basic commitment remains unchanged.

With regard to proposals for a United Nations naval force in the Gulf, we believe it is essential that the concept for such a force be spelled out clearly. If the proposal is for a U.N. force to help monitor or enforce compliance with an arms embargo, we would be prepared to consider the possibilities seriously once an arms embargo is adopted by the Security Council. We want an arms embargo to be as effective as possible. The Soviet Union, however, has been inconsistent about its concept for a U.N. naval force. The Soviets appear to favor a U.N. naval force that would replace the U.S. and other navies in the area and impose an end to attacks on shipping, while allowing Iran to continue the land war. This represents a deliberate diversion from the full implementation of Resolution 598, which calls for a comprehensive cease-fire.

Well, thank you. And General Sandler, General Hultman, distinguished guests and Reserve officers, I'm grateful for this opportunity to be with you and to thank personally all of you in the Reserve Officers Association. The United States of America would not stand as secure and free today if it were not for you. You have the deep appreciation of this President and the rest of our citizenry for your dedication. General Sandler, General Hultman, as a grateful Commander in Chief, I salute you all and those who serve with you.

You know, looking around this room, I can't help but believe that in this gathering I may well hold the longevity record as a Reserve officer. [Laughter] I was, in fact, sworn into the Army Reserve as a lieutenant in 1935 at Fort Des Moines, Iowa. And that was back when the cavalry really was the cavalry. [Laughter] Now, I understand that both Generals Sandler and Hultman have served at Fort Des Moines. Back in my day, having a general come to visit was a big event.

And then every summer, why, they would have a war game someplace, and they would come in for 2 weeks in an encampment. And then the Reserve officers would be called up, and they'd don uniforms and serve the officers in this thing that was undertaken. And I can't help but remember that one time it was at Fort Omaha. And usually they would invite some top brass from Washington to come out and add a little luster to the scene, in viewing these war games.

I will always remember my time as a Reserve officer. And let me add that I will always be grateful to you for the support that you've been to our administration over these last 7 years. When it counted, you were there. Your support for a strong national defense, for American leadership and solid alliances, for an activist, profreedom foreign policy has made all the difference.

It has not been easy, but together we've rebuilt America's defenses, which in the last decade had been sorrowfully neglected. Military spending in real terms was permitted to decline by 20 percent during the 1970's. And if there's any lesson from that decade, it is that there's a measurable relationship between the military might of the United States and the state of freedom in the world. By the latter half of the 1970's, the pay level of our active duty personnel had eroded, their weapons were wearing out, spare parts were in short supply, morale hit rockbottom, and reenlistment rates plummeted.

Not by mere coincidence, this was also a time of defeat and despair for the free people of the world. Those who suggest that the Soviet Union's disproportional military spending is a reaction to our own military expenditures need to explain why in the 1970's, when our real spending was going down, the Soviets raced ahead with a massive peacetime buildup. At the same time, Communist forces, supplied and trained by the Soviet Union, pushed forward in Southeast Asia, in Africa, and in Central America. Terrorists wreaked havoc and, much to our European allies' alarm, Soviet intermediate-range missiles, SS-20's, were deployed. Communist expansion and Western retreat were the order of the day.

We've put in the hands of those defending us top quality weapons, like the F-16 and the Abrams battle tank. And perhaps most important to these brave young men and women, to whom we owe so much, we restored the pride this country has in those who wear the military uniform of the United States of America.

America's military is strong, confident, and standing tall. I can't help but think that if there's one man who deserves credit for the rejuvenation of our forces and the resurgence of American military might, it is the man you honor with this year's Minuteman of the Year award, former Secretary of Defense Cap Weinberger.

Cap inherited what seemed like an overwhelming challenge. When he was appointed, I felt like I'd just handed him a bayonet and given him 2 hours to clear a minefield. [Laughter] Cap, for example, was faced with the dilemma of sweeping the waste, fraud, and abuse out of the Pentagon, realizing that every victory would be used against him. And sure enough, when contracts for $400 hammers or $9,000 wrenches were found and corrected, more often than not, it was portrayed in the media as a horror story and used to cast doubt rather than praise on our defense effort.

It's a tribute to their common sense and patriotism that the American people have stuck with us. The national security of the United States is not an inexpensive proposition. It is not a job that can be done with bargain-basement equipment and second-rate weapons. And as a free people, we owe this pledge to our defenders: If they're willing to put their lives on the line for us, we at least must be willing to pay the cost of providing them with the best equipment and weapons available so they can accomplish their mission and come home safely.

I think the American people agree with that as well. They want our country to be secure and America to be a strong force for freedom in the world. Our nation's defense should be a sacred trust, above the political fray and the pressures of partisan consideration. That is the ideal, but let's have no illusions. Three years of steady decline in the value of our annual defense investment have increased the risk of our most basic security interests, jeopardizing earlier hard-won goals. We must face squarely the implications of this negative trend and make adequate, stable defense spending a top goal both this year and in the future.

Jefferson once noted, ``If a nation expects to be ignorant and free, it expects what never was and never will be.'' It is up to us then to get the word to our fellow citizens. First and foremost, we've got to inform them about the serious consequences -- I would even say catastrophic consequences -- of cutting off aid and, thus, pulling the rug out from under the democratic resistance in Nicaragua.

I'm submitting to the Congress my request for $36 million in additional aid for the freedom fighters in Nicaragua. This request ensures that the democratic resistance can keep the pressure on the Sandinistas to comply with the terms of the Guatemala accord for peace and democracy. Ninety percent of the funds is for nonlethal aid, such as food, clothing, medicine, and the means to deliver it. Ten percent is for ammunition. And this part of the request will be suspended until March 31st to determine if the steps taken by the Sandinistas are irreversible steps to democracy in Nicaragua. In reaching this judgment, I will personally consult the Presidents of the four Central American democracies.

Our approach to the Communist threat in Nicaragua has long been based on a simple principle: diplomacy and pressure in support of freedom and democracy must go hand-in-hand. President Teddy Roosevelt once said, ``Diplomacy is utterly useless where there is no force behind it.'' We've seen the success of this two-track approach elsewhere in the world -- in Afghanistan, freedom fighters have forced the Soviet Union to think seriously about a diplomatic solution to that brutal occupation; and in the INF talks, where our decision to deploy intermediate-range missiles a few years ago made possible the agreement I signed this past December.

This same approach may be working today in Nicaragua, although it's too early to tell if Daniel Ortega's promises will be matched by true efforts to allow democracy to flourish or if these promises are just a repetition of things said for nearly 10 years. It is clear, however, that the pressure of the Nicaraguan freedom fighters has forced the Sandinistas to pull back from aggression against their neighbors and to think twice about their continued domestic repression.

Although past efforts to restore peace and establish democracy in Nicaragua have invariably failed, I believe we owe it to ourselves and the people of Central America to explore fully diplomatic avenues toward solving the conflict. But only if we have the tools can diplomacy work. Last November, I pledged at the Organization of American States that if serious negotiations between the Nicaraguan resistance and the Sandinista government were underway, I would ask Secretary Shultz to enter regional talks in Central America with the Presidents of all five countries.

I reiterate that pledge today, and I hope that we may be close to fulfillment of the necessary conditions. The objectives laid out last August in the Guatemala accord and most recently affirmed in San Jose by the five Presidents are consistent with our goals. I will ask Secretary Shultz to pursue them, just as he pursues the security interests of our country and the democracies of Central America.

We must ask ourselves, however, what will create the conditions for serious negotiations? Recent months have shown clearly that only continued and to the Nicaraguan freedom fighters -- aid, I should say -- to the Nicaraguan freedom fighters has provided sufficient incentive for the Sandinistas to make concessions, as minimal as those concessions have been. If we remove that incentive -- if Congress cuts off aid to the freedom fighters next week -- there is little chance that the Sandinistas will bargain seriously.

I intend to make an all-out diplomatic effort to achieve a negotiated settlement leading to democracy in Central America. But success at the negotiating table depends on continued support for the Nicaraguan freedom fighters. We cannot expect diplomacy to work if we ourselves lack the will to negotiate from a position of strength. We cannot go to the bargaining table empty-handed. And that, in the end, would assure a Marxist-Leninist regime on the American mainland. And I didn't come to Washington to preside over the communization of Central America.

We must have the will to do what is right and the courage to stand by other free peoples, whether they're Western Europeans in the NATO alliance, Mujahidin insurgents struggling for their national independence, or Nicaraguan freedom fighters who want nothing more than the democratic government they were promised. Such support makes war less likely; it deters aggression. In the case of NATO, it has provided over 40 years of peace for the European Community. In the Third World, our support affirms to all that aggression comes with a heavy price, and that Americans will not sit back idly and watch brave people -- like those in Afghanistan and Nicaragua -- beaten into submission.

There's evidence of some change in the Soviet Union. We welcome it, but let me reiterate a point I've made before. If there is truly to be a new era, we must see significant changes -- a far greater respect for human rights, including the right to emigrate, and an end to Soviet policies that prolong regional conflicts.

On those regional conflicts, we've heard the rhetoric. Now it's time to see the action. If the Soviet leadership wants to improve substantially relations with the West, they must realize that it will not happen while Soviet troops still occupy Afghanistan. We want to see those Soviet troops go home permanently and leave the Afghan people in peace and free to determine their own future.

That has never been more true than today as our naval forces patrol the waters of the Persian Gulf, a commitment that already cost the lives of 37 brave men aboard the U.S.S. Stark. Yet because of the bravery and professionalism of our military personnel, our friends in that volatile region understand that the United States can be counted on, and our adversaries know that we will not be driven out of the Middle East or anywhere else. We're telling the world in unmistakable terms that the United States is a global power, and we intend to keep her that way.

And let me just add, we went into the Gulf alone. Yet today the naval forces of our allies can also be found patrolling those dangerous waters. They came because they believed it was the right thing to do. It underscores the common interest we share. I can't help but be proud of this kind of cooperation. And I can't help but also be proud that America still has what it takes to lead the way.

Peace through strength. We've heard it a thousand times. The validity of that truism was never more real to me than during my recent summit with General Secretary Gorbachev. In 1981 we faced the challenge of Soviet deployment of a large number of new nuclear-armed intermediate-range missiles threatening our friends and allies in Western Europe and Asia. The Soviets rejected our offer for a zero option, which I proposed in November 1981. Following that, street demonstrators and our political adversaries turned up the heat on us -- not the Soviets. Our opponents insisted on acceptance of a so-called nuclear freeze, which would have frozen-in the Soviet advantage. Well, to our credit and that of our allies, we stood firm and moved forward with our deployment of Pershing II's and ground-launched cruise missiles. It was this strength of commitment that brought the Soviets back to the bargaining table in early 1985, following their late 1983 walkout. And it was this strength that ultimately convinced them then to come to an agreement similar to the one I first proposed in 1981, a zero option.

Well, let me just note: The cornerstones of any bargaining with the Soviets are strength and realism. I believe, however, there are potential areas, even with a government that is so fundamentally contrary to our own ideals, where it will be mutually beneficial for us to come to an agreement of some kind. It requires the utmost care, and that's what we took in reaching the INF agreement.

We withstood the massive propaganda campaign against deployment of the cruise and Pershing missiles. We understood [withstood] the Soviet pressure to abandon our Strategic Defense Initiative. And I can assure you, SDI will not be given up -- under any circumstances -- in exchange for an arms control agreement. And let me add now that the world must by now be noting a bit of cynicism in the Soviet campaign against SDI. Mr. Gorbachev himself, in a presummit interview, finally acknowledged his own country's extensive SDI-like program.

Strategic Defense Initiative represents the new potential that technology is opening for mankind, especially the free people of the world. Computerization and miniaturization are changing our way of life. By the end of the next decade, we will have developed an aerospace plane that will take off from airport runways and speed to its destination at up to 25 times the speed of sound. It will be traveling in space -- Washington to Tokyo in 3 hours.

But technology alone will not keep us free. Our country will never be able, simply, to put its faith in machines. The true bulwark of our freedom and national independence is to be found in the souls of our people. Our greatest defense lies in their love of liberty and strength of character. It is this that makes us a mighty force for good on this planet. It is this on which our security and our free system of government rely. It is the willingness to accept the heavy burden of responsibility that comes with liberty. Freedom, you see, is not meant for the faint of heart.

Nowhere is the sense of patriotism and responsibility to which I am referring more evident than in the Reserve forces of the United States. Today nearly 1.7 million men and women so serve. We as a country could never hope to match a less than free adversary, a militarized state -- and maintain our own freedom at the same time -- without a strong Reserve force. Today the Reserves play an increasingly vital role in military planning and in actual operations. In Grenada, Reserve pilots were part of the action. Off the coast of Lebanon, the Reserves relieved our weary sailors on the battleship New Jersey. And in everyday assignments, in arduous missions that need to be done, the Reserves are doing their part. You are doing it because you love this blessed land of ours and all she stands for. She cannot stand without you.

There's a story I'd like to close with. It's about a young American marine who fought in the Pacific four decades ago, Private First Class Maurice Roach. In March of 1945, after 3 weeks of heavy fighting, Roach was mortally wounded during the battle for Iwo Jima. A friend, Frank Campbell, now a Catholic priest in Oregon, remembers that before Roach died there on that blood-soaked little island, the young marine turned and whispered, ``Tell 'em I did my duty.'' That same spirit is alive in this room today. It is what keeps our country the last best hope for all mankind. Thank you for all you are doing. God bless you.

Anthony Kennedy gives us considerable confidence that the Nation will soon have a full Court. The committee has acted responsibly and expeditiously to review his qualifications and favorably report Judge Kennedy to the full Senate. I look forward to a positive vote soon by the Senate that will bring this distinguished and scholarly legal mind to the Court. I am very pleased by the committee action.

Despite the combined diplomatic efforts of the four Central American democracies and the United States to persuade the Sandinista regime in Nicaragua to move toward democracy and to cease its actions that threaten the security of the region, progress towards these goals is far from complete.

Organization of American States in 1979 and, most recently, two weeks ago in the Final Communique of the Central American Presidents at the close of the San Jose Summit. In contrast to these assurances, the Sandinistas' years in power have brought repression and poverty to the Nicaraguan people, not democracy.

It has become clear beyond doubt that, without the steady pressure created by an effective Nicaraguan Democratic Resistance supported by a determined United States, the Sandinistas will neither move toward democracy nor desist from aggression against their neighbors. The United States, in consultation with the governments of the four Central American democracies, is prepared to redouble its diplomatic efforts in support of peace and democracy on the Central American isthmus. However, the success of such efforts depends on the continuation of the pressure that the Resistance provides.

I urge approval of the additional aid I am requesting for the Nicaraguan Democratic Resistance. Congressional approval of this request is essential to assure a democratic future for Central America and to protect the national security interests of the United States.

Transfer and Use. -- Upon enactment of a joint resolution approving this request, there are hereby transferred to the President $36,250,000 of unobligated funds, from the appropriations accounts specified in section 106, to provide assistance for the Nicaraguan democratic resistance, to remain available until expended.

Indemnification of Leased Aircraft. -- (1) The President is authorized to transfer unobligated funds, from the appropriations accounts specified in section 106, solely for the indemnification of aircraft leased to transport assistance for which this request provides and assistance previously, specifically authorized by law for the Nicaraguan democratic resistance.

The President shall transfer the balance, if any, remaining of funds transferred under paragraph (1) to the appropriations accounts from which such funds were transferred under that paragraph when the funds transferred by subsection (a) have been expended.

Passive Air Defense Equipment. -- (1) The Department of Defense shall make available to the department or agency administering this request passive air defense equipment (including ground-based radio detection and ranging equipment) to ensure the safety of transportation provided pursuant to this request.

The Department of Defense shall not charge the department or agency receiving equipment under paragraph (1) for such equipment, and shall bear the risk of loss, damage, or deterioration of such equipment during the period of its use under the authority of paragraph (1).

Suspension During Ceasefire. -- Delivery of lethal assistance to the Nicaraguan democratic resistance for which this request provides, or which was previously authorized by law, shall be suspended during any period in which there is in place a ceasefire agreed to by the Government of Nicaragua and the Nicaraguan democratic resistance, except to the extent, if any, permitted by the agreement governing such ceasefire.

Continuation of Authority to Support, Monitor, and Manage. -- The authority to support, monitor and manage activities for which funds are provided under this request or a law which previously, specifically authorized assistance to the Nicaraguan democratic resistance shall continue until the funds transferred by section 102(a) have been expended.

Enactment of the joint resolution approving this request shall not be deemed to constitute agreement or disagreement by the Congress or any Member thereof with the statements and report incorporated by reference in this section.

All funds under the request are derived by transfer from existing defense appropriations. Ninety percent of the funds requested provides nonlethal aid, such as food, clothing, medicines, and the means to deliver it. Ten percent provides for REDEYE air defense missiles, for use against the Sandinistas' Soviet-made Hind helicopter gunships, and ammunition.

The request prohibits the purchase of aircraft to transport aid to the resistance, but permits leasing aircraft. To ensure the availability of leased aircraft, the request authorizes the President to transfer not more than $20 million from defense appropriations to indemnify the owners of leased aircraft in the event of loss, but which will otherwise not be spent. The request also provides for electronic equipment, radar, and other passive air defense equipment to protect the safety of transportation.

The request supports the Central American peace process by providing a clear opportunity for the Sandinista regime to comply with its obligation to establish democracy and to negotiate a cease-fire directly with the resistance.

Congress will consider a joint resolution to approve the President's request under expedited procedures that provide for a vote in the House of Representatives on February 3 and a vote in the Senate on February 4.

Council. (a) The Council shall continually identify, review, and discuss areas of government-wide weakness and vulnerability to fraud, waste, and abuse and develop plans for coordinated government-wide activities that attack fraud and waste and promote economy and efficiency in government programs and operations. These will include interagency audit and investigation programs and projects to deal efficiently and effectively with those problems concerning fraud and waste that exceed the capability or jurisdiction of an individual agency.

The Council members should, to the extent of their ability and authority, pay careful attention to professional standards developed by the Council and participate in Council plans, programs, and projects.

The creation and operation of the Council shall neither interfere with existing authority and responsibilities in the departments and agencies, nor augment or diminish the statutory authority or responsibilities of its members.

The Chairperson shall, on behalf of the Council, report to the President on the activities of the Council. The Chairperson shall advise the Council with respect to the reaction of the President on the Council's activities.

Council, such committees of the Council as deemed necessary or appropriate for the efficient conduct of Council functions. Committees of the Council may act for the Council in their areas of designated responsibility.

The Conference shall be composed of the Chairperson of the Council and one representative of each Executive agency, not represented on the Council, determined by the Office of Management and Budget to possess audit and investigative resources. The head of each such agency shall designate as the agency's representative the official who is responsible for coordinating the agency's efforts to eliminate fraud and waste in the agency's programs and operations.

The Chairperson shall provide for the dissemination to the Conference of appropriate information on the activities of the Council, in order to enable the Conference members, to the extent of their own ability and authority to do so, to implement the coordinated plans, standards, policies, programs, and projects developed by the Council.

Provisions. (a) The Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall provide the Council and the Conference with such administrative support as may be necessary for the performance of the functions of the Council and the Conference.

President Reagan. Mr. President and Mrs. Mubarak, welcoming good friends to Washington and to the White House is one of my more pleasant responsibilities as President. I'm especially pleased today to greet, once again, President Mubarak, a personal friend and a friend of the United States. President Mubarak is the proud leader of a proud land: Egypt, a country with a special fascination for Americans; Egypt, a venerable society rich in culture, a country not unaccustomed to making history.

Americans learn from their earliest school days about Egypt's extraordinary place in the history of civilization. And recent history records that our two countries were partners in one of the monumental events of our era: the securing of peace between Egypt and Israel. The first step toward ending the cycle of violence in the Middle East was as arduous, painstaking, and fraught with danger as any that a country ever made. It was a tremendous accomplishment and a tribute to the vision, courage, and sincere desire for peace on both sides. And, President Mubarak, we're heartened by the progress that continues under your dynamic and responsible leadership.

In the past few months, Arab countries that broke relations with Egypt years ago have resumed diplomatic relations with your country. It's a victory for the cause of peace and a tribute to your steadfastness as well as a recognition that Egypt is again exerting the leadership role it has traditionally played in Arab councils. We applaud you at this moment, when time and events have proven you right.

The United States and Egypt continue to work together to broaden the peace that started with that first step 10 years ago. The recent explosion of violence in the West Bank and Gaza and the sad toll it has taken in lives and injuries, vividly remind us that much remains to be done.

The danger of allowing the Palestinian problem to fester is evident and reinforces the urgency of moving toward negotiations: Hard work, creativity, and a willingness to take practical, not merely rhetorical, steps are needed.

We are partners in this endeavor, and Egypt's own experience provides it with special insights. I'm looking forward to discussing with you your ideas as well as our own thoughts on how to ensure that hope displaces despair and real progress is made toward peace.

Both of our countries also look with distress on the seemingly endless conflict between Iraq and Iran. The latter's aggressive measures to intimidate and destabilize other countries in the Gulf and elsewhere in the Middle East are reprehensible and reason for alarm. Both the United States and Egypt strongly support U.N. Security Council efforts to end the war, and we share a firm commitment to freedom of navigation in the region and the security of friendly Gulf Arab States. President Mubarak, as your recent trip to the Gulf clearly demonstrates, Egypt has a vital role to play in the pursuit of these goals; and I'm pleased to have this opportunity to discuss how we can work together to achieve them.

The scope of our cooperation, of course, goes far beyond the formulation of foreign and diplomatic policy. Egypt and the United States have also made common cause in advancing Egypt's economy and bettering the living standard of her people. America's contributions to agriculture, industry, power generation, and private sector development stand as visible symbols of our broader partnership for progress, a partnership that we expect to benefit both our peoples for many years to come.

I hope that in the limited time you have you'll capture a glimpse of America's heart and soul. You'll find it in cities and towns across the country, in businesses, in universities, and in our churches. And there you'll find a love of freedom and a genuine good will to you and the people of Egypt.

Some may not realize that the U.S.-Egyptian collaboration on security issues goes back over 100 years. Shortly after the American Civil War, General Charles Pomeroy Stone and General William Wing Loring, together with some 50 other officers from the Union and Confederate Armies, went to Egypt to work with the Egyptian Armed Forces. They worked on military training, helped strengthen coastal defenses, and shared their ideas and their experience.

General Stone left Egypt in 1878, and his last job after his return to the United States provides a fitting symbol of our enduring relationship. Stone was asked to design and construct the base for a huge statue, designed and constructed by a Frenchman, presented to the United States by the schoolchildren of France.

Stone went to work with his usual energy. He gave lectures on Egypt to help finance the project, and enlisted two of his former colleagues from his days in Egypt to help with drafting the plans and erecting the structure. So, Mr. President, when you look at the Statue of Liberty, you can be proud that those who built its solid base spent nearly a decade in the service of Egypt, building a base as well for our relationship.

Reagan, Mrs. Reagan, dear friends, once again we meet in your glorious Capital in order to strengthen the bonds of friendship and understanding between our peoples. The Egyptian people are sending you and each and every American warm greetings and heartiest wishes for success and fulfillment.

States as a friend and a partner in the search for peace and progress. This friendship is a lasting one, for it is based on mutual respect and a profound conviction that all nations, regardless of origin and decree, share a common interest in the preservation of peace and maintenance of security. Over the years, our American friendship has served as a force of stability and progress; today it remains a source of hope and promise. We are determined to deepen this friendship and intensify our cooperation for our common good.

President Reagan has made a great contribution to the process of strengthening these ties and deepening their roots. He's a man of wisdom and conviction. During the past few years, he has taken many steps for the purpose of enhancing world peace and security. We commend him on his recent achievement and congratulate the American people on the courageous steps that are certain to reduce tension and pave the way for a better future for mankind.

People of good will should build upon it in the years ahead to maintain insecurity -- to eliminate insecurity and stop violence and suffering throughout the world. Sincere and concrete and concerted efforts are urgently needed for solving regional conflicts. In this respect, the Middle East is a region that requires special attention and top priority.

A few days ago I met with most of the area's leaders, and it was their consensus that certain steps must be taken urgently and effectively in order to check the continuous deterioration of the situation in different parts of the Middle East. This is needed not only to safeguard the interests of the region's people and save the lives of millions of innocent individuals but also to protect vital American interests.

The futile war which is raging in the Gulf threatens the safety and the security of all parties. It endangers the freedom of navigation and blocks the flow of strategic materials that are essential in international trade as well as the prosperity of many nations. It's an illusion to speak of restricting the theater of operations. Even if it happens, the fallout from the war would certainly spread throughout the region. Therefore the only real solution is to end the war immediately and to bring the dispute to the negotiating table.

The tragic situation in the West Bank and the Gaza is another source of alarm and concern. It is evident that the continuation of occupation and oppression would bring loss to and inflict damage on all the parts without exception. It would badly hurt American interests in the Middle East.

In the course of our discussion today, we shall focus on these issues in full awareness of their importance and ramifications. We shall exchange views candidly and sincerely and examine certain ideas designed to generate a new momentum and initiate movement. We realize that many governments are preoccupied this year with domestic matters and international events. But history does not stop, and it is an absolute must that we continue to move forward to attain our objectives. This is the crux of public responsibility.

In the past few weeks we noticed with satisfaction that the United States, under the leadership of President Reagan, has taken courageous steps in the right direction. This active role must continue for our mutual benefit. The risks involved here cannot be compared with the damage that is certain to result from inaction and stagnation.

African problems need greater attention, too. The debt problem is crippling growth and development in most parts of our continent. An equitable solution must be reached if we want to save the lives of millions who face the danger of starvation and fatal disease. On the other hand we cannot accept the continuation of the worsening situation that exists in southern Africa today. The fundamental rights of our fellow Africans are being violated, and their security is being endangered every day. The fight for human rights and the dignity of man -- indivisible, and we must maintain our firm commitment to work for a better future for coming generations.

I am looking forward to a stimulating and fruitful discussion with President Reagan and his able associates, and we shall continue to an objective exchange of views during the months ahead. We shall always be guided by the spirit of genuine friendship and sincerity, which has dominated our relations consistently. Together we shall endeavor to serve the cause of peace and derive hope in the midst of despair and frustration. Together we shall overcome. Thank you, Mr. President.

Two years ago, on January 28, 1986, America lost the seven-member crew of the Challenger. Now as then, we join the families of those gallant Space Shuttle explorers in mourning them and in saluting their courage, vision, and determination.

The families of Challenger's crew members, sharing the bold spirit of the loved and lost, resolved to join in the task of preparing America's coming generations of astronauts and scientists -- of inspiring young people and of giving them the opportunity to develop all of the knowledge and capabilities they would need in space and science research.

To that end, the families established a living memorial, the Challenger Center for Space Science Education. The Center will be a tribute to the Challenger crew and to their achievements, their bravery, and their dedication to America's leadership in space.

The Center will stimulate and enhance students' search for knowledge and involvement in science, especially the space sciences. The Center, which will rely on private donations, has already established headquarters in our Nation's Capital and is planning regional sites.

The goals of the Center are those of all Americans, as National Challenger Center Day reminds us so well. Let our Nation's continued mission in the exploration of space pay tribute to the Center and to the families, and let it forever salute Challenger's crew and its quest.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-eighth day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

This visit is a particularly happy occasion as it provides the opportunity to congratulate you personally on your reelection to a second term as President of Egypt. As a second term veteran myself, however, let me suggest, Mr. President, it doesn't get any easier. [Laughter] The referendum that approved your second term reflects the strong confidence that the Egyptian people have in your leadership. We share that same confidence. Nevertheless, Mr. President, we both know that governing a country in which there are divergent political views and a lively opposition is a tough job. We respect your work to broaden participation in the political process and are confident it will help create the stable political environment needed for Egypt to move forward.

This is particularly important at a time when the forces of fanaticism and blind hatred threaten the security and stability of the Middle East. Egypt, by again exerting its wise and calming influence, provides the world hope that the serious challenges facing the Middle East can and will be overcome and that the region will be restored to a happier and more tranquil course.

President Mubarak, you have wisely and effectively led Egypt onto a course of economic reform and development. The difficult obstacles you and the Egyptian people face are well understood here, too. We, too, learned in our own efforts to strip away years of government intervention in our marketplace how monumental this task can be, how ingrained is the dependence on intervention, and how powerful are the interest groups that resist change. But we're convinced that such vigorous reform is the surest path to economic progress.

Mubarak. President Reagan, Mrs. Reagan, dear friends, thank you for your kind words and the gracious hospitality. The elegant and warm reception you have accorded us reflects the best tradition of American friendship and genuine openness. It is a tradition that has deep roots in our culture, too. We value friendship and loyalty to friends. As usual, President Reagan and his graceful spouse have made us feel welcome and quite at home the minute we arrived at the White House this morning. They symbolize the American spirit at its best.

I expressed to him my admiration of the relentless efforts he exerted for years to make the world more safe and secure for future generations. His recent achievement in this area will certainly have a lasting effect on world peace and stability. I have no doubt that other steps will follow in the same direction during the months ahead.

I am certain that regional conflicts will figure high on the agenda throughout the year. Of these conflicts, the Middle East problems deserve special attention and priority. Strenuous efforts are needed to stop the war, which is still raging in the Gulf, and set the peace process in motion again.

With this in mind, Egypt has not hesitated at any point to take pioneering steps in order to make peace. It is for this reason, too, that I have proposed a few days ago a moratorium on all forms of violence and repression. I am quite convinced that this proposal, which is conceived as a preparatory step towards comprehensive peace, reflects the real sentiment of people of good will and human principles everywhere. No one who looks ahead and thinks of the future can accept the continuation of occupation and oppression. No one can, in good conscience, condone a policy of shooting and beating in a land that is holy to all of us.

I am proposing here is a policy of hope and positivity to replace despair and fear. I am sure that I am not alone in that, for I am backed by millions of men and women of courage and conviction everywhere. Let me seize this opportunity to thank all those Americans, Israelis, and others who raise their voices in support of peace and in defense of liberty. Their stand will never go unnoticed or unrewarded.

Dear friends, American leaders have worked with Egyptian leaders over the years in order to construct a model for friendship and cooperation among nations. In particular, President Reagan has made a great contribution to the development of friendly relations between Egypt and the United States. We are proud of this friendship, which has been mature enough to overcome all obstacles we have encountered and deep enough to look to the future with hope and promise. The talks we had in the morning added to the reservoir of good will and mutual understanding that exists today between our peoples. As ever, the President was both receptive and responsive. I highly value his opinions and ideas. We shall continue to work together, as we did in the past, in order to serve our common goal of reinforcing peace and promoting progress and stability.

The remarkable story of the International Red Cross began at Solferino, in northern Italy, exactly 125 years ago, when battling Austrian and French soldiers brought death and destruction to the countryside -- and when Swiss traveler Henri Dunant realized that wounded soldiers should receive assistance no matter what their allegiance.

From that compassion at Solferino grew a great tradition and a humanitarian organization that relieves the sufferings of all those wounded not only by war but also by poor health, old age, personal adversity, natural calamity, and so on.

Americans join people around the globe in observing this anniversary, we reflect that the story could have turned out much differently if Henri Dunant -- one man, after all -- had ignored Solferino and its victims. Clara Barton, for instance, might never have founded the American Red Cross, and her counterparts in other countries might never have founded sister societies. Life would truly have been different in our land for people who needed blood, or evacuees left homeless by floods, or accident victims, or countless others.

A century and a quarter after Solferino, we have real reason to celebrate the victory for humanity and for international cooperation that sprang from that battlefield. Today, 145 national societies of the International Red Cross offer help without regard to race, creed, cause, or nationality. Like many of these societies, the American Red Cross provides assistance on several fronts, including health and safety, disaster relief, blood, and social services.

Red Cross also assists military personnel, last year alone helping members of the Armed Forces and their families 2.5 million times. Daily it relays 4,000 messages of birth, death, and illness to military posts worldwide.

American Red Cross battles potential threats to the blood supply by collecting, and testing for disease, more than half of our Nation's blood supply. Last year, four million volunteers donated blood to the Red Cross, restoring life and health to millions of blood recipients.

Red Cross, by virtue of the authority vested in me by the Constitution and laws of the United States, do hereby proclaim the month of March 1988 as American Red Cross Month. I urge all Americans to continue their generous support and ready assistance to the work of the American Red Cross and its more than 2,800 chapters, 1.4 million adult members, and three million youth volunteers.

I'm delighted to welcome President Ted Strickland and all the officers and leadership of the National Conference to the Old Executive Office Building. You know, one of the things I like best about getting together with people from the States is the sense of diversity that it brings out -- the different regions, the different accents. And, well, would you be surprised if that reminded me of a story?

But it's an honor to have this opportunity to speak to you who work at levels of government so close to the people themselves. In a moment, I'd like to discuss the domestic agenda for this, the remaining year of our administration. But if you'll permit me, first I'd like to stress something that we've been working on from the very first: federalism, a topic Secretary [of Transportation] Burnley has just touched on as well.

Well, when our administration came to office, we took it as one of our chief aims to reawaken the federalist impulse and approach the Constitution with a new fidelity -- in short, to restore power to the States. By now you should know how, since 1981, we've worked to widen the scope for independent State decisionmaking. I'm proud to say that our federalism focus is continuing. This past October, I issued an Executive order requiring all Departments and Agencies to do a federalism assessment of all their policies, to make sure they aren't doing things better left to the States.

But despite all we've been doing to promote federalism here in Washington, our efforts take second place to the remarkable new initiatives that you're overseeing in the States. State governments are attracting venture capital. You're fostering international trade. Many States have cut taxes. And more than half the States have set up their own enterprise zones, even without Federal incentives. These zones have created new jobs and spurred billions of dollars in capital investment. In the words of columnist James J. Kilpatrick: ``It becomes increasingly evident that the State governments, as a group, are governing more responsibly than the National Government. The most interesting political activity these days is often not in the National Capital but in the State capitals.'' Well, now, I happen to think that's just what the Founding Fathers had in mind. So, congratulations to you all.

And as I now turn to our domestic agenda, I believe you'll see that, here, too, the States have their role to play. The first item I'd like to mention is one that seems to have made quite an impression during my State of the Union Address this past Monday: the urgent need for budget reform. You may remember that I placed on a table, for everyone in the Nation to see, all 43 pounds of the continuing resolution, the accompanying conference reports, and the reconciliation bill. As if anybody needed any more evidence that the budget process here has completely broken down.

And when I say that producing that huge pile of documents made an impression, I mean literally. You see, when I banged down one of those stacks of paper -- if I remember correctly, it was the one weighing 15 pounds -- when I banged that document down, I got my finger stuck underneath.

I am when I consider the budget process we've had to go through, year after year here. This coming year, I intend to use all my powers as President to enforce some simple discipline upon the Federal budget.

But we need other measures to reform the budget process permanently, and here I take a page from the States. The great majority of your State constitutions require balanced budgets. I'd submit that it's about time we passed a balanced budget amendment for the Federal Government. And in your statehouses, no fewer than 43 Governors have the line-item veto. I had it back in Sacramento, myself. The line-item veto is a proper and prudent tool of government, an instrument that gives the Executive the ability to reach into the massive appropriations bills and pare away the waste. It's time we gave that power to all future Presidents. As we push for these measures this coming year, I urge you to join us.

Next, a subject that really belongs to the States: education. You know the story how from 1960 to 1980 overall spending on education more than doubled, while college board scores during the same period fell drastically. We've worked hard to put education at the top of the Nation's agenda and to make certain that we concern ourselves not only with what we spend but with how we spend it. This response has been dramatic. Many States formed task forces on education. In some States, promising new programs, like merit pay for teachers, are being put in place. Still other States have opened the teaching profession to a wider pool of qualified candidates. And in recent years we've seen college board scores actually go up for the first time in nearly 20 years.

This year at the Federal level, we're doing still more to promote imaginative reforms. We're adding money to the budget for the magnet schools program, an idea that has already done much to foster greater achievement among our public schools. We're building greater accountability into our Federal programming by tying funding to results. Secretary [of Education] Bennett has proposed, among other reforms, a much stronger curriculum for our high schools. As Bill puts it, his aim is to promote a ``national conversation'' on what works in education.

I don't intend to stop here. Polls show that millions of Americans would like, but do not have, the ability of choosing the education program and institution that is best for their children. A voucher system at the State level would empower parents. I'll ask the Department of Education to develop model voucher legislation and make it available to the 50 States so that they can implement programs that promote choice in education. As we do all this here in Washington, I encourage you in the States to do even more. For as I said in my State of the Union Address, the most important thing we in Washington can do is reaffirm that control of our schools belongs to the States, to local communities and, most of all, to parents and teachers.

The sad truth is that our welfare programs, State and Federal alike, too often have only made poverty harder to escape. In the fight against poverty, we now know, it's essential to have strong families -- families that teach children the skills and values they'll need to succeed in the wider world, families that provide mothers and fathers with comfort, inspiration, and a focus for their labors. Yet when we ask ourselves whether our welfare programs have encouraged family life and values, we must answer: Far from it. Instead, they've subjected poor families to a subtle but constant undermining force, pulling them apart.

Many of you already preside over important welfare innovations. Some of you have shown us how child support enforcement can be improved. Others have launched innovative new programs which require welfare recipients to work or prepare for work. You in the States are attempting to meet what I believe must become the central criterion for all forms of public assistance: not how much money we spend on welfare but how many Americans our programs make independent of welfare. This is what we should be doing at the end of each year, not boasting about how many more people are on welfare that we're taking care of but how many people have we been able to remove from welfare and make independent and self-sufficient. The 50 States present us with the opportunity to apply this criterion in endless ways, experimenting and testing in a manner from which all can profit. Our administration will give the States even more flexibility and encourage still greater reform. Our aim is simple: to replace today's poverty trap with a welfare system that fosters genuine economic opportunity.

I'd like to turn now to a subject that's especially close to Nancy and me: a drug free America. Nancy and so many others have worked tirelessly to change the Nation's attitude toward drugs -- to replace what was too often an easy complacency with a hard and clear understanding of just how damaging drug abuse truly is. And one of my proudest moments in office came just a few weeks ago, when I read that our most recent survey of the attitudes of high school students toward drug abuse -- you see, cocaine use is on the way down, while marijuana use is at the lowest point since the surveying began. We're making progress, real progress.

States, of course, have a critical role in amplifying the antidrug measure. Efforts to reduce demand must occur at the State and local level, and they are. The recently enacted legislation in New Jersey and Missouri, for example, to provide swift and certain consequences for illegal drug use reinforce my deep belief that there is no need for a Federal law to do what States can do better.

Now, it was my intention to focus today on our domestic agenda, but one foreign policy issue has become so important in recent days that I want to share with you my thoughts. That issue, of course, is Central America. Our approach to the Communist threat in Nicaragua has long been based on a simple principle: diplomacy and pressure in support of freedom and democracy must go hand-in-hand. We've seen the success of this two-track approach elsewhere in the world. In Afghanistan, for example, freedom fighters have forced the Soviet Union to think seriously about a diplomatic solution to that brutal occupation.

I believe we owe it to ourselves and the people of Central America to explore fully diplomatic avenues toward solving the Nicaraguan conflict. We must ask ourselves, however, what will create the conditions for serious negotiations? If Congress cuts off aid to the freedom fighters next week, there is little chance that the Sandinistas will bargain seriously. We cannot expect diplomacy to work abroad if here at home we lack the will to negotiate from a position of strength. So, much depends upon this coming vote -- the progress of democracy in Latin America and our own security as a nation. I just have to believe that we owe it to the future to stand by the freedom fighters.

Well, having said that, I thank you all once again for being here today. And by the way, I know that as fellow politicians your hearts start to quicken just a little bit, the way mine does, when we start to head into a campaign season. No two ways about it, last year was not one of my favorites.

Because of their remarkable advancements in economic development and their recent improvements in trade competitiveness, President Reagan today has decided to remove four participants from the trade preference program that permits certain imports from developing economies to enter the United States duty free. Effective January 2, 1989, Hong Kong, the Republic of Korea, Singapore, and Taiwan will be graduated from the Generalized System of Preferences (GSP), a move that will affect nearly $10 billion in imports.

Since its inception in 1976, the Generalized System of Preferences has been a program of temporary incentives rather than permanent tariff advantages. Through the years we have regularly reviewed the 3,000 products from 141 beneficiaries that are eligible for GSP treatment and removed benefits from those products that no longer needed preferential treatment to compete in the U.S. market. Today's action is in keeping with the original intent of the program and with its operation during the past 12 years.

Over the past decade, Hong Kong, the Republic of Korea, Singapore, and Taiwan have made such tremendous strides in their economic development that they can now compete effectively in the United States without preferential treatment. Indeed, they have successfully fulfilled the objectives of the program. Last year nearly 60 percent of GSP benefits went to these four beneficiaries, a disproportionate amount for such advanced economies. Their graduation will open additional opportunities for the remaining beneficiaries -- those most in need of the program.

This move should not be interpreted as penalizing any of the beneficiaries being graduated from the program. On the contrary, it reflects the great economic successes they have had. All four are good friends and valued trading partners.

GSP beneficiaries no longer need the program benefits, they should be graduated. America's relationship with these four advanced developing economies has entered a new phase, one that is characterized by greater equality. The United States admires their economic achievements and their advancement toward full partnership in the international trading system. We look forward to continued friendship and even closer economic ties in the years ahead.

Well, thank you all very much. And you know, there was a bit of confusion around here earlier this week. It seems that when I told somebody to expect the Hurricanes on Friday some of the White House staffers battened down the storm doors and ordered up emergency reserves of jellybeans.

I just couldn't wait to have you champs come to the White House here to offer you much-deserved praise for the skill, determination, and winning spirit that you've demonstrated this season. And from the looks of a few of your other fans gathered here in the East Room, I'm not the only one impressed, not by a long shot. The whole country honors you today, and I'm pleased to have this opportunity to add my congratulations.

Of course, it's never easy. Yet with Steve Walsh, a sophomore quarterback who completed 18 of 30 passes for 209 yards and 2 touchdowns, and did it against a defense which only gave 7\1/2\ points per game all season, you had the odds on your side. Steve, of course you know better than anyone how important the help of running back Melvin Bratton and flanker Michael Irvin was. [Laughter] Each of them caught a touchdown pass in the big game. And the Orange Bowl might have come out a little differently without Greg Cox, who kicked a 56- and a 48-yard fieldgoal. And congratulations, Greg, on setting the Orange Bowl record with that 56-yard kick. You know, I kind of feel that if I could just kick some of the spending bills coming across my desk -- [laughter] -- I'd set a few fieldgoal records myself.

I might just ask Bernard Clark, the Hurricanes' most valuable player, to stand outside the Oval Office and tackle those spending bills. Those 14 tackles that you made in this Orange Bowl are truly impressive and something to be proud of.

Switzer and the Oklahoma Sooners. They may have lost the game, but they had a winning season and accomplished it with a lot of class. The mark of a great sportsman is grace in defeat, and Coach Switzer exemplifies this. As he said after the game: ``The best team won.'' Well, of course, let me congratulate all of you for having grace in victory, which is also important and not as easy as some people think.

As a matter of fact, Knute Rockne once told his team that it really is this thing about being a good loser -- it's easier to be a good loser and smile and take it than it is to be a good winner and do it with dignity and grace.

First of all, the chairman of our board of trustees, Jim McLamore, whom you know, sir -- he is also the founder of Burger King, you have met before, and one of the leading Republicans in our part of the United States, as you know -- [laughter] -- our outstanding director of athletics, Mr. Sam Jankovich, standing right next to you, who is presenting you with a ball that has been signed by the Hurricanes; our outstanding coach, Jimmy Johnson, to my right, Mr. President; and his staff. This is the best coaching staff in the United States, President Reagan. And finally, the national champions. They're the big ones.

I take this opportunity, please, sir, to wish you the very best during your last year in office; and on behalf of our university, these young men, and all of us, to thank you for your service to the United States. And I present this to you on behalf of the University of Miami as a small token of our appreciation.

Obviously, we're very proud of these young men winning the national championship, going undefeated; but we're also very proud that they are outstanding young men off the field, on the field, and in the classroom. Mr.

Yet in the face of this broad and sweeping movement toward human freedom, one country has gone in the opposite direction, away from freedom and toward oppression. That country is Nicaragua. Since the Communist Sandinista regime of Nicaragua took power in 1979, its political opposition has been subjected to constant harassment. Freedom of the press was replaced by state censorship. Communist control of the economy has produced hyperinflation and a standard of living that is now nothing short of desperate.

It would be one thing if Nicaragua, bad as it is, were self-contained. Yet the actual case is much worse. For the Communist regime has placed Nicaragua within the Soviet orbit, embarked upon a massive military buildup, and already begun to send arms and guerrillas into neighboring countries. First, El Salvador, then Guatemala, Honduras, Costa Rica -- the Communist Sandinistas have sought to extend violence throughout all of Central America. It could be only a matter of time before serious unrest and instability reached Mexico. Were that to happen, the decade of the nineties could open with hundreds of thousands of refugees streaming toward our own southern borders.

Yet people in Central America have themselves moved to prevent this threat from becoming a reality. First among these are the Nicaraguan freedom fighters. These brave men and women have given up ordinary life to endure the hardship of living in the countryside -- virtually always on the move -- to fight for freedom in their own country.

There was a time when the freedom fighters, with few supplies, little medical support, and dwindling ammunition, were forced to retreat. But in recent months, in large measure because we in the United States have stood with them, the freedom fighters have begun to win major victories, placing intense pressure upon the Communist Sandinista regime to reform.

Communist Nicaragua, the democratic leaders of neighboring Central American countries have worked together to develop a peace plan for the region. Among its provisions, the peace plan calls for all the countries of Central America, including Nicaragua, to respect civil liberties, including freedom of the press and freedom to hold elections.

Communist regime in Nicaragua -- which, as I've said, is under intense pressure from the freedom fighters -- has agreed to participate in the regional peace process. So far, the measures the Communists have taken have been extremely limited -- the release of a small number of political prisoners, for example, and the lifting of censorship in a very few cases. Yet there is hope that, with the freedom fighters keeping up the pressure, the Communists will observe still further provisions of the peace plan, permitting Nicaragua at least to inch toward the conditions of genuine democracy.

Next week Congress will vote on my request for additional aid for the Nicaraguan resistance. Ninety percent of the $36 million package is for nonlethal support, such as food, clothing, medicine, and the means to deliver those items. Only $3.6 million is for ammunition, and its delivery would be suspended for at least a month to determine whether progress is being made toward a cease-fire. I'm hopeful that will occur, and the ammunition will not be required.

However, if the Sandinistas fail to move forward on the path of peace and democracy, then I will certify to Congress that these supplies must be released. I will make that decision only after the most careful and thorough consultation with Congress and the four Central American democratic Presidents. Those brave freedom fighters cannot be left unarmed against Communist tyranny.

Many issues face this session. The United Nations has repeatedly affirmed the right of self-determination for the Afghan and Cambodian peoples and deplored overwhelming human rights violations committed by their respective Soviet and Vietnamese invaders. The U.N. also has concerned itself with the serious human rights situation in Iran, whose government continues to suppress fundamental freedoms and persecute members of the minority Baha'i faith. The Commission has furthermore concerned itself with the human rights problems of Chile. We intend to work closely with cooperative delegations to reach constructive and helpful resolutions on such issues as the practice of apartheid by the South African Government.

Yet much remains to be done. One of the principal human rights violators in the Western Hemisphere, Cuba, has escaped attention for many years, but no more. The United States sponsored a resolution last year asking that violations in Cuba be placed on the UNHRC agenda, and we will do so again this year. Religious intolerance, particularly in the Soviet Union, continues to deprive millions of the freedom to worship as they choose. The freedom to emigrate, proclaimed by the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, continues to be denied to large numbers of people, including Soviet Jews, by Communist regimes. In spite of our best efforts, the practice of torture by other governments continues. The abuse of psychiatry to repress political dissidents in the U.S.S.R. is especially repugnant. We will look for deeds, not words, to satisfy world opinion that the U.S.S.R. has ended this practice.

We must not forget other victims of longstanding human rights abuses: Among them are the Baltic nations of Estonia, Latvia, and Lithuania; the Turkish minority in Bulgaria; the Paraguayans; and the peoples of Ethiopia, North Korea, Vietnam, and Nicaragua, where governmental repression is a way of life.

As the trend toward democracy throughout the world continues to gain momentum, we welcome the efforts of the United Nations to accelerate that trend. We pledge our full participation in the struggle for respect for all human rights.

In your country and mine, the New Year is a time of hope and renewal. Never have these qualities of the spirit been more necessary than now, as Soviet Armenia begins to heal from its wounds. You have our deepest sympathy. You have our prayers. And you have a personal hope from my wife, Nancy, and me that in the effort to rebuild what was shattered you will find your solace.

I am confident that relations between our two countries will continue on the positive course they have followed in the year just ending. And despite our disagreements, we have been able to find some common ground. When I visited Moscow and met with President Gorbachev, we advanced our mutual understanding on the vital issues of human rights, arms reductions, regional problems, and bilateral relations. Although much remains to be done, we're making progress in all of those areas.

Moscow, we signed the documents of ratification for the treaty eliminating an entire class of U.S. and Soviet intermediate-range nuclear missiles, and the implementation of that historic treaty has proceeded smoothly. Soviet and American negotiators continued to discuss a 50-percent reduction in strategic nuclear weapons. And we are preparing to enter into new negotiations about conventional military forces in Europe. President Gorbachev, during his recent speech to the United Nations, announced significant reductions in Soviet conventional forces. This is certainly a step in the right direction of correcting the imbalances in the European military situation, but much more remains to be done. Thus, while much has been accomplished in the area of arms control and reductions, we must continue efforts to ensure a lasting peace.

In human rights, progress is being made in reunification of families, freedom of people to travel as they please, and in other areas. The cessation of jamming is also a positive step; for if we're to understand each other better, we must be able to talk freely with each other, and listen freely as well. In bilateral relations, for example in cultural and educational exchange, improvements mean that the barriers that artificially separated our peoples are slowly being lowered. And in regional issues, from Afghanistan to the Persian Gulf and southern Africa, solutions are being found to conflicts of many years' standing. Perhaps your country will join ours in the effort to bring peace, democracy, and security to Central America.

In all of these areas, these improvements represent only the beginning of a long, difficult road to better understanding and cooperation. We are ready to continue moving along this road. Important differences remain between our countries and will continue for years to come. But I am confident that we have been witness in 1988 to progress that, if we are careful and diligent, can continue next year and during the years to come.

Gorbachev's visit to New York -- cut short by the catastrophe in Armenia -- gave us a chance to meet once more during my term as President. On January 20, George Bush will be sworn in as my successor. The American people have chosen him in part because he represents continuity in the policies, foreign and domestic, that the United States has pursued over the past 8 years. I know that Mr. Bush will continue on the same course with equal commitment.

This is my final message to you as President, and so, let me close by saying this: I believe the world is safer than it was a year ago, and I pray it will be safer still a year from now. I wish you, the Soviet people, well in the New Year.

Americans, on this first day of the New Year, I am pleased to have the opportunity to convey, on behalf of the Soviet people and on my own behalf, our best wishes to the American people and to every American family.

Each time, we take stock of the past year: happy about some things, sad about others, and hoping that many of our concerns will be left behind as we cross the threshold of the year and that our wishes will be fulfilled in the coming year.

Last year was rich in momentous events. It also brought many good changes in relations between our peoples and countries. Today they are more dynamic and more humane. We have become closer, and we have come to know each other better.

Americans seem to be rediscovering the Soviet Union, and we are rediscovering America. Fears and suspicion are gradually giving way to trust and feelings of mutual liking. I could see all of this for myself in my meetings with Americans in Washington and, quite recently, in New York. We regard the warmth and good will shown to the Soviet delegation during those days as something very important for our relations. I think President Reagan, too, will remember his meeting with Soviet people during his visit to the Soviet Union.

We in the Soviet Union are in favor of the most wide-ranging ties between our peoples; I hope you are, too. And that means we can look ahead with optimism to the future of our relations. This is what we talked about with President-elect Bush.

And let me mention one thing in particular. You know how much misfortune and suffering was caused by the earthquake in Armenia, how great was the human tragedy it wrought. I went to see the ruins of the devastated Armenian towns. You can't even look at what the forces of nature have done without shuddering. All Soviet people took the misfortune of the people of Armenia as their own. In this hour of grief, they extended a helping hand to them, as brothers. The devastated towns and villages will be reborn -- that is the will of all the peoples of the Soviet Union. Armenia's tragedy has evoked great sympathy throughout the world. We are grateful to the American people and to all peoples who have come to our aid.

Seeing all this, one cannot help thinking that all people who live on this Earth, all of us, however different, are really one family. I am sure we will find enough wisdom and good will to establish together a true period of peace for all humankind. If we are capable of a new way of feeling, then we must surely be capable of a new way of thinking. If we are capable of a new way of thinking, then instead of merely surviving we can live in a new way: on the basis of equal rights, justice, trust, humanism, and wide-ranging cooperation. This is the message I wanted to convey in addressing the United Nations in New York.

There are, of course, still many problems in the world, and they are intricate and complex. But that only heightens the need to solve them together -- as we say in our country, with everyone pitching in. It is good that we understand this and, moreover, that we are taking the first steps in that direction. Both our countries have a lot of problems. Quite naturally, you know your problems better, and we know ours. We intend to solve our problems in the course of perestroika. But the Soviet Union and the United States also have some common problems. I am convinced that today, on the basis of growing mutual understanding and trust, we can solve them better than we could yesterday.

Once again, I salute you, citizens of a great nation. Once again, I wish all of you peace, good health, and well-being. May there be more happiness and joy in your life. May your best hopes be fulfilled. May our common achievements shine brighter and brighter, filling every Soviet and American home and all our planet with an abiding will for peace, development, and construction.

I am pleased to transmit for your consideration and enactment the ``Whistleblower Protection Act of 1989.'' Federal employees who blow the whistle on fraud, waste, abuse, and violations of the law help to ensure that the Federal Government uses American taxpayers' dollars effectively and efficiently. The Nation's laws must encourage such reports and protect those who make them from reprisal.

At the close of the last Congress, I withheld my approval from S. 508, the Whistleblower Protection Act of 1988, because of the constitutional and other defects in that bill. The measure I am transmitting today corrects those defects. The legislation protects from reprisal Federal employees who expose wrongdoing within the Government. It also ensures that Federal personnel managers are not burdened with routinely defending appropriate personnel decisions.

The proposed legislation establishes the Office of Special Counsel as an independent office within the Executive Branch. The Office would protect Federal employees from prohibited personnel practices. To assist in the conduct of investigations in executing this function, the Special Counsel may administer oaths, examine witnesses, take depositions, and receive evidence.

Under the bill, when the Special Counsel determines that reasonable grounds exist to believe that a prohibited personnel practice has occurred, the Special Counsel generally reports that determination to the agency involved, the Merit Systems Protection Board, the Office of Personnel Management, and in appropriate cases, the President. When necessary to ensure that an agency found to have engaged in a prohibited personnel practice takes corrective action, the Special Counsel may seek an order from the Merit Systems Protection Board requiring such actions. In cases involving reprisal for whistleblowing, the individual who does not prevail in the proceeding before the Merit Systems Protection Board may seek Federal court review of the Board's decision.

The bill also entitles employees who make allegations to the Office of Special Counsel to notification of the results of the Office's investigation. The Office of Special Counsel may investigate allegations it receives and may initiate investigations on its own.

I would note that the proposed legislation does not contain the constitutional defects that were contained in S. 508 of the 100th Congress. Unlike that bill, the proposed legislation is consistent with the constitutional separation of powers, investment of the Executive power in the President, and the proper exercise of the Judicial power of the United States. I urge the Congress to enact the ``Whistleblower Protection Act of 1989'' swiftly to extend important protections and procedural rights to employees of the Federal Government.

President has today submitted to the Congress the Whistleblower Protection Act of 1989. The legislation protects Federal employees who blow the whistle on fraud, waste, and abuse in government from reprisals by their supervisors. The administration believes that employees who speak up when they see wrongdoing deserve the thanks and protection of the Nation.

After its last session, Congress presented the President with S. 508, the Whistleblower Protection Act of 1988. The President withheld his approval from that bill because of constitutional and other defects. The bill the President has proposed to Congress extends substantial new protection to whistleblowing Federal employees and is fully consistent with the Constitution. Whistleblowers help ensure that tax dollars are spent efficiently and properly in the conduct of the public's business. Swift enactment of the legislation the President has submitted will serve the Nation well.

Department's investigation was in response to a petition filed in December 1987 by the National Energy Security Committee. The Secretary of Commerce has concluded that there has been a substantial improvement in U.S. energy security since the last section 232 petroleum finding in 1979. However, declining domestic oil production, rising oil imports, and growing free world dependence on potentially insecure sources of supply raise a number of concerns, including vulnerability to a major supply disruption. The investigation found that the maintenance of U.S. access to sufficient supplies of petroleum is essential to our economic security, foreign policy flexibility, and defense preparedness. Given these factors, the Secretary of Commerce found that petroleum imports threaten to impair the national security.

However, taking into account the administration's detailed program to improve energy security, transmitted to Congress on May 6, 1987, the Secretary has recommended that no action to adjust imports under section 232, such as an oil import fee, be taken because such action would not be cost effective and, in the long run, would impair rather than enhance national security.

My administration has done a great deal to build the Nation's foundation for long-term energy security and to strengthen the domestic oil industry. We have decontrolled oil prices and eliminated allocation controls. The Strategic Petroleum Reserve (SPR) contains over 555 million barrels, compared to 108 million barrels 8 years ago. U.S. imports come from diversified sources, and there have been important developments in conservation and interfuel substitution that contribute significantly to enhancing U.S. energy security. In addition, implementation of the U.S.-Canada free-trade agreement will promote increased bilateral energy trade and provide reliable supplies at competitive prices. Today the Nation is far less vulnerable to an oil supply disruption than in 1973 or 1979.

Despite these improvements, important energy security concerns remain. While lower oil prices have provided substantial benefits to the U.S. economy, they have also led to rising oil consumption, declining U.S. crude production, and rising oil imports. In addition, projections show that the free world will become increasingly dependent on oil supplies from potentially insecure sources. Therefore we must continue our efforts to ensure that these trends do not leave the free world more vulnerable to economically damaging oil supply disruptions.

I was heartened by congressional action on some of my May 6, 1987, recommendations, such as repeal of the windfall profit tax, repeal of restrictions on the use of natural gas, and reauthorization of the Price-Anderson Act for nuclear power plants. However, a number of my recommendations to improve the Nation's energy security have not been acted upon.

Increase the availability of the percentage depletion allowance used in calculation of independent oil and gas producers' income taxes by repealing the ``transfer rule'' and increasing the next net income limitation to 100 percent.

Given the nature of the international oil market, the United States alone cannot assure its energy security. Consequently, we continue to work closely with our partners in the International Energy Agency (IEA) to improve our mutual energy security.

With our encouragement, our IEA partners have built up their strategic stocks to 400 million barrels. Together we are making significant progress towards a more balanced mix of energy options. The specific actions I have outlined above, when implemented, will make a further significant contribution to improving the energy security of the United States and the free world.

I approve your finding that petroleum imports threaten to impair the national security. However, based on your recommendation that takes into account my detailed program to improve energy security, transmitted to the Congress on May 6, 1987, I determine that no action to adjust oil imports under Section 232 need be taken.

However, taking into account the Administration's detailed program to improve energy security, transmitted to the Congress on May 6, 1987, the Secretary has recommended that no action to adjust imports under Section 232, such as an oil import fee, be taken because such action would not be cost effective and, in the long run, would impair rather than enhance national security.

Administration has done a great deal to build the Nation's foundation for long-term energy security and to strengthen the domestic oil industry. We have decontrolled oil prices and eliminated allocation controls. The Strategic Petroleum Reserve (SPR) contains over 555 million barrels, compared to 108 million barrels 8 years ago. United States imports come from deversified sources, and there have been important developments in conservation and interfuel substitution that contribute significantly to enhancing U.S. energy security. In addition, implementation of the United States-Canada Free-Trade Agreement will promote increased bilateral energy trade and provide reliable supplies at competitive prices. Today the Nation is far less vulnerable to an oil supply disruption than in 1973 and 1979.

The seizure of the Italian cruise ship Achille Lauro in 1985, and the murder of American passenger Leon Klinghoffer, demonstrated that no country, or form of transportation, is immune from the criminal savagery of those who engage in terrorist acts. This Convention is aimed at ensuring that those who engage in such acts on board or against ships engaged in navigation are brought to justice. The Protocol would do the same with respect to acts on or against fixed platforms on the continental shelf. Modeled on earlier conventions dealing with aircraft hijacking and sabotage (to which the United States is a party), they include provisions requiring States to provide severe punishment for such offenses, and to extradite or prosecute those who commit them.

Work on the Convention and Protocol began in 1986 under the auspices of the International Maritime Organization on the basis of an initial draft cosponsored by the Governments of Italy, Austria and Egypt. That work was completed, and the Convention and Protocol adopted by consensus, at an international conference in Rome in March 1988. The United States and 22 other States signed the Convention at that time, and the United States and 20 other States signed the Protocol. It is clear that the Convention already has broad support in the international community, and it is hoped that all States will join in this major step to deter acts against the safety of maritime navigation.

This is the eighth and final report of my Administration on the state of small business. And it is my pleasure to report to the Congress that there has never been better opportunity in America to start a business, to grow and create new jobs, to research and generate new products and technologies, and to maintain America's economic expansion.

The report for 1988 details the number of new businesses, new jobs, and new investments made by small business. I am pleased and proud that we have 5 million more businesses than we did when I took office, that there are over 1.5 million new women-owned businesses in that time, and that small business has been the major contributor in generating the nearly 18 million new jobs added to our economy since 1982.

At the January 1981 Inaugural I spoke of heroes, not the people who are famous, but the people who every day risk their money, their time, and their reputation in the community, who work hard for themselves and their neighbors, whose day-to-day contributions sum up to national greatness. If we have a greater nation today, it is not only because of economic progress, but because of growth in opportunity.

Millions of Americans continue to convert opportunities to new enterprises, new jobs, and innovative products. And by taking advantage of the opportunities available to them, they create opportunities for other Americans.

Their concerns reflect not the narrow views of special interest groups, but broad perspectives on issues that affect all of us -- the provision of health care for the uninsured, workplace literacy and training, and international competitiveness.

But in a number of specific instances, we have been able to target public and private resources and to alleviate regulatory, paperwork, or other burdens on small firms so that they will be free to do what they do best -- create new enterprises, new jobs, and innovative products and processes.

One of the recommendations of the 1986 White House Conference on Small Business delegates was that the Government do a better job of paying its bills on time. I heartily agreed with this recommendation, and the Prompt Payment Act Amendments of 1988, which I signed last October, will strengthen the rules Federal agencies must follow in paying their bills.

Another priority was to strengthen the national record of research and innovation, in which small firms play such an important role. I am very pleased that the Congress agreed with my strong recommendation to extend the research and experimentation tax credit and thus keep American products competitive in the world economy.

We as a Nation have much to learn from our small business leaders. Their creative contributions and those of many other citizens will be an important resource as we search for solutions appropriate to our Nation's needs in the 21st century.

Small firms will continue to have a broad impact on American society. They employ and train a majority of the Nation's new workers, and they will retrain many workers for new occupations in the years ahead. As we learn more about this vital sector's contributions to the economy, we will be able to shape policies at all levels of Government that will encourage the start-up and growth of America's vital small enterprises.

I transmit also for the Senate's information a certified copy of the recommendation (No. 170) on the same subject, adopted by the International Labor Conference on the same date, which amplifies some of the Convention's provisions. No action is called for on the recommendation.

As explained more fully in the enclosed letter from the Secretary of Labor, the Government of the United States already collects, compiles and publishes basic labor statistics in all nine subject areas covered by Convention 160. Ratification of this Convention, therefore, would not require the United States to alter in any way its law or practice in this field.

Conventions makes more difficult our attempts to take other governments to task for failing to comply with ILO instruments they have ratified. In part for this reason, the Senate gave its advice and consent to the ratification of ILO Convention 144. I accordingly recommend that the Senate also give its advice and consent to the ratification of ILO Convention 160.

But we do appreciate all that each of you had done and will do in the fight against drug abuse. I know I've said this before, but while there are many things that I will remember with pride and affection about the last 8 years, right at the top of the list will be the battle a certain lady began long before it was fashionable to get America's young people to just say no to drugs.

Teddy Roosevelt used to talk about the White House as a ``bully pulpit,'' but with her crusade against drug abuse, Nancy has shown that it's not just the President who can use that ``bully pulpit'' for the good of America.

I've been deeply touched in the last few months when some people that I greatly respect have praised the work of our administration and compared it with a few select administrations of the past. But I must say that, to my way of thinking, the work Nancy has done can't be compared to the work of anyone ever before. Nancy, I knew from the first moment that I laid eyes on you that you were the greatest, and now the world knows that, too.

Claus arriving for us a little late this year. Well, back to our friends, back to our home, back to chopping wood on a ranch. So, until then, thank you from the bottom of our hearts, and God bless you all.

Reagan. Well, if I can get past the laryngitis -- I wish that I could thank each one of you individually for all that you've done tonight and your generosity. You can't possibly imagine what this is going to mean to a lot of children and their parents. And I'll be forever grateful to all of you, and I do thank you very, very much. And I add my God bless, too. Thank you.

President decided to agree to this schedule, including the Moscow conference, as a means of encouraging continuation of the significant progress in human rights that has taken place in the Soviet Union over the past 3 years.

That progress has included the release of hundreds of political prisoners and exit permission for many people long refused the right to emigrate. Emigration rates from the Soviet Union are substantially higher. And jamming of the Voice of America, Radio Liberty, and other Western broadcasts have ceased. New laws respecting individual liberties have been promised to the world by President Gorbachev in his recent speech to the United Nations.

Such new laws, the institutionalization of reform, are crucial; and the President recognizes that there is much yet to be done in the Soviet Union before that nation meets acceptable and universal human rights standards. We will make it clear to the Soviet Union that the lack of future and institutionalized progress or a reversal of progress made to date will cause us to reconsider our decision to attend a Moscow conference in 1991. At present, we believe that Western concurrence in principle in such a Moscow conference may be the best way to encourage and support future improvement in Soviet human rights performance. The Soviet Union now has a unique opportunity to take further action to demonstrate its continuing and irreversible commitment to achieve commonly accepted human rights standards.

January 9, 1989, I will be forwarding to the Congress the compensation recommendations of the Commission on Executive, Legislative, and Judicial Salaries. This bipartisan Commission composed of individuals of superior achievement in the public and private sectors carefully reviewed the compensation of senior Federal officials and unanimously recommended increased levels of compensation.

Fair compensation for those who bear the responsibility for effective functioning of our government is critical at this juncture of history. The American people expect excellence at the top levels of government, and they deserve to get it.

We must not allow Federal service to become the province only of the wealthy. We must ensure that the door to service remains open to Americans who must work to support their families, educate their children, and save for their retirement.

I join the Commission in urging Congress to abolish the current system used to supplement inadequate Federal salaries through payments from private special interests. The ban on honoraria should take effect at the same time as the proposed pay levels take effect. The current system undermines public faith in the integrity of senior Federal officials, particularly in the Legislative branch. Congress should move immediately to enact legislation that takes a comprehensive approach to the problems posed by honoraria, including payments for articles, speeches, and appearances, and other forms of financial benefits.

During my Presidency, I have been impressed with the ability and dedication of the senior Federal officials who serve our country. It is in the Nation's best interest to attract and keep highly qualified individuals for senior government positions. I ask you to support the bipartisan Commission's unanimous pay recommendations to ensure that the American people continue to benefit from the government service of highly talented Americans.

We can trace evidence for skiing back more than 5,000 years. This efficient method of traveling over snow in difficult or inaccessible terrain has benefited mankind in countless ways over the centuries and continues to do so in our land. The practicality and pleasure of skiing are worth celebrating by all of us, and that is the reason for this National Skiing Day.

Skiing is advantageous to many of us for the jobs and income it generates. It also proves useful for residents of isolated areas; rescue teams; and Armed Forces units. Additionally, national and international sports groups, including Special Olympics International, recognize the athletic and therapeutic benefits of skiing for handicapped people and include it in their regular programs.

Skiing is now one of our most popular winter sports. It is loved by fans of national, international, and Olympic competition and enjoyed by millions of Americans as healthful, exciting recreation. More and more of us are becoming skiers. The increase of ski trails and slopes on private and public lands is making skiing much more widely available, as is the advent of artificial snow surfaces in areas with mild winter weather.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this sixth day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-nine, and the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

The travel and tourism industry is the source of countless benefits for both Americans and our guests from other lands. Friendship, knowledge, and appreciation of intercultural differences, enhancement of international understanding, cooperation, and goodwill are just a few.

Our abundant natural and manmade attractions, the warm hospitality of our people, and the outstanding facilities and services provided by our travel and tourism industry establish the United States as the preeminent destination for both foreign and domestic travelers.

Every year, millions of Americans and foreign visitors travel throughout our country discovering the glory of America -- the beauty of our natural wonders, cities, wilderness, and countryside; the hospitality of our people; and our outstanding recreational, educational, and cultural activities.

The travel and tourism industry, which is composed mainly of small businesses, is now America's second largest private employer and its third largest retail industry. The industry directly employs over 5\1/2\ million Americans and indirectly employs another 2,200,000.

Total travel expenditures in the United States amount to nearly $280 billion -- over 6 percent of our gross national product. The more than $19.4 billion spent here on travel and tourism by foreign visitors improves our balance of trade and makes travel and tourism our largest service export.

Tourism Week fittingly honors all those Americans who earn their livelihood in the travel and tourism industry. National Tourism Week reminds us of this industry's economic, educational, cultural, and social benefits -- that come from a productive partnership of industry, labor, and government.

Act, from the time a request to establish a board is made until 60 days after the board makes its report, no change, except by agreement, shall be made by the parties in the conditions out of which the dispute arose.

President, by Executive order, created the emergency board pursuant to appropriate requests as mandated by the Railway Labor Act. This is the second emergency board created to report on this dispute. The first, Board No. 216, issued its report and recommendations on October 21, 1988.

The parties were unable to reach agreement, however, thus necessitating the establishment of a second board. The parties will have 30 days to submit their final offers for settlement to the board. The board will then select the most reasonable final offer within the next 30 days. From the time the board is established until 60 days after the board's report, if the dispute remains unresolved, the parties must refrain from resorting to self-help.

President today announced his intention to appoint Adm. William J. Crowe, Jr., to be a Governor on the Board of Governors of the American National Red Cross for a term of 3 years. This is a reappointment.

Majesty's 62-year reign spanned one of the most tumultuous and yet, at the same time, constructive eras in the history of mankind: an age of unprecedented economic collapse, a most vicious war, astonishing scientific achievement, and dramatic political and social changes throughout the world. It was also an era of unprecedented reconciliation. His Majesty played a truly heroic role in bringing hostilities between our two peoples to an end and leading the Japanese people through a period of reconstruction and reconciliation that has resulted in both the prosperity the Japanese know today and the close relations our two nations and peoples now enjoy.

While we mourn the passing of His Majesty, we shall long remember him for his contributions which strengthened the United States-Japan relationship and set a future course of continued close and friendly relations.

Monday, I submit to Congress my final budget. It's a responsible plan which cuts the deficit without touching Social Security, weakening defense, or reducing benefits to the needy. And the best news is that this budget proves it can be done without raising your taxes.

Our growing economy will, in the next fiscal year, produce $84 billion in new revenues with no increase in tax rates. Since the whole economic pie is expanding, the Federal Government's slice grows along with the private sector.

Raising taxes would be the surest way to kill the economic goose that lays the golden eggs. So, I leave as I came: dead-set against any new taxes. And even if there were a tax increase, history shows that Congress would almost certainly spend the additional money. It wouldn't be used to reduce the deficit; it would just mean that you had to pay for an even bigger government. And now, with an estimated $84 billion in new revenues coming in, we can both reduce the deficit and increase Federal spending.

By combining new revenues with previously scheduled reductions and savings in other areas, priority programs will grow by nearly $50 billion. There are more funds for air safety, fighting crime, housing the poor, and the war on drugs. Funds for AIDS research and prevention is increased by 24 percent. And money to clean up toxic waste goes up by a fifth. We also increased funds for the science and space program and for basic biomedical research. And student-aid funds are increased again, bringing it to a level 83 percent higher than where it stood in 1980.

Real defense spending is increased by 2 percent. This is a small increase, but an important one -- the price of peace and security for America. Through strength we achieved greater realism in the U.S.-Soviet relationship and breakthroughs in arms reduction. Our defense budget will enable us to continue on this path.

Let's remember that despite the internal reforms in the Soviet Union, they are modernizing their weapons at a rapid pace, spending a far larger share of gross national product on weapons than the United States does.

Well, 'tain't so. In Washington, when spending goes up less than had been projected, they call that a cut, even through more of your tax dollars are being spent than ever before. With Medicare, we've simply limited the increase in payments to providers of services. There is no effect on the people who receive the benefits.

So, my fiscal year 1990 budget provides for the needy; does not raise taxes; and by controlling the growth in spending, reduces the deficit next year by nearly $70 billion. This not only meets the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit reduction target, it reduces the deficit even further and puts us on track to a balanced budget and a modest surplus by fiscal year 1993. This budget is a realistic program which protects the working families of America, provides adequate support for those who depend on government, and helps assure America's prosperity in the years to come.

I've often spoken of the rising incomes Americans have enjoyed in recent years, but one group lags behind. According to a new report by the bipartisan commission on Federal salaries, real pay for top-level government jobs has fallen by 35 percent since 1969 due to inflation, while private sector pay has outpaced inflation. So, my budget includes higher pay for vital positions, ranging from judges to scientists to elected officials. This increase is still less than what was lost to inflation. Even after this raise, the real income of a circuit court judge will be 19 percent less than in 1969.

The cost of these increases will be absorbed in the budget without slowing progress in the deficit, and we'll be getting something important in return. When salaries are too low, it's hard to attract and keep America's best in government.

Federal judges are leaving the bench in record numbers, partly because they're paid less than junior members of some law firms. The National Institutes of Health that fight cancer and other grave diseases have vacancies for senior researchers that have been empty for 10 years due to poor pay.

Also troubling is that some officials, particularly in Congress, now supplement their income with special-interest honoraria payments. My support for the pay increase rests on my firm belief that such payments undermine the integrity of our government and should be abolished. We must be willing to pay for excellence in government or risk a government run only by people of wealth or by those beholden to special interests.

The procedure commenced at 7:30 a.m. and was performed under regional anesthesia. A general anesthesia was not necessary. The President was alert and responsive throughout the operation, discussing various aspects of the procedure with doctors. He is now recovering in his room and is in good spirits.

Reagan will remain at Walter Reed tonight and return to the White House at his convenience on Sunday, January 8. Today's procedure is not expected to interrupt the President's normal work schedule, other than the obvious presence of a dressing on the left hand. The President will be receiving no special medications other than routine postoperative antibiotics and analgesic as necessary. The President's arm will be bandaged and in a sling for a few days.

After that, only a hand bandage will be required. The finger will require a dynamic splint for several months to ensure corrective healing. Doctor Hutton indicates that no further surgery should be necessary. It is anticipated that the President will have full use of his finger.

Reverence for human life and recognition of the sanctity of individual life are among the defining characteristics of a just civil order. For century upon century, mankind has struggled to establish such principles in law -- not merely as right ideas confirmable by experience, but as self-evident truths that provide the only possible basis for the creation of durable political institutions. Age after age of wars and persecutions, serfdom and slavery, have left bitter reminders of the consequences that everywhere follow a failure to recognize the fundamental dignity and equality of human beings in the sight of God.

Nation was born in the midst of a struggle in which these principles were the real field of battle. The United States of America was founded by visionary people who believed, and said forthrightly, that the test of any just political system lay in whether it affirmed the unalienable rights endowed by God, rights that no civil authority was ever free to deny or contravene. In this context, it is no wonder then that the first right proclaimed by our Founders in the Declaration of Independence was that of life, and that the care of human life and happiness, as Jefferson declared in words now inscribed on the marble walls of our national Memorial to him, was held to be the first and only legitimate object of good government.

Today our Nation, economically prosperous and at peace, bears a fresh, dark wound upon its conscience, a wound created by a stark deviation from the course of our national journey. Contrary to the purpose of law, to the character of medicine, to the habit of charity, and to the spirit of our founding, abortion has become routinized in America. No one can mistake abortion for the gentle art of healing. Each day in our land the promise of life is stolen from thousands of the unborn, the first flower of their unique existence crushed forever. But, as many philosophers have pointed out, the effects of such acts of violence are just as profound on those who perform them as on those who undergo them.

Americans are a generous and kindhearted people, a people who strive to strengthen and preserve those delicate bonds of affection that unite the human family and give safe harbor to all its members. We often fail in our tenderness and mercy; but it is not in our nature to choose failure. Rather, we are a people who thirst after justice and will give our all to achieve it and defend it. Most particularly, we are a people who will not settle for a national policy that each year condemns 1.5 million unborn children to an early death and consigns their mothers to exploitation and emptiness. We must and we will answer abortion with loving alternatives like adoption, and we will ensure that our laws preserve and protect the innocent unborn from destruction.

Americans to reflect on their heritage as a free people under God and the duty incumbent upon each of us to recognize the personhood of every individual and to defend the life of every innocent person from the moment of conception until natural death. Let us gather in homes and places of worship during this sixth annual observance of National Sanctity of Human Life Day to offer reparation for the appalling tragedy of abortion and to rededicate ourselves to works of charity and justice in behalf of America's unborn children and their mothers.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this ninth day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-nine, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

Commission found that Federal executives and legislators have experienced a decline of approximately 35 percent in real salaries since 1969. In contrast, the salaries of General Schedule employees have declined by only 8 percent over the same period. The Commission's recommendations go a long way towards compensating for this salary erosion, but they do not make up the full gap. For example, for an official at Executive Level II, which is also the congressional salary rate, the salary level adjusted for inflation since 1969 would be $140,340 while the Commission's recommendation is $135,000.

Every one of the Commissions that has met over the past 20 years concluded that a pay increase for key Federal officials was necessary. Each Commission found that pay for senior Government officials fell far behind that of their counterparts in the private sector. They also surmised that we cannot afford a Government composed primarily of those wealthy enough to serve.

In accepting the Commission's salary recommendations, I recognize that we are under a mandate to reduce the Federal deficit and hold the costs of government to an absolute minimum. Thus, while I have decided to propose a pay increase that accepts in full the salary recommendations made by the Commissioners in their report to me last month, this proposal will not increase the deficit; the funding for the pay increase will be fully absorbed within proposed budget levels.

This increase fulfills my promise made in January 1987 that, assuming continued progress toward eliminating the deficit and favorable economic conditions, I would recommend another step toward overcoming the erosion of real income.

While this represents a substantial increase in salaries, it is coupled with the salutary recommendation of a ban on receipt of all honoraria in all branches of government. Although my recommendation concerning honoraria has no legal effect, I urge the swiftest possible consideration of this important reform.

The Commission further recommended that the Congress enact legislation to bar officials in the three branches from receiving honoraria. I endorse these recommendations of the Commission as an appropriate step toward better government. A salary increase and a prohibition on receipt of honoraria together will help ensure that the government is able to attract and keep talented senior officials and that the questions that arise from outside payments of honoraria are put to rest.

We also initiated the largest management improvement program ever attempted in order to restore the proper relationships among the Federal, State and local governments, and the private sector; to eliminate waste in Federal programs; and to introduce management controls and efficiencies, while improving services.

Today, the American people can be proud of the progress that has been made on each of these fronts. As a result of this progress, America is internally stronger, internationally more secure, and stands taller in the eyes of the world than it did eight years ago.

The current economic expansion, now in its seventy-fourth month, has outlasted all previous peacetime expansions in U.S. history. Business investment and exports are rising, and economic growth is expected to continue into the 1990's.

The growth in domestic spending has been slowed, and the budget priorities have been shifted to those functions the Federal Government should provide, such as national defense, basic scientific research, and protecting the rights of all citizens.

The runaway growth of spending for means-tested entitlement programs that occurred in the 1970's has been curbed. Eligibility rules have been tightened to retarget benefits to the needy. Basic benefits for the poor, the elderly, and others in need of Federal assistance have been maintained.

We have begun the process of putting other entitlement programs on a more rational basis, including medicare hospital insurance, which was converted to a system that encourages efficiency and lower costs.

We began the Strategic Defense Initiative research and technology program that offers our best hope of a safer world in which our security, and that of our allies, no longer rests on deterrence through the threat of nuclear retaliation, but on defenses that threaten no one.

Federal agencies undertook a major management improvement program, ``Reform '88,'' to carry out the cash, credit, and financial operations of the Federal Government in a more business-like manner, and to reduce waste, fraud, and abuse.

The one area in which I have been persistently disappointed throughout my term of office has been in the efforts to bring the budget under control. Time and again I have proposed measures to help curb Federal domestic program spending.

It has been estimated that 81 percent -- over $640 billion -- of the growth of the deficit over the 1981 - 1986 levels originally projected in my March 1981 budget was attributable to that recession. The second reason is that, even after including necessary increases for defense, my March 1981 budget called for net spending reductions totalling $331 billion over five years; but Congress approved less than 40 percent of those reductions. Wasteful programs continued to be funded. The necessary reductions have still not been made.

If the deficit is not curbed by continuing to limit the appetite of government, we put in jeopardy all that we worked so hard over the years to achieve. Large deficits brought on by excessive domestic spending undercut the incentives to work and save by absorbing the savings that would otherwise lead to productive investment. We cannot allow this to happen.

This budget shows that a gradual elimination of the deficit is possible without raising taxes, without cutting into essential social programs, without devastating defense, and without neglecting other national priorities. It can be done in a reasonable, responsible way -- with discipline and fairness. New taxes are not required. Receipts will grow dramatically between 1989 and 1990 because our economy is growing. This budget simply proposes to increase spending by less than the increase in revenues, and therefore, reduce the deficit. The proposed reforms will yield additional deficit reductions in future years. We have an opportunity this year to put the worst of the deficit problem behind us and enable the next Administration to begin its term of office with a clean slate and with the promise of continuing prosperity.

H Act, my budget proposes that some programs -- such as those for AIDS research and prevention, drug enforcement, and technology development -- receive significant funding increases, while others are reduced, reformed, or, in some cases, terminated.

Maintaining peace and protecting our country are the foremost responsibilities of the Federal government. Defense budget authority declined in real (inflation-adjusted) terms for the fourth straight year with funding of $299 billion for 1989. This trend cannot continue without severe impact on combat readiness. Therefore, my budget requests defense funding of $315 billion in budget authority and $303 billion in outlays for 1990, and $331 billion in budget authority and $314 billion in outlays in 1991. These amounts provide 2 percent annual real growth in budget authority over the 1989 level, bringing it back up to the 1984 level in inflation-adjusted terms by 1991. The budget also projects 2 percent real growth in these programs in future years.

To consolidate and build on the foreign policy gains of the past eight years, additional funds are needed for international affairs that would promote our foreign policy and national security interests in the Middle East, Central America, and elsewhere. A special program is proposed to foster strong economic growth in the Philippines to support that country's return to democracy. Other increases in foreign aid would pay arrearages on contributions to multilateral lending institutions and make payments to the United Nations and related agencies.

To relieve prison overcrowding and adequately house a growing inmate population, I would provide $1.6 billion for prison construction and operation, $193 million more than was devoted to this purpose in 1989.

I propose a continued increase in federally supported basic research aimed at longer-term improvements in the Nation's productivity and global competitiveness. This budget continues the commitment to double National Science Foundation support for academic basic research by 1993, increases support for training future scientists and engineers, and expedites transfer of the results of Government-funded basic research to industry.

Our space program will provide $13.1 billion for continued development of America's first permanently manned space station; for increased support for improving the performance and reliability of the space shuttle; for initiation of two major new international planetary space science missions; and for support to encourage the commercial development of space.

Also included in the budget is $250 million in 1990 as the Federal share of support for initiating construction of the Superconducting Super Collider (SSC). Non-Federal cost sharing arrangements will be required to support one-third of the project's costs. The SSC as currently envisaged will be the largest pure science project ever undertaken. It will help keep this country on the cutting edge of high energy physics research well into the next century.

To continue the Federal Aviation Administration's multi-year program to increase its controller and inspector workforces and to modernize the Nation's air traffic control systems, the budget provides $7.7 billion -- a 17 percent increase over the 1989 level.

To alleviate the problems facing our savings institutions, I propose that the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation (FSLIC) spend $16 billion in 1989 and $9 billion in 1990 to address the most serious thrift institution problems. The Secretary of the Treasury is developing a comprehensive plan to resolve the savings industry's problems, and reform the financial institution regulatory structure and deposit insurance system to prevent a reoccurrence of these problems. I expect the Secretary to submit his proposals to the new President shortly.

To improve coordination of Federal rural development programs and to redirect funding toward needy rural areas and program recipients, I am continuing support of the rural development initiative coordinated by the Secretary of Agriculture.

By emphasizing housing vouchers, I would provide housing assistance to 132,000 additional low-income households in 1990, 5 percent more than the 126,124 additional households receiving housing subsidies in 1989. Housing vouchers can serve more low-income households at a lower Federal cost and provide greater opportunity for these families to rent housing of their own choosing.

To maintain the progress we have been making in fostering State and local education reform, I would sustain the present level of spending on discretionary education programs at $18.5 billion, but refocus those funds to put more money where the needs of the disadvantaged and students with handicaps are greatest.

To continue the significant progress we have made in cleaning up the environment, I recommend a $153 million increase for the Environmental Protection Agency's regulatory, research and enforcement programs. I also recommend an increase of $315 million for the Superfund hazardous waste cleanup program in order to maintain the program's momentum and support a stronger enforcement role.

Because changes in the earth's natural systems can have tremendous economic and social effects, global climate change is becoming a critical concern. Our ability to understand and predict these changes is currently limited, and a better understanding is essential for developing policies. The budget proposes a coordinated and effective Federal research program on global change. This budget is accompanied by a report by the Committee on Earth Sciences that describes this program and its strategy.

Last year's fires on Federal forestlands indicated the need for more timely funding for annual fire-fighting costs. I therefore propose that two new Federal wild land firefighting accounts be established in the Departments of Agriculture and Interior.

To further strengthen our energy security, I propose legislation authorizing the sale of the naval petroleum reserves to the private sector in exchange for cash and oil to be added to the strategic petroleum reserve. I also propose the establishment of a separate 10 million barrel defense petroleum inventory.

Current farm price support programs are far too costly. For the period 1986 - 89 an estimated $130 billion in Federal spending for farm-related assistance programs provided an average of nearly $600,000 per farmer. Much of this assistance goes to farmers with high incomes -- more than twice the U.S. family average. I therefore propose outlay reductions for the price and income support programs of $2 billion in 1990 and additional annual reductions of between $2 and $2.5 billion in each year from 1991 through 1994. In addition, I urge reform of the counterproductive sugar price support program.

The rapidly rising costs of the medicare program need to be moderated. I propose a reasonable increase in the medicare prospective payment system rate and reductions in hospital capital payments and special graduate medical education payments. Also, in an effort to restrain excessive growth in supplementary medical insurance (SMI) costs, I propose extension of the current law SMI premiums, limitations on physician payments, reductions in payments for certain overpriced procedures, and reforms in the durable medical equipment payment system. Medicare spending would still grow by 9 percent between 1989 and 1990 under these proposals -- but not by the 13 percent that would occur under current law.

I also propose reforms in the medicaid program to reduce spending growth between 1989 and 1990 to $1.7 billion, or 5 percent, rather than the $3.3 billion, or 9 percent, that would occur under current law. These reforms reinstate successful incentives employed in the early 1980's. My budget also proposes restructuring Federal financing of administrative expenses to give States greater incentives to operate their administrative systems as efficiently as possible.

Government often continues programs at the Federal level that are either duplicative or are no longer needed, or more appropriately undertaken by other levels of government or the private sector. This is the case with the Economic Development Administration, Amtrak, urban mass transit discretionary grants, and most operating subsidies for the Postal Service. Efforts to reverse this situation have been undertaken by prior administrations as well as my own.

As the Federal Government grew, it took on improper responsibilities, and managed its programs inefficiently. We undertook to return the Federal Government to its proper role. We also initiated a major program to improve the management of the remaining programs. These priorities are continued and expanded in this budget.

Privatization. -- The Government and the private sector should each do what it does best. The Federal Government should not be involved in providing goods and services where private enterprise can do the job cheaper and better.

Accordingly, my budget proposes that a number of Federal enterprises be opened to the private sector, through public offerings or outright sales. Following our success in the sale of Conrail and the sale of $21 billion in selected loan portfolios, I am proposing sale of the naval petroleum reserves, the Alaska Power Administration, and the Southeastern Power Administration. I also propose sale of the Federal Government's helium-processing assets, excess real property, and a further $4.3 billion in loan portfolios. In addition, my budget proposes legislation to establish a government corporation for the uranium enrichment enterprise, as the first step towards eventual privatization.

I saw that the Federal Government did not have effective cash management practices for dealing with what is now a $2 trillion annual cash flow, nor did it have a government-wide credit management program for what is now a $1 trillion portfolio. This resulted in the waste of billions of dollars each year. We built the necessary government-wide controls in both areas and stopped the drain.

Moreover, we began the establishment of the first government-wide financial accounting system, consolidating and making uniform over 400 previously incompatible individual agency systems. This was essential for any well-managed government, and is presently being implemented.

Federal Government has a major effect on our daily lives through the collection of taxes and fees, the direct provisions of services, the payment of financial assistance through various entitlement programs, and the regulation of commercial enterprises. Through modernization, improved administration, and automated services the Government has made substantial reductions in the time it takes to provide services to the public. As the 21st century approaches, the Federal Government must adapt its role in our society to changing conditions and changing technology. At the turn of the century, the U.S. population will exceed 268 million, with a larger proportion of elderly citizens. Changes in technology and communication will increasingly link the world's economies, trade, capital flows, and travel as never before.

The persistence of the budget deficit is overwhelming evidence that the Federal budget process is fundamentally flawed. Past efforts at ``reform'' have been directed largely toward protecting a large portion of domestic spending from real fiscal discipline. Fourteen years after passage of the Congressional Budget Act and three years after enactment of the Balanced Budget and Emergency Deficit Control Act, the Federal budget process remains unwieldy and undisciplined. The American people expect better of their political system, and they deserve it.

Under the Congressional Budget Act, Congressional budget resolutions -- Congress' proposed budgets -- are passed each year. They are not sent to the President for approval and, therefore, are not law. They provide guidance to the committees of Congress, but the guidance is often late and ambiguous. The resolutions are usually passed well after the dates required by law, and well after they are needed by the finance, authorizing, and appropriations committees. Moreover, there is little agreement within Congress on the guidance provided. The House of Representatives and the Senate do not agree, except in the most general terms, on the priorities implied by resolutions both have approved.

Except for last year's on-time performance, Congress self-imposed budget deadlines have usually been missed, and massive continuing resolutions and reconciliation bills have been the rule rather than the exception. These large, cumbersome bills provide cozy hiding places for hundreds of special interest add-ons, which line-item veto authority would permit the President to challenge.

Line-item veto. -- My successors should be given the authority, subject to Congressional override, to veto line-items in annual appropriations bills, in authorizing legislation that provides or mandates funding for programs, and in revenue bills. Such authority would permit the elimination of substantial waste and would be an effective instrument for enforcing budget discipline.

President's ability to control Government spending, I recommend that line-item veto authority be complemented by a change in law that would require the Congress to vote ``yea'' or ``nay'' on any rescission proposed by the President. Current law allows the Congress to duck responsibility by simply ignoring proposed rescissions for 45 days.

Biennial budgeting. -- The annual budget process consumes too much time and energy. A biennial budget would reduce the repetitive budget tasks, allow more time for considering key spending and revenue decisions, provide less scope for gimmicks that give the illusion of ``savings,'' such as shifting spending from one year to another without affecting the underlying programs, and permit the realization of real savings that would be possible with a more assured availability of funds. For these reasons, I recommend that biennial budgeting be adopted.

Joint budget resolution. -- To ensure the broader scrutiny and stricter discipline that is needed in the congressional budget process, I propose that Congress be required to prepare a budget resolution covering a minimum of two years showing revenue proposals individually and showing spending priorities. The Congress should also be required to submit its budget resolution to the President for his signature or veto. Subsequent legislation which exceeds these allocations should not be considered without super-majority approval.

Individual transmittal of appropriations bills. -- The practice of transmitting full-year continuing resolutions covering a number of appropriations bill does not permit the Legislative and Executive Branches to exercise proper scrutiny of those bills. Too often in the past, such continuing resolutions have provided convenient cover for special-interest spending that would not survive close scrutiny. To minimize this risk, I propose that appropriations bills be transmitted individually to the President.

To correct this major fault in the budget system, I recommended credit reform legislation two years ago. This legislation, which I am recommending again, would measure the true cost -- the present value -- of the subsidies provided by Federal credit programs and put that cost on an expenditure basis equivalent to the cost of other Federal programs. This change must be an integral part of the reform of the budget process.

Measuring the effects of budget proposals. -- Budget discipline and lasting deficit reduction would be facilitated if the Legislative and Executive Branches were to use a common set of principles for scoring budget proposals and actions on them. I urge that the Congressional Budget Office and the Office of Management and Budget be charged with the responsibility to develop, in consultation with the budget, finance, authorizing, and appropriations committees, a common set of budget scoring principles for use by the Legislative and Executive Branches.

Adoption of these reforms should enable the Federal Government to make informed decisions in a deliberate fashion that fosters rational priorities. The American people deserve no less from their elected representatives.

This budget achieves the 1990 target of the amended Act, and projects a budget balanced in 1993. It preserves legitimate programs for the aged and needy, provides for adequate national security, devotes more resources to other high-priority activities, and accomplishes all this without raising taxes. Tax increases are not needed. History shows that they would simply be used by the Congress to increase spending. Tax increases have been overwhelmingly voted down in the last three Presidential elections.

I call upon the Congress to enact this budget. Higher taxes are not needed -- as this budget demonstrates -- but genuine deficit reduction through moderating the growth in spending is essential to enable the next Administration and Congress to address the Nation's agenda for the future.

Over the past eight years, we Americans have made our world a safer place for freedom because we had the will to reinvigorate our economy, rebuild our defenses, and provide for the less fortunate among us. Together, we achieved a new beginning for our country and prepared the way for the next Administration to build on our accomplishments.

I submit to Congress my final budget. And I want to thank all of you for your support, both on this budget, as members and friends of Coalition for Fiscal Restraint, and so many of you for your help over the years. By taking the pledge against any tax hike and fighting to control spending, you put the national interest first, and you put the ``iron triangle'' in its place. The country needs more people like you in Washington.

I also want to commend the many members of the administration who've worked on this final budget. We've prepared an excellent document that fulfills the original objectives that I set forth for the fiscal year 1990 budget; not only does this budget meet the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit target of $100 billion, we even do better than that. And we do this without touching Social Security, weakening our national defense, or reducing benefits to the needy. And, my friends, we prove it can be done without raising taxes.

I've said before, the reason no new taxes are needed is because our strong and growing economy will in the next fiscal year produce an additional $84 billion in tax revenues without any increase in tax rates. Thanks to our record expansion, the money is literally rolling in. Those who want to tax away even more hard-earned dollars from working people ought to be ashamed of themselves. By 1994 the total revenue gain, without any new taxes, will be $370 billion. Now, that's plenty of additional revenue to do the business of government and still bring down the deficit. All that's necessary is to make the choices that governing is all about.

Never mind that Federal revenues are higher than ever before. Never mind that they're growing at a healthy clip. Never mind that raising taxes would be the surest way to kill the economic goose that lays the golden eggs. Never mind the sorry record of new revenues being used not for deficit reduction but for even higher spending. Never mind the facts: The big government crowd wants more taxes.

The tax-and-spend crowd will not like our budget. Without even reading it, they've already gone on the air to say that. They'll complain loudly about one thing or another, but their biggest objection really will be that our budget proves that no new taxes are necessary, that the additional $84 billion that the American people will be sending to Washington is enough new revenue to both reduce the deficit and increase spending in priority areas.

I'm sure you've already heard, not only do we reduce the deficit by nearly $70 billion, we also provide nearly $50 billion in increased spending. This is made possible by combining new revenues with previously scheduled reductions and savings in other areas. And let me stress that these savings do not involve reducing benefits to those who need them. In our budget there are more funds for improving air safety, fighting crime, and providing housing for the poor.

There is another $600 million for the war on drugs. Funding for AIDS research and prevention is increased by 24 percent. And money to clean up toxic waste goes up by a fifth. We also increase funds for the science and space programs and for basic biomedical research. And student-aid funds are increased again, bringing them to a level 83 percent higher than where they stood in 1980.

But if the past is any guide, the headlines will claim that we've actually cut funding. Well, 'tain't so. But I think most of you have been in Washington long enough to know that when spending goes up, but by less than had been projected, they call that a cut, even though more of your tax dollars are being spent than before. I've learned that experts have a name for that kind of upside-down accounting. They call it hogwash.

The fact is that the increase in Medicare spending is being limited to 9 percent not by any cut in benefits to recipients but simply by controlling the increase in payments to health-care providers. Similarly, the increase in Medicaid spending will be limited to 5 percent by renewing the cost containment incentives that were so effective in the early 1980's. But again, benefits will not be reduced.

You know, some have questioned the accuracy of my description last month of an ``iron triangle'' composed of some members of Congress, the media, and special interest groups, which work against our efforts for fiscal responsibility in order to increase the size of government. I think that the reaction to our budget will be very telling. It will be interesting to see whether the media coverage makes it clear, for example, that Medicare and Medicaid are, in fact, increasing or that without any tax increase Congress will be getting an additional $84 billion in new revenues to appropriate. And as for the revenue projection, I wonder if they'll treat it as a rosy scenario or whether they'll report that the Congressional Budget Office, using a less favorable economic forecast, actually predicts revenues even higher than we do.

Well, the bottom line is that our budget protects the working families of America, provides adequate support for those who depend on government, maintains our national defense, reduces the deficit by nearly $70 billion, and does not raise taxes. Moreover, it places America on track to a balanced budget and even a modest surplus by fiscal year 1993. With America now in its 74th month of economic growth, I am proud to say this budget will help assure our nation's prosperity in the years to come.

I don't need to rehearse the litany and cite the evidence to this audience. We've been talking about these matters for 8 years now, and the evidence is overwhelming. Choice works, and it works with a vengeance. Whether it's a Harlem school district in which scores have risen dramatically because parents are now permitted to choose which school to send their children to, or the marvelous program in Minnesota that is fostering unprecedented competition among public schools to make them more attractive to parents and students, choice is the most exciting thing that's going on in America today.

Choice represents a return to some of our most basic notions about education. In particular, programs emphasizing choice reflect the simple truth that the keys to educational success are schools and teachers that teach, and parents who insist that their children learn. They must work in concert, respecting each other's particular concerns and needs, not second-guessing each other.

And choice in education is the wave of the future because it represents a return to some of our most basic American values. Choice in education is no mere abstraction. Like its economic cousin, free enterprise, and its political cousin, democracy, it affords hope and opportunity. Can anyone doubt that, after hearing these splendid young people testify about how choice has changed their lives? Choice recognizes the principle that there is no one best way for all of us. It allows schools to excel at something special, rather than trying, and failing, to be all things to all people.

Education was one of the means by which this country first grew great and strong and powerful, through the extraordinary efforts of ordinary Americans to better themselves and make a better life for their families and their children. The key step in the most important domestic effort of this century, the civil rights movement, was the 1954 Brown decision by the Supreme Court. And that, of course, was about affording black children equal access to public schools. We all know how significant that was because we all understand that without appropriate education it's nearly impossible for the disadvantaged to improve themselves.

Americans can consider the particular triumph of those who have immigrated to our shores from scores of lands, scores of cultures, speaking a hundred different tongues. The struggle to make their way in a country whose language they didn't speak was a hard one, and almost every sociological study of American immigrants tells the same story: those that did best economically are those whose passion for education drove them and their children. The -- I get tangled up in my bandage every once in a while here -- [laughter] -- but as I say, drove them and their children, and that meant paying attention. It meant making sure homework was done, report cards were signed, and that their children were always challenged and never bored. In this way, they knew, their children would make it as Americans.

For too long, I think, we were content as Americans to imagine that our nation and our society were so inherently strong and successful that they could continue to run on automatic pilot. The schools had done well and should continue to do well; we could turn our attention elsewhere. Well, if we were on automatic pilot in the past, we've learned we have to work the controls by ourselves every day. And that's why a choice in education is so important. Parents are at the controls. At the same time, teachers know that their students are going home to parents who'll serve as their partners in getting the homework done and keeping the excitement and enthusiasm up. Students won't be marking time in school. Instead, they'll be preparing for an American future in which literacy and technological skill will be more vital to their chances for prosperity than ever before. Engaged parents and engaged teachers mean engaged students and a better educated America.

Now, you'll be hearing from some other folks, including especially a good friend of mine -- name happens to be George Bush. So, I'll get off of here, and I want to thank all of you for all that you're doing. And God bless all of you.

It is with great pride in the accomplishments of the American people that I present my eighth, and final, Economic Report of the President. When I took office 8 years ago there was widespread doubt concerning the ability and resolve of the United States to maintain its economic and political leadership of the Free World. Political events abroad seemed to demonstrate the impotence of American power, while economic events at home raised concerns about the vitality of our system. Throughout most of the 1970s inflation raged at unacceptably high rates, and unemployment moved upward. Stagflation, a name invented for the era, and malaise were the words used to describe America.

Western ideals of freedom of thought, expression, and enterprise, flows in our direction. By strengthening our military posture and reaffirming our commitment to the cause of freedom throughout the world, we have restored respect for America and have achieved the first arms control agreement in history to eliminate an entire class of nuclear missiles. And by reducing taxes and regulatory bureaucracy, we have unleashed the creative genius of ordinary Americans and ushered in an unparalleled period of peacetime prosperity. The world today is far safer, and more prosperous, than it was 8 years ago. And the America of today is, once again, brimming with self-confidence and a model for other countries to emulate. To be sure, there are challenges for the future, but I leave office confident that, with continued cooperation between the President and the Congress, America will meet these challenges and, in partnership with its allies, will continue to lead the world toward peace, prosperity, and freedom.

The other system believes that power emanates from the individual, not from the state; that the function of government is to serve, not dictate to, individuals. The great democracies recognize that political and economic freedom are indivisible; policies that threaten one of these freedoms inevitably undermine the other. These two divergent systems have vied, sometimes with words and sometimes with swords, for the hearts and minds of the rest of the world.

At the end of World War II the outcome of this competition was, to some, far from certain. Many intellectuals, looking back upon the experience of the depression in the interwar period, felt that the future was with communism. These people felt that capitalism, with its emphasis on the individual and decentralized decisionmaking, could not cope with the complexity of a modern economy. In the years that followed, some countries chose state planning and state ownership over the alleged chaos of the marketplace, while many more countries had this authoritarian system imposed upon them. Centralized control was especially attractive for many newly emerging economies, which felt themselves impoverished from, and were resentful of, their colonial experience.

Today, few doubt which of these systems will emerge triumphant. Comparisons of economies with common cultures and people, such as North and South Korea, East and West Germany, or the People's Republic of China and Hong Kong or Taiwan, uniformly show that systems that emphasized individual initiative, open markets, and personal freedoms -- as opposed to collective action -- have prospered most. Developing economies have increasingly recognized the benefits of the market system as they have undertaken reforms to reduce the role of government and to increase the role of international trade. Most recently, this trend has even embraced the two largest proponents of state control, as first China and now the Soviet Union have reluctantly recognized that the true chains on individual fulfillment are an overbearing government that destroys motivation and freedom.

Viewed from the perspective of one who remembers well events of 40 years ago, the prosperity that we enjoy today is extraordinary. The economic growth experienced by countries that chose the path of economic and political freedom is virtually unparalleled in human history. This economic success is attributable to all nations that joined in pursuing market-oriented policies at home and in reducing barriers to trade among nations.

I said in my first Inaugural Address, ``If we look to the answer as to why for so many years we achieved so much, prospered as no other people on Earth, it was because here in this land we unleashed the energy and individual genius of man to a greater extent than has ever been done before.'' The central role of government must be to nurture this genius, not to shackle it in a morass of regulations or to tax away the incentives for innovation.

This is not to deny that there are vital functions that a government must perform, but it must always do so in the least intrusive and costly fashion. The guiding philosophy of my Administration has been to leave to private initiative all functions that individuals can effectively perform for themselves, and when government action is necessary, to use the level of government closest to the community for all the public functions it can effectively handle. Federal Government action should be reserved only for those functions that require national attention. In this way government will least interfere with private incentives and will be most responsive to the wishes of the people it serves.

Federal Government, of necessity, must provide for the national defense. Only through strength can we maintain peace and secure freedom and prosperity for ourselves and all free nations. But we must ensure that our defense money is spent wisely, not on pork-barrel projects, such as maintaining military bases that are no longer necessary. This Administration, through its words and its deeds, has shown its commitment to protecting the health and financial security of our elderly. Similarly, the government must provide a safety net for the Nation's poor, but is must do so in a way that promotes individual initiative.

The main role of government is to provide a stable economic environment that allows each individual to reach his or her full potential. Individuals and businesses must be able to make long-run plans confident that the government will not change the rules halfway through the game. Government's drain on the economy, both through its use of resources that could be used more productively by the private sector and through taxes that destroy individual incentives, must be minimized. This Administration's long-term view of fiscal policy, which abandoned the outmoded emphasis on fine-tuning the economy, has set the basis for the record peacetime expansion we currently enjoy. This policy, in conjunction with responsible monetary policy, has led to a sizable decrease in both unemployment rates and inflation over the past 8 years. I am pleased to say that my Administration is the first in more than a generation that can lay claim to this accomplishment.

The government's economic role in the international sphere should be similarly circumspect. It is the primary responsibility of governments to promote sound and stable financial markets that encourage international commerce and to reduce barriers to trade at home and abroad. Reducing these barriers will allow markets, not governments, to determine the goods that society produces. Too often policies designed to preserve jobs in one industry reduce competitiveness and employment in other industries. A creative, competitive America is the answer to a changing world, not trade wars that close doors, create greater barriers, and destroy millions of jobs. We should always remember: Protectionism is destructionism. America's jobs, America's growth, America's future depend on trade -- trade that is free, open, and fair.

In my first Inaugural Address I stated, ``The economic ills we suffer have come upon us over several decades. They will not go away in days, weeks, or months, but they will go away.'' After a shaky start, necessitated by the sorry state of the economy in 1980, we now have a peacetime economy entering an unprecedented 7th year of expansion. The length, strength, and resilience of this expansion are ample testimony to the wisdom of the policies that we have pursued.

During this expansion, real GNP has risen by more than 4 percent a year, nearly double the growth rate of the previous 8 years. The growth in employment and jobs has been phenomenal; nearly 19 million nonagricultural jobs have been created during this period, with nearly 3.5 million new jobs created in the first 11 months of 1988. Furthermore, this remarkable expansion has benefited all segments of the population. While civilian employment has increased by more than 17 percent, Hispanic employment has grown by more than 45 percent, black employment by nearly 30 percent, and female employment by more than 20 percent.

And, assertions to the contrary, the jobs created are good ones; over 90 percent of the new jobs are full-time, and over 85 percent of these full-time jobs are in occupations in which average annual salaries exceed $20,000.

Unlike previous experiences, this expansion has been accomplished without simultaneously fueling inflation. The average inflation rate during this period, as measured by the GNP deflator, has been barely one-third the rate of inflation that prevailed in 1980. The scourge of inflation, which served as a hidden tax on the American people and diverted productive resources to unproductive uses, has been brought under control here and in our major trading partners. This, in turn, has led to a dramatic decline in interest rates, which, while still high by historic standards, are far lower than they were in January 1981. In short, we have achieved the objectives that eluded us during the 1970s -- rapid economic growth and declining inflation rates.

This record has been achieved not through alchemy, but by using that good old-fashioned recipe of reducing the role of government. Too often the government has sought to solve problems best left to the private sector; and too often these solutions have had devastating side effects. We have at least learned that more government is not the solution to our problem; often it is the problem.

New Beginning has restored personal incentives through a series of tax reforms and tax cuts. These reforms have reduced the top Federal marginal income tax rate to less than one-half the level that prevailed when we took office and decreased tax liabilities at all income levels. The Tax Reform Act of 1986 improved efficiency by eliminating many tax preferences that distort private decision-making. By reducing tax rates and tax loopholes, we have encouraged people to make money the old-fashioned way -- by producing goods and services that people want, not by finding new ways to avoid taxes. The tax reforms have increased equity as well, as an estimated 4 million low-income individuals and families have been removed from the income tax rolls by 1988. If imitation is the sincerest form of praise, then the fact that many other major industrial powers have also cut their tax rates is praise indeed.

These tax reforms, combined with regulatory reforms that will result in billions of dollars of saving over this decade, have helped spur productivity growth. Since 1981, manufacturing productivity has grown at an average annual rate exceeding 4 percent, triple the rate for the preceding 8 years and nearly 50 percent faster than that for the period 1948 - 73. This productivity growth, combined with exchange-rate changes, has led to a surge in U.S. exports that puts to rest the notion that U.S. industry is no longer competitive.

We have also made progress in reining in government expenditures, but much still needs to be done. We have reduced the rate of growth of Federal spending, and over the past 5 years government spending as a percent of GNP has fallen from 25.1 to 23.2 percent. Significant progress has also been made in reducing the budget deficit, both in absolute terms and as a percent of GNP, but further progress can be made only by reducing government spending. Tax increases would only threaten the enormous progress that has been made so far.

Our successes extend to the international sphere as well. The strong U.S. recovery, coupled with a weaker recovery abroad, helped create a sizable U.S. trade deficit. While the trade deficit has been significantly reduced during the past year as a result of our surging exports, it has served as an excuse for those seeking protection from foreign competition. Protectionism, like most forms of government intervention in the economy, serves only to enrich the few at the expense of the many. We have successfully resisted this protectionist pressure, while pursuing major trade liberalization efforts abroad.

Free-Trade Agreement was the first such agreement entered into by the United States. The recently implemented Free-Trade Agreement with Canada represents an historic step forward for two staunch allies. In addition to creating the world's largest free-trade area between two countries and generating large benefits for both countries, it serves as a model of what can be accomplished in other negotiating forums. The United States remains committed to full multilateral liberalization, as reflected in the fact that we are the driving force behind the current Uruguay Round of multilateral negotiations under the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade. While these negotiations are not scheduled to conclude until 1990, the results of the recent Mid-term Review indicate that they will result in significant reductions in trade barriers and a significant expansion in trade coverage.

Rather than succumbing to protectionist pressures at home, we have vigorously combatted unfair trade barriers abroad. This was the first Administration to seek, on its own initiative, changes in foreign trade practices that harmed American business. These policies have helped reduce foreign trade barriers and given American companies a chance to compete on equal terms.

As proud as I am of these and many other accomplishments, I will be the first to admit that the agenda is not yet completed. First, and foremost, is a need to reform the budget process and to bring Federal spending under control. The large budget deficit that this Nation faces is not a result of too few taxes, but too much spending. Strong economic growth and the base-broadening effect of tax reform have led to sizable increases in Federal receipts. According to current projections, these receipts will have increased by over $375 billion between fiscal years 1981 and 1989, but spending will have increased more rapidly -- by more than $450 billion over this 8-year period. Projections indicate that Federal revenue will grow by more than $80 billion during the next fiscal year. All that is required to reduce the deficit is to halt, or moderate, the increase in expenditures.

Gramm-Rudman-Hollings is a first step toward bringing the deficit under control. However, further progress toward reform of the budget process is needed. Under current practice, funding for special-interest groups is combined with vital appropriations, leaving the President the choice between vetoing the entire package or accepting some funding that he knows is not in the national interest. To prevent this waste of taxpayers' money, the President needs what governors already have -- a line-item veto and enhanced rescission authority.

Moreover, the current budget process places no real restraint on congressional appropriations, because expanded spending on one program does not require reduced spending on other programs. Too often the temptation is to raise taxes, not lower spending. A law that requires a super majority of the Congress to approve waivers of spending limits or tax limits would help ensure that taxpayers' hard-earned dollars are spent wisely, and that the temptation to increase tax burdens is resisted. Furthermore, reform of government credit operations is required to limit new subsidies and to guarantee that the true costs of these measures are not hidden from public scrutiny. These reforms, together with the balanced budget amendment that I have repeatedly endorsed, would guarantee the fiscal prudence that is needed to sustain the dramatic expansion of the past 6 years. Limiting government expenditures would also help stimulate the private investment that is required to ensure that the next generation of Americans can look forward to the same increase in living standards that previous generations have enjoyed.

Despite the enormous progress we have already made in bringing down inflation, there is still work to be done. Inflation is a hidden, insidious way of taxing the American people. Price stability, not merely lowered inflation, is the key to maintaining the vigor of the American economy and the strong international role of the dollar. Stable, predictable monetary policy can provide the type of price stability that benefits not only our own economy, but also provides significant benefits to those developing countries that are so dependent upon us.

Perhaps most importantly, the challenge for the future is to maintain and expand upon the progress we have made in taking economic decisions away from the government and returning them to the private sector, where they properly belong.

Governments are notoriously bad at identifying ``industries of the future,'' and efforts to have the government formulate and implement industrial policy must be strongly resisted. For decades, government policies throughout the world have distorted agricultural production and trade. Adoption of our bold proposal to phase out these policies in the United States and other major producing countries would result in enormous efficiency gains. And, while major deregulatory gains have been made, much more can be accomplished. Reduced regulation of vital sectors, including transportation, energy, and financial industries, has led to significant increases in productivity and to sizable gains for consumers. Further deregulation of the financial sector can help preserve this country's position as the financial capital of the world.

Finally, we must resist pressure to increase government requirements for mandated benefits. These programs, while well-intentioned, increase costs, reduce labor market flexibility, and reduce productivity. They undermine the competitiveness of American business and they ultimately hurt the very people they are supposed to benefit.

Well, thank you, Senator Mitchell and Ambassador vanden Heuvel. It's a particular pleasure for me to be here today, as I near the end of my career in public life. The historian William Leuchtenburg has written about how Franklin Roosevelt aroused the interest of young men and women in politics and government and drew them into the national service. From the brain trusters to the many idealists who staffed the agencies and bureaus of the New Deal, his magic brought thousands to Washington. But I can tell you from personal experience that it didn't stop there. All across the Nation, millions of new voters looked at this President who was filled with confidence in the future, faith in the people, and the joy of the democratic rough-and-tumble, and they said to themselves maybe someday they, too, would like to serve the Nation in public life.

I was one of those millions. Franklin Roosevelt was the first President I ever voted for, the first to serve in my lifetime that I regarded as a hero, and the first I ever actually saw; that was in 1936, a campaign parade in Des Moines, where I was working as a radio announcer. What a wave of affection and pride swept through that crowd, as he passed by in an open car -- a familiar smile on his lips, jaunty and confident, drawing from us a reservoir of confidence and enthusiasm some of us had forgotten we had in those days, those hard years. He really did convince us that the only thing we had to fear was, as Senator Mitchell has told us, fear itself.

And it was that ebullience, that infectious optimism that made one young sportscaster think that maybe he should be more active as a citizen. I assure you, though, he never tied that to one day holding public office and certainly never dreamed that destiny would take him to the same office F.D.R. held.

But to my mind, James MacGregor Burns caught the core of President Roosevelt's contribution when he included in his list, ``Faith in the people.'' The months before F.D.R. took office are far behind us now. We forget what they were like -- the pink slips handed out at factories across the land with no jobs anywhere if you lost yours, the soup kitchens in every major city, the look of desperation in people's eyes. And we forget that, in the unprecedented economic crisis, many had begun to question our most basic institutions, including our democracy itself. And then along came F.D.R., who put his faith, as he said, ``in the forgotten man,'' the ordinary American.

I remember that voice of his, as we've heard it here today, coming over the radio -- its strength, its optimism. I wonder how many of us in this room know that to this day, no program in the history of radio has ever equalled the audience he had in his fireside chats. I remember how a light would snap on in the eyes of everyone in the room just hearing him, and how, because of his faith, our faith in our own capacity to overcome any crisis and any challenge was reborn.

In this sense, F.D.R. renewed the charter of the founders of our nation. The founders had created a government of ``We the people.'' Through a depression and a great war, crises that could well have led us in another direction, F.D.R. strengthened that charter. When others doubt, he said that we would find our salvation in our own hands -- not in some elite but in ourselves. We'd find it where we'd always found it: in the towns, on the farms, in the stores and factories across America.

One other thing about F.D.R. -- he understood history and how history lives in a nation's life. He was, as you've been told, the first President to establish a Presidential library to house all his papers and collections. The first meeting of supporters of the library was held 50 years ago next month. F.D.R. addressed it, and in explaining his feeling for history, he told a story that I thought I'd tell you.

F.D.R. knew that the history of the Nation's past is part of its charter for the future. To my mind, as one who has served in the office F.D.R. once graced so magnificently, no higher tribute can be given a President than that he strengthened our faith in ourselves, which is the foundation of that charter.

Policies come and go. Leaders will pass from the stage. The enduring sail and compass of our nation is ``We the people.'' When the American people are strong and confident, when their leaders hear their voices, America, whatever storms it might be weathering, will make it through. It will survive, and it will prevail. Franklin Roosevelt was what they used to call on the Mississippi a lightening captain of the ship of state because he gave us all the confidence to be lightening captains in our own way.

I shall be very proud to have both of these in another Presidential library, following in the footsteps of the man who started those institutions. And I'm grateful to all of you. I thought he was a Democrat when he was supporting me.

The President. We're very pleased today to be presenting these medals to Natan Shcharanskiy and his wife, Avital, who couldn't be here with us today. And we're going forward with the ceremony, and then we're pleased also to have his mother, his brother, and his cousin here with us. And also to have the wife of Congressman Gilman, Mrs. Gilman, who is the one who sponsored the legislation the Congress created for these medals.

So, now we'll have the presentation. And I want to point out in presenting this medal to you, what it really means and what -- [inaudible] -- service that you've given. This is in behalf of all mankind, not just all Americans. Because of what you've done for people who are persecuted and oppressed throughout the whole world, your courage over the years -- 9 years of imprisonment on false charges, and still retained your poise and your strength to do this.

Shcharanskiy. Thank you very much. Dear President, I know you are finishing your 8 years. And when you retire you'll probably be writing memoirs, as all of us do, and you'll be thinking about the past. And if you have some sad moments, think about my happy family. And think about thousands and thousands of people who are praying -- in Soviet camps -- who are praying and asking from the gods to give you strength and stubbornness and assistance to you, to you, Mr. Shultz, to American people in the struggle for their rights, and who are free today not because of some good will of Soviet leaders but because of their struggle and your struggle.

And to you, President-elect, dear George, please think about those thousands and thousands who are still there and who are praying now for you and know that you will be as stubborn. And they are sure you will be stubborn, as firm in striving for defending human rights in the Soviet Union. And, of course, all your work in the Soviet Jewry and the -- [inaudible] -- Jewry and other things convinces us that you'll continue that fantastically good record of human rights which President Reagan -- and Secretary Shultz and American Congressmen -- heads, and made possible our freedom and freedom of our brothers and sisters. Thank you very much.

Shcharanskiy. Thank you very much. She -- a pure uphill struggle, which was successful only because of the strong support of Israel, of America, of all the world. And because the White House, together with Congress, turned into the headquarters of the struggle. And that's why it was so successful in bringing freedom to me and to many other people. Thank you.

Shultz. Mr. President, you have heard from all of us how honored we are to have served in your Cabinet and to be associated in some way with all of the things that have happened that have done so much for our country and for stability throughout the world. And we thought you probably were tired of hearing us say that. And you're wondering, could there be something a little more tangible connected with it? [Laughter] So, we all got together and chipped in and purchased this chair that has on the back of it ``The President.'' And so, I now want to ask the person with the most continuous seniority in office to do the honors. Sam?

The President. Well, there are some things that are no longer there. And there have been some tightening up in the line of adopting modern business practices that I think have made quite considerable changes that are not usually seen because they're in the form of kind of administrative changes.

The President. No. This country was meant to be -- well, ``We the people.'' The people told the Government what it could do in the Constitution. It's the only -- well, there's one other constitution which is something like that in the world, I've found out. It's the only one that really says that. All those other constitutions are documents in which the Governments tell the people what they can do.

During the current 6-month period, the Office has issued licenses to individuals and corporations to permit them to engage in activities that would otherwise be prohibited by the Regulations. Under the Office's licensing procedures, 12 individuals registered to remain in Libya with Libyan immediate family members. Four licenses were extended authorizing transactions in connection with U.S. persons' filings or renewals of Libyan patents, copyrights, and trademarks. The Office also issued licenses to Bankers Trust Company, Manufacturers Hanover Trust Company, and the Bank of America authorizing the debiting of certain Libyan accounts held by their London branches. Finally, the Office licensed a service contractor that had been operating in Libya prior to the imposition of the Libyan sanctions to sell certain of its equipment in Libya to a Libyan purchaser.

Various enforcement actions mentioned in previous reports continue to be pursued. In June 1988, the U.S. Customs Service seized a shipment of canned tuna valued at $430,600 for an attempted transshipment to Libya through the United States from Mexico. In July 1988, a U.S. national, facing criminal charges for repeated visits to Libya to work in the oil industry, paid a $5,000 civil penalty and signed a consent agreement that he would refrain from travel to Libya. This marked the first instance of an independent civil penalty being imposed under the Regulations.

The latter defendant received a sentence of 5 years' imprisonment and a separate suspended sentence with 10 years' parole, while the other coconspirators received suspended sentences and deportation orders. A total of $600,300 in fines was paid in this enforcement action.

Three cases are pending in an English court, involving claims by Libya seeking the release of funds blocked in the London branches of Bankers Trust Company and Manufacturers Hanover Trust Company. The United States Government is not a party to these cases, but is closely monitoring the proceedings. Hearings in one of these cases are scheduled to commerce on January 16, 1989.

Christensen, an arbitrator and professor of law at New York University School of Law. Dr. Thomas Francis Carey and Dr. Mark Leo Kahn were appointed as members of the Board. This dispute was investigated by a prior Presidential Emergency Board No. 214, which issued recommendations for settlement of the dispute. Presidential Emergency Board No. 217 was ordered to select the most reasonable final offer submitted by the parties.

After formal hearings and careful study of the final offers submitted by the parties, the Board selected PATH's final offer as the most reasonable. The primary features of PATH's final offer are a 5-percent increase in all rates in each year of a 3-year contract beginning in June 1985, improvements in medical and life insurance, and the addition of Martin Luther King's birthday as a holiday.

It's been my responsibility, my duty, and very much my honor to serve as Commander in Chief of this nation's Armed Forces these past 8 years. That is the most sacred, most important task of the Presidency. Since our nation's founding, the primary obligation of the national government has been the common defense of these United States. But as I have sought to perform this sacred task as best I could, I have done so with the knowledge that my role in this day-to-day-to-day effort, from sunrise to sunrise, every moment of every hour of every day of every year, is a glancing one compared to yours.

And the credit, the gratitude of a nation comfortable and at peace, properly goes not to me but rather to all of you. For you have, of your own free and true good will, chosen to spend all or part of your lives in service to your country and your countrymen.

We live in an age of great prosperity and ease, a time when many people your age are getting themselves established in the world in circumstances of comfort that would astonish your ancestors. You have chosen a different path, a path of service to country and to others rather than to self. You have made yourselves a shining example of how men and women can find within themselves qualities of self-sacrifice, bravery, camaraderie, and true courage. These are many of the noblest virtues to which humankind can aspire. They are martial virtues. You have made the comfortable lives of your fellow Americans possible by taking on these responsibilities by choice. And over the past 8 years, the luster has been restored to the reputation of our fighting forces after a time during which it was shamefully fashionable to deride and even condemn service such as yours. Those days will never come again.

But it's not just your fellow Americans who owe you a debt. No, I believe many more do, for I believe that military service in the Armed Forces of the United States is a profound form of service to all humankind. You stand engaged in an effort to keep America safe at home, to protect our allies and interests abroad, to keep the seas and the skies free of threat. Just as America stands as an example to the world of the inestimable benefits of freedom and democracy, so too an America with the capacity to project her power for the purpose of protecting and expanding freedom and democracy abroad benefits the suffering people of the world.

Just ask the freedom-loving people of Grenada whether American military power is a good thing or not. Because we remained strong, because we acted when we believed we had to, in the past 8 years not one inch of ground on this Earth fell under Communist control. We cannot name the tens of millions who have been saved from that fate, so we cannot ask them. Rather ask those unfortunate enough to have lived under communism. Ask them whether America should be strong. Ask them whether America should stand tall. Ask them. You don't have to. You know the answer.

You were and are willing to fight and die for America and for freedom and democracy. And some have -- 595, to be exact, over these past 8 years -- some have died. They're not with us today because they're at God's right hand. In the air and on the seas, in battle or as victims of terrorism, they gave their lives while in the service of their country, while representing us and defending what we hold dear. They volunteered. They chose to serve. They gave their lives. They are our heroes. I have seen the faces of those who served with them and those who commanded them, and I know the truth of the old maxim that there is none who hates war as much as he who knows it well; none who knows as well how agonizingly high are its costs, how agonizing are its losses. And I would like to ask right now that we observe a moment of silence in memory of those we have lost.

Who, indeed. Where, I have at times asked myself, where do you all come from? How have you managed to cohere into the crack, disciplined, patriotic brand [band] of brothers I see before me this morning? Well, the answer's simple. You come from the southwest and the northeast, from the Rockies and the Adirondacks, from the inner cities and the most remote of farms. You come from America, and you are America's pride. And on behalf of all America, I thank you and pray God that He may bless you now and forever.

Pursuant to the requirements of the statute, I am enclosing both classified and unclassified versions of the Nuclear Weapons Complex Modernization Study. This report will enable the Administration and the Congress to adopt a long-term approach to modernization rather than a piecemeal response to the problems within the nuclear weapons complex. I am pleased to forward it for consideration by the Congress.

Marble statuary and granite monuments, imposing as they may be, can never speak with the eloquence reserved only for a living memorial. The Challenger Center is a living tribute to the brave and courageous crew of the Space Shuttle Challenger who made the supreme sacrifice 3 years ago. The mission and work of this crew will continue with their same sense of dedication and vision at the Challenger Center.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twelfth day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-nine, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

Children are gifts from God, the Bible tells us, and that is what America's parents through the centuries have known their youngsters to be. We have sought to give our children -- our kids -- love and well-being in the present and hope and opportunity for the future. We have also sought to give them a realization of their God-given individual worth and dignity, the liberty that is their due as Americans and human beings, and the reverence, thanks, and obedience we owe the Almighty for making us His children.

Many youngsters suffer the effects of permissiveness, lack of guidance, drug and alcohol abuse, and absence of religious faith. Fortunately, remedies for these ills do exist, and families and concerned citizens are doing all they can to guarantee a future of promise and fulfillment for their own children and for all our kids. We owe our gratitude and cooperation to those who encourage us to give our children the spiritual as well as material sustenance we all need.

We must also continue to strive for public policies, educational reforms, and conditions of economic growth and opportunity that help meet every child's material needs -- that break the cycle of poverty and foster health, prosperity, and progress for our kids, families, communities, and Nation. We must continue to aid school dropouts; youngsters who run away or are forced to leave home; and victims of child abuse, pornography, and prostitution. We must recognize our duty to report suspected child abuse and neglect, and to do the same in cases of selling liquor and illegal drugs to minors. And we must teach youngsters the beauty of the loving, lifelong relationship between husband and wife that is marriage.

As we celebrate this special month, let us be mindful of the worth of every child, recognize our youngsters' accomplishments, and rededicate ourselves to providing help and support for all who need them. And let us be sure to do these things with a prayer in our hearts as we prove that, truly, America Loves Its Kids.

These voluntary, independently operated Associations supply a wide range of services, including nursing care by registered nurses; homemaking, therapy, and social services by qualified specialists; friendly visiting services; and many other forms of assistance provided by volunteers in each community served by an Association.

The care provided by the Associations enables hundreds of thousands of Americans to recover from illnesses and injury in the comfort and security of their homes, regardless of their ability to pay. Thousands of patients with mental or physical handicaps or with chronically disabling illnesses would be unable to remain at home without the therapeutic benefits of the Associations' care and support services.

I want particularly to thank Ambassador Dubinin for the great cooperation the Soviet Government has provided in making this exchange possible. It's just been 8 months since I proposed this program to President Gorbachev, and I'm very happy to see it already underway as I prepare to leave office. Let me also commend Charlie Wick for the outstanding work that he's done in organizing this and other exchange programs. Under his leadership, USIA has made a vital contribution to United States-Soviet relations through development of people-to-people programs that make it possible for us to better understand one another and the world we live in.

Now to all of you, the American and the Soviet students here today, I want to tell you that I share your excitement. You're representing your countries in a new international program. You have received a unique opportunity to learn about another country, and you've embarked on a great personal adventure. To the Soviet students, I want to say, welcome to America. You've made a long voyage to come here, but I think you'll find many things to delight and fascinate you.

Last spring, I spoke to students at Moscow State University where some of you may go on to complete your studies. I talked to them about the political and economic system in the United States. But you'll have the chance to see it for yourself. And I think you'll find American democracy and our free economy both remarkable and thrilling. What with our political parties and our open elections, all of the independent media, free labor unions, private businesses, and private organizations of every type and size, America has more different, independent participants in our system than we have flavors of ice cream. And believe me, we have a lot of flavors of ice cream.

For the American students -- whose Russian, I understand, is a little better than mine -- I found my visit to the Soviet Union last spring very fascinating. And all of you will have an even greater opportunity to learn about life in that country. The Soviet Union encompasses a remarkably rich and diverse culture. You'll find some of the world's greatest literature, art, and music. And you'll also find other young people who will be very interested in learning more about you and where you come from. I'm especially pleased that you'll be staying with Soviet families because -- for all the differences between our systems of government and the practical and philosophical differences are important -- I think you will find that as people we share so much. Above all, we share our common humanity and our dreams of peace and freedom and a decent life for ourselves and our children.

For the students from both countries, you will have the chance to imagine what it would be like to grow up in the other country, go to their schools, to work, to worship, and to raise a family. You'll hear each other's music and see each other's fashion, and share with each other your personal goals and ambitions and personal hopes. And I think as you get to know each other and become friends with each other, you may come to believe something that I have long believed and felt myself: and that is that most of the problems in this world between countries do not exist between people. People around the world have much more in common than they do differences. The differences are between governments, and the problems are between governments. It's not people who begin wars or suppress freedom, it's governments that do that. As I've said many times, if it were just up to young people like you, if you could all get together and meet one another, I think you'd become fast friends. And I don't think there would ever be another war.

Well, you have a lot to look forward to, and not only the exchange program. This is a fascinating time to be alive, and I think your generation will lead us into one of the most exciting ages in human history. You know, as I look at all of you, I can't tell which of you are American and which are Soviet. And I'm glad that you will have this chance to get to know one another and to learn from one another. So, I won't take any time now to talk about my operation. [Laughter] I will just say a thank you to all of you, and God bless all of you.

Highness, President Peter Grace, and ladies and gentlemen, tonight for me is a moment from humility: to stand here before you, the members of the most ancient order of its kind in the world, formed in the Holy Land 900 years ago -- or as some of us would say, only yesterday. [Laughter] But to stand in this way before the members of this order with its remarkable history, which speaks to the entire ebb and flow of Western civilization, and its noble present, which is a monument to the highest values of free men and women, is to be reminded once again that the only true calling of man is service to God, and to have served in that calling is cause not for pride but for gratitude.

Today, as for nine centuries, you, the Knights and Dames of Malta, serve the victims of poverty, hunger, and disease. I have often noted that in America we have a tradition that began when the first community of settlers joined together to help build a home for a newcomer: the tradition of neighbor helping neighbor, the tradition of the barn-raising and the settlement house and the church-run hospital, the tradition that Tocqueville spoke of in wonderment more than a century and a half ago when he observed that when there was a job to do Americans didn't wait for the government but pitched in and did it for themselves. Well, yes, an American tradition, but one more ancient and universal as well, of which history offers few examples more crystalline and enduring than the Knights of Malta.

But to return to faith, hope, and love, your work with the ill, in particular, those with leprosy, now those with AIDS; your partnership with Americans [Americares] and its president, Bob Macauley, to move medicine to those in need all over the world; your support of Mother Teresa's care for the poorest of the poor; your work feeding the hungry in Latin America -- these are some of the highest examples of love, compassion, and mercy in our time. They show the power of faith moving in the modern world.

I've heard a lot about this being the era of greed, usually from those who really mean that taxes are too low and government is too small. I wish these critics would explain how it is that in the past 8 years, during this supposed era of greed, charitable giving has risen to record highs in our nation -- last year, in cash alone, $94.7 billion. And not too long ago, we found it's even higher than we thought. No one, it turned out, had ever fully added up what Americans give to their neighbors in need through their churches, synagogues, and other religious organizations. Some of this was because of the difficulty of gathering the information, but I expect that it may also have reflected a secularist bias.

Whenever we've talked about the immensity of American giving, critics have been quick to retort, well, that much of it is through church congregations and that not much of that goes to the poor and the hungry. Now, a private organization called Independent Sector has added up what America's congregations actually do pass on -- not just conjecture about it. It found that the giving to the needy from those sources amounts to more than half of the national total. In other words, we already knew that private giving in America -- through corporations, foundations, and other easily seen bodies -- was the highest in the world, and now we know that this giving is only about a third of all American private givings to the needy. That sure doesn't sound like greed to me.

By the way, I suspect that a dollar that comes from our churches and synagogues goes farther to help those in need than one that comes from the Government. And I don't mean just because the Government's overhead is higher. No, it's that the state's power is, at its root, the power to coerce, for example, to demand taxes. The power of the church is the power of love. And that makes all the difference.

Why is it that in this city which spends so much on its social service bureaucracy so many young people find their refuge and salvation in Father Ritter's Covenant House? Could it be that there in the priests and nuns and volunteers they see the face of love entering their lives for the first time? They aren't a case to be handled, which they would be if they were in the hands of the government agencies, but a soul to be cherished.

Twenty years ago the Government declared a war on poverty. Poverty won. Too many poor people were sucked into a system that declared that the only sin is not to have enough money. Soon, too many became dependent on government payments and lost the moral strength that has always given the poor the determination to climb America's ladder of opportunity.

In just 7 days I will lay down the mantle of this great office the American people have bestowed upon me. I won't leave the battle. As long as there is breath in me, I will fight for the principles in which I believe. But if I may, in this moment of leaving office, make two special requests of you: The first is that you prepare now to be part of the voice of life in the great debate ahead, and the second, that you help America find a way out of the trap of the welfare state. Help it find a way to open the doors of hope and love -- open them as no state, any state, ever can -- for those in need. Help open the promises of this land of shining opportunity to all.

And you who have so willingly and ably taken up the burdens of freedom, through the Knights and throughout your lives, you who are surely part of what Jefferson called our natural aristocracy, you will surely be in the front as ``We the People'' turn to the dawn of America's tomorrows.

Over the years I've greatly enjoyed this opportunity to get together with you and report on the week's events here in Washington. But next week, after witnessing the inauguration of George Bush as President, Nancy and I will head back to the ranch. We go with full hearts, with best wishes for George and Barbara, and with gratitude to all of you. It's been a privilege to serve the people and the Nation we've always loved and love so much today.

But as I look back over these Saturday talks, I can't help but think about how often at moments of accomplishment and triumph, as well as crisis and heartbreak, we came together in this way: a President giving his accounting to those, under our system of government, to whom he is accountable. We've shared a great deal together; for me it's been a special relationship. Believe me, Saturdays will never seem the same. I'll miss you.

But you know, somehow messages of farewell, leave-taking, and nostalgia don't quite capture my mood today. Don't get me wrong, we've had great years and done much together. The economy is booming. Long-festering social problems like drugs, crime, and a decline in our educational standards are being dealt with. And for the first time in the postwar era, the Soviet menace shows some signs of relenting. This last development is, of course, so heartening to those of us who have lived through all the brooding terrors of the postwar era. We're prayerful and hopeful -- hopeful that the next generation of Americans will not have to contend as we did with the nightmares of nuclear terror and totalitarian expansionism.

You know, shortly after World War II and the struggle against Nazi Germany, Winston Churchill looked with grave concern and sadness at a world that evolved so quickly, as he put it, from ``triumph and tragedy.'' But then as he began to detect the vigor and resolve of America against the Soviet menace and for freedom in Europe and everywhere in the world -- a vigor and resolve shared equally by an American President and an American Congress of different political parties -- he grew hopeful and grateful for this unselfish, bipartisan unity.

Well, generous words, honest emotion from a great world leader; and now, more than a quarter century later, as the decade of the eighties comes to a close, there is hope that the generosity and resolve that Churchill saw in the American people is at last paying an historic dividend: the possibility of a new time in human history when all the problems that so haunted the postwar world give way to peace and expansion of freedom.

So, you can see why to me, the story of these last 8 years and this Presidency goes far beyond any personal concerns. It is a continuation really of a far larger story, a story of a people and a cause -- a cause that from our earliest beginnings has defined us as a nation and given purpose to our national existence.

The hope of human freedom -- the quest for it, the achievement of it -- is the American saga. And I've often recalled one group of early settlers making a treacherous crossing of the Atlantic on a small ship when their leader, a minister, noted that perhaps their venture would fail and they would become a byword, a footnote to history. But perhaps, too, with God's help, they might also found a new world, a city upon a hill, a light unto the nations.

Those words and that destiny beckon to us still. Whether we seek it or not, whether we like it or not, we Americans are keepers of the miracles. We are asked to be guardians of a place to come to, a place to start again, a place to live in the dignity God meant for his children. May it ever be so.

The report recommends that Section 360D of the Public Health Service Act that requires the completion of this annual report be repealed. All the information found in this report is available to the Congress on a more immediate basis through congressional committee oversight and budget hearings. This annual report serves little useful purpose and diverts taxpayers' money from productive uses.

President today announced his intention to appoint Governor George A. Sinner to be a member of the Advisory Commission on Intergovernmental Relations for a term of 2 years. He would succeed John Carlin.

Strong support for our Nation's science and technology has been the policy of this Administration. The goals of this support are enhanced national security, increased economic strength and competitiveness, and improved quality of life. Today, more than every before, we must use our technical resources purposefully and effectively in order to retain international leadership.

This report highlights the significant Government decisions and actions in science and technology and the future outlook in selected areas of science and engineering. It also presents the Federal research and development programs and discusses results and achievements, as appropriate. The international cooperation aspects of Federal research and development programs, including a summary of the associated negotiations and agreements concluded, are given special emphasis.

When we took office in 1981, Federal outlays were increasing almost 17 percent a year -- an unsustainable rate. There was no organized approach toward reducing waste, fraud, and mismanagement; no Governmentwide management systems; no cash and credit management systems; and there were nearly 400 incompatible accounting systems.

Cash Management. The Federal Government now recognizes that cash is an asset and that there are major cost benefits to be achieved by managing cash intelligently. The application of business-like practices to manage the Government's annual cash flow have saved $4.3 billion since 1983. In FY 1988 alone, the Government realized interest savings of almost $1 billion. And, Federal agencies now pay 87 percent of their bills on time -- making us not only a desirable, responsible business partner, but also saving the Government millions of dollars in interest payments and late payment penalties each year.

These electronic links enable 450 financial institutions around the country to wire funds to the U.S. Treasury within one business day. Further, 234 lockboxes operated by financial institutions have reduced from one month to three days the time required by agencies to receive and process payments.

Government now accepts credit cards. Examples of Government credit card acceptance include: duties and seized property sales, medical services, Government publications, passports, and recreational facilities fees.

Credit Management. We put into place routine private sector practices to better manage the Government's credit portfolio. Applicants for Federal loans, contracts, grants, and jobs are now prescreened for their creditworthiness.

Loan asset sales allow the transfer of loan management responsibilities, and risks, to the private sector. In 1987, the loan asset sales pilot program at the Departments of Agriculture and Education yielded $3.1 billion in third-party sales. In 1988, proceeds from sales and prepayments were $8.2 billion.

In addition, the Federal Government is now engaged in aggressive efforts to collect money owed it. These efforts include the use of private sector collection firms, offsetting tax refunds due delinquent debtors, offsetting the salaries of Federal employees who owe the Government, and Justice Department litigation and contracting with private attorneys for debt collection. Since 1982, an additional $3.7 billion owed the Government has been collected through these initiatives.

Financial Management. The Government is now building an effective system for managing the Government's over $2 trillion cash flow, processing more than 900 million payments, and paying its 5 million civilian and military personnel. For the first time, Governmentwide standards and systems have been established to provide consistency in financial and payroll reporting among all Federal agencies.

To assure consistency and adherence to sound financial management principles throughout the Government, a Chief Financial Officer (CFO) has been designated within the Office of Management and Budget, and CFOs for each agency are now in place.

Management'' environment in the Federal Government workplace. The goal of this program is to provide error-free, timely, and inexpensive services and products to the public. This commitment requires a fundamental change in attitudes and ways of doing business. One example of results that have been achieved is a reduction in the amount of time it takes to process a HUD property improvement loan, down from 86 days in 1985 to just 22 days in 1988.

Information Technology. Efficient use of computers, information technology, and management information systems are benefitting numerous programs that touch the lives of many Americans, including modernization of the social security system; redesign of the income tax system; improved weather forecasting; and safer air travel.

Agencies are now emphasizing better use of technology to deliver services and improve quality and timeliness. For example, in 1988, 2 million tax returns were filed electronically, reducing processing time and providing refunds in less than 3 weeks; and 12 of 20 air traffic control centers have been modernized, increasing reliability twentyfold.

Management inefficiencies can be caused as a result of poor planning, bad process, or lack of commitment. We have improved the latter two substantially, and have included, for the first time, a 10-year plan -- to the year 2000 -- for continuing to pattern the Federal Government services to the needs of the future.

In my 1990 budget, I have requested that $84 million, over and above that included in individual agency budget requests, be appropriated to the President for distribution to agencies to complete Reform '88 management initiatives. These funds will greatly enhance the capabilities of agency financial and accounting systems, and help introduce better quality in the services and products provided to the American public by its Government.

It is to the collective credit of Federal managers and employees that the Federal Government has made remarkable achievements in managing and streamlining its operations over the past eight years. The Federal Government rarely has the opportunity to take pride in its many accomplishments. This report allows the record to speak for itself. Our management improvement program, Reform '88, has achieved measurable results, saving billions of dollars for the American taxpayer and providing better, more efficient services to every American.

Millan has been with the First National Bank of Southwestern Ohio, serving as its chairman from 1980 to 1986. Although recently retired, he has been active in both civic and community relations. In 1965 Mr. Millan began volunteering to teach classes to inmates of the Lebanon Correctional Institution. This created a network involving business, education, and religious institutions in the retraining of inmates for productive lives.

Whether on the battlefield or Capitol Hill, Senator Robert Dole has served America heroically. Senate Majority Leader during one of the most productive Congresses of recent times, he has also been a friend to veterans, farmers, and Americans from every walk of life. Bob Dole has stood for integrity, straight talk, and achievement throughout his years of distinguished public service.

Michel, a man who could always be counted on by his President, his constituents, and his country. Selfless and devoted in his work as House Minority Leader, Bob Michel steered through Congress some of the most revolutionary and wide-ranging legislation of the postwar era. His legislative skills and distinguished service played a critical role in restoring America's economic and military strength and opening a new era of world peace through freedom.

Thurmond's legislative achievement but his character, fortitude, and strength of mind and heart. A former judge, Presidential candidate, and President pro tempore of the United States Senate, he worked to appoint conservative judges and strong performance of constitutional law. The achievement of more than six decades have made the name of Strom Thurmond synonymous with distinguished public service and devotion to America.

You know, Coach Rockne believed there are no shortcuts to success. Practice and hard work combined with respect for your opponent is the path one must take to achieve the greatest glory. And as Rockne himself once wrote: ``Sportsmanship means fairplay. It means having a little respect for the other fellow's point of view. It means a real application of the golden rule.'' Well, you young fellows here today are living proof of the truth of Rockne's ideas. All of you, coaches and players, have made sacrifices and bore many a burden, and you did it all for one goal: to be the very best.

Well, as I mentioned when I was on your campus last year, Knute liked spirit in his ballplayers. Once when he was working with the four backfield stars who became known as the Four Horsemen, one of the them, a fellow named Jim Crowley, just couldn't get it right. Now, you know, I never tell ethnic jokes -- unless they're about the Irish.

Well, at this year's Fiesta Bowl, you showed us what you're made of and reached the goal of being the very best. The West Virginia Mountaineers didn't luck into playing you for the national championship. No, just like you, they fought hard all season and earned the right to play for the title of being number one. And just like the Fighting Irish, they're a talented, well-coached team, and they deserve a salute. Their records should make them proud.

Holtz. Mr. President, it's indeed a thrill for us to be here. It's the number one football team in the country, and we're exceptionally proud of that. We're also exceptionally proud of the fact that we've won an award for graduating 100 percent of our football team of 5 years ago. We also realize that to reach a position such as this you have to be very lucky and very fortunate. We're also aware of the fact that many other teams could have been standing here rather than us had it not been for many good, fortunate things that happened to us.

It's a great thrill to be number one, but it's also a great thrill for any American -- it's a dream to be able to come to the White House to meet the President. I know I speak on behalf of our football team when we say we're deeply gratified and feel blessed to be here. It's been a great honor for us, but it's also a great honor to come here representing the University of Notre Dame family.

The idea of guards in the line, instead of charging forward against the other linemen on many plays, backing out and coming out of the line and leading the interference -- and I don't know whether I could have had a football career if he hadn't done that, because our coach copied it. I weighed 175. And I remember one day when the player opposite me on the line would go on to play with the Chicago Bears and then later be 8 years all pro tackle, and he weighed 275 pounds to my 175. His name was George Musso. And I can't tell you how grateful I was to Rockne as I went back out of the line to run the interference -- [laughter] -- made the job possible.

Duberstein. Mr. President and Mrs. Reagan, during the past few weeks, over and over again, so many members of the White House staff have asked for a chance as a group to say so long and job well done. So, today the staff has gathered for the last time to thank you both for the opportunity and the privilege of helping as you have sought to both change a nation and change the world. You both have succeeded in both endeavors.

For most Americans, the President and the First Lady are two people they see on television or read about in the newspapers and magazines, and the White House is a place that is the symbol of American leadership at home and abroad. You have given all of us the honor of being here with you, up close, to help in the challenges you faced. You've allowed us to play a role in the history of our great country. We have had a chance to help you frame the options, just as we have helped you promote your policies, schedule your trips, and bring your unique message to the American people.

President and Mrs. Reagan, you both have made America proud again and respected throughout the world. I know, Mr. President, for the longest time you have been looking for the guy who has been telling you where to go and what to do every 15 minutes of the day. [Laughter] Well, Mr. President, there are a lot of those individuals, and frankly, they're all standing before you today.

On a serious note, you've allowed us to be part of your lives, and you are very much a part of ours. We will cherish the trust you have given us and the warmth you have shown us. You have our respect and our thanks, but you also have our affection as well as our love. For all of us who have served on your staff, being part of your administration is the highest honor of our lives. It was a labor of love that came from the heart.

DeCain. Mr. President, I know I speak for all my fellow staff members when I asked you to please accept this gift as a token of our affection. We hope, one and all of us, that it will help you remember us when you're out there in God's country with one of those horses we know you'll be riding. Thanks on behalf of all the staff for all you've done for us. We'll miss you terribly. We wish you good health, good life, lots of fun, and God's blessing. Thank you, sir.

So, instead, as the person that hasn't allowed you to keep any secrets in the last 4 years -- [laughter] -- I'm presenting you your gift from the staff and letting you know as you open it what's inside. It's a wonderful little box for your collection of boxes. But it's very special because it's crammed full of love and hugs, and you can share it. [Laughter] And it has a bit of magic to it, because no matter how many times you open the box and take out a little hug from us, it'll always replenish itself because we aren't going to forget you.

But there aren't any words that can properly tell you how bittersweet these days are and the things that we would like to say to all of you. You know, I keep remembering back -- and not too far -- when someplace along the line there would always be a picture of a President standing in the Oval Office looking out the window -- usually the picture from behind. And he's standing there, and then his words are quoted as a tag for that picture about this is the loneliest place -- the lonely, and so forth. I don't know about them. I haven't been lonely one minute.

I think both of us have been aware every minute we're here that we're surrounded by you, by others who may not be here in this room today but here in this house or over there in the West Wing or just here in Washington -- all a part of everything we came here to do, and it couldn't have been done without you. And we've all shared, and I like to think maybe it's kind of close to what happened 200 years ago. We were all revolutionaries, and the revolution has been a success.

But there just aren't enough words to thank you for all that you've meant to all of us and how hard it is to say goodbye to all of you. But as I say, the only thing that can make it bearable at all is to remember all that you did and how much of a team we did become. And God bless you all.

When the Archivist provides notice to the incumbent and former Presidents of his intent to disclose Presidential records pursuant to section 1270.46 of the NARA regulations, the Archivist, utilizing any guidelines provided by the incumbent and former Presidents, shall identify any specific materials, the disclosure of which he believes may raise a substantial question of Executive privilege. However, nothing in this Order is intended to affect the right of the incumbent or former Presidents to invoke Executive privilege with respect to materials not identified by the Archivist. Copies of the notice for the incumbent President shall be delivered to the President (through the Counsel to the President) and the Attorney General (through the Assistant Attorney General for the Office of Legal Counsel). The copy of the notice for the former President shall be delivered to the former President or his designated representative.

Archivist may disclose the records covered by the notice, unless during that time period the Archivist has received a claim of Executive privilege by the incumbent or former President or the Archivist has been instructed by the incumbent President or his designee to extend the time period. If a shorter time period is required under the circumstances set forth in section 1270.44 of the NARA regulations, the Archivist shall so indicate in the notice.

Office of Legal Counsel) and the Counsel to the President shall review as they deem appropriate the records covered by the notice and consult with each other, the Archivist, and such other Federal agencies as they deem appropriate concerning whether invocation of Executive privilege is justified.

The Attorney General and the Counsel to the President, in the exercise of their discretion and after appropriate review and consultation under subsection (a) of this section, may jointly determine that invocation of Executive privilege is not justified. The Archivist shall be promptly notified of any such determination.

If after appropriate review and consultation under subsection (a) of this section, either the Attorney General or the Counsel to the President believes that the circumstances justify invocation of Executive privilege, the issue shall be presented to the President by the Counsel to the President and the Attorney General.

General in writing of the claim of privilege and the specific Presidential records to which it relates. After receiving such notice, the Archivist shall not disclose the privileged records unless directed to do so by an incumbent President or by a final court order.

President, and such other Federal agencies as he deems appropriate concerning the Archivist's determination as to whether to honor the former President's claim of privilege or instead to disclose the Presidential records notwithstanding the claim of privilege. Any determination under section 3 of this Order that Executive privilege shall not be invoked by the incumbent President shall not prejudice the Archivist's determination with respect to the former President's claim of privilege.

Archivist shall abide by any instructions given him by the incumbent President or his designee unless otherwise directed by a final court order. The Archivist shall notify the incumbent and former Presidents of his determination at least 30 days prior to disclosure of the Presidential records, unless a shorter time period is required in the circumstances set forth in section 1270.44 of the NARA regulations. Copies of the notice for the incumbent President shall be delivered to the President (through the Counsel to the President) and the Attorney General (through the Assistant Attorney General for the Office of Legal Counsel). The copy of the notice for the former President shall be delivered to the former President or his designated representative.

This Order is intended only to improve the internal management of the Executive branch and is not intended to create any right or benefit, substantive or procedural, enforceable at law by a party against the United States, its agencies, its officers, or any person.

Indeed, much was taken when we lost Challenger's brave crew. Yet much abides, because the American people will forever remember them and salute the devotion to excellence that characterized them and continues to characterize the members of the U.S. space program. That spirit has manifested itself again and again as we have journeyed to the moon and probed planets, our solar system, and beyond. It thrives today as we seek a permanent base in space and further manned exploration.

That spirit was evident on September 29, 1988, when the Space Shuttle Discovery lifted off from the launch pad. There could be no more fitting testimony to the Challenger crew and the excellence they personified than this mission, which returned our Nation to manned space flight. May our boundless dreams continue to inspire us in the pursuit of excellence -- in space and in every endeavor.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighteenth day of January, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-nine, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

President's decision has been taken to protect U.S. interests. It will eliminate the significant financial windfall which Libya has been receiving under the 1986 standstill agreements by marketing the U.S. oil companies' equity shares of oil liftings. It also protects the U.S. oil companies from a potential breach-of-contract claim, under which the Libyan Government might otherwise attempt to seize the oil companies' assets in Libya and withdraw the companies' concession rights there. The effect of the decision will be to permit the U.S. oil companies, subject to the restrictions on trade and travel which remain in effect, to resume their operations in Libya, transfer operations to foreign subsidiaries, or sell their assets.

This decision does not represent a change in the attitude of the U.S. Government toward Libya. We remain deeply concerned about Qadhafi's continued support for terrorism and subversion as well as Libyan efforts to develop a chemical weapons capability.

The President. When we finish this luncheon, I hope you'll stick around a little while. We're having a tag sale upstairs, and everything must go. [Laughter] But, really, thank you all for coming to be with us here today.

Truly, one of the privileges of this office which I've found greatest joy in exercising has been the opportunity to present our nation's highest civilian honor, the Medal of Freedom. To stand, as I have had the honor of doing, with the recipients of this award has been to stand with the flesh and blood and spirit that is the greatness of America, men and women who have so greatly served our nation and helped keep her free. The contribution of each recipient has been unique and noteworthy, and today is no exception, as we honor two remarkable Americans: Mike Mansfield and George Shultz.

Mansfield has dedicated the entirety of a very long and productive lifetime to public service. He served in both Houses of Congress, spanning seven Presidents, and held the post of Senate majority leader longer than any other person. A former professor of Far Eastern history, he played an important part in shaping America's Asian policy, serving on both the House Foreign Affairs Committee and the Senate Foreign Relations Committee and then as our Ambassador to Japan. For a sizable portion of America's history as a nation, Mike Mansfield has been in service to his country.

Labor, Director of the Office of Management and Budget, Treasury Secretary, and finally as one of America's great Secretaries of State. Over the last 6\1/2\ years, in managing our foreign policy, he has served wisely and met great challenges and great opportunities. George Shultz has helped to make the world a freer and more peaceful place.

Well, no, America's freedom does not belong to just one nation. We're custodians of freedom for the world. In Philadelphia, two centuries ago, James Allen wrote in his diary that ``If we fail, liberty no longer continues an inhabitant of this globe.'' Well, we didn't fail. And still, we must not fail. For freedom is not the property of one generation; it's the obligation of this and every generation. It's our duty to protect it and expand it and pass it undiminished to those still unborn.

Yes, the torch of Lady Liberty symbolizes our freedom and represents our heritage, the compact with our parents, our grandparents, and our ancestors. It is that lady who gives us our great and special place in the world. For it's the great life force of each generation of new Americans that guarantees that America's triumph shall continue unsurpassed into the next century and beyond. Other countries may seek to compete with us; but in one vital area, as a beacon of freedom and opportunity that draws the people of the world, no country on Earth comes close.

I believe, is one of the most important sources of America's greatness. We lead the world because, unique among nations, we draw our people -- our strength -- from every country and every corner of the world. And by doing so we continuously renew and enrich our nation. While other countries cling to the stale past, here in America we breathe life into dreams. We create the future, and the world follows us into tomorrow. Thanks to each wave of new arrivals to this land of opportunity, we're a nation forever young, forever bursting with energy and new ideas, and always on the cutting edge, always leading the world to the next frontier. This quality is vital to our future as a nation. If we ever closed the door to new Americans, our leadership in the world would soon be lost.

A number of years ago, an American student traveling in Europe took an East German ship across the Baltic Sea. One of the ship's crewmembers from East Germany, a man in his sixties, struck up a conversation with the American student. After a while the student asked the man how he had learned such good English. And the man explained that he had once lived in America. He said that for over a year he had worked as a farmer in Oklahoma and California, that he had planted tomatoes and picked ripe melons. It was, the man said, the happiest time of his life.

I don't tell this story to make the case for former POW's. Instead, I tell this story just to remind you of the magical, intoxicating power of America. We may sometimes forget it, but others do not. Even a man from a country at war with the United States, while held here as a prisoner, could fall in love with us. Those who become American citizens love this country even more. And that's why the Statue of Liberty lifts her lamp to welcome them to the golden door.

It is bold men and women, yearning for freedom and opportunity, who leave their homelands and come to a new country to start their lives over. They believe in the American dream. And over and over, they make it come true for themselves, for their children, and for others. They give more than they receive. They labor and succeed. And often they are entrepreneurs. But their greatest contribution is more than economic, because they understand in a special way how glorious it is to be an American. They renew our pride and gratitude in the United States of America, the greatest, freest nation in the world -- the last, best hope of man on Earth.

Medal of Freedom represents the reverence the American people have for liberty, and it honors the men and women who through their lives do greatest honor to that freedom. The lives of the two men we honor here today tell a story about freedom and all its possibilities and responsibilities, and, well, both those that inhere in each free man and woman and those that fall upon a great and free nation. Our honorees have dedicated their lives to preserving and protecting America's freedom. They have engaged themselves in the larger cause, that of humanity and of the world, to help extend freedom to people of other lands. There is no task more fitting for Americans than that.

I will now read the citations for our two very distinguished award recipients and present to them their medals. Perhaps I should mention that our first recipient today -- the one who calls me kid -- [laughter] -- is the son of immigrants, from a country called Ireland.

Ambassador Matsunaga and Mrs. Matsunaga, my former colleagues from both the House and the Senate, our distinguished guests, ladies and gentlemen, I can't begin to express in words, Mr. President, my deep appreciation for what you've said about me and the encouragement which you've given me in my post as your Ambassador, your personal representative, our country's Ambassador to Japan.

I think that much of the credit should go to Maureen, my wife, who down through the years has been such a wonderful helpmate; whose advice, counsel, and understanding I appreciated; who worked harder at any job I've had and received little credit in the process. So, I want to say how much I owe to her, how much I'm indebted to her; how much I appreciate what the President has said -- who has laid out a sound policy for our future in the Pacific and East Asia. I appreciate the advice and counsel that George Shultz has given to me from time to time. And I appreciate the fact that, for the first time in memory, that we have both a President of the United States and a Secretary of State who are actively interested in the Pacific, in Japan, and in East Asia. I anticipate that the policies these men have laid down will be continued.

In conclusion, we may recall that Robert Sandburg [Frost], one of our poets, said on a certain occasion, there are things to do, miles to go, and promises to keep before we sleep. Well, Maureen and I have traveled many miles. We have had and still have things to do. And we still have the promises we made over half a century ago when we were joined together. So, to her I want to give special thanks for all that she has been able to do with me. And to the President and Nancy, my thanks, my appreciation for their thoughtfulness and consideration. Thank you very much.

The President. ``Unyieldingly dedicated to the protection of the American national interest, the advancement of freedom and human rights, the battle against tyranny, and reductions in nuclear arms, George P. Shultz has presided over the Department of State during one of the most critical periods in the history of this nation's foreign policy.

You have also known -- and I've heard you say many times -- that the strength comes from ``We the People,'' that we get our legitimacy and you get your legitimacy as President from the people. And you've never been in any doubt, and none of us have, about who we came here to serve: the American people.

I see you there with your arm around Nancy. I had the privilege of going with Nancy a couple of months ago to the United Nations where she spoke about drugs. And she had the courage to say that one of the root causes of this worldwide problem is use of drugs in the United States. And we have to say no.

So, all of these things make me especially proud to have served with you, to have been your Secretary of State. And to receive a medal from you called the Medal of Freedom has a significance for my life and Obie's life and my children that we will never forget.

The President. Thank you. Well, ladies and gentlemen, I have been privileged to participate in this recognition of the service of these two gentlemen to this great country of ours. I'm glad that all of you could be here. And now my clock tells me that -- like the letter I got the first week I was here from the little 11-year-old girl who told me all the things that I had to do and then said, ``Now, get over to the Oval Office and go to work.'' I see I've still got a few more hours of work ahead of me, and we're a little behind schedule. And so, we'll bid you all farewell, and thank you again for all being here and participating.

The fundamental policies that guide the administration's approach to the management of soil and water resources on nonfederal lands are the principles of responsible stewardship and cooperative action to solve resource problems.

Those principles rely upon individual landowners being responsible caretakers of natural resources, demonstrating concern for and willingness to maintain the productivity of those resources and the quality of our environment.

Individual stewardship is supported by a conservation partnership that includes private landowners, private business, associations, the educational community, State and local government, and the Department of Agriculture and other agencies of the Federal Government. Our policy is to support this partnership, with the objective that decisionmaking and responsibility for our natural resources will continue to rest with the individual private landowner.

Production statistics and our resource appraisals bear out the fact that farmers and ranchers acting on their own initiative have dutifully carried out their responsibilities in this conservation partnership. This cooperative approach, coupled with voluntary programs, has benefited the Nation's conservation effort. The approaches outlined in the National Conservation Program are not a total solution to the overall problems of agriculture and environmental quality. Rather, they are USDA's components in the conservation partnership.

There are some erosion and water quality problems that warrant resolution through a continued role for the Federal Government. Focused attention should be placed on the detection and treatment of agriculture nonpoint source water pollution, as well as reduced erosion of croplands and wetlands.

Federal and State Governments also need to play a major role in both research and education. The kinds of information needed require extensive and long-term research and data collection efforts. The private sector has little incentive to undertake such efforts, and institutions smaller than Federal and State Governments would be overwhelmed by such undertakings.

Agriculture in 1982. It provides policy guidance for the programs of eight USDA agencies during the period 1988 - 97. The program is based on an appraisal of existing resource conditions and on projections of trends to identify possible future resource conditions. It provides for focusing activities on identified priorities, including the following: implementation of the conservation provisions of the Food Security Act of 1985, which link conservation and commodity programs; protection and enhancement of water quality and quantity; assisting State and local governments with the development and implementation of conservation programs; strengthening the USDA's role in agriculture chemical management; and implementing other actions to increase the consistency and cost-effectiveness of the Department's entire range of programs.

This updated National Conservation Program for USDA is just one component of the administration's overall prescription for fostering, protecting, and enhancing natural resources. It describes a realistic strategy for USDA to follow in helping landowners and land users manage, conserve, and improve soil, water, and related resources for an environmentally sustainable agricultural production system. I believe that implementation of this program will ensure that the conservation programs of the Department of Agriculture will continue to further the objectives of the Soil and Water Resources Conservation Act.

I commend the Secretary of Agriculture for his Department's efforts in preparing the program and for his responsiveness to the need for good stewardship and conservation of the Nation's soil, water, and related resources.

President today designated Dwayne O. Andreas to be vice chairman of the Board of Trustees of the Woodrow Wilson International Center for Scholars at the Smithsonian Institution. He would succeed Robert Mosbacher.

Blakey is currently Deputy Assistant to the President for Public Affairs and Communications Planning at the White House. Prior to this she was director of public affairs and special assistant to the Secretary at the U.S. Department of Education. From 1982 to 1984, she was Director of Public Affairs at the National Endowment for the Humanities. Previously Ms. Blakey served as director of that agency's youth programs and in its Office of Planning and Policy Assessment.

As the report indicates, we have achieved considerable success in reducing the number of railroad-related accidents, injuries, and fatalities during this Administration. This report was prepared in accordance with Section 211 of the Act.

General Review because I have determined that these waivers are no longer warranted due to changed circumstances. I also have determined that calculation of Thailand's competitive need limit for specified products imported during calendar year 1988 shall be consistent with section 504(c)(2)(B) of the Act and implemented on July 1, 1989. (The products affected by each of these actions are enumerated in the annex to this document.) Finally, future requests for competitive need waivers for Thai products will not be looked upon favorably until Thailand provides adequate and effective intellectual property protection.

The observance of Afro-American (Black) History Month serves to focus national attention on an endeavor of awareness that should follow us throughout the year. Understanding the history of black Americans is a key to understanding the strength of our nation. Their struggles, achievements and perseverance help us understand the moral fiber of America and our commitment to freedom, equality and justice.

This month's theme of ``Black History: Role Model for Youth'' goes to the very heart of our best hope for the future of our nation. We will hand to the youth of this nation the responsibility of preserving our heritage for future generations. The minds being shaped today in classrooms around the country must be fully enriched. The achievements and courage of individuals provide an inspiring example of the essence of the American spirit.

I urge all Americans, particularly those in our schools and civic groups, to study our history and incorporate in their activities projects to help us all understand those individuals who played so great a part in our development. We must ensure that the gains of the past are not lost in the future, and in so doing we can look to tomorrow with confidence.

President Reagan. Nancy and I, Mr. President, are pleased to welcome you and Madame Chun to the White House. You are one of our first guests here. We haven't lived here very long, and in looking about, I can't help but contrast the peaceful and rather elegant setting with a meeting that took place in your country 30 years ago in a building in your capital in Seoul that was badly damaged by the war. It was just after the landing at Inchon. General Douglas MacArthur turned the command of the city over to President Rhee and the civilian authorities of the Republic of Korea. And General MacArthur spoke then of the special friendship that exists between our two countries and of our mutual commitment to democratic principles and individual liberty and personal dignity.

We've come a long way together since that meeting. You have a saying in your country that after the rain, the earth hardens. Well, the miracle of modern Korea is well known in the world. Nancy and I had the opportunity to see that miracle at first hand a few years ago when we visited your country. And we recall that visit with great warmth and great pleasure.

In the very short time, Mr. President, that you've had, you've done much to strengthen the traditions of 5,000 years of Korean history. We share your commitment to freedom. If there's one message that I have for the Korean people today, it is this: Our special bond of freedom and friendship is as strong today as it was in that meeting 30 years ago. Our young men have fought side by side, not only in Korea but in Vietnam. And again there, the cause was freedom. And today we are committed to each other's defense against aggression. We shall continue to search together for continued peace on the Korean peninsula, in the Pacific region, and throughout the world.

You have honored my country by inviting my wife and me today to the White House, and I thank you, Mr. President and Mrs. Reagan, for your invitation to me so soon after your inauguration as the President of the United States of America. With God's blessing, the United States will more than successfully achieve its national objectives under your great leadership. The new era of great renewal for America will certainly succeed because of your statesmanship and greatness in the American people that you will be serving and leading in the years ahead.

Incidentally, the Republic of Korea, too, embarked upon a new venture to open a new era for the country. The new era will be characterized by a renewal of the spirit of national harmony, replacing the old chronic and internecine battles between those who take rigid and extreme positions. We are determined and hopeful that we can usher in an era of dialog and consensus-building so that our national energy can be channeled to a far more constructive objective of building a freer, more abundant, and democratic society in our midst.

Peace, Amity, Commerce and Navigation between the Kingdom of Korea and the United States of America. Since that time our two nations have maintained exceptionally close ties. In the more recent past when North Korean Communists invaded the Republic of Korea in 1950, Americans came to Korea to fight and make the supreme sacrifice in its defense of our liberty and independence.

After the armistice, the United States gave us generous assistance to rehabilitate our war-devastated economy. Mr. President, Korea has in recent years achieved rapid economic development despite countless difficulties. We are moving ahead vigorously in all sectors of society. Korea is now the 16th largest trading country in the world and ranks 11th among the trading partners of the United States. In other words, American assistance has not been in vain.

The Republic of Korea is now capable of joining with the United States to ensure the prosperity of mankind and peace in East Asia. Mr. President, you have aroused renewed hope, courage, and confidence within the United States and now lead the march toward an even greater future. I believe that your philosophy applies not only to the United States but to all free world nations.

I hope you'll understand that the United States will remain a reliable Pacific partner, and we shall maintain the strength of our forces in the Pacific area. I hope, too, that our Asian allies in Korea, Japan, Australia, New Zealand, and our friends in the ASEAN know that they will have -- we'll have just as much alliance with them, and they will have our continued support as our European allies have.

Today at the luncheon, President Chun spoke of General MacArthur's wise admonition that we must never underestimate America's vital interests in the Pacific. So, it is my fervent hope in the years ahead that we can work together to make the great Pacific Basin a place of peace, prosperity, and stability for all who live there.

And we bid President Chun and Madame Chun goodby with a hope that their visit here will be as happy and successful as the visit that Nancy and I had some years ago in their country, a visit for which we are both grateful and deeply indebted to the Korean people.

President Chun. I am happy to be visiting in Washington at the kind invitation of His Excellency, the President of the United States, and Mrs. Reagan. I appreciated the opportunity I had this morning of exchanging views on matters of mutual interest with President Reagan in an atmosphere of warmth and mutual cordiality. I am happy to say that President Reagan gave me firm assurances that the United States has no intention of withdrawing the American forces in Korea. I am pleased that the present level of United States military presence in Korea will be maintained. This makes a vital and indispensable contribution toward not only peace in Korea but peace and tranquility of the Northeast Asia region.

The two Presidents shared the view that any unilateral steps toward North Korea which are not reciprocated toward South Korea by North Korea's principal allies would not be conducive to promoting stability or peace in the area.

The United States will seek to assist Korea to obtain energy supplies in the event of an emergency affecting our mutual security interests. Korea will explore long term arrangements for importing American coal. President Reagan promised that the United States would remain a reliable supplier of nuclear fuel, generation equipment and power technology.

Smithsonian Institution which President Chun presented on behalf of the Korean people for the construction of a new Museum of Eastern Art on the Mall in Washington. This museum will further enhance inter-cultural understanding and appreciation between the people of America and the peoples of Asia.

Basin, the two Presidents expressed their intent to maintain close communication with each other and with other friends and allies in Asia. President Chun invited President Reagan to visit the Republic of Korea at a time of his convenience, and President Reagan accepted the invitation with pleasure.

Admiral Garrick is on leave from his position as senior vice president of Doremus & Co., an international public relations firm. He was deputy director of the transition for public affairs and served as director of research and policy development of the Reagan-Bush Campaign Committee.

America is a strong and vibrant nation because its people are the people of many nations. They have given this land we love the inherited wisdom and strength of mankind's greatest civilizations, including that of China. Americans of Chinese ancestry can take pride in their cultural heritage and in the contributions they and their forebears have made to this country.

The President announced today his intention to nominate Seeley Lodwick to be Under Secretary of Agriculture for International Affairs and Commodity Programs. Mr. Lodwick recently served as codirector of the farm and food division of the Reagan-Bush Committee. He organized the agriculture sector in 50 States and worked closely with farm organizations and agricultural firms.

In 1979 - 80 he served as Iowa administrator for U.S. Senator Roger W. Jepsen, responsible for the operation of each of the Senator's six Iowa district offices and for maintaining liaison with various State organizations. His government responsibilities have included 7 years as an Iowa State senator. He was elected president pro tempore of that body during his last year of service.

He and his wife, Pat, are both graduates of Iowa State University. They have three daughters, all of whom are college graduates and now married. Mr. Lodwick lives with his wife on a farm near Wever, Iowa. He is 60 years old.

Since 1977 Mr. Studdert has been an independent businessman in the areas of residential housing and land development in Utah. During the 1980 campaign he took leave from business interests to direct the press advance office and served as deputy press secretary with the Reagan-Bush Committee.

Civic activities include being elected a member of the Bountiful City Council and Jaycee president. He received the distinguished service award as the Outstanding Young Community Leader in two separate communities. Mr. Studdert has served on many local advisory commissions.

Mr. Studdert has been an active participant in Republican Party politics, including serving as a political consultant to the speaker of the Utah house of representatives and field advance coordinator to Vice-Presidential nominee Robert Dole in 1976.

Mr. Carleson will be responsible for assisting in the formulation and coordination of plans to implement one of the President's major goals, the return of authority and responsibility for various programs from the Federal to State and local levels of government. He will report to Edwin J.

I'm a little surprised to find myself at this podium tonight. I know your organization was founded by six Washington newspaperwomen in 1919 -- seems only yesterday. [Laughter] I know that it was Washington's National Press Club for over a half a century, so I thought that tonight's production would be equal time, right? A night for Nancy. Then I learned of your 1971 pioneering and coeducational Washington press corps. You changed the name. You admitted male members.

I do want to congratulate the Washington Press Club for forward-looking leadership, and I hope that Ann McFeatters and Carol Richards and all of you succeed quickly in your effort to acquire a clubhouse. [Laughter] And if we have our way and you wait a little bit there will be several public buildings that will be open to --  -- [laughter].

But I tell you, it's good to be here with all my fellow classmates in the freshman class. Merv -- you know that Merv and I came here by way of Sacramento. Merv was a Lieutenant Governor for Governor Brown. The difference you'll find here, Merv, is that the flakes are real. [Laughter] And if enough of them fall from heaven, it stops traffic for hours. And Senator D'Amato, if I could raise the kind of money with my pictures you're talking about, hell, I'd still be there.

But I am glad that you asked me here and seriously would like to explain that Nancy would have been with me. Maybe it was just the cold; I hope it was. She thought and felt like maybe she was coming down with something, and we're both scheduled very early in the morning for the Prayer Breakfast. And so, I was instrumental in telling her she should stay home by the fire and drink warm milk and maybe we'll be together in the morning.

I'm delighted to have this. And I just want to say that I don't mind at all any of the jokes or remarks about age, because Thomas Jefferson made a comment about the Presidency and age. He said that one should not worry about one's exact chronological age in reference to his ability to perform one's task. And ever since he told me that -- [laughter] -- I stopped worrying.

But to all of you, to the many who are here from across the world and the different lands -- and as the chairman told us earlier, I was surprised to learn that we are joined this morning by meetings of this kind in places that might be surprising to some: on naval vessels, military bases, even in penal institutions, all across our land.

You have taken Nancy and me back to a nostalgic time, because I have found myself remembering at occasions like this, in a hotel dining room not quite so grand or not quite so large, but the Governor's Breakfasts of Sacramento. And they were always enriching, spiritual experiences, and I think maybe -- I haven't checked with Nancy about her -- but I think for both of us I could say that this morning we are freed from the last vestige of homesickness.

I would like to tell just a little story. It was given to me by a friend on a printed card, author unknown. Now, I don't know how widely this has been distributed, or whether some of you or many of you are aware of it. I'm going to tell it anyway.

Lord. And as they walked, above him in the sky was reflected each stage and experience of his life. Reaching the end of the beach, and of his life, he turned back and looked back down the beach and saw the two sets of footprints in the sand, except that he looked again and realized that every once in a while there was only one set of footprints. And each time there was only one set of footprints, it was when the experience reflected in the sky was one of of despair, of desolation, of great trial or grief in his life.

Abraham Lincoln once said, ``I would be the most foolish person on this footstool earth if I believed for one moment that I could perform the duties assigned to me without the help of one who is wiser than all.'' I know that in the days to come and the years ahead there are going to be many times when there will only be one set of footprints in my life. If I did not believe that, I could not face the days ahead.

You're now in the famous Rose Garden. Now, I have to confess something to you. When I came here to live a couple of weeks ago, I had always thought that the Rose Garden, the whole thing, was roses. [Laughter] I didn't know that it was a grass garden with a few roses along one side. I better not say that to Nancy or she'll get busy with a spade -- [laughter] -- and we'll have them.

Anyway, you are welcome, and I am so proud, first of all, of the Hearst Foundation doing this, the Senate sponsoring also at this end a visit of this kind. You've been chosen -- very obviously have leadership qualities or you wouldn't be here -- two from each State in our Union, and I know you must be very proud of having been selected for this. We're very proud of you.

For how many of you is this the first visit to Washington? If you haven't already, I know you will see all of the historic monuments and the places here that should be seen. Have you been to Lincoln's Monument yet -- Lincoln's Memorial? You have. Then it won't do me any good to tip you off. [Laughter] I was going to tell you that I learned the first time I was here, someone told me that if you stand on one side of that massive statue and look up at his face, you see the compassion of Lincoln. If you go around to the other side and look -- and the artist must have intended this -- you see the strength of the man, a difference in his face depending on which side you're standing. But you've been there now, and I know they won't want to interrupt the schedule for you to go back. Just take my word for it -- it's there.

But seriously, I think you all know, or you wouldn't be here, the importance of leadership in our country -- what you represent. Many years before your time there was -- I know you've heard of him -- there was a great cowboy philosopher and wit. Many people remember him more as a comedian than as a philosopher, but Will Rogers -- and it's so easy to be cynical these days; you're bombarded with so many words every day -- and Will Rogers responded once about the people who hold elective office. He said, ``They are no better and no worse than the people who send them there. But they are all better than those who don't vote at all.'' So, use that leadership in the future. Use it to get your peers, your generation involved in public life. Ours is a government truly by the people, and we've tended many times in the past just through apathy on the part of our people to forget that and turn it over to someone else. You're going to run your lives, or politicians are going to run them for you. The choice is up to you. They are -- and we -- I forget every once in a while -- [laughter] -- we are your servants to make that system work.

We give our permission to government to do the things that it does. And that's the whole story of the difference -- why we're unique in the world and why no matter what our troubles may be, we're going to overcome all of those troubles -- and with your help and support, because it's an ongoing process.

Few, if any, resources offer more potential, I think, than our 35 million disabled Americans. Too often they are relegated to the sidelines in spite of, in many cases, outstanding abilities. The International Year of Disabled Persons is an excellent example of how partnerships work.

Our Federal interagency task force of Government employees on special assignment has done an outstanding job. Alan Reich and David Kearns have demonstrated the best of American resourcefulness in establishing the private sector U.S. Council for the International Year of Disabled Persons. They've done this to assist the disabled in accomplishing their own goals.

I'm proud to participate in this International Year to help increase the awareness of each and every one of us, to commit that we'll make that extra effort in 1981 to assist our disabled in moving into the mainstream of American life. It takes so little, and it offers the promise of so much, because our most valuable resource is our people.

I was very proud in California that we started a program that did so much and to see people who had previously been sidelined actually involved and self-sufficient in contributing to our welfare and to society.

Today there are 35 million disabled Americans who represent one of our most underutilized national resources. Their will, their spirit, and their hearts are not impaired, despite their limitations. All of us stand to gain when those who are disabled share in America's opportunities.

Through partnerships of disabled and nondisabled persons; of our private sector and our government; and of our national, state, and community organizations, we can expand the opportunities for disabled Americans to make a fuller contribution to our national life. I am proud to pledge the cooperation of my Administration and the Federal agencies under my jurisdiction, including the Federal Interagency Committee for the International Year of Disabled Persons.

Governor Ella Grasso was a determined and spirited public servant who brought to her life the energies of the committed. She worked hard to make State government work, and her service to the people of Connecticut was unstinting.

For the past several weeks, members of the Cabinet and I have been identifying major policy and program changes that must be made to begin bringing spending under control. These major changes will be outlined in my February 18th address.

In addition to these major items, reductions will have to made in virtually every agency for fiscal year 1981, 1982 and the future. This memorandum is to ask your cooperation in this second phase of our review and to outline the process and schedule that we must follow in order to submit a fully revised 1982 budget -- including the details of the major changes I announce on February 18th and all other revisions of the budget submitted by President Carter on January 15th -- to the Congress by March 10, 1981.

During the next 9 days, OMB will complete its review, consult with my senior advisers and me as appropriate, and at my direction, will advise each agency of additional reductions that are needed from the Carter budget to achieve our spending and employement reduction goals.

If you believe there are better ways of achieving the reductions, I ask that you convey your views to the Director of OMB in writing within 48 hours after receiving the revised budget and employment limits.

I will look to you and the Office of Management and Budget to resolve any differences promptly and, in those few cases where they cannot be resolved, to bring those differences to me jointly for final decision. Of necessity, I need to receive such items within 4 days of the time that you receive the initial notification from OMB.

Some agencies will begin receiving the initial notification by February 9th. The entire process must be completed promptly for all departments and agencies to allow time for your preparation of supporting materials and for compiling and printing the revised budget. Your cooperation in this effort is appreciated.

I'm not saying hello individually, except to those near at hand, because I understand we'll have a chance later when we leave here for some photos. But I am grateful that all of you came here today, and I hope that the meeting so far has been productive for you. I know that it's helpful for us.

You, the State legislators, you who are in county and local government are the representatives that are closest to the people. You are the first to see which programs work and which don't, and you know what is best for the States, for your communities, and that means what's best for the people. I've long believed that State and local governments have a better chance to be efficient and responsive than does the Federal bureaucracy, which tries to fit solutions to problems that vary from one locale to another, and all too often they end up with their own bureaucracy the beneficiary of whatever program they administer. My goal is to transfer as many programs as are appropriate back to you, along with the tax resources to pay for them. And we can use your help in getting that done.

It'll take all of us working together to turn things around, and frankly, I've asked you here today to enlist you in this effort. I would like your guidance as we come down to the wire on our comprehensive economic program, which we'll be submitting to the Congress next week, and then I would like to continue working with you as we work to put that plan into operation.

Board. The Board will be composed of economic experts from outside the Government and will meet every 3 or 4 months to advise the President with respect to the conduct and objectives of both domestic and international economic policy of the United States. The Board will work with Secretary of the Treasury Donald Regan, who will have principal responsibility for economic policy in the administration.

Since 1976 Mr. Winn has served as chairman of the board of Philip D. Winn and Associates, a real estate development and property acquisition firm. He has also served as chairman of the board of Winn/Olson Marketing Group, a marketing and research and financial consulting firm which primarily dealt with residential real estate. In 1964 - 76 Mr. Winn was sales manager of Witkin Homes.

Mr. Terra will report to the Secretary of State and will represent the President at major national and international cultural events having significant American participation. He will act as adviser for the cultural programing fuctions of the U.S. International Communication Agency (ICA) and will serve as a liaison point between the State Department and ICA to plan cultural events abroad and to ensure harmonization with foreign policy objectives and priorities. Mr. Terra will make recommendations to the President and the Secretary of State regarding broad cultural cultural policies and activities of the U.S. Goverment. He will provide guidance to the Art-in-Embassy program to ensure that American art displayed in Ambassadorial residences abroad is representative of our national cultural heritage and in concert with the President's goals and international policies of the Department of State. As the President's representative, Mr. Terra will act as adviser and coordinator of existing government cultural agencies and departments.

Representative to the Holy See. In this capacity, Mr. Wilson will visit the Vatican from time to time to exchange views with His Holiness Pope John Paul II and other Vatican officials on international and humanitarian subjects of interest and concern to the Holy See and the United States Government.

And this audit confirms that the economy of the United States needs a profound and dramatic change in direction. There can no longer be a business-as-usual approach. Inflation and unemployment are threatening the American way of life as never before, and without a change of policy these intolerable conditions will get even worse.

This audit also suggests a sense of urgency that we must halt the growth of government and the corresponding burden of overspending, taxation, and regulation before they irreversibly alter the character of this Nation.

We're still the most productive people in the world, living in a nation with a potential that staggers the imagination. I'm confident with the facts before them, the American people will understand the need for the changes that we'll propose next week. And this audit shows us that our actions must put the nation on a fundamentally different course.

But I am leaving you in the hands of Murray Weidenbaum, who can take all of your questions and explain this audit report to you, which I understand is going to be made available or already has been made available to you.

President Reagan inherited. It shows that although the economy has in the past suffered either high inflation or high unemployment, what is unique today is the combination of sustained high inflation and sustained high unemployment.

We show that the basic source of most of our economic distress is the policies of government itself over the course of many previous administrations. Nevertheless, the fundamental strength of the private enterprise economy still shows through the dismal current statistics. To tap into this Nation's productive economic base requires a commitment to reduce tax and regulatory burdens and to increase incentives for working and saving.

The economy's various economic difficulties are closely interrelated. Any attempt to solve one, such as inflation, without taking the others, such as unemployment, into account is doomed to failure. In fact, it is the stop-and-go economic policies of the past that have been a major source of the problem.

Yet, there is more left to us of Lincoln than the ceremony, the monument, or even the memory of his greatness as a leader and a man. There are words, words he spoke and that speak in our time or to any time, words from the mind that sought wisdom and the heart that loved justice.

Today do our national leaders agonize over the dilemma between doing what is practical and what is right? Let us have faith in the right, that it makes might, Lincoln wrote, and in that faith let us to the end do our duty as we understand it.

The President announced today his intention to nominate Edward N. Brandt, Jr., to be an Assistant Secretary of Health and Human Services (for Health). It is the President's intention to see that this position is elevated to Under Secretary of Health in accordance with a reorganization plan that will be announced later.

Dr. Brandt has been active in various committees of the American Medical Association and the American Association of Medical Colleges. He is currently chairman of the AMA's section on medical schools. He is also a member of the American Academy of Family Physicians' Commission on Legislation and Governmental Affairs.

Dr. Devine was the transition team leader for the Office of Personnel Management (OPM) and related personnel agencies of the Federal Government within the office of the President-elect. He has been as associate professor of government and politics at the University of Maryland since 1967. During the 1980 Presidential campaign, Dr. Devine was a regional political director of the Reagan-Bush Committee. He also served as Maryland State chairman, deputy director of political planning and analysis, and coordinator for Delaware and the District of Columbia. In 1978 Dr. Devine was the Republican nominee for State Comptroller of Maryland.

Mrs. Ruppe has spent most of her life in volunteer efforts. She has traveled extensively and shared ideals with past Peace Corps volunteers in many countries. She is a member of the International Neighbors Club IV and attended the Conference on Africa held in England in 1978.

The productivity and efficiency of American agriculture are basic ingredients in our national strength. Agricultural productivity is a major weapon in the war against inflation and in the struggle to eliminate world hunger. The efficiency of the American farmer is the envy of the world.

American farmers are, in reality, fiercely independent businessmen whose job it is to provide food and fiber. With the profit motive and freedom of enterprise, these businessmen of the soil have supplied this Nation with an abundance never before witnessed in the history of man.

The conversion to temporary deferrals will provide my Administration with the opportunity to review and revise these proposals within the context of my overall plan to curtail the growth of government and reduce Federal spending.

In addition, I am reporting four other new deferrals totalling $8.0 million and a revision to a previously transmitted deferral increasing the amount deferred by $51.1 million. These four new items involve programs in the Departments of the Interior and Transportation and the International Communication Agency. The revision to the existing deferral involves the Department of the Treasury.

Weinberger, who was Deputy Director, then Director, of the Office of Management and Budget in the Executive Office of the President. Mr. Taft assisted him in the management of the budgetary process, policy review, and program oversight for the entire Federal Government.

Mr. Arnett is an avid sportsman and outdoorsman who has devoted much of his life to the conservation, preservation, and enhancement of wildlife. He was appointed by Gov. Ronald Reagan to head the California Department of Fish & Game, where he served for 7 years.

Mr. Arnett was director of the National Wildlife Federation for 17 years, and served two terms as president, retiring from that position in 1978. He has been affiliated with many State and national conservation organizations. He was one of the founders and currently serves as chairman of the board of the Wildlife Legislative Fund of America and its companion organization, the Wildlife Conservation Fund of America.

Although restrictions on building temperatures may result in reduced consumption of fuel, I have concluded that the regulatory scheme designed to accomplish that objective imposes an excessive regulatory burden and that voluntary restraint and market incentives will achieve substantially the same benefit without the regulatory cost.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventeenth day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two-hundred and fifth.

Regulatory Impact Analysis or final rule, the agency shall, subject to Section 8(a)(2) of this Order, refrain fron publishing its final Regulatory Impact Analysis or final rule until the agency has responded to the Director's views, and incorporated those views and the agency's response in the rulemaking file.

Management and Budget. It should be noted that this report will be followed by a complete budget submission to the Congress, addressing fiscal years 81 and 82. That report will be sent to you on March 10th.

It is my hope that this combination of transmittals will allow the Congress to proceed in accordance with timetables established in the Congressional Budget Act and will permit rapid consideration of this entire program.

My Cabinet and other members of my Administration have worked intensively and cooperatively with me in developing this program for economic recovery. All of us are now eager to work with the Congress as partners in an undertaking that is vital to the future of the Nation.

Today the Administration is proposing a national recovery plan to reverse the debilitating combination of sustained inflation and economic distress which continues to face the American economy. Were we to stay with existing policies, the results would be readily predictable: a rising government presence in the economy, more inflation, stagnating productivity, and higher unemployment. Indeed, there is reason to fear that if we remain on this course, our economy may suffer even more calamitously.

The program we have developed will break that cycle of negative expectations. It will revitalize economic growth, renew optimism and confidence, and rekindle the Nation's entrepreneurial instincts and creativity.

The benefits to the average American will be striking. Inflation -- which is now at double digit rates -- will be cut in half by 1986. The American economy will produce 13 million new jobs by 1986, nearly 3 million more than if the status quo in government policy were to prevail. The economy itself should break out of its anemic growth patterns to a much more robust growth trend of 4 to 5 percent a year. These positive results will be accomplished simultaneously with reducing tax burdens, increasing private saving, and raising the living standard of the American family.

The plan is based on sound expenditure, tax, regulatory, and monetary policies. It seeks properly functioning markets, free play of wages and prices, reduced government spending and borrowing, a stable and reliable monetary framework, and reduced government barriers to risk-taking and enterprise. This agenda for the future recognizes that sensible policies which are consistently applied can release the strength of the private sector, improve economic growth, and reduce inflation.

We have forgotten some important lessons in America. High taxes are not the remedy for inflation. Excessively rapid monetary growth cannot lower interest rates. Well-intentioned government regulations do not contribute to economic vitality. In fact, government spending has become so extensive that it contributes to the economic problems it was designed to cure. More government intervention in the economy cannot possibly be a solution to our economic problems.

We must remember a simple truth. The creativity and ambition of the American people are the vital forces of economic growth. The motivation and incentive of our people -- to supply new goods and services and earn additional income for their families -- are the most precious resources of our Nation's economy. The goal of this Administration is to nurture the strength and vitality of the American people by reducing the burdensome, intrusive role of the Federal Government; by lowering tax rates and cutting spending; and by providing incentives for individuals to work, to save, and to invest. It is our basic belief that only by reducing the growth of government can we increase the growth of the economy.

The U.S. economy faces no insurmountable barriers to sustained growth. It confronts no permanently disabling tradeoffs between inflation and unemployment, between high interest rates and high taxes, or between recession and hyperinflation. We can revive the incentives to work and save. We can restore the willingness to invest in the private capital required to achieve a steadily rising standard of living. Most important, we can regain our faith in the future.

The leading edge of our program is the comprehensive reduction in the rapid growth of Federal spending. As shown in detail below, our budget restraint is more than ``cosmetic'' changes in the estimates of Federal expenditures. But we have not adopted a simple-minded ``meat ax'' approach to budget reductions. Rather, a careful set of guidelines has been used to identify lower-priority programs in virtually every department and agency that can be eliminated, reduced, or postponed.

Federal personal income tax rates by 10 percent a year for 3 years in a row. Closely related to this is an incentive to greater investment in production and job creation via faster tax write-offs of new factories and production equipment.

The third key element of our economic expansion program is an ambitious reform of regulations that will reduce the government-imposed barriers to investment, production, and employment. We have suspended for 2 months the unprecedented flood of last-minute rulemaking on the part of the previous Administration. We have eliminated the ineffective and counterproductive wage and price standards of the Council on Wage and Price Stability, and we have taken other steps to eliminate government interference in the marketplace.

Federal Reserve System was underscored. It is clear, of course, that monetary and fiscal policy are closely interrelated. Success in one area can be made more difficult -- or can be reinforced -- by the other. Thus, a predictable and steady growth in the money supply at more modest levels than often experienced in the past will be a vital contribution to the achievement of the economic goals described in this Report. The planned reduction and subsequent elimination of Federal deficit financing will help the Federal Reserve System perform its important role in achieving economic growth and stability.

The ultimate importance of this program for sustained economic growth will arise not only from the positive effects of the individual components, important as they are. Rather, it will be the dramatic improvement in the underlying economic environment and outlook that will set a new and more positive direction to economic decisions throughout the economy. Protection against inflation and high tax burdens will no longer be an overriding motivation. Once again economic choices -- ivolving working, saving, and investment -- will be based primarily on the prospect for real rewards for those productive activities which improve the true economic well-being of our citizens.

The policies this Administration is putting foward for urgent consideration by the Congress are based on the fact that this Nation now faces its most serious set of economic problems since the 1930s. Inflation has grown from 1 to 1\1/2\ percent a year in the early 1960s to about 13 percent in the past 2 years; not since World War I have we had 2 years of back-to-back double digit inflation. At the same time, the rate of economic growth has been slowing and the unemployment rate creeping upward. Productivity growth -- the most important single measure of our ability to improve our standard of living -- has been declining steadily for more than a decade. In the past 3 years our productivity actually fell.

Government, through tax, spending, regulatory, and monetary policies, has sacrificed long-term growth and price stability for ephemeral short-term goals. In particular, excessive government spending and overly accommodative monetary policies have combined to give us a climate of continuing inflation. That inflation itself has helped to sap our prospects for growth. In addition, the growing weight of haphazard and inefficient regulation has weakened our productivity growth. High marginal tax rates on business and individuals discourage work, innovation, and the investment necessary to improve productivity and long-run growth. Finally, the resulting stagnant growth contributes further to inflation in a vicious cycle that can only be broken with a plan that attacks broadly on all fronts.

Surges of inflation are not unusual in history; there were price explosions after both World Wars, as well as smaller outbursts in the 1920s and late 1930s. Therefore, in spite of the role played by food and energy prices in recent inflationary outbursts, it is misleading to concentrate on these transitory factors as fundamental causes of the inflationary bias in the American economy. Even when prices in these markets have been stable, inflation has continued with little relief.

What is unusual about our recent history is the persistence of inflation. Outbursts of high inflation in the last 15 years have not been followed by the customary price stability, but rather by long periods of continued high inflation. This persistence of inflation has crucially affected the way our economy works. People now believe inflation is ``here to stay''; they plan accordingly, thereby giving further momentum to inflation. Since there are important long-term relationships between suppliers and customers and between workers and management, long-term contracts, sometimes unwritten, are often based on the view that inflation will persist. This robs the economy of flexibility which might otherwise contribute to reducing inflation.

The Federal Government has greatly contributed to the persistence of high inflation. Overly stimulative fiscal and monetary policies, on average, have financed excessive spending and thus pushed prices upward. Since government accommodation is widely expected to continue, inflation has become embedded in the economy.

When inflationary outbursts occur, policymakers all too often have made a quick turn toward restraint. Such turnabouts, however, have been short-lived and their temporary nature has increasingly been anticipated by savers, investors, and workers. Subsequent declines in employment and growth inevitably call forth stimulative policies before inflation can be brought under control. Such ``stop-and-go'' policies have only resulted in higher unemployment and lower real growth.

Finally, but equally important, government policies have increased inflation by reducing the potential of our economy to grow -- directly through the increasing burdens of taxes and regulations, and indirectly through inflation itself. The result is a vicious circle. Its force can be measured by the statistics of our productivity slowdown, but it is seen more dramatically in the anxiety and concern of our people.

Productivity, popularly measured as output per worker-hour, is an indicator of the efficiency of the economy and consequently of our ability to maintain the rate of improvement in our standard of living. Over the past 15 years, the rate of productivity improvement has slowed, and now virtually halted.

Government policies have been a major contributor to the slowdown but they can be an even more important contributor to the cure. The weight of regulation and the discouragement that results from high marginal tax burdens are key factors, but inflation itself also plays an important role. Reduced capital formation is the most important and visible, but no the only, channel by which this occurs.

By increasing uncertainty about the future, inflation discourages investors from undertaking projects that they would have considered profitable but which, with today's inflationary environment, they consider too risky. Inflation also diverts funds from productive investments into hedging and speculation.

Accelerating prices, and the high interest rates and shifting economic policy associated with them, have contributed to an unwillingness to make long-lived investments. As a result, our stock of productive plant and equipment depreciates faster, so that more investment is needed simply to stand still.

The regulatory requirements imposed by the government have likewise served to discourage investment by causing uncertainty in business decisionmaking. In addition, investments to meet regulatory requirements have diverted capital from expanding productive capacity. Some estimates have put regulation-related investment at more than 10 percent of the total level of business investment in recent years. The expanding intrusiveness of the government into the private sector also inhibits innovation and limits the ability of entrepreneurs to produce in the most efficient way.

The role of the tax system in reducing our past growth, and its potential for improving the prospects for future growth, deserve special attention. By reducing the incentives for investment and innovation, both by individuals and by businesses, the tax system has been a key cause of our stagnation. Restoring the proper incentives will make a major contribution to the long-run vitality of our economy.

The progressivity of the personal income tax system levies rising tax rates on additions to income that merely keep pace with inflation. Households therefore find that even if their gross incomes rise with inflation, their after-tax real income declines. Some households respond to these higher marginal tax burdens by reducing their work effort. ``Bracket creep'' also encourages taxpayers to seek out ``tax shelters,'' sources of income that offer higher after-tax returns but not necessarily higher before-tax returns than more productive sources, again contributing to economic inefficiency. In the last two decades the Congress has reduced personal income taxes seven times.

Due to inflation, the rate of return on corporate assets, after tax, and the level of corporate earnings have been seriously eroded over the past decade and a half. That was a major factor stunting capital spending from what it otherwise would have been. The tax treatment of depreciation has been an important contributor to this lowering of returns. We now allow write-offs at the cost of purchase, rather than at more realistic prices. This creates phantom profits upon which taxes are paid.

Finally, unless the Congress takes frequent actions to offset the revenue-generating effect of inflation on the progressive personal tax system, the Congress has available for spending unlegislated increases in funds. Inflation in tandem with the tax system thereby impairs the fiscal discipline of the budget process and facilitates higher levels of government spending than would result if the Congress were forced to vote on each tax increase. This offers further encouragement to inflation.

Because past policies have not reduced unemployment, even as they have encouraged rising inflation -- the economy as a whole has suffered. Over the past two decades, we have seen the ``misery index'' -- the sum of the inflation and unemployment rates -- more than double, rising from 7.3 in 1960 to 17.2 in 1980. While unemployment rates have fluctuated over the business cycle, there has been no long-run tradeoff between unemployment and inflation. The upward movements in inflation have not brought us falling unemployment rates, nor has high unemployment brought lower inflation.

Thus trends of the past are clearly disturbing in that they have sapped our Nation's economic vitality. Of greater significance, however, is the danger we face if the policies of the 1970s are continued.

For the first time in American history financial markets reflect the belief that inflation will not retreat significantly from current high levels. The Nation's economy and financial system are on a dangerous course -- one which, if not reversed, would lead to a prolonged stagnation of economic growth and employment, ever higher inflation and interest rates, and potentially a financial crisis.

The solution to this growing economic threat calls for bold actions designed to reduce -- dramatically and sharply -- inflationary expectations. These policies must restore fiscal integrity; increase incentives for saving, investment, and production; attain monetary and financial stability; and enhance the role of the marketplace as the principal force in the allocation of resources.

The uncontrolled growth of government spending has been a primary cause of the sustained high rate of inflation experienced by the American economy. Perhaps of greater importance, the continued and apparently inexorable expansion of government has contributed to the widespread expectation of persisting -- and possibly higher -- rates of inflation in the future.

Thus, a central goal of the economic program is to reduce the rate at which government spending increases. In view of the seriousness of the inflationary pressures facing us, the proposed reductions in the Federal budget for the coming fiscal year are the largest ever proposed.

Despite the tendency to refer to ``cutting'' the budget, it is clear that an expanding population, a growing economy, and a difficult international environment all lead to the need for year-to-year rises in the level of government spending. Thus, the badly needed effort to ``cut'' the budget really refers to reductions in the amount of increase in spending requested from one year to the next.

The application of these guidelines has required great care, judgment, and sensitivity. However, we are putting forward over 80 proposals that will carry out these guidelines and affect virtually every segment of our economy except the truly needy. The Administration's insistence on this fundamental principle has meant that programs benefiting millions of truly needy beneficiaries have not been affected by the spending control effort. These programs include social insurance benefits for the elderly, basic unemployment benefits, cash benefits for the chronically poor, and society's obligations to veterans.

The selection of specific reductions has been a difficult task involving the entire Administration as well as much consultation with representatives of business, labor, agriculture, minority groups, and State and local governments.

In conjunction with the tax program that is being proposed, the present excessively high deficit in the budget will be reduced and, in a few years, eliminated. Because of the legacy of fiscal commitments that were inherited by this Administration, balancing the budget will require tough action over several years.

The rewards that the economy will reap with enactment of the spending control plan are many and substantial. In the past, excessive deficit spending has been a major contributor to the initiation and persistence of inflation. Not only have Federal budget deficits at times of expanding private sector activity fueled inflationary pressures, but government's tendency to stop fighting inflation with the first signs of a slackening economy has persuaded firms and workers that they need not fear pricing themselves out of business with inflationary wage and price increases. With the plans for controlling government spending, the Federal budget will become a weapon against inflation, rather than one of its major causes.

Many of the program reductions that are being proposed will contribute to a more efficient use of resources in the economy and thereby higher levels of production and income. No longer will the average American taxpayer be asked to contribute to programs that further narrow private interests rather than the general public interest. In many cases, such services are more appropriately paid for with user charges. By consolidating a variety of categorical grant programs into a few block grant programs, the resources spent will provide greater benefits because the levels of government closer to the people can better recongnize their needs than can Washington.

American society. It will contribute to the health of the economy, the strength of our miliatry, and the protection of the less fortunate members of society who need the compassion of the government for their support. Many special interests who had found it easier to look to the Federal Government for support than to the competitive market will be disappointed by this budget, but the average worker and businessman, the backbone of our Nation, will find that their interests are better served.

An integral part of the comprehensive economic program is a set of tax proposals to improve the after-tax, after-inflation rewards to work, saving, and investment. Inflation inevitably increases the burden of taxes on individuals by pushing them into higher and higher marginal rates. In businesses, inflation makes the purchase of new equipment progressively more difficult by reducing the amount of cash flow available for capital investment. The tax package addresses both of these problems.

Any increase in nominal income moves taxpayers into higher tax brackets, whether the increase is real or merely an adjustment for higher costs of living. As a consequence, taxes rise faster than inflation, raising average tax rates and tax burdens. In fact, every 10 percent increase in income -- real or nominal -- produces about a 15 percent increase in Federal personal income tax receipts.

Individual tax liabilities rose from 9.2 percent of personal income in 1965 to 11.6 percent last year. The average tax burden would have risen far more had not much of the inflation-related tax increases been offset by periodic tax cuts. Marginal tax rates, however, have been allowed to rise sharply for most taxpayers. In 1965, 6 percent of all taxpayers faced marginal rates of 25 percent of more. Today nearly one of every three taxpayers is in at least the 25 percent bracket.

As taxpayers move into higher brackets, incentives to work, save, and invest are reduced since each addition to income yields less after taxes than before. In the late 1960s and the early 1970s, Americans saved between 7 to 9 percent of personal disposable income. In 1979 and 1980, the saving rate was between 5 to 6 percent. The combination of inflation and higher marginal tax rates is undoubtedly a major factor in the lower personal saving rate.

President is asking the Congress to reduce the marginal tax rates for individuals across the board by 10 percent per year for the next 3 years starting July 1, 1981. This would reduce rates in stages from a range of 14 to 70 percent to a range of 10 to 50 percent effective January 1, 1984. These rate reductions will contribute materially above those which would be attained under present laws.

The Administration's proposals will bring down average individual tax receipts to 10.8 percent of personal income in 1984, still 1.6 percentage points above where it was in 1965. Without these marginal tax rate cuts, however, individual taxes would rise to 14.7 percent of personal income by 1984. Failure to enact these proposals is thus tantamount to imposing a tax increase on the average American taxpayer.

Since the late 1960s the rate of net capital formation (excluding spending mandated to meet environmental standards) has fallen substantially. For the 5 years ending in 1979, increases in real net business fixed capital averaged just over 2 percent of the Nation's real net national product, or one-half the rate for the latter part of the 1960s.

One of the major tasks facing the U.S. economy in the 1980s is to reverse these trends and to promote more capital investment. To combat the decline in productivity growth, to hasten the replacement of energy-inefficient machines and equipment, to comply with government mandates that do not enhance production, we must increase the share of our Nation's resources going to investment. Both improvements in productivity and increases in productive jobs will come from expanded investment.

Inflation and an outdated capital equipment depreciation system have combined to lower the after-tax real rate of return on capital investments by business. High inflation causes a large discrepancy between the historic and the current replacement costs of physical assets of business.

In 1980 alone, the replacement cost of inventories exceeded by over $43 billion the cost of the inventories claimed for tax purposes. Depreciation charges based on historical cost fell short of the replacement cost of capital assets consumed by another $17 billion. These arose from a failure to record inventory and capital assets at their true replacement cost.

On an inflation adjusted basis, many firms are now paying out more than their real income in the form of taxes and dividends. The result is that real investment in equipment, maintenance, modernization, and new technology is falling further behind the needs of our economy. Clearly, present incentives for business capital formation are inadequate.

Ten years on an accelerated write-off schedule for long-lived public utility property (with a 10 percent investment credit) and factories, stores, and warehouses used by their owners (no investment credit, consistent with present law).

Tangible personal property .... Guidelines allow 2\1/2\ to 50 years depending on asset type or activity, with optional 20 percent variance for each. .... 3 years (autos, light trucks, and machinery and equipment used for research and development), 5 years (most machinery and equipment), or 10 years (long-lived public utility property).

Real estate .... Determined by facts and circumstances or by guidelines ranging from 25 to 60 years depending on the type of building. .... 10 years for owner-occupied factories, stores, and warehouses; 15 years for other nonresidential and for low-income housing; 18 years for other residential.

Real estate .... Same for new residential; up to 150 percent declining balance for new, nonresidential; up to 125 percent declining balance for used residential; straight line for used nonresidential. .... Same for 10-year property. Straight line for other.

The rapid growth in Federal regulation has retarded economic growth and contributed to inflationary pressures. While there is widespread agreement on the legitimate role of government in protecting the environment, promoting health and safety, safeguarding workers and consumers, and guaranteeing equal opportunity, there is also growing realization that excessive regulation is a very significant factor in our current economic difficulties.

The costs of regulation arise in several ways. First, there are the outlays for the Federal bureaucracy which administers and enforces the regulations. Second, there are the costs to business, nonprofit institutions, and State and local governments of complying with regulations.

The most readily identifiable of the costs are the administrative outlays of the regulatory agencies, since they appear in the Federal budget. These costs are passed on to individuals and businesses directly in the form of higher Federal taxes. Much larger than the administrative expenses are the costs of compliance, which add $100 billion per year to the costs of the goods and services we buy. The most important effects of regulation, however, are the adverse impacts on economic growth. These arise because regulations may discourage innovative research and development, reduce investment in new plant and equipment, raise unemployment by increasing labor costs, and reduce competition. Taken together, these longer run effects contribute significantly to our current economic dilemma of high unemployment and inflation.

In many cases the costs of regulation can be substantially reduced without significantly affecting worthwhile regulatory goals. Unnecessarily stringent rules, intrusive means of enforcement, extensive reporting and recordkeeping requirements, and other regulatory excesses are all too common.

Previous efforts to manage the proliferation of Federal regulation failed to establish central regulatory oversight at the highest level. On January 22, the President announced the creation of a Task Force on Regulatory Relief to be chaired by the Vice President. The membership is to include the Secretary of the Treasury, the Attorney General, the Secretary of Commerce, the Secretary of Labor, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, the Assistant to the President for Policy Development, and the Chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers.

Environmental Protection Agency (EPA), requesting that, to the extent permitted by law, they postpone the effective dates of those regulations that would have become effective before March 29 and that they refrain from issuing any new final regulations during this 60-day period.

This suspension of new regulations has three purposes: First, it allows the new Administration to review the ``midnight'' regulations issued during the last days of the previous Administration to assure that they are cost-effective. Second, the Administration's appointees now can become familiar with the details of the various programs for which they are responsible before the regulations become final. Lastly, the suspension allows time for the Administration, through the Presidential Task Force, to develop improved procedures for management and oversight of the regulatory process.

The President has signed a new Executive order designed to improve management of the Federal regulatory process. It provides reassurance to the American people of the government's ability to control its regulatory activities. The Office of Management and Budget is charged with administering the new order, subject to the overall direction of the Presidential Task Force on Regulatory Relief.

The order emphasizes that regulatory decisions should be based on adequate information. Actions should not be undertaken unless the potential benefits to society outweigh the potential costs, and regulatory priorities should be set on the basis of net benefits to society. The order requires agencies to determine the most cost-effective approach for meeting any given regulatory objective, taking into account such factors as the economic condition of industry, the national economy, and other prospective regulations.

As part of the development of any important regulation, the order also requires that each agency prepare a Regulatory Impact Analysis to evaluate potential benefits and costs. The Task Force will oversee this process; OMB will make comments on regulatory analyses, help determine which new and existing regulations should be reviewed, and direct the publication of semiannual agendas of the regulations that agencies plan to issue or review.

The President has also ordered the immediate decontrol of domestic oil prices, instead of waiting until October as originally scheduled. This has eliminated a large Federal bureaucracy which administered a cumbersome and inefficient system of regulations that served to stifle domestic oil production, increase our dependence on foreign oil, and discourage conservation.

Reduction Act of 1980. Lamentably, present regulations will require Americans to spend over 1.2 billion hours filling out government forms during 1981. This is equivalent to the annual labor input for the entire steel industry.

The Congress responded to the need for consistent management of Federal paperwork and regulatory issues by passing the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980. The act creates an Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs within OMB with the power to review Federal regulations that contain a recordkeeping or reporting requirement and directs this agency to reduce the paperwork burden by 15 percent.

The program of regulatory relief is just getting under way. Future regulatory reform efforts will be directed not only at proposed regulations, but also at existing regulations and regulatory statutes that are particularly burdensome. This process has already begun: in the first month of the Administration several cabinet departments and agencies -- on their own initiative and in coordination with with the Task Force -- have taken action on particularly controversial rules. For example, rules mandating extensive bilingual education programs, passive restraints in large cars, the labeling of chemicals in the workplace, controls on garbage truck noise, and increased overtime payments for executives have been withdrawn or postponed. The actions taken already are expected to save the American public and industry almost $1 billion annually. The Admistration will be reviewing a host of other regulations in the near future.

Not all of our regulatory problems can be resolved satisfactorily through more effective regulatory management and decisionmaking. Existing regulatory statutes too often preclude effective regulatory decisions. Many of the statutes are conflicting, overlapping, or inconsistent. Some force agencies to promulgate regulations while giving them little discretion to take into account changing conditions or new information. Other statutes give agencies extremely broad discretion, which they have sometimes exercised unwisely.

The Administration will examine all legislation that serves as the foundation for major regulatory programs. This omnibus review, spearheaded by the Presidential Task Force on Regulatory Relief, will result in recommendations to reform these statutes. The Task Force will initially concentrate its efforts on those laws scheduled for Congressional oversight or reauthorization, such as the Clean Air Act.

Monetary policy is the responsibility of the Federal Reserve System, an independent agency within the structure of the government. The Administration will do nothing to undermine that independence. At the same time, the success in reducing inflation, increasing real income, and reducing unemployment will depend on effective interaction of monetary policy with other aspects of economic policy.

To achieve the goals of the Administration's economic program, consistent monetary policy must be applied. Thus, it is expected that the rate of money and credit growth will be brought down to levels consistent with noninflationary expansion of the economy.

If monetary policy is too expansive, then inflation during the years ahead will continue to accelerate and the Administration's economic program will be undermined. Inflationary psychology will intensify. Wages, prices, and interest rates will reflect the belief that inflation -- and the destructive effects of inflation -- will continue.

By contrast, if monetary policy is unduly restrictive, a different set of problems arises, unnecessarily aggravating recession and unemployment. At times in the past, abruptly restrictive policies have prompted excessive reactions toward short-term monetary ease. As a result, frequent policy changes can send confusing signals, and the additional uncertainty undermines long-term investment decisions and economic growth.

With money and credit growth undergoing steady, gradual reduction over a period of years, it will be possible to reduce inflation substantially and permanently. In this regard, the Administration supports the announced objective of the Federal Reserve to continue to seek gradual reduction in the growth of money and credit aggregates during the years ahead. Looking back, it seems clear that if a policy of this kind had been successfully followed in the past, inflation today would be substantially lower and would not appear to be so intractable.

Until recently, the Federal Reserve had attempted to control money growth by setting targets for interest rates, particularly the rate on Federal funds. Experience here and abroad has shown repeatedly that this interest rate management approach is not sufficient to achieve reliable control.

Mistakes in predicting movements in economic activity or tendencies on the part of policymakers to avoid large interest rate fluctuations can lead to undesirable gyrations in the rate of money growth.

Under new procedures the Federal Reserve adopted in October 1979, the Federal Reserve sets targets for growth of reserves considered to be consistent with the desired expansion in the monetary aggregates. Interest rates are allowed to vary over a much wider range in response to changes in the demand for money and credit. A number of factors -- such as the introduction of credit controls and their subsequent removal and frequent shifts in announced fiscal policies -- have contributed to pronounced fluctuations in interest rates and monetary growth over the past year. At the same time, we need to learn from the experience with the new techniques and seek further improvements. The Federal Reserve has undertaken a study of last year's experience. We look forward to the results and encourage them to make the changes that appear warranted.

In that connection, success in meeting the targets that the Federal Reserve has set will itself increase confidence in the results of policy. Otherwise, observers are likely to pay excessive attention to short-run changes in money growth and revise anticipations upward or downward unnecessarily. Without confidence in the long-term direction of policy, such short-run changes may lead to unwarranted but disturbing gyrations in credit, interest rates, commodity prices, and other sensitive indicators of inflation and economic growth.

But, with monetary policy focusing on long-term objectives, the resultant restraint on money and credit growth would interact with the tax and expenditure proposals to lower inflation as well as interest rates.

The Administration will confer regularly with the Federal Reserve Board on all aspects of our economic program. The policies that are proposed in the program will help to advance the efforts of the independent Federal Reserve System. In particular, the substantial reductions of the Federal Government's deficit financing and the achievement of a balanced budget in 1984 and the years that follow should enable the Federal Reserve System to reduce dramatically the growth in the money supply.

With the Federal Reserve gradually but persistently reducing the growth of money, inflation should decline at least as fast as anticipated. Moreover, if monetary growth rates are restrained, then inflationary expectations will decline. And since interest rate movements are largely a mirror of price expectations, reduction in one will produce reduction in the other.

This plan for national recovery represents a substantial break with past policy. The new policy is based on the premise that the people who make up the economy -- workers, managers, savers, investors, buyers, and sellers -- do not need the government to make reasoned and intelligent decisions about how best to organize and run their own lives. They continually adapt to best fit the current environment. The most appropriate role for government economic policy is to provide a stable and unfettered environment in which private individuals can confidently plan and make appropriate decisions. The new recovery plan is designed to bring to all aspects of government policy a greater sense of purpose and consistency.

Central to the new policy is the view that expectations play an important role in determining economic activity, inflation, and interest rates. Decisions to work, save, spend, and invest depend crucially on expectations regarding future government policies. Establishing an environment which ensures efficient and stable incentives for work, saving, and investment now and in the future is the cornerstone of the recovery plan.

Personal tax reductions will allow people to keep more of what they earn, providing increased incentives for work and saving. Business tax reductions will provide increased incentives for capital expansion, resulting in increased productivity for workers. Spending reductions and elimination of unneeded regulation will return control over resources to the private sector where incentives to economize are strongest. Stable monetary policy, combined with expanding productive capacity, will bring about a reduction of the inflation rate.

Inflation control is best achieved with a two-edged policy designed both to limit the rate of increase in the money stock and to increase the productive capacity of the economy. Neither policy can be expected to achieve adequate results alone.

A stable monetary policy, gradually slowing growth rates of money and credit along a preannounced and predictable path, will lead to reductions in inflation. At the same time, the effects of supply-oriented tax and regulatory changes on work incentives, expansion and improvement of the capital stock, and improved productivity will boost output and create a ``buyer's market'' for goods and services.

In contrast to the inflationary demand-led booms of the 1970s, the most significant growth of economic activity will occur in the supply side of the economy. Not only will a steady expansion in business fixed investment allow our economy to grow without fear of capacity-induced inflation pressures, but it will also increase productivity and reduce the growth of production costs by incorporating new and more high-efficient plants, machinery, and technology into our manufacturing base. The result will be revitalized growth in the real incomes and standards of living of our citizens and significantly reduced inflationary pressures. As our economy responds to a new era of economic policy, unemployment will be significantly reduced.

The Administration's plan for national recovery will take a large step toward improving the international economic environment by repairing domestic conditions. Improving expectations and slowing inflation will enhance the dollar as an international store of value and contribute to greater stability in international financial markets. As interest rates come down and faster U.S. growth contributes to rising world trade, economic expansion in other countries will also accelerate. This Administration will work closely with the other major industrial countries to promote consistency in economic objectives and policies so as to speed a return to noninflationary growth in the world economy. Finally, rising U.S. productivity will enhance our ability to compete with other countries in world markets, easing protectionist pressures at home and thus strengthening our ability to press other countries to reduce their trade barriers and export subsidies.

Indeed they do represent a dramatic departure from the trends of recent years -- but so do the proposed policies. In fact, if each portion of this comprehensive economic program is put in place -- quickly and completely -- the economic environment could improve even more rapidly than envisioned in these assumptions.

Again, as I say, we're pleased to have you here. We think that we can have a dialog instead of a monolog, and I'm going to, without any further remarks, introduce to you one of our Cabinet Secretaries who will introduce a couple of teammates, and then I will come back. And we will begin some question-and-answer which will be concluded with the gentleman you are about to meet.

Good morning, ladies and gentlemen. It's a pleasure to be here with you. I hope you are all as thrilled as I was last night in hearing the President's remarks. This program is really bold. It's innovative; it's new; it breaks with the past; and it is different. I think that it's going to be one of the most stimulating things that's ever happened to our economy. From the point of view of why we are being so abrupt in breaking with the past, is that we can no longer go on with what we have been doing. You take a look at what our economy has been doing and consider that for the last 2 years we've had the greatest rates of inflation since the Civil War. And we apparently were going to continue down that road unless there was a break, so we have decided to make it.

Now, during the morning, Dave Stockman, Murray Weidenbaum, and I will be explaining to you the details of this package. I won't take any longer except to say that as part of my program -- that is, the tax part of it -- I am going up on the Hill this morning at 10 o'clock to start explaining it. I have another session with a different part of the Hill at 2 o'clock. I'm back up there again tomorrow at 10 o'clock. We'll be explaining this program, I hope not ad nauseum, but at least with a great deal of clarity so that you'll all understand it. And we feel that it's exactly what the American people have wanted. It's been designed that way. We're going to give it to them that way. We're going to fight with them in Congress.

You can use any analogy you want. This is the kick-off in football. This is the first inning of a baseball game. We're right at the start of what promises to be a great victory for the Reagan forces. And that's the program that we're going to be developing over the next few months, working with the Congress.

Mr. Stockman. Well, thank you very much, Don. And ladies and gentlemen, I would like to welcome you to the President's new White House breakfast program this morning, the one new program that we didn't announce last night. But what we hope that we're offering to you this morning is not only a breakfast but some food for thought.

And what I would suggest today is the plan that the President announced last night contains more new ideas, more new approaches to the fundamental economic problems of this country than we've seen in the last 15 or 20 years in Washington. And when you look at the economic mess that we have today, the way that inflation is eroding the ability of our economy to operate, the way in which tax rates continue to creep up and destroy incentives, destroy investment, destroy savings, it's pretty clear to me and I think it's pretty clear to the President that the kind of bold changes on the spending side, on the tax side, on the regulatory side that he proposed last night are precisely what this country needs.

I'm in charge of the budget side in particular. And although the papers this morning, at least some of them, have suggested that this $41 billion cut that we're requesting in the Federal budget for next year is too draconian, is too deep, I would just take this opportunity to remind you that even after all those changes are made, and even after the Congress adopts the 83 different proposals that we presented last night, we will still have a budget next year that is $40 billion higher than it is this year.

That's far faster than the growth of our tax base. It's far faster than the growth of our economy as a whole. As a result, we're taking a larger and larger share of the output of our economy at the government level. And that explains basically the economic deterioration that we've had. So, we're proposing to shift direction sharply, to hold the growth rate of Federal spending to 6 percent next year and in the years thereafter.

It will be difficult to do. But we have proposed to slay some sacred cows, if you will. We have proposed to reduce or eliminate programs that simply can't be justified under the current fiscal and economic crisis conditions that we face in this country. But I think we're going to get a favorable response from the American people, and I think we're going to get a favorable response from the Hill.

I happened to spend 4 years on the Hill as a Member of Congress. And I know that during those 4 years, every Member of Congress knew in his mind and his heart that things were going too far, that things were out of hand. Now we have a President who's willing to propose a program to turn that around. We have a President who I think can rally the support of this country. And I think you're going to find on Capitol Hill, despite all the cynicism that you hear from some, that we're going to get a great deal of support and that we're going to get this job done.

Murray Weidenbaum, who's Chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers. He's the guy in charge of integrating and pulling this whole program together and explaining it in a lucid and convincing way, something that he's fully capable of doing. So, I would like to introduce Murray Weidenbaum, Chairman of the CEA.

Reagan program is a program for a healthier economy which will provide real, solid benefits to every American citizen. I will not concentrate on the medicine, so to speak -- the budget cuts, the regulatory restraint. I would like to emphasize the results, the positive results, in terms of bringing the inflation down by more than half, in terms of reducing the tax burden of every taxpayer, the creation of 3 million new jobs, all this between now and 1986 -- not a quick fix to be sure, but a constructive, balanced program which very frankly deserves the support, I think, of the American people.

The President. Well, ladies and gentlemen, you obviously know that you are here because we beleive that the main source of strength in this fight is going to be the people themselves. And we believe also that they are ready to support a great change and go along. And you are in a position to help with this.

I've been hearing some of the voices already, when I was getting dressed, on some of the morning shows, from those who would be expected to be against this program in government. And I almost sense that one of their plans is going to be to not criticize the cuts at all, but to see if they can't wipe out the tax part of the program. This tax part of the program we have tried to stress, and this is one of the reasons why we've gone out of our way to point out to the people that it is not a reducing of the amount of money that government is going to get, it is reducing that increase.

We found in California when I was Governor there that -- and we had our great welfare reforms and all, and we had inherited a situation similiar to that of the Federal Government today. And during the campaign I was very frustrated when people would bring up and say, ``Well, yes, he talks about saving money in California, but look, the budgets went up and they went up to such and such a figure by the time he left office.'' What they didn't realize was of course the budgets are going to go up. There's growth, there's inflation, there's growth in government to match the increase in population and so forth. What they didn't realize though was that that slant of going up, we reduced by 20 percent. And if you do the same with the taxes and change the steep rise, today there's virtually a hundred billion dollars of tax increase built into the present system that will take place in this coming year if we do not reduce that increase.

But for years now the two lines have been diverging. Even steep as the taxes are, they don't keep up with the increase in spending. If we can bring the those lines to more parallel and what we are, believe me, hoping for and we know we can do, is have the tax line begin to converge with the spending line. And when you reach that point and then if you keep going, the tax line will be bringing in revenues greater than the increase in government, that is when you go foward with further tax cuts of the kind to correct the inequities that I mentioned in my remarks last night.

And I believe the people are ready. But I believe that there's going to be a lot of misinformation released in the fights that might go on. And yet, we're optimistic. We think that across the aisle, in Congress today, there is a different feeling and there are more people than anyone realizes who are of the opinion that this has to go forward.

Now, rather than go on with any kind of a monolog, and since my time is limited here, and possibly yours also, maybe we can open this up to discussion or questions from you. And if you throw me one that I can't answer, you can see I've got three specialists here that I'll call on.

The President. Why in the list of inflationary forces did I not mention gasoline prices and home heating fuel prices? Well, I have to believe that to a certain extent, I know that that's an unusual situation, prices are not so much the cause of inflation -- price rises -- they're the result. And when I say there is something different in that one, yes. When the OPEC nations with the near monopoly power now take advantage of that position and just simply raise the price to suit themselves, that is a price over and above the normal response to inflation.

One economist pointed out a couple of years ago -- he didn't state this as a theory, but he just said it's something to look at -- when we started buying the oil over there, the OPEC nations, 10 barrels of oil were sold for the price of an ounce of gold. And the price was pegged to the American dollar. And we were about the only country left that still were on a gold standard. And then a few years went by, and we left the gold standard. And as this man suggested, if you looked at the recurrent price rises, were the OPEC nations raising the price of oil or were they simply following the same pattern of an ounce of gold, that as gold in this inflationary age kept going up, they weren't going to follow our paper money downhill? They stayed with the gold price. Of course, now, if we followed that, why, they should be coming down, because the price of gold's coming down. But I think that that's like the inflation-contributing factor that you'll have sometimes simply because of a poor crop. That is not based on the economy, that's simply supply and demand. And if there's a crop failure and you've got a bigger demand than you have supply, the price goes up.

But I believe that even those things can be dealt with with the other factors that we're going to follow, and that is trying to increase the energy supply in our own country. I think we can talk conservation all we want, but there's a limit that you get below which you cannot get maintaining your level of comfort and your level of industry. And I think the best answer, while conservation is worthy in itself, is to try to make us independent of outside sources to the greatest extent possible for our energy, and I believe that we have the possibilities of that. We're not energy poor.

Q. Mr. President, in your remarks last night you mentioned that you envisioned reductions in spending in some social services, and not only as a reduction in expenditures but as improving the efficiency in social services -- [inaudible] -- rather interesting. I was wondering if you feel that by cutting expenditures you do improve efficiency -- the old theory that any job 10 men can do, 9 men can do, 8 men can do better -- is that part of your thought on the governmental operation?

The President. Well, in social services -- maybe part of my confidence in that and what we can do is based on what we did in California. We finally realized that all the savings we were making, all the economies, were all being eaten by welfare. And in good times and bad it bore no relation to the economy.

We saw that welfare in California was reaching a point of an increase of as much as 40,000 cases a month being added to the welfare rolls. We finally turned the task force loose to come back with a plan for reforming welfare. And we had a long fight. We could do the part administratively. We had two fights. We had a fight with our legislature to get some of it, because I had a hostile legislature at the time, and we had a fight with Washington, with the bureaucracy in HEW who had rules and regulations that for example -- and this is still true today -- that under those rules and regulations no one in the United States knows how many people are on welfare. They only know how many checks they're sending out, and then we turn up a woman in Chicago that's getting checks under 127 different names. And just recently in Pasadena, California, living in a lovely big home there, a woman was brought in and charged with collecting $300,000 in a welfare scheme.

Well, we set out to correct this. We finally got some waivers from HEW. We finally got the legislation, and again, we got it -- one of the biggest single things that happened to turn the public on our side in that fight came from your profession -- from the press. When a paper in San Francisco sent a reporter out to see if he could get on welfare -- to see if our stories of the horrors of welfare were true -- he got on welfare four times under four different names in the same office on the same day. And when he wrote that story, we had an ally.

When we finished our reforms, though -- we hadn't been able to give a cost-of-living increase to the welfare recipients in California because we were spread so thin, this is 1958 -- we saved over a 3-year period, because the welfare reforms went in only in my last 3 years -- we saved $2 billion for the California tax-payers in the program. The rolls were reduced by more than 350,000 people without us actually throwing anyone off. They just disappeared, and over and above that we had enough to increase the welfare grants to the deserving needy who remained by an average of 43 percent.

And when I say we didn't throw anyone off, we got permission that in 35 of our 58 counties, we could require able-bodied welfare recipients to work -- to come and report for useful community projects -- all of which we'd screened from school boards, from counties, from cities and towns, to make sure there were no boondoggles. And they had to report -- they only had to work 20, not 40 hours a week; the other half was to be spent either in job training or looking for work. And then we assigned what we called job agents from our labor department to each group of these people and told these job agents their job was to look at these people doing these jobs and see how quickly they could get them out into private enterprise. And in the midst of the '73 and '74 recession, when unemployment was increasing in the nation, they funneled 76,000 welfare recipients through this program into private enterprise jobs -- and free of welfare from there on out.

And we believe that this is what's going to happen, because we're very much determined to turn as much of welfare management as we can back to the States -- give them the Federal revenue share, but more in the nature of a block grant, and give them the right to require able-bodied recipients to work and give them the right to administer this program without this layer of bureaucracy in Washington on top of it. And so, we think we're going to benefit rather than hurt the people that are getting these grants.

The President. We're introducing five pieces of legislation. One will be the tax bill; the other one will be a reconciliation act -- that will be one of the toughest ones -- that is, to try and get them to simply submit the program to the major committees and not break it all up into fragments and fragment it out with all the subcommittees. Then there will be the rescissions for 1981. We didn't mention that last night, but our cuts have begun with the remainder of 1981, which has been going on since October 1st -- this budget. We're going to make several billions of dollars of savings before the year is out in that program. That will take rescissions that have to be passed by Congress. And then, of course, the cuts in the 1982 budget which has been submitted by the previous administration. And that's the one where we're hoping to reduce $41.4 billion with our cuts.

So, that's as much as we could package it. We've emphasized and I've been meeting with legislative leaders from both sides of the aisle. We're going to continue to do that, urging them both to expedite this, but also to hold it together.

One of the reasons that we didn't add in any of the tax features that I mentioned later, as coming later on, is because we thought if we opened that door, then everyone with an idea might, and then would, begin to pick at the program with amendments and so forth. And we hope that they will just simply get the basic program passed. I believe, as I said earlier, that one of the things we must be most aware of will be the attempt -- no one will want to stand up and oppose the cuts in today's climate, but they will then say, ``Well, the tax part of it won't work.'' And we're sure it will.

The President. Well now, that's a problem I'm going to have to face. And I had a rule I'll fall back on in California as Governor: I never talk about whether I'll sign or veto until whatever is there is before me on my desk. But the two must go together if we're to have the stimulant to the economy, because the main purpose of this is really to get the economy moving again. And to do that, we've seen the percentage of gross national product that the Federal Government is taking in taxes going up consistently. And if you go back to where it was hovering below 20 and down around anywhere from 17\1/2\ to 19 over the years. we didn't have inflation; we didn't have the problems we're having today. But we're on our way up to almost a fourth of the gross national product taken by government in taxes, and this is what we feel has to come down if the economy is to go forward. And of course, to do that, we've got to make -- if we're going to cure inflation, which I believe stems in the main from government spending more than it takes in, we're going to have to bring government down to match the revenues.

Q. Mr. President, many people in Congress believe in the tax cuts -- I mean, the budget cuts, but are very concerned about the tax cuts. They fear it will be inflationary. How do you plan to combat that fear among Congress?

First of all, a number of fine economists like Murray Weidenbaum and many of his associates don't think that that's so. But also we've got history on our side. Every major tax cut that has been made in this century in our country has resulted in even the government getting more revenue than it did before, because the base of the economy is so broadened by doing it.

We only have to look at the last few experiences with cuts in the capital gains tax, and you find that the very next year after the rate was lowered, the government got more revenue from capital gains tax than it's been getting at the higher rate. What happens? People up there who are now worried about and busying themselves with tax shelters, if it becomes profitable to move out into risk-taking adventure and investments, they then are encouraged to move out and into that.

Back when Calvin Coolidge cut the taxes across the board, and more than once, the government's revenues increased. When Jack Kennedy did it in the 2-year program and his economic advisers, they were all telling him -- I can remember the figures -- they told him that the government would lose $83 billion in revenue, and the government gained $54 billion in revenue, I think is the figure, that it actually went up. So, they had made quite a sizeable financial error in their estimates. Jack Kennedy's line about it was, ``a rising tide lifts all boats.'' And this is what we believe that the tax proposals that we've made, what they're aimed at.

Business and industry in America today is investing the lowest percentage of any of the industrial nations in improvement in plant and equipment. We have the highest percentage of outmoded industrial plant and equipment of all the industrial nations. One of the reasons is the lack of capital. The government is competing in the private capital market to fund the government's deficits. The American people are saving at a lower percentage than the workers are in Japan, West Germany, and the other industrial nations, and that money that once went into savings accounts or insurance, as we all know it then, became a part of the capital pool that was reinvested by banks and insurance companies out in the free enterprise sector. And you could cite all sorts of figures of the increase in investment in tax-free municipal bonds and the reduction in industrial stocks that have taken place in America.

The President. Well, I can't say that I didn't expect it. I thought it was interesting that they kind of took a stand against it before they heard what it was. Now, whether they'll be converted or convinced by the things that they will now be able to understand or know about the program, I wish they would treat it with more of an open mind.

I happen to believe that sometimes they're out of step with their own rank and file. They certainly were in the last election. [Laughter] But I was a president of my own union once, an AFL-CIO union, and I think I know something about them. And it is true that they philosophically have tended for a number of years now to support the idea of government spending being good for the economy.

I remember once that as a union president representing not only my own but 32 other unions in the motion picture industry and management, I came to Washington to appear before the House Ways and Means Committee in support of a tax reform program that had been introduced. I was met by two of the lobbyists for the AFL-CIO and shown a rather sizable book labeled ``The Tax Policy for the AFL-CIO'' for that year, and it was completely the opposite of what I was here to say on behalf of those local unions that were all part of that organization. They frankly stated that the tax policy they favored would get the government $12 billion in additional revenue, and they wanted it to get that revenue because they had $12 billion worth of social welfare programs that they wanted the government to adopt.

Corporation [U.S. Synthetic Fuels Corporation], you express confidence that private enterprise will pick up that slack and do the job. In view of their failure to do so in the past, the energy companies' failure, what makes you think they'll do it here?

The President. Well, because if it's going to be done, they'll have to do it. Maybe they haven't done it in the past because there was so much promise of government standing there ready to do it. And you know, not that the giant companies are poor, but I keep remembering what Milton Friedman once said,``If you start paying people to be poor, there's going to be a lot of poor people.'' And maybe the same thing was true of business, that human nature is the same in the board room as it is down there on the street.

But I think that with the price of fuel where it is -- let me be practical about them and fair to them also -- there was no incentive before, because what we were talking about, synthetic fuels, were going to be more costly than the natural fuels that we were using. Now with the price up where it is, there is an incentive for them to look at these because they may be cost-effective. They may even be cost-advantageous over fossil fuels. So, I believe that there is.

The President. Hmm. You know something? That's a question -- I just looked over here, and I got a cue. Yes, Don Regan tells me they are. And that's fitting, because the tax increase that was adopted in the last year and that is built into the present system is the largest single tax increase in our Nation's history. So, we might as well match it with the largest single tax cut in our history.

I know that I've come to the end of my time and hear that helicopter take off pretty quickly, but don't think your questions won't be answered here. I am now going to get my trio back up here, and they will take your questions. And I think they'll be able to give you more indepth on anything that you might want to know about the program that we've been putting together.

The President. There's still that belief on the part of many people that a cut in tax rates automatically means a cut in revenues. And if they'll only look at history, it doesn't. A cut in tax rates can very often be reflected in an increase in government revenues because of the broadening of the base of the economy.

The President. I can't give you a firm answer on that until I see that, but I have to point out that if they tried it -- no, I think it would be the other way around, that they are less apt to oppose the budget cuts than they are the tax cuts. But if you tried it the other way with the tax cuts of none, then I'm not sure that you'd have the same stimulant that you're going to have out of the whole program, and you could aggravate your situation.

The President. Oh, I think here and there, there will be, yes; there will be battles here and there on some of them. But I've noticed that most of the immediate responses from those you would expect to oppose this have dealt with the taxes more than with the other.

The President. Well, I have a hunch that they will greet me with the same amount of reading material that they do in Washington; they have on the plane already. No, there'll be -- leave the job behind, but I also think that I'll be able to haul some wood and ride some horses and do that.

The President. Yes, he really is. He's trained for what's known as high dressage. But I have had to board him out for a little bit until we can get a facility for him if we're going to have him back up there, because the five geldings that I've got -- that stallion was going to wind up being the only horse on the place if we didn't move him. So, until we can have a better facility, why, we've boarded him nearby.

Ladies and gentlemen, we are most grateful for this warm welcome, to come out here with two of our California Congressmen and their ladies -- Congressmen Lagomarsino and Badham -- and brought our lawyer along too, the Attorney General. We all just decided -- well, it's only coincidence that I made a speech on inflation last night and turned up here this morning.

I know the ladies know about inflation. Once upon a time you used to put some money in your purse and go to the market and buy a bag full of groceries. Now you take a bag full of money, go to the market, and bring the groceries home in your purse. [Laughter] That's what we were talking about and what we are trying to correct.

Nancy and I are delighted to be back in California. This is the first time since the Inauguration, and I find that already I've become so much of a Washingtonian that I have a hard time keeping my eyes open in the California Sun. [Laughter] But it's wonderful to be back. We've been very homesick. And while it is wonderful there and we're pleased to be there and doing what we're doing, I hope that we'll be seeing you again, and on a fairly regular basis.

Well, we won't keep you any longer except to say that -- incidentally, did you hear last night's speech? [Applause] Well, now I'm very much relieved. I wasn't going to mention it, because you were so friendly, and then I just kind of got curious as to whether you were friendly in spite of it or because of it.

We're grateful to be here and look forward to seeing you again and hope that some of the things that we said last night are going to take place and take place very quickly, because we think it's time to get America on the move again in the world. And we think it's time also for that which you represent here and the other branches of our service to take their rightful place in our society with the respect and the gratitude of the people extended to you for what you are all doing in our behalf, and we're going to see if that cannot happen too.

Dr. Hernandez has a B.S. in civil engineering from the University of New Mexico, an M.S. in sanitary engineering from Purdue University, and a Ph. D. in water resources from Harvard University. A registered professional engineer and land surveyor in New Mexico, Dr. Hernandez has written extensively in professional publications on water quality and waste treatment. He received a letter of commendation from President Nixon in 1970 for exceptional service in the field of air and water pollution. In 1978 he received the Engineer of the Year Award by the New Mexico Society of Professional Engineers.

Well, I just want to say this is a time for nostalgia for me. I see some familiar faces around here, and I want you to know that when you're all in town and around a hotel and walking down the corridor, I do the same thing that you do. Somebody says ``Governor,'' and I turn around.

I am looking forward to having a coordinating task force on federalism and would appreciate your suggestions before you leave as to how we can organize this. In the meantime I'll be working with Rich Williamson [Assistant to the President for Intergovernmental Affairs Richard S.

As you know, this is a longtime dream of mine, this thing of balancing up the divisions of government. I think they've been badly distorted over the years. I've dreamed about it before and just today was going through some things that are still in the desk drawers from the old days. And I came across this set of figures -- I don't know what they would be today, but back when I was Governor, that for every 10,000 Americans there are 12 doctors, ll lawyers and judges, 40 gas station attendants, and 37 telephone employees. So, that's a total of 100 for every 10,000 people to keep us healthy and give us legal advice and sit in the courts and fill our cars with gas and take care of the telephones. But there were 130 Federal civilian employees for every 10,000 people, and I thought that was too many then, and I think it's too many now. But the Intergovernmental Affairs Office of the White House will be playing a part in our deliberations.

And I'd like also your thoughts on revenue sharing. Again, my dream has always been that, if possible, the ideal situation would be not the connection of Federal grants but of eventually turning over to the States -- and turning, I'd say, back to the States, tax sources that more properly belong there and which would then help fund responsibilities that also properly belong at the State level instead of at the Federal level.

Now, we haven't made a final decision on some of the things with regard to revenue sharing, but I would like to hear from you and to hear your comments. But first I'm going to call on Governor Busbee for comments from chairmen of your standing committees.

Of all God's gifts, the ability to see is one of the most precious. It is the sense of sight that saves mankind from living in darkness. It is the sense of sight that permits individuals to communicate with each other and to future generations through literature and art. It enables man to enjoy the magnificence of a sunset and the promise of a rainbow.

Unfortunately, sight is often taken for granted. Few realize how many of our citizens lose their sight every year. Yet many forms of blindness can be cured if discovered soon enough, and many blinded by accident could have kept their sight had they taken only minor eye safety precautions.

Each of us has the responsibility to care for that which is ours. Our eyesight and the eyesight of our children should be paramount on the list of personal responsibilities. Money cannot but it, but a check-up and early care can preserve it.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-third day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

President, the authority vested in the President by Section 2107 of the Act to the extent necessary to implement the provisions of Section 2101 of the Act, relating to pay and benefits pending conversion.

Secretary of Defense and the Administrator of Veterans Affairs such information as the Secretary deems necessary. To the extent permitted by law: (a) The Secretary of Defense shall provide information on retired or retainer pay provided under Title 10, United States Code; and, (b) the Administrator of Veterans Affairs shall provide information on pensions or compensation provided under Title 38 of the United States Code. The Secretary, in consultation with the officials from whom information is requested, shall ensure that information made available under this Order is used only for the purpose authorized.

The President. I realize I'm interrupting here, and I did just drop by for a few minutes before today's briefing ends, that I thought I might add a few words of my own to those that you've already heard from members of the Cabinet.

Over the past 6 days since I addressed the Congress, the response to our economic program has been enormously encouraging. Several thousand Americans have already written to me or have sent telegrams expressing strong support. If you want the figures, the latest telegraph count is 2,490 favorable, 43 unfavorable. And I won't vouch for the arithmetic, but somebody that figured it out said that was 98 percent in our favor.

Yesterday, as you know, I had an opportunity to meet with the Nation's Governors, and they all recognize that this program will require some belt-tightening. But many of them also agreed that only if our Government grows less will our economy grow more.

Hollings of South Carolina are together introducing a reconciliation resolution in the Senate so that the Congress can begin speedy and earnest deliberation on our proposals. Their bipartisan support for this resolution is very much in the spirit of what I said to Congress last week: that economic recovery must not be a concern of one party or one President, but of all parties and indeed all Americans. It shouldn't simply be my plan, it should be our plan.

Reporter. Mr. President, on the defense budget, the rationale for it, in your increase, you believe that it's necessary in order to keep from falling behind the Russians. Now President Brezhnev has suggested a summit meeting with you to try to decrease tensions, and I presume down the line if it all worked, that might change the rationale for the defense budget. What are the chances that you'd have a summit meeting with Brezhnev, under what conditions, and what could you discuss?

The President. Well, I think the only answer to that question is I was most interested in his suggestion, and it's something that now we will discuss and discuss it with the State Department, with the Cabinet in general, and very particularly, discuss it in the days ahead with the leaders of our allies, which is -- Margaret Thatcher coming here, Prime Minister of England, this week.

That'll be part of the discussion, because I have pledged to them that we're not going to act on things like this unilaterally. We'll have a discussion with all of them as well as with our own people, and I have repeatedly said that I am willing to negotiate if it's a legitimate negotiation aimed at verifiable reductions, in particular, the strategic nuclear weapons.

And I also made it plain that I think that at such a negotiation table, if and when this takes place, there should be other considerations, what has been termed by Mr. Brezhnev as linkage. I think that you can't just deal with just one facet of the international relationship; you've got to deal with all of the problems that are dividing us.

The President. So far, at least publicly, they've been denying that they are involved in that, but I think the evidence that we have and that we've made public and that we've told our allies about makes it evident that they are involved.

Vietnam syndrome, but we have no intention of that kind of involvement. But there's no question but that we are in support of the government there against those who are attempting a violent overthrow of the government.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. My question is about the summit meeting. If you appear to be delaying, won't that look like Brezhnev is the one seeking peaceful means, seeking a summit, and that the United States is the one holding off? Won't you be accused, won't it appear that way if you don't act quickly in giving him an answer?

We do have to put this up to our allies and to their leadership and wait for their consultation, as well as talking it over ourselves. So, I think that they would understand that. They've had experience dragging their feet.

Note: The President spoke at 9:50 a.m. at the second of a series of briefings on the economic recovery program given by administration officials for reporters in Room 450 of the Old Executive Office Building.

This agreement is one of a series to be negotiated in accordance with that legislation. I urge that the Congress give favorable consideration to this agreement at an early date. Several U.S. fishing interests have urged prompt consideration of this agreement, and I therefore recommend that the Congress consider issuance of a joint resolution to bring this agreement into force.

Securities and Exchange Commission for the remainder of the term expiring June 5, 1982. He will succeed Harold M. Williams, who is resigning. The President also announced his intention to designate him to serve as Chairman.

Mr. Shad is vice chairman of the board of directors of the E. F. Hutton Group, Inc., the second largest publicly owned investment banking and brokerage firm. He also serves as chairman of the finance, underwriting, investment and acquisition committees, and as a member of the executive committee.

He has had a lengthy career as a military and civilian expert in crime prevention and investigation; industrial defense; physical security; civil disturbances and disasters; confinement and rehabilitation responsibilities. He attained the rank of colonel in the U.S. Army in 1968 and served in a variety of positions. In 1971 he left the Army and, at the request of Governor Ronald Reagan, organized the California Specialized Training Institute and has directed it since its inception. In addition, he served as an adviser on terrorism, emergency management, and other special topics for the office of the Governor of California. He was recently promoted to the rank of general in the California National Guard.

Several years ago, we brought home a group of American fighting men who had obeyed their country's call and who had fought as bravely and as well as any Americans in our history. They came home without a victory not because they'd been defeated, but because they'd been denied permission to win.

As the poet Laurence Binyon wrote, ``They shall grow not old, as we that are left grow old: Age shall not weary them, nor the years condemn. At the going down of the sun and in the morning We will remember them.'' Pride, of course, cannot wipe out the burden of grief borne by their families, but it can make that grief easier to bear. The pain will not be quite as sharp if they know their fellow citizens share that pain.

Army combat troops began sacking enemy food they had captured and shipping them back on returning helicopters. They found cots in a salvage dump, repaired them, and soon the children were sleeping in beds for the first time. One day, the cup was passed. Marines earmarked 10 percent of all poker winnings, and by the end of the year, the orphans were in a new building.

The stories go on and on. A Green Beret learned that a mother in a remote mountain village was having trouble in childbirth. He made his way to her home, caried her to a truck, and raced to Cam Ranh, where a Navy doctor delivered the baby. On Christmas he gave 1,500 orphans toothpaste, soap, candy, and nuts he'd collected from fellow servicemen.

Bob Hope, who visited our men there as he had in two previous wars, said of them, ``The number of our GI's who devote their free time, energy, and money to aid the Vietnamese would surprise you.'' And then he added, ``But maybe it wouldn't. I guess you know what kind of guys your sons and brothers and the kids next door are.'' Well, yes, we do know. I think we just let it slip our minds for a time. It's time to show our pride in them and to thank them.

I have one more Vietnam story, and the individual in this story was brought up on a farm outside of Cuero in De Witt County, Texas, and he is here today. Thanks to the Secretary of Defense, Cap Weinberger, I learned of his story, which had been overlooked or buried for several years. It has to do with the highest award our Nation can give, the Congressional Medal of Honor, given only for service above and beyond the call of duty.

On May 2, 1968, Master Sergeant (then Staff Sergeant) Roy P. Benavidez distinguished himself by a series of daring and extremely valorous actions while assigned to Detachment B-56, 5th Special Forces Group (Airborne), 1st Special Forces, Republic of Vietnam. On the morning of May 2, 1968, a 12-man Special Forces Reconnaissance Team was inserted by helicopters in a dense jungle area west of Loc Ninh, Vietnam to gather intelligence information about confirmed large-scale enemy activity. This area was controlled and routinely patrolled by the North Vietnamese Army. After a short period of time on the ground, the team met heavy enemy resistance, and requested emergency extraction. Three helicopters attempted extraction, but were unable to land due to intense enemy small arms and anti-aircraft fire. Sergeant Benavidez was at the Forward Operating Base in Loc Ninh monitoring the operation by radio when these helicopters returned to off-load wounded crewmembers and to assess aircraft damage. Sergeant Benavidez voluntarily boarded a returning aircraft to assist in another extraction attempt.

Realizing that all the team members were either dead or wounded and unable to move to the pickup zone, he directed the aircraft to a nearby clearing where he jumped from the hovering helicopter, and ran approximately 75 meters under withering small arms fire to the crippled team.

Prior to reaching the team's position, he was wounded in his right leg, face, and head. Despite these painful injuries, he took charge, repositioning the team members and directing their fire to facilitate the landing of an extraction aircraft, and the loading of wounded and dead team members. He then threw smoke cannisters to direct the aircraft to the team's position. Despite his severe wounds and under intense enemy fire, he carried and dragged half of the wounded team members to the awaiting aircraft. He then provided protective fire by running alongside the aircraft as it moved to pick up the remaining team members. As the enemy's fire intensified, he hurried to recover the body and the classified documents on the dead team leader. When he reached the team leader's body, Sergeant Benavidez was severely wounded by small arms fire in the abdomen and grenade fragments in his back. At nearly the same moment, the aircraft pilot was mortally wounded, and his helicopter crashed. Although in extremely critical condition due to his multiple wounds, Sergeant Benavidez secured the classified documents and made his way back to the wreckage, where he aided the wounded out of the overturned aircraft, and gathered the stunned survivors into a defensive perimeter. Under increasing enemy automatic weapons and grenade fire, he moved around the perimeter distributing water and ammunition to his weary men, reinstilling in them a will to live and fight. Facing a build-up of enemy opposition with a beleagured team, Sergeant Benavidez mustered his strength, and began calling in tactical air strikes and directing the fire from supporting gunships, to suppress the enemy's fire and so permit another extraction attempt. He was wounded again in his thigh by small arms fire while administering first aid to a wounded team member just before another extraction helicopter was able to land. His indomitable spirit kept him going as he began to ferry his comrades to the craft.

On his second trip with the wounded, he was clubbed from behind by an enemy soldier. In the ensuing hand-to-hand combat, he sustained additional wounds to his head and arms before killing his adversary. He then continued under devastating fire to carry the wounded to the helicopter.

Upon reaching the aircraft, he spotted and killed two enemy soldiers who were rushing the craft from an angle that prevented the aircraft door gunner from firing upon them. With little strength remaining, he made one last trip to the perimeter to ensure that all classified material had been collected or destroyed, and to bring in the remaining wounded. Only then, in extremely serious condition from numerous wounds and loss of blood, did he allow himself to be pulled into the extraction aircraft. Sergeant Benavidez' gallant choice to join voluntarily his comrades who were in critical straits, to expose himself constantly to withering enemy fire, and his refusal to be stopped despite numerous severe wounds, saved the lives of at least eight men. His fearless personal leadership, tenacious devotion to duty, and extremely valorous actions in the face of overwhelming odds were in keeping with the highest traditions of the military service, and reflect the utmost credit on him and the United States Army.

Sergeant Benavidez, a nation grateful to you, and to all your comrades living and dead, awards you its highest symbol of gratitude for service above and beyond the call of duty, the Congressional Medal of Honor.

Section 1. All claims which may be presented to the Iran-United States Claims Tribunal under the terms of Article II of the Declaration of the Government of the Democratic and Popular Republic of Algeria Concerning the Settlement of Claims by the Government of the United States of America and the Government of the Islamic Republic of Iran, and all claims for equitable or other judicial relief in connection with such claims, are hereby suspended, except as they may be presented to the Tribunal. During the period of this suspension, all such claims shall have no legal effect in any action now pending in any court of the United States, including the courts of any state or any locality thereof, the District of Columbia and Puerto Rico, or in any action commenced in any such court after the effective date of this Order. Nothing in this action precludes the commencement of an action after the effective date of this Order for the purpose of tolling the period of limitations for commencement of such action.

Sec. 4. A determination by the Iran-United States Claims Tribunal on the merits that a claimant is not entitled to recover on a claim shall operate as a final resolution and discharge of the claim for all purposes. A determination by the Tribunal that a claimant shall have recovery on a claim in a specified amount shall operate as a final resolution and discharge of the claim for all purposes upon payment to the claimant of the full amount of the award, including any interest awarded by the Tribunal.

Claims Settlement Agreement between the United States and Iran. After a complete review of the agreements with Iran leading to the release of the hostages held by Iran I have decided to implement them.

I am also ratifying earlier Executive Orders signed by President Carter on January 19, 1981 to remove any doubt as to their effect, an issue that has been raised in recent litigation challenging them. In this connection I note that Executive Orders 12276 through 12285 were all signed by President Carter and made effective while he was still in office. The Report to Congress required by IEEPA dated January 19, 1981 indicates that some of the Executive Orders were not signed until the release of the hostages, an event that did not occur until after the end of his term. The report, which was prepared in advance, did not, because of the press of circumstances, reflect events precisely as they occurred and to that extent it stands corrected.

The United States has been engaged in nuclear cooperation with the European Community for many years. This cooperation was initiated under agreements concluded over two decades ago between the United States and the European Atomic Energy Community (EURATOM) and extends until December 31, 1995. Since the inception of this cooperation, the Community has adhered to all its obligations.

The Nuclear Non-Proliferation Act of 1978 amended the Atomic Energy Act to establish nuclear export criteria, including a requirement that the United States have a right to consent to the reprocessing of fuel exported from the United States. Our present agreements for cooperation with EURATOM do not contain such a right. To avoid disrupting cooperation with EURATOM, a proviso was included in the law to enable continued cooperation until March 10, 1980, and provide for negotiations concerning our cooperation agreements.

I believe that it is essential that cooperation between the United States and the Community continue and likewise that we work closely with our Allies to counter the threat of nuclear explosives proliferation. Accordingly, I have determined that failure to continue peaceful nuclear cooperation with EURATOM would be seriously prejudicial to the achievement of United States non-proliferation objectives and would jeopardize the common defense and security of the United States. I intend to sign an Executive Order to extend the waiver of the application of the relevant export criterion of the NNPA for an additional twelve months from March 10, 1981.

The President and Prime Minister Seaga of Jamaica, in their talks here on January 28, stressed the central importance of new private sector investment for Jamaican economic recovery and agreed that the formation of action groups of outstanding business leaders in the two countries would contribute substantially to this end. The President therefore applauds and strongly endorses the formation of the U.S. Business Committee on Jamaica, which was announced today.

The Committee will work together with a counterpart Jamaican group in seeking to stimulate and mobilize new investment, trade, and employment in Jamaica during this critical period of national economic recovery.

Revitalization of the private sector is an integral part of the overall economic program being developed by the Government of Jamaica. Discussions are underway between the Government of Jamaica and international financial institutions to establish a sound development and stabilization program over the next 3 years. The United States, other bilateral donors, and the multilateral development banks are coordinating increased levels of economic assistance to strengthen the productive capacity of the country. These efforts, and those of many other private and public bodies, will help alleviate the pressing social problems of poverty and unemployment.

The President. Well, let me just say Nancy and I are both delighted that the first state dinner that we've had here should be this dinner on this occasion, to have you here in this room which traditionally is reserved for chiefs of state. It's been a nostalgic thing, as I said to some of you -- ladies, to your husbands -- the other day, because present are faces of men that I served with when we came here and sat as guests at the White House in the Governors' Conference and, of course, many new friends here also.

We've discussed in less pleasant surroundings some of the problems that confront us today. I'm sure that the Governors, whether they all agree or not, do realize that what we're trying to do is alter the economic situation in our country by changing one simple two-letter word, economic control by government to economic control on government. And I look forward to collaboration and cooperation with all of you because of my belief that our Constitution calls for the 50 sovereign States being the basis of our freedom here in this land.

And so that all can drink, including George, to the days ahead when between us we are going to see America solve its problems and have the cooperation that I think should properly exist between you, the chief executives of your States, and this Federal Government which was created by the States. So, a toast.

Listening to your remarks I reflect back to our meeting in Denver this past August when we looked at all the problems of our States, the problems of this Nation, formed by our States, and we said, ``We need one priority to address the problems of all, and that is to relook at this question of federalism. And we adopted this as our number one priority. About that time we had a former Governor that was making speeches about the country espousing the same thoughts. Now, he's here with us. And those words have become acts and deeds.

You've asked, Mr. President, that the Governors of this Nation join with you in a partnership as you look at this great economic crisis that we as a nation face that demands immediate action, which you've taken. You have stated that you feel that we need to look at this system of government that we have, the levels of government we have that deliver the services to our people, and we need some realignment. You've asked for our imput, and you've provided access by meeting with the executive committee, with the standing committee chairmen, now with all of the Governors on yesterday. And I just would like to say to you, Mr. President, that we accept your invitation.

Room for coffee and liqueurs, and then on to the East Room for entertainment, where a cast of 26 of the great Broadway musical, ``A Chorus Line,'' are going to entertain. I think it is very fitting for them to entertain, because I have found out that the cast of 26 come from 18 separate States.

The President. Prime Minister Thatcher, on behalf of the American people, Nancy and I extend to you and your family a warm welcome to the United States. Your visit here renews the personal friendship we began in your country just before you took office, and today as we meet in Washington at the start of my administration we also renew the friendship and alliance of our people.

Great Britain and the United States are kindred nations of like-minded people and must face their tests together. We are bound by common language and linked in history. We share laws and literature, blood, and moral fiber. The responsibility for freedom is ours to share.

When we talked in London just over 2 years ago -- when neither of us was in office -- I was impressed by the similar challenges our countries faced and by our determination to meet those challenges. You have said that we enter into a decade fraught with danger, and so we have. But the decade will be less dangerous if the West maintains the strength required for peace, and in achieving that goal, there is one element that goes without question: Britain and America will stand side by side.

Outside Cambridge curving rows of simple white markers testify to a time when peace was lost and Britons and Americans united to turn back threats to freedom. Our challenge today is to ensure that belligerance is not attempted again by the false perceptions of weakness. So long as our adversaries continue to arm themselves at a pace far beyond the needs of defense, so the free world must do whatever is necessary to safeguard its own security. A stronger, more vigilant NATO must be the background of that security and of our effort for equitable arms control.

The Atlantic Alliance will continue to be the steadfast center of our mutual security. But we're also both concerned with the totality of the East-West relationship. The Soviet invasion in Afghanistan was a brutal invasion, and you, Prime Minister, took a lead in rallying world opinion against it, and for that we commend you. The tension in Poland commands the attention of the world. Clearly, the Polish people must be allowed to work out their own solutions to their problems. Outside intervention there would affect profoundly and in the long term the entire range of East-West ties. There are problems in other parts of the world such as regions of Africa and Central America where Anglo-American cooperation is key to the success of Western efforts to find solutions.

Americans are grateful for British efforts to bring the American prisoners home from Iran. We remember and are grateful for the support you gave us when you visited here a little more than a year ago. We remember your words of encouragement. They gave us heart. And together we will work to continue to confront the scourge of international terrorism.

Finally, our two nations know that there is no true security unless there is economic stability. We have both suffered from substantial economic difficulties. They might be different in their complexities and require appropriately different solutions, but we know that we share one basic commitment: We believe that our solutions lie within the people and not the state. We are committed to unleashing the natural power of the individual to produce more and to make a better life for all. We believe that people will stay free when enterprise remains free, and we believe that there are no insurmountable problems when we let individuals make decisions outside the restricting confines of government.

Prime Minister Thatcher, I look forward to our discussions, to the pleasure of renewing our friendship, and to the opportunity to fortify the commitment between our countries. On behalf of all Americans I welcome you and your family to the United States.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, I count it a double joy that I'm once again in the United States and that I'm being greeted here by you, Mr. President, newly in office, after a splendid victory but long since for me a trusted friend. Your warm welcome in this deeply moving ceremony will strike a chord in the hearts of British people everywhere.

Mr. President, these are not easy times in which to assume and to bear the responsibilities of national and international leadership. The problems are many, the dangers real, the decisions difficult. Indeed, weaker spirits might even be tempted to give way to gloom. But others like you, Mr. President are stirred by the challenge. And that's why I value so greatly the opportunity to come to Washington to talk with you and to discuss the way ahead on so many of the problems of which you've spoken this morning.

We start from a common basis of understanding. For generations our two countries have cherished the same ideals. We've defended the same causes. We've valued the same friendships, and together we've faced the same dangers. Today, once again, our sense of common purpose and common resolution is being tested. It will not be found wanting.

The message I have brought across the Atlantic is that we in Britain stand with you. America's successes wil be our successes. Your problems will be our problems, and when you look for friends we will be there.

Mr. President, the natural bond of interest between our two countries is strengthened by the common approach which you and I have to our national problems. You have mentioned some of the relevant things. We are both trying to set free the energies of our people. We are both determined to sweep away the restrictions that hold back enterprise. We both place our faith not so much in economic theory but in the resourcefulness and the decency of ordinary people.

Mr. President, you've spoken of a time for renewal. If we are to succeed in the battle of ideas, if we are to hold fast and extend the frontiers of freedom, we must first proclaim the truth that makes men free. We must have the courage to reassert our traditional values and the resolve to prevail against those who deny our ideals and threaten our way of life.

The President. I just have a few words here -- both of us -- but I also want to say that due to the schedule that has been arranged and the meetings of the Prime Minister yet to go to, there'll be no time for any questions.

Out partnership in NATO is a vital part of that effort. We're determined to consult closely with each other and with the rest of our allies on all matters involving our common security. In that connection, we affirmed our support for the Alliance's decision of December 1979 to modernize long-range theater nuclear forces and to pursue arms control efforts at the same time, in parallel.

We've also noted the Soviet proposal for a summit meeting. We believe this proposal needs to be carefully studied, and we will be consulting closely on this matter. For our part, we certainly have an interest in pursuing serious, constructive dialog with the Soviets on those issues which divide us.

We're very sensible in Britain of the honor you do us, Mr. President, by asking us to make the first official visit of a head of government to see you here, and we have indeed taken advantage of the opportunity afforded us to discuss many things which will be extremely important in the coming months. The President and I had a tete-a-tete for some time, and then were joined by the Vice President and the foreign secretaries, when we discussed many of the wider issues the world over.

Of course, we take the same view in the United States and Britain that our first duty to freedom is to defend our own. And our second duty is to try somehow to enlarge the frontiers of freedom so that other nations might have the right to choose it. It is indeed a very difficult time the world over, and we have, of course, discussed the many problems, as the President said, including President Brezhnev's recent speech, the problems in Africa, the problems in the Middle East, and the problems in Central and South America.

I really regard it as the beginning of a process of consultation. We shall both of us be going to a number of summit meetings this year. It is absolutely vital that we coordinate our efforts and decide upon a common line for the many problems that will face us.

Mr. President, thank you very much for the wonderful welcome you've given us. Thank you for giving us so much time and for talking in so much detail about the things which concern us both, which concern our peoples, and which concern the peoples in the world everywhere. And I think, if I may -- can I just end on a note of optimism? Yes, there are enormous problems. Yes, there have always been enormous problems, but I believe, together, we have the capacity to solve some of them. And those which we do not solve, I believe we can improve so that we can set them on their way to a solution in the end.

The membership of each Cabinet Council has been finalized. The Cabinet Councils are designed to operate as subgroups of the full Cabinet, with the President presiding. Full Cabinet meetings will continue to focus on broad issues affecting the entire Government and on overall budgetary and fiscal matters.

Development. This individual, working with the Office of Cabinet Administration, will coordinate the activities of each Cabinet Council, including the preparation and distribution of agendas and meeting summaries. This activity will be supplemented by a secretariat for each Cabinet Council, composed of the Executive Secretary, representatives of the member departments, and other personnel as needed, to prepare background materials, refine policy options and recommendations, and otherwise assist the Cabinet Council.

The President. Prime Minister Thatcher, Nancy and I welcome you, Mr. Thatcher, and your daughter, Carol, to this house, and it's my deep hope that as the leaders of two nations whose relationship is vital for the preservation of human freedom that we'll be in close and frequent consultation in the years ahead. Absolute trust between the Prime Minister of the United Kingdom and the President of the United States will continue to be the hallmark of Anglo-American cooperation.

Roosevelt and Churchill, Attlee and Truman, Eisenhower and Macmillan -- these names inseparably linked in recent history -- the legacy of their relationships is nothing less than the security and the freedom enjoyed by our nations today. We will continue in this great tradition, not only because it's essential but also because our two peoples expect and insist on it.

Our joint love of liberty was spawned by a common heritage. It was English history and tradition, with the Magna Carta and the Common Law, which gave birth to our Declaration of Independence. It was men of enormous intellectual capacity and courage -- John Locke, Adam Smith, Thomas Jefferson, Alexander Hamilton, and John Stuart Mill -- whose powerful ideas fed our notions of individual freedom and the dignity of all people.

In her London address last month to the Pilgrim Club the Prime Minister affirmed that her own political convictions are founded in that love of freedom, that rejection of tyranny and repression which inspired the Pilgrim Fathers and those who followed them to America. Well, it's widely known that I share many of your ideals and beliefs, Prime Minister Thatcher. My admiration for you was reinforced during today's productive meeting. I believe, however, that our relationship goes beyond cordiality and shared ideals. In these days the survival of our nations and the peace of the world are threatened by forces which are willing to exert any pressure, test any will, and destroy any freedom.

Survival in this era requires us, as those who preceded us, to take freedom in the palm of our hands and never to cower behind a veil of unrealistic optimism. We shall learn from those who spoke of the need for vigilance, even when speaking out was not popular. Winston Churchill was such a man, a man more than any other who symbolizes the link between our two nations. He was the son of Britain, but the child of a New World woman. His dedication to principle was not without hardship, yet his courage never wavered. We, undeniably, are the beneficiaries of the freedom he loved and the peace that he sought.

Churchill's peace, is in danger. It may serve us to look to the wisdom of his words. He said, and I shall quote him, ``The peace will not be preserved without the virtues that make victory possible in war. Peace will not be preserved by pious sentiments expressed in terms of platitudes or by official grimaces and diplomatic correctitude, however desirable these may be from time to time.

I thought as I heard that song ``I'll be seeing you in all the old familiar places,'' this is quite a nice, old familiar place in which to see you, Mr. President. [Laughter] And I hope we'll be able to sing that song for very, very many years. And what was the other? ``There'll be bluebirds over the White Cliffs of Dover tomorrow when the dawn is free.'' Well, the dawn is free now. And you and I have to try to make something of it which would match the hopes of those who made it free.

We started this momentous day on your lawn, Mr. President, in weather that, when it occurs for some public occasion with us, we describe as royal weather. And it's a great pleasure to end the day in your house at this glittering dinner party as guests of you and Mrs. Reagan. We've heard so much of your oratory as a speaker, and it's been such a delight to hear you speak. And I've been very moved by what you've said.

I'm told, Mr. President, that when you and Mrs. Reagan were inspecting your new home, where we're dining this evening, to see what refurbishment was needed, you came across some charred areas, vestiges of certain heated events in 1812. [Laughter] I don't think I need apologize for them, because I'm relieved to hear that Mrs. Reagan saw in this not a source of historical reproach, but an opportunity for redecoration -- [laughter] -- and very beautiful it is.

President, won a massive victory in November after a marvelous campaign in which you made clear your determination to set your country on a fresh course. You underlined that determination last week in a budget speech which I very much admired and so it seemed to me did all those who heard it.

Mr. President, you were that homesick and hungry author. You will remember the book which you wrote after, I think, you'd been making a film. Was it ``The Hasty Heart'' in London? Well, I doubt whether I'll be able to do much about your homesickness. You may even feel hunger if you're in search of a real American jellybean in London. [Laughter] But when you do come over, I can promise you two things. The first is the friendship of the British people, and the second, that the years of socialist bumbling are at an end.

I'm proud to lead a Conservative administration in Britain. For me, and I know for you, too, conservatism doesn't mean maintenance of the status quo. It means maintenance of the old values, the only background against which one could make the changes and adaptations which have to be made to keep abreast of the technological change that we need to embrace for a prosperous future. Conservatism means harnessing, but still more, the liberation of the fundamental strengths and resources which make a country great, which make its people prosperous and self-reliant.

As a Conservative I want determined and decisive government. But that's something very different from an all-powerful government. You and I, Mr. President, believe in strong governments in areas where only governments can do the job, areas where governments can and must be strong -- strong in the defense of the nation, strong in protecting law and order, strong in promoting a sound currency. It we do these things very well, we shall indeed be leaders of strong government, doing the things that only government can do.

But for too long and in too many places we've seen government assume the role of universal provider and universal arbiter. In many areas of our daily life there are hard but essential choices to be made. But in a free society those choices ought not to be made by government, but by free men and women and managers and work force alike, whose lives and livelihood are directly affected.

Mr. President, wall-to-wall government is no substitute for that freedom of choice. Wall-to-wall government is economically inefficient and morally demeaning to the individual. Just take a look at those countries where the art has been brought to its cold, callous perfection to see where that leads.

Mr. President, in Britain's case we've set ourselves to reverse a process of industrial decline which has lasted decades. We too seek to release the real energies of the wealth-creating sector in the first place and, above all, by conquering the crippling forces of inflation. We're winning that battle.

The cost is heavy, particularly in terms of the present levels of unemployment. But we won't solve that problem just by reflation, whatever the short-term attractions. The only true solution is a revitalized economy, providing real jobs of permanent economic viability. That is our goal, and we're going to stick to it.

Now above all is the time to stay on course. I say that, Mr. President, not least because only a firmly based economy can enable us to act as a strong and effective partner in an alliance -- and that we are determined to be, because an enduring alliance with the United States is fundamental to our beliefs and our objectives. Never in the post-war years has that alliance been more essential to us all. You spoke of Winston Churchill. We all do. Nearly 50 years ago Winston told our two countries that together there is no problem we cannot solve. We are together tonight. Together let us prove him right.

Mr. President, it is my very, very great pleasure to ask the assembled company to rise and drink a toast to our wonderful host, the new leader not only of the United States but of the whole of the Western World. I give you the toast: The President of the United States, President Reagan.

And now may I invite all of you to go to the Green and the Blue and the Red Rooms for coffee and liqueurs, and from there then make your way into the East Room, where you started this evening and where we are going to be entertained for a period by the Harlem Ballet.

With unfailing resourcefulness, zeal, and compassion, Red Cross volunteers have proved equal to the challenges of our time. In peace and in war, they have reflected the humanitarian instincts of the American people.

The Red Cross teaches individuals, families, and communities to avoid emergencies; prepares individuals, families, and communities for those emergencies that cannot be avoided; and helps individuals, families, and communities cope with crises when they do come.

This voluntary support reflects admirably the freedom and generosity of the American people. To insure that the Red Cross emblem continues to fly on banners across this Nation for another 100 years, I urge all Americans to continue this support with undiminished vigor.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-seventh day of February, in the year of the Lord nineteen hundred eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and fifth.

The historic record of mercy and service of the Red Cross is known to us all. Its efforts this past year have alleviated suffering in this country and abroad, trained hundreds of thousands to deal effectively in matters of health and safety, and, through its blood services, saved the lives of untold numbers.

I know that you will join me in this support and encourage every Federal employee and member of our armed forces to assist the Red Cross by supporting their local chapters. It is essential to the Nation that the Red Cross continue to receive wide public voluntary support, both in funds and volunteer effort, to insure the organization's second century of service.

The President today announced the appointment of Wendy H. Borcherdt to be Associate Director of Presidential Personnel, with responsibility for the recruitment of women. Mrs. Borcherdt will report to E. Pendleton James, Assistant to the President for Presidential Personnel.

Mrs. Borcherdt has been involved with many volunteer organizations. Since 1974 she has served as a member of the finance committee of the Hoover Institution on War, Revolution, and Peace at Stanford University. She is vice chairman and trustee of the Independent Colleges of Southern California.

President, to be a perfect description of the man who has been my host for the last 48 hours. And it's not surprising, therefore, that I've so much enjoyed all our talks together, whether the formal discussions in the Oval Office -- and how very much it suits you, sir, to be there -- or in the Cabinet Room or those less formal at the dinner table.

Mr. President, Henry David Thoreau once said that it takes two to speak the truth, one to speak and another to hear. Well, sometimes one of us has spoken and sometimes the other. But together, Mr. President, I would like to think that we have spoken the truth.

He described the Congressmen he met there as ``striking to look at, hard to deceive, prompt to act, lions in energy, Americans in strong and general impulse.'' Having been there and agreeing wth Dickens as I do, I'm delighted to see so many Members of Congress here this evening. And if Dickens was right, relations between the legislative and executive branches should be smooth indeed over the next 4 years. After all, ``prompt to act and lions in energy'' should mean, Mr.

California, we British have done something to advance the cause of harmony. [Laughter] And I hope also that you'll think we've chosen well. I must confess that the Californian berries I`ve never seen growing on any tree, but of course they are none the worse for that. [Laughter] You see how much we try to attend to what has customarily become called ``the supply side'' in all aspects of life -- [laughter] -- not simply in economics.

California, of course, has always meant a great deal to my countrymen from the time, almost exactly 400 years ago, when one of our greatest national heroes, Sir Francis Drake, proclaimed it New Albion, in keeping with the bravado of the Elizabethan Age. This feeling of community and curiosity that we have about California exists in the present age when another of our household names made his career there, one of he greatest careers in show business. I refer to Mr. Bob Hope, who is here this evening, and whom we like to claim is partly ours because he was born in the United Kingdom, though he decided to leave when he was only 4 years old -- [laughter] -- presumably because he thought the golf courses in the United States were better than those in the United Kingdom. [Laughter] I'm glad that my husband, Denis, did not agree with him.

Leaving history aside, I hope we've succeeded in making you feel at home. The Embassy has been described as being like a Queen Anne country house. At any rate, it's our own version of a Rancho del Cielo. [Laughter] It is, as they say, in a good neighborhood. After all, the Vice President and Mrs. Bush live next door. [Laughter] I'm told that they occasionally cast predatory glances on our excellent tennis court. But I fear there's little chance of persuading Nico and Mary Henderson to give it up. Too much useful business gets done on it, or so they claim.

It's a singular honor for me and, no less important, a great pleasure for all the other guests this evening that you should be here, Mr. President, not just because you are the free world's leading statesman but because you are a person who has got there by your own efforts and who retains that wonderful personality -- natural, forthcoming, and wise, whatever the pomp and circumstance in which you find yourself surrounded. Emerson wrote that nothing astonishes men as much as common sense and plain dealing, but in you, Mr. President, to find these qualities is only what one would expect.

It's not the time, Mr. President, for me to talk at any length about the relations between our two countries, except to say that they are profoundly and deeply right. And beyond that, we perhaps don't have to define them in detail. But after these 2 days of talks with you and meetings with many of the United States ministerial and congressional leaders, I have realized what at any rate to me is exceptional about the dealings we two countries have with each other.

We honor the same values. We may not always have identical interests, but what we do have in common is the same way of looking at and doing things. We don't seek to score off the other. We don't seek to involve the other in some commitment against his will. We try rather, in discussing the whole range of world problems that affect us both, to find common ground and to find the way which protects for humanity that liberty which is the only thing which gives life dignity and meaning.

There will, of course, be times, Mr. President, when yours perhaps is the loneliest job in the world, times when you need what one of my great friends in politics once called ``2 o'clock in the morning courage.'' There will be times when you go through rough water. There will be times when the unexpected happens. There will be times when only you can make a certain decision. It is at that time when you need the 2 o'clock in the morning courage. By definition it means courage. It requires also conviction. Even that is not enough. It requires wisdom. It requires a capacity to evaluate the varying advice that comes your way, the advice from those who say, ``Yes, go on, go on, this is your great opportunity to prove what you're made of;'' the advice which says, ``This is the time to make a dignified retreat,'' and only you can weigh up that advice.

Only you can exercise that judgment, and there's no one else. And it is the most lonely job, and what it requires is the most wonderful, profound understanding of human nature and the heights to which it can rise. And what it requires is a knowledge on your part that whatever decision you make, you have to stick with the consequences and see it through until it be well and truly finished.

Those of us who are here realize what this 2 o'clock in the morning courage means, what a lonely job it is, and how in the end only one thing will sustain you, that you have total integrity and at the end of the day you have to live wih the decision you've made.

I'd like to thank you, Mr. President, for the hospitality you and your government have given to me, to my family, and to my party on this memorable visit. It's very early days in your administration, and you've very heavy preoccupations. But if these meetings have meant a tithe as much to you as they have meant to me and to my team, I shall leave with a pang of sorrow, but happy and contented, eager soon to see you on the shores of Britain.

Nancy and I want to thank you for the warmth of those words that you spoke, as well as your gracious hospitality. And may I say that I do know something about that 2 o'clock courage, but I also know that you have already shown that 2 o'clock courage on too many occasions to name.

It's been delightful for Nancy and me to be here and with the Thatcher family in these 48 hours and to know them better, to know Mr. Thatcher, to know your daughter, Carol. I would also like to thank Sir Nicholas and Lady Henderson, who have made this house such a gracious center of hospitality in this city.

This evening marks the first steps I've taken as a President on foreign soil. [Laughter] What an honor to visit Great Britain first and how symbolic of the close relationship between our two nations that I only had to go 15 city blocks to do it. I wonder if this is what is meant by the saying that the Sun never sets on the British Empire. [Laughter] I do hope you agree, Prime Minister, that this city is an excellent vantage point from which to see the brilliant sunlight that still falls upon the Empire.

I don't mean the empire of territorial possessions. I mean the empire of civilized ideas, the rights of man under God, the rule of law, constitutional government, parliamentary democracy, all the great notions of human liberty still so ardently sought by so many and so much of mankind. These are the enduring grandeur of the British heritage.

The gift of humor can make a people see what they might ordinarily overlook, and it supplements that other gift of great leaders -- vision. When he addressed Parliament in the darkest moments after Dunkirk, Churchill dared to promise the British their finest hour and even reminded them that they would someday enjoy ``the bright, sunlit uplands'' from which the struggle against Hitler would be seen as only a bad memory. Well, Madam Prime Minister, you and I have heard our share of somber assessments and dire predictions in recent months. I do not refer here to the painful business of ending our economic difficulties. We know that with regard to the economies of both our countries we will be home safe and soon enough. I do refer, however, to those adversaries who preach the supremacy of the state.

We've all heard the slogans, the end of the class struggle, the vanguard of the proletariat, the wave of the future, the inevitable triumph of socialism. Indeed, if there's anything the Marxist-Leninists might not be forgiven for, it is their willingness to bog the world down in tiresome cliches, cliches that rapidly are being recognized for what they are, a gaggle of bogus prophecies and petty superstitions. Prime Minister, everywhere one looks these days the cult of the state is dying, and I wonder if you and I and other leaders of the West should not now be looking toward bright, sunlit uplands and begin planning for a world where our adversaries are remembered only for their role in a sad and rather bizarre chapter in human history.

The British people, who nourish the great civilized ideas, know the forces of good ultimately rally and triumph over evil. That, after all, is the legend of the Knights of the Round Table, the legend of the man who lived on Baker Street, the story of London in the Blitz, the meaning of the Union Jack snapping briskly in the wind. Madam Prime Minister, I'll make one further prediction, that the British people are once again about to pay homage to their beloved Sir Winston by doing him the honor of proving him wrong and showing the world that their finest hour is yet to come. And how he would have loved the irony of that. How proud it would have made him.

So, ladies and gentlemen, I ask you to join me in a toast to the memory of that great leader of free people, to his vision of bright, sunlit uplands, a toast to his Britannia and all that she's been, all that she is, and all that she will be, and to her finest hour, yet to come. Ladies and gentlemen, to Her Majesty, the Queen.

During the 1980 Presidential campaign, Mr. Carmen was director of political programs and analysis for the Reagan-Bush Committee. He previously served as senior northeast adviser for the Reagan primary campaign in New Hampshire.

Dr. Beck was the principal investigator on numerous research projects, including studies supported by the National Institutes of Health, the National Science Foundation, and the Dow Chemical Co. He has attended international congresses of microbiology and biochemistry in Stockholm, Moscow, and Tokyo. He has published many articles for scholarly journals and has coauthored a laboratory manual for courses in general microbiology.

Concerning Peaceful Uses of Nuclear Energy and accompanying annex and agreed minute; my written determination, approval, and authorization concerning the agreement; and the memorandum of the Director of the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency with the Nuclear Proliferation Assessment Statement concerning the agreement. The joint memorandum submitted to me by the Secretaries of State and Energy, which includes a summary analysis of the provisions of the agreement, and the views and recommendations of the Members of the Nuclear Regulatory Commission and the Director of the United States Arms Control and Disarmament Agency are also enclosed.

The Nuclear Non-Proliferation Act of March 10, 1978 sets forth certain requirements for new agreements for peaceful nuclear cooperation with other countries. In my judgment, the proposed agreement for cooperation between the United States and Bangladesh, together with its accompanying annex and agreed minute, meets all statutory requirements.

The proposed bilateral agreement reflects the desire of the Government of the United States and the Government of Bangladesh to establish a framework for peaceful nuclear cooperation between our two countries in a manner which recognizes both the shared non-proliferation objectives and the friendly and harmonious relations between the United States and Bangladesh.

Any agency or department handling NSC Information will hold the number of persons having access to such information to the absolute minimum consistent with efficient operations of the NSC system, and will strictly control document dissemination and reproduction to carry out existing law. A numbered cover sheet bearing the notation appearing below will be affixed to each copy of a document containing NSC information. The cover sheet will be attached at the time it is submitted to an Assistant Secretary or equivalent level. The NSC will provide sample cover sheets to departments and agencies who will then be responsible for further distribution and administration.

Your signature acknowledges you are such a person and you promise you will show or discuss information contained in the document only with persons who are authorized by law to have access to this document.

Persons handling this document acknowledge he or she knows and understands the security law relating thereto and will cooperate fully with any lawful investigation by the United States Government into any unauthorized disclosure of classified information contained herein.

The DCI will also submit by that date for NSC consideration draft procedures for protection of sensitive intelligence information within its control. Such procedures will be cleared within the Intelligence Community and dissenting views will be noted.

The Attorney General is requested to convene by March 1, 1982, an interagency group to report to the President on the effectiveness of existing statutes and Executive Orders prohibiting unauthorized disclosure of classified information.

Sec. 3. Functions of the Council. (a) The Council shall advise the President and the Secretary concerning progress made in carrying out the provisions of this Order and shall recommend to the President and the Secretary, as necessary, actions to accelerate progress.

Sec. 4. Administrative Provisions Concerning the Council. (a) The Secretary and the Council are authorized to request from any Federal agency such information or assistance deemed necessary to carry out their functions under this Order.

Your visit today reaffirms our friendship, and all Americans thank you for that reaffirmation. Your visit and the current excellent relations between our two governments are testimony that the friendship between Egypt and the United States is more than a compact between individuals. It is a commitment between nations.

Mr. President, there's much to discuss. Our talks will touch on issues of global, regional, and bilateral significance. We share a mutual concern as we observe the expansion of a totalitarian power based on an ideology that smothers freedom and independence and denies the existence of God. The people of Poland and Afghanistan now suffocate under the oppressive whim of this fearful master. Within the Mideast, this same power encourages hatred and conflict, hoping to take some advantage of instability.

The United States stands firmly with Egypt and other Mideastern nations concerned with regional security. As Secretary Haig emphasized on his recent visit, we have never sought a military, permanent presence, but we do ask and are grateful for mutually agreed arrangements that will enhance the security of the nations in that region.

In an address last December, Mr. President, you stated that one of the characteristics of great nations is their ability to learn from history. But if history teaches us anything, it is that good people must cooperate if peace is to be maintained and if progress is to be made.

Over the last decade, the United States played a part in the peace process which has led to peace between Egypt and Israel. We are willing to continue in that role to seek a lasting peace in the Middle East between Israel and all its Arab neighbors. And Camp David, we believe, is a first step toward that goal. It has brought recognizable and measurable progress. As Israeli withdrawal from the Sinai takes place later this year, we must commit ourselves to push on. In a spirit of understanding, we must address the remaining issues in the negotiations for autonomy in the West Bank and Gaza and chart a course that will build upon that which has already been accomplished.

Others should be brought into the Camp David process, because no matter how long and arduous, it offers the best opportunity for tangible results. In the months ahead, we must maintain our flexibility, yet never lose sight of the goal of establishing a lasting and comprehensive peace that will provide security and justice and a better life for all peoples of the region. Without setting deadlines, I personally believe the time has come to get on with the task before us and the sooner the better.

Secretary Haig has explained to me your sincere commitment now that you have peace with Israel to seek a broader peace in the region. President Mubarak, the United States also remains eager to do whatever we can to help Egypt enjoy the fruits of peace. We offer the helping hand of friendship, and we're optimistic that working with you, we can streamline our joint economic efforts, make them more flexible, more efficient, and more responsive to our mutual needs, so that all can share in the bounty of peace.

In the coming spring, America's trade ambassador, William Brock, will visit your country with the expressed purpose of strengthening our trade and economic ties. And, Mr. President, we also share your concern for the well-being of your neighbors in the Sudan. In this world of advanced technology, communication, and transportation, all nations are neighbors. Furthermore, with you and all those who would be our friends, we hope to be a good neighbor.

Mr. President, I grew up in a small town in the Midwest of our country, and in the tiny school where I received my initial education, our history books taught us about the magnificent 7,000-year-old culture that grew and prospered along the Nile. I remember wondering what kind of people they were -- those people who laid the foundation for Western civilization. Well, today, we Americans know the Egyptian people well, their courage and nobility, and we're proud to have you as our friends.

Egyptians. They look upon the United States with admiration and respect. They remember very vividly the words of President Abraham Lincoln, who spoke of a nation conceived in liberty and dedicated to the proposition that all men are created equal. They recall also that President John Kennedy urged all nations to join in creating a new endeavor -- not a new balance of power, but a new world of law, where the strong are just and the weak secure and the peace preserved.

Mr. President, during the past few years our late leader, President Sadat, worked vigorously with you and your predecessors to forge an ever-growing friendship. In doing so he was expressing the will of the Egyptian people. Hence this policy will continue unchanged. We are determined to build upon what has been achieved and add to it every day. We are here to reinforce our friendship and intensify our cooperation in all fields. We are here, Mr. President, to cement the bonds of interaction between our two nations. We are here to reaffirm our commitment to work together for peace and reconciliation.

The steps we took on the road to peace in the Middle East generated a historic change in that troubled part of the world. However, they must be followed up in the months ahead. We must double our efforts in order to fulfill our pledge to establish a just and a comprehensive peace. The key to peace and stability in the area is to solve the Palestinian problem.

The exercise of the right to self-determination cannot be denied to the Palestinian people. In fact, it is the best guarantee for Israeli security. This is the lesson of history and the course of the future.

To make it a living reality the Palestinians need your help and your understanding. We are certain that you will not fail them -- you will not defeat the expectations of those who look upon you as a nation of freedom-fighters and peacemakers.

I'm looking forward to the talks that we'll have today with hope and optimisim. Much depends on the success of our efforts and the clarity of our vision. I have no doubt that we shall meet the challenge with resolve and determination.

Mr. President, on behalf of the Egyptian people, I invite you and Mrs. Reagan to visit Egypt in order to enable the Egyptian people to express to you the genuine feeling towards every American in the United States.

These diseases affect at least 40 million Americans, many of whom have been seriously and often permanently disabled. Heart disease causes one million deaths each year and costs the nation more than $60 billion a year in lost wages, productivity, and medical expenses.

However, progress has been made in recent years to substantially reduce illness, disability, and death from heart disease. For most heart and blood vessel diseases, death rates have been declining slowly but steadily since 1950. Over the past decade, death rates have declined in all cardiovascular-disease categories and at a pace double that of the death rate for all other causes.

In human terms, we know that 300,000 Americans who would have died from cardiovascular disease during 1981 are still alive today. This development has been a major contributing factor to the three-year increase in the life expectancy of Americans in the past decade.

We have learned much about averting the onset of cardiovascular disease. Americans are increasingly aware of the crucial role lifestyles play in affecting their risk of these diseases. By recognizing the importance of proper nutrition, reduced smoking, exercise, and prevention of high blood pressure, our citizens are making a major contribution to the fight against heart disease. The role of prevention in cardiovascular diseases is especially vital because the initial symptoms are so frequently lethal or permanently disabling.

While we have made significant progress in the treatment of this group of diseases, they still take an appallingly high toll on our people. Cardiovascular diseases still account for more than 50 percent of the deaths in America; coronary heart disease is the primary cause of death.

Clearly, we must continue our vigorous efforts to stem the great amount of death and disability cardiovascular diseases cause in our nation. To this end, the Congress has requested the President to issue annually a proclamation designating February as American Heart Month.

President Reagan. President and Mrs. Mubarak and distinguished guests, tonight we honor a man who has emerged as a source of quiet strength at a time when such traits are sorely needed in the world. He is uncompromising about his principles, and this is something that should be admired.

Years ago, as the superintendent of the Egyptian Air Force Academy, he was asked to bend the rules and permit one student to begin class before all the necessary formalities had been completed. The request was denied. The young man making the request was the brother of President Gamal Abdel Nasser, the President of Egypt. This says a lot about the man we honor tonight. It is this dedication to duty, equality before the law and doing the job right, that engenders our respect and our trust.

President Mubarak is now the political leader of a great nation, but his chosen career was that of a military officer. In that profession, he exhibited courage and skill as a pilot, efficiency as an administrator; and this quality now serves his country well.

Like all good military men, President Mubarak understands that the purpose of military power is not to fight, but to keep the peace. Those who must fight when war comes know better than others that peace is not achieved through platitudes or excessive emotion. It requires hard work, resolution, and sacrifice.

In his speech before the Egyptian parliament, President Mubarak said, ``Peace to us is a firm strategic commitment, not a tactical position that can change.'' We, today, have rededicated ourselves to that noble goal. What has been accomplished so far is a tribute to the commitment of the Egyptians, the Israelis, and, I think we're all proud to say, the Americans. Our meetings have reassured me that further progress is within our grasp. While it's not easy, progress rarely is.

Team sports teaches that winning depends on knowing what's required and working seriously with those seeking the same goal. One also cultivates the concern for others and a respect for playing by the rules. President Mubarak expressed this in his inauguration speech when he stated, ``Freedom means a commitment for freedom to others, and democracy means respect for the legislature and the laws.'' Well, these words reflect a world view that is consistent with America's ideals and aspirations as well as, I'm sure, those of his fellow countrymen.

President Mubarak, I look forward to working closely with you as we move toward the goal of establishing a just and lasting peace. Clearly, the Egyptians, Americans, and all the people of the Middle East who seek this goal are on the same team. To succeed we must continue cooperating, and we've already demonstrated cooperation, and cooperation that we thought would have been impossible only a decade ago. But we're doing these things necessary to achieve this goal. We will win the victory we seek. The leadership and quiet strength of the man that we honor tonight makes us all more confident of that.

President -- although it is the second time, but I could feel that I've met you several times -- I feel the depth of your sentiments towards Egypt and the Egyptian people. We too attach great importance to the friendship between our two peoples. We are determined to strengthen the bonds of this friendship and double our cooperation. This is a constant line of our policy.

We appreciate the assistance you have given us without any conditions. Your partnership with us in the peace process is a valuable asset to all parts concerned. It is the pivotal factor for widening the scope of peace to encompass every corner of the region. The talks that we held today, Mr.

President, were an added source of satisfaction and reassurance. They reaffirmed our faith in the future, and they reinforced our determination to pursue our goal hand in hand. Together we have made a new beginning. I am certain that it will be recorded in the annals of history as one of the greatest events of our time. And together we shall continue our endeavor until it bears fruit.

I am happy to say that I find President Reagan a statesman of vision and courage. I have no doubt that we will succeed in our endeavor. I realize that the way ahead will not be easy, nor do we believe that the remaining issues lend themselves to simple solutions. Great is the challenge in front of us, but so is our resolve and determination.

Union message. He said that he will strengthen his country's position as a force for peace and progress. He proposed to achieve that by promoting negotiations wherever both sides are willing to sit down in good faith. We support this view.

The United States can make a great contribution to peace through promoting a meaningful and unconditional dialog between Israel and all other parties willing to negotiate. No party should be excluded from this process. A further step in this direction is an American dialog with the Palestinians. This would encourage moderation and rekindle the spark of hope in the hearts of millions of your friends.

Your service to the Nation in this capacity, especially your support of the Administration's economic program, has been greatly appreciated. I know that in the years ahead you will be able to look back with pride on your many accomplishments as an advocate of small business.

The Small Business Administration, under my leadership has been a strong advocate of your economic recovery program. I want to assure you of my continued support of these programs and your administration.

Thank you very much, John, all our friends and distinguished guests here at the head table, and all of you very distinguished people. Nancy and I are delighted to be with you this morning, and are honored to be here.

General Dozier, I know you don't like being praised for what you only consider was doing your duty. Forgive me, I'm going to pull rank on you. [Laughter] We want to give thanks to God for answering our prayers. We want to salute the Italian authorities for their brilliant rescue, and, Jim, we just want to thank both you and Judith for your gallantry. Welcome home, soldier.

Well, when I told that story last year, I said I knew, having only been here in this position for a few weeks, that there would be many times for me in the days ahead when there would be only one set of footprints and I would need to be carried, and if I didn't believe that I would be, I wouldn't have the courage to do what I was doing.

I also believe this blessed land was set apart in a very special way, a country created by men and women who came here not in search of gold, but in search of God. They would be free people, living under the law with faith in their Maker and their future.

Sometimes, it seems we've strayed from that noble beginning, from our conviction that standards of right and wrong do exist and must be lived up to. God, the source of our knowledge, has been expelled from the classroom. He gives us His greatest blessing, life, and yet many would condone the taking of innocent life. We expect Him to protect us in a crisis, but turn away from Him too often in our day-to-day living. I wonder if He isn't waiting for us to wake up.

There is, as Pete so eloquently said, in the American heart a spirit of love, of caring, and a willingness to work together. If we remember the parable of the Good Samaritan, he crossed the road, knelt down, and bound up the wounds of the beaten traveler, the Pilgrim, and then carried him into the nearest town. He didn't just hurry on by into town and then look up a caseworker and tell him there was a fellow back out on the road that looked like he might need help.

Isn't it time for us to get personally involved, for our churches and synagogues to restore our spirit of neighbor caring for neighbor? But talking to this particular gathering, I realize I'm preaching to the choir. If all of you worked for the Federal Government, you would be classified as essential. We need you now more than ever to remind us that we should be doing God's work on Earth. We'll never find every answer, solve every problem, or heal every wound, but we can do a lot if we walk together down that one path that we know provides real hope.

I hope that on down through the centuries not only is this great land preserved but this great tradition is preserved and that all over the land there will always be this one day in the year when we remind ourselves of what our real task is.

President Reagan. Ladies and gentlemen, President Mubarak and I have just completed a most fruitful and wide-ranging set of meetings. Our discussions were frank and cordial and covering a number of matters of mutual concern. President Mubarak's visit demonstrates more clearly than any words the continuity of American-Egyptian relations and reflects the strong ties that bind us together.

Arab-Israeli dispute. President Mubarak has assured us that Egypt remains committed to a peaceful solution of this conflict. And to that end, we'll spare no effort to achieve a comprehensive peace as set forth in the Camp David agreement.

During our talks, we reaffirmed our commitment to press ahead with the autonomy talks in order to reach agreement on a declaration of principles, which is the best means of making tangible progress toward a solution of the Palestinian problem in all its aspects as envisaged by Camp David.

We reviewed our mutual concerns about the strategic threats to the region and reconfirmed our indentity of views on the need to work closely together. We discussed in some detail our economic and military assistance programs. We agreed to consult regularly on methods of implementing and improving them. These consultations have, in fact, already been -- or begun, I should say, among our principle advisers.

And, finally, let me just say that it has been a pleasure having this opportunity to further my personal relationship with President Mubarak. I'm confident that we will be working closely together to achieve those many goals that are in the mutual interest of our two countries.

I welcomed the reaffirmation, the continuation of the U.S. role as a full partner in the peace process. We are determined to pursue our peace efforts until a comprehensive settlement is reached according to the Camp David accords.

Federal regulations that place needless burdens on people, businesses, and State and local governments. As we strive to control taxing and spending, we must also cut back government regulations that are anticompetitive, excessively stringent, or just plain unnecessary.

Federal regulations and paperwork impose a particularly heavy burden on the new businessman and the small businessman. Small firms don't have the luxury of large staffs to fill out government forms, and they can't afford high-powered Washington lobbyists.

But the men and women who run small businesses must shoulder these burdens directly. Often they are the only ones who know enough about their companies to complete all the detailed government forms, leaving that much less time to do what they do best -- managing their organizations and developing better products and services.

A vigorous small business sector is essential to a productive and competitive economy. For all of the talk in Washington about government creating new jobs, most of the new jobs actually created are in small private enterprises. Between 1969 and 1976, 82 percent of all the new jobs were in businesses employing a hundred or fewer employees, and 66 percent were in companies with 20 or fewer employees. Currently 38 percent of our gross national product is produced by small business, and small business continues to be our most prolific source of innovation. So, this administration's regulatory relief program, headed by Vice President Bush, is paying special attention to regulations that come down hardest on small firms.

In a moment I'll turn the lectern over to the Vice President, who will announce a new series of deregulatory initiatives focused on the concerns of small businesses. But first I want to say a few words about the Information Collection Budget for Fiscal Year 1982, which is being released this morning.

The Information Collection Budget, or paperwork budget, sets limits on the burdens imposed in the private sector by Federal forms and recordkeeping requirements. Under the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 most Federal forms and recordkeeping requirements must be approved by the Office of Management and Budget.

That's a workload greater than the entire work force of the automotive industry. We will be eliminating nearly 200 million hours of this wasteful burden by the end of the year, a reduction of over 1 hour of costly paperwork for every man and woman in the United States. This means a savings of productive effort equal to that of 95,000 people working 40 hours a week for an entire year. And, as the details in the budget illustrate, many of these savings come from reducing tax and regulatory forms that are unusually burdensome to small businesses.

These paperwork reductions are a good start, but they're only a start. The budget that we're releasing this morning still does not document all of the Federal paperwork that must be identified and reduced. And, as you will see in a moment, many of the issues that are being designated for revision by my Task Force on Regulatory Relief are based upon complaints from small companies about unnecessary paperwork.

We reject the accusation that the United States is stalling the INF negotiations, and we are familiar with this Soviet proposal for phased reductions from an alleged current balance. The Soviet ``balance'' is based on selective use of data and is not a meaningful basis for negotiations.

I am sorry Ed Meese and I have been unsuccessful in our attempts to change your mind and persuade you to stay in your key position. But I am well aware of your strong desire to return to the Hoover Institution to resume your research and writing.

The service you have rendered to the country by your scholarly research and writing and your unique ability to translate ideas into campaign issue positions and then into effective national policy is deeply appreciated, as you know.

Now that we are once again fellow ``Fellows'' at the Hoover Institution, Nancy and I extend to you our best wishes as you enter this new phase of your distinguished career in academic life and public service.

As you know, I have been planning to return to my research and writing at the Hoover Institution for some time now. At your request, I agreed to serve as Assistant to the President for Policy Development during the initial stages of your Administration to help lay the groundwork for the successful achievement of the policy goals we both share.

Now that this has been established, and consistent with my desire to resume my academic career, as we have discussed, I believe the time has come to submit my resignation as Assistant to the President for Policy Development, effective March 1, 1982.

It has been an extraordinary pleasure and experience to work with you over the past few years -- in the presidential campaigns of 1976 and 1980, and especially during the past year in the White House.

Your personal efforts, strength and conviction have been a major factor in the intellectual and political revolutions which have taken place in this country during the last two decades. The changes in public policy you have achieved thus far in your Presidency are of historic magnitude and their effects will be felt and appreciated for many years to come.

The President today announced his intention to nominate James C. Sanders to be Administrator of the Small Business Administration. He would succeed Michael Cardenas, whose resignation the President has accepted.

Mr. Harper will prepare the domestic policy agenda for the President and will be charged with seeing that policy development and the decision process are moving in a timely manner. He will also be an ex officio member of all of the Cabinet Councils.

Mr. Harper has served as Chairman of the President's Council on Integrity and Efficiency, the coordinating body of agency Inspectors General and others involved in the President's campaign against fraud, waste, and abuse.

The outlook for victims of scleroderma has improved significantly in recent years. In the past three years, medical researchers have discovered that aggressive treatment with newly-developed antihypertensive drugs succeeds in lowering blood pressure, improving kidney function, and saving lives.

Advances in medical research and education mean that scleroderma patients can now look forward to the opportunity to live more productive and happy lives. Additional research findings and early treatment and diagnoses are vitally needed if we are to eliminate scleroderma and improve the quality of life for its victims.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 5th day of Feb., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Unfortunately, the warning, ``Keep Out of Reach of Children,'' has become so commonplace that it is often carelessly ignored. Because children are naturally curious, parents and those responsible for child care must exercise strict supervision and provide the training which can help eliminate cases of accidental poisoning.

Local communities have taken the lead in developing programs which stress the use of safety packaging for potentially toxic substances and emphasize the need for their proper storage, handling, and disposal. Poison control centers have streamlined their operations to provide better service to the public by informing consumers of appropriate first aid, improving treatment procedures, and participating in poison prevention programs. Through increased public awareness and cooperation, we can build upon the progress of the past two decades and actually eliminate the serious injuries to our children which result from the abuse of harmful products.

To aid in encouraging the American people to learn of the dangers of accidental poisoning and to take such preventive measures as are warranted, the Congress, by a joint resolution approved September 26, 1961 (75 Stat. 681), requested the President to issue annually a proclamation designating the third week in March as National Poison Prevention Week.

The President today authorized the immediate release of an additional 70 million pounds of surplus cheese from the Commodity Credit Corporation's inventory. The Department of Agriculture will release the cheese without cost to States for distribution to needy persons.

States will have until July 1, 1982, to order from the most recent authorization. Consideration will be given to specific requests from States for distribution, rather than by an allocation procedure.

USDA's Food and Nutrition Service regional offices have signed agreements for the original 30 million pounds with 42 States, 16 of which have begun distribution. Agreements with the remaining States are in progress. No State has declined to participate.

The President announced today that he will reduce by $2 million a previously announced budget rescission for the Department of Labor's Mine Safety and Health Administration (MSHA) in 1982. This will allow MSHA to lift the hiring freeze and hire coal mine inspectors and support personnel up to a level consistent with pre-freeze employment levels. In addition, the President will send to Congress an amendment increasing the level of funding in fiscal year 1983 for protecting the health and safety of the nation's coal miners.

The proposed funding increase will be used to help combat conditions in the Nation's coalfields, which have suffered a recent series of disastrous mine explosions and multiple fatal accidents, and to reduce sharply, historically and persistently high injury rates in the coal mining industry. The amendment requests an additional $15 million for the Labor Department's Mine Safety and Health Administration in their cooperative efforts with coal operators and miners to improve health and safety practices and conditions at the Nation's 5,900 coal mining operations.

In announcing the proposed amendment, the President emphasized to the mining industry and the mineworkers that their mutual responsibilities and roles in health and safety are of paramount importance in reversing the recent upswing in injuries and deaths.

The President. Good morning. I am here to sign copies of the budget. I'm sure you're all aware that these aren't exactly the entire budget; it weighs a lot more than this. This is the part that we sign. And this budget that we're submitting is the second step, really, in our program to try and bring government spending back in line with government's revenues.

We are staying with our tax program because we believe it is absolutely essential to stimulate the economy and make us able to provide more jobs. And in the last decade, we have had instances of tax increases -- double the taxes in the 5 years between '76 and '81 -- and in those 5 years, we had the biggest deficits the country has ever had. We believe that the reduction in rates does not mean a reduction in revenues, that as the economy takes hold -- from all the evidence we've had in this century of such tax cuts -- the government will get more money instead of less.

As for the budget, we've continued -- and everyone has and we're as guilty as all -- in referring to these as budget cuts. There has been no budget cut. There have been cuts in the rate of increase in spending. This budget that I'm signing is bigger than the 1982 budget. The '82 was bigger than the '81, and the '81 was bigger than the '80. What we are doing is reducing a rate of increase that, when I became President, was running at 17.4 percent, far ahead of what any increase or any tax revenues could bring in, which meant continuing to go deeper and deeper into the trillion dollar debt.

The '81 budget -- we reduced this to about 14 [percent]. While it was not our budget -- it was in place when we came here -- we did reduce it by managing to get some savings that we secured during this past year. The '82 budget would have been only about half of that higher rate had it not been for the recession. But, even so, it will be reduced to an increase of about 10.4. And this budget will bring the rate of increase down to 4\1/2\ percent, the lowest that it has been since 1969.

Q. Mr. President, you say it's not balanced on the backs of the poor and the needy, but that's what the Democrats are saying already, and they're coming up with lots of stories about people who are suffering because of the budget cuts that are already in place. What do you say?

The President. Yes, and they'll probably try to find horror stories and, incidentally, this is something I think all of you ought to be on guard against. In times such as this -- and I had previous experience as a Governor with this happening -- there are those out there in government employ who will, if possible, sabotage and deliberately penalize some individual who actually is not supposed to be penalized in order to get a story indicating that the programs are not working.

The President. Listen, we all have trouble, and we all regret it. And that budget -- how big would that budget be if we didn't have last year's $40 billion worth of budget savings that we had already passed? This has come upon us because of the recession.

The recession, I believe, was -- well, actually, the recession started in 1979, and then in the last 6 months of 1980, which by coincidence was an election year, the money supply was increased at the fastest rate ever in our history, 13 percent. But as that increase in money supply went up, so did inflation to almost 14 percent, the interest rate 21\1/2\ percent, and unemployment was around 8 million. We didn't start the decline this year, in the recession, to the present 9 million unemployed from a full employment; it was an increase over 8 million already unemployed.

Now, adding that million unemployed added the additional amount over and above our projected deficit, because it costs about $25 to $27 billion -- billion -- for each 1 percent of increase in the unemployment rate.

Now, what our plan is aimed at doing -- the combination of the regulations, the tax program, and the reduction of the increase in spending -- is to get this economy moving again to where we can produce jobs for our people. And as we do so, that same $25, $27 billion figure could be reversed.

The tax breaks we've given business, which they themselves supported, were breaks to enable business to finally catch up with our competitors worldwide. We're the lowest of the seven industrial nations in investment in plant and equipment and research.

The President. There are still 21 million people going to get food stamps. And it is not cutting the needy and those who need it the most, it is actually, as I've said, aimed at better administration based on some of the experiences we had when we reformed welfare in California and found out that there were people who were technically, under the Federal regulations, eligible for government help, but should not have been getting it on the basis of their lack of need.

Do we honestly believe that someone whose parents earn in six figures is entitled to have food stamps because they're going to college? That's what's been going on. Any number of cases of that kind where there is abuse. And these are the things that we believe can be corrected by the tighter administration.

I've heard that argument from up on the Hill. I've never heard them substantiate it in any way. As a matter of fact, I know that Tip says that I associate with the country club crowd. Well, I've only played golf once since I've been President, and he's an inveterate golfer, and I'm sure he must have to go to a country club to play golf.

The President. If this country were a business and had to cash out its assets and meet all its obligations, not only including the budget debt but the unfunded -- by billions of dollars -- liability for further future pension payments and so forth, this country would be declared bankrupt because the assets couldn't sell for what the liabilities are. But this country is not going to go bankrupt. I have faith in the people, and I have faith, as I've said, we're not to the point that we're actually reducing the budget to a lower figure than it has been the year before. Now that did happen in recent years, and I envy the man who did it. President Eisenhower was able one year to actually bring in a budget that was smaller than the budget he had the year before.

And incidentally, his fifth budget in office, as I understand it, was lower than the budget he inherited from the preceding Democratic administration. But I shouldn't use the word, because we want bipartisan support for our program.

Inflation, interest, and unemployment rates were at painfully high levels, while real growth, job creation, new investment, personal savings, and productivity gains had virtually ceased. Our economy was staggering under the burden of excessive tax rates, double-digit inflation, runaway Government spending, counter-productive regulations, and uneven money supply growth. The economy, I declared, was in the ``worst mess'' in half a century.

To our great good fortune, there were many in the Congress who understood the nature of our difficulties and who rose with us to meet the challenge. Fundamental and long-overdue remedies were proposed and put in place. Together, we enacted the biggest spending and tax reductions in history. Counter-productive regulations have been swept away, and the Federal Reserve has taken action to bring excessive monetary growth under control.

The first year of the 97th Congress will be remembered for its decisive action to hold down spending and cut tax rates. Today, the question before us is whether the second year of this Congress will bring forward equal determination, courage, and wisdom. Clearly, there is a great deal more to be done.

Some seek instant relief from the economic problems we face. There is no such panacea. Our program began October 1, and it cannot solve in 4 months problems that have been building for more than 4 decades. All the quick fixes tried in the past not only failed to solve but actually aggravated our economic difficulties. They simply ensured a new cycle of boom and bust, of exaggerated hopes and eventual disappointment.

Our goal was and remains economic recovery -- the return of non-inflationary and sustained prosperity. We seek a larger economic pie to provide all Americans more jobs, more after-tax income, and a better life. Quick fixes won't get us there.

The Nation's fiscal policy is now firmly embarked on a new, sound, and sustainable course. For the first time in 2 decades, the destructive pattern of runaway spending, rising tax rates, and expanding budgetary commitments has been slowed, and with the cooperation of the Congress this year, will finally be broken.

After a decade of tax-flation in which fiscal and monetary excess fueled the unrelenting rise of prices and the automatic increase of taxes, significant tax rate reductions have been enacted. A permanent safeguard against bracket creep and Government profiteering on inflation -- income tax indexing -- has also been created.

In short, we are putting the false prosperity of overspending, easy credit, depreciating money, and financial excess behind us. A solid foundation has been laid for a sound dollar, sustained real economic growth, lasting financial stability, and noninflationary prosperity for all Americans.

We are also moving to shackle the regulatory juggernaut that burdened production, consumed jobs, and diminished productivity growth. During the past year no significant new regulatory statutes were enacted and few major new regulations were imposed. Additions to the Federal Register declined by 23,000 pages. Benefit-cost analysis was made mandatory for regulations.

Dozens of existing regulations were reviewed, modified, or eliminated. Without taking into account billions of dollars of savings from regulations never formally proposed because of the changed climate our program has created, quantifiable one-time cost savings of over $3 billion and recurring annual savings of nearly $2 billion have been realized. And the effort has just begun.

They far exceed anything that the skeptics and critics ever dreamed possible just 1 year ago. They occurred because the executive and legislative branches of our Government joined together to respond to the mandate of the American people and overcome the impediments that had paralyzed Washington for a decade. Together, we have launched a process of reform and change that can transform the course of events.

The penalty tax rate on investment income has been eliminated. By dropping the top rate from 70 to 50%, the attractiveness of tax shelters will be reduced and the incentives for productive investment in stocks, bonds, new business ventures, and other financial assets will be increased.

Marginal tax rates have been significantly lowered for the first time in two decades. The 23% across-the-board rate reduction will mean $183 billion in lower taxes for individuals over the first 3 years. The financial reward for savings, work effort, and new production will stop diminishing and start rising once again.

Powerful new incentives for savings have been established. Beginning this year, 50 million workers will be eligible for the first time to set aside tax-free up to $2,000 per year for Individual Retirement Accounts. The annual limit for existing Keogh and IRA investors will also be raised.

By sharply altering the incentives for saving as opposed to consumption, a huge new flow of current income will be channeled toward restoring our productivity and lifting our national savings rate from last place in the industrial world.

The taxation of phantom corporate profits has also been significantly curtailed. The new accelerated cost recovery system will shorten depreciation periods to 5 years for machinery and 15 years for structures. This will permit fuller recovery of asset costs, a more valid accounting of taxable profits, and a reasonable after-tax return on investments for the first time in years. By eliminating the drastic under-depreciation provided in previous tax law, after-tax business cash flow will be increased by $10\1/2\ billion this year and $211 billion over the next 6 years. This growing stream of funds for modernization, new machinery, new technology, new products, and new plants will revive our lagging productivity, restore our competitiveness in world markets, and spur the steady growth of jobs, production, and real incomes.

The confiscatory taxing of estates and inheritances has been halted as well. By raising the exemption to $600,000, by lowering the rate to 50%, and by removing the limits on the marital deduction, 99.7% of all estates will eventually be exempt from estate taxation. Hard-working American farmers, small businessmen, investors, and workers can once again be confident that the sweat, sacrifices, and accumulations of a lifetime will belong to their heirs rather than their Government.

The past year's achievements on spending control and the reestablishment of budgetary discipline are no less impressive than the sweeping tax changes. For the first time ever, the Congress activated its central budgetary machinery and overcame the spending impulses of its fragmented parts. The Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 was a watershed in fiscal history -- a giant step toward the restoration of fiscal discipline. By the accounting of its own Congressional Budget Office, spending will be $35 billion lower this year and about $130 billion lower over the next 3 years due to just one bill passed in only 5 months after having been considered by 30 different committees, a bill that reduced, reformed or eliminated hundreds of programs. The growth of budgetary outlays is at last being brought in line with the growth of the tax base and the national income. Excess spending commitments, unnecessary programs and overlapping activities were meaningfully addressed in the Reconciliation Act for the first time in decades.

As a result of congressional action in 1981, the growth of entitlements will be reduced by $41 billion during the next 3 years. For the first time, eligibility standards for food stamps and student loans have been tightened. Unemployment benefits have been targeted to States where they are needed. Subsidies for non-needy students have been reduced in the school lunch program. Abuses of the medicaid, nutrition, and AFDC programs have been curtailed, saving $14.4 billion over the next 3 years. Overly generous and unaffordable twice-a-year cost-of-living adjustments for Federal retirees have been eliminated. The ``uncontrollables'' are being brought under control, and benefits have been retargeted where they are most needed.

Dozens of ineffective or counter-productive programs have been eliminated or reduced. The $4 billion make-work CETA public sector jobs program was abolished. Extravagant dairy subsidies have been cut substantially. The ineffective $700 million Economic Development Administration is being phased out. The Community Services Administration has been eliminated. An unnecessary $2 billion in Government subsidies for new energy supplies and technologies has been cut. The excessively-funded impact aid program was substantially scaled back. In short, a long-overdue housecleaning of excess budgetary commitments was accomplished.

Inappropriate Federal subsidies have been withdrawn. Legislation to return Conrail to the private sector has been enacted. The National Consumer Cooperative Bank has been privatized. Subsidies to the auto industry for new technology demonstrations have been eliminated. Operating subsidies to local mass transit systems are being phased out. Subsidies to exporters have been sharply curtailed. Subsidized disaster loans to financially viable businesses have been eliminated.

A major stride toward rationalizing the structure, reducing the cost, and increasing State and local flexibility in the Nation's $91 billion grant-in-aid system has been enacted. Fifty-seven narrow, redtape-ridden categorical grants programs have been replaced with 9 block grants. The pages of regulation imposed on State and local governments have been reduced from over 300 to 6, while the cost to the Federal budget has been reduced.

An impressive start at reducing fraud, waste, abuse, and unnecessary Government overhead was made. The President's Council on Integrity and Efficiency, established to coordinate a Government-wide attack on fraud and waste, saved $2 billion in the last 6 months of 1981 alone.

At the same time that the Congress joined in these long-overdue efforts to pare back the size of the Federal budget and slow its momentum of growth, it has fully supported our ambitious but essential plan to rebuild our national defense. A year ago every component of military strength was flashing warning lights of neglect, under-investment, and deteriorating capability. Today, health is being restored.

Pervasive deficiencies in readiness -- including too many units not ready for combat, too many weapons systems out of commission, too few people with critical combat skills, and too few planes and ships fully capable of their missions -- are being corrected. Funds for operations and maintenance, including training and aircraft flying hours, have been boosted. Backlogs of combat equipment needing repair are being eliminated. Adequate supplies of spare parts necessary to support high operating rates for training, as well as to provide war reserves, are being purchased.

Last year's 14.3% pay increase has improved recruit quality, boosted reenlistment rates, stopped the drain of critical skills, and contributed to the dramatic revival of morale in our military services. End-strength goals are now being exceeded. In addition, the percentage of recruits with higher test scores has risen in the past year.

Abrams tank, the AV - 8B Marine Corps attack aircraft and the F/A - 18 Navy tactical fighter have been approved. Improvements in our airlift and sealift forces to transport equipment and soldiers rapidly to counter military aggression anywhere in the world, are moving forward.

These achievements of the first year truly constitute a new beginning. In every major dimension of national strength and well- being we have launched the redirection of policy that was so desperately needed and so long overdue. We are ending the destructive inflation and the financial disorder built up over a decade. We have removed the yoke of over-taxation from our workers and our business enterprises. We have begun to dismantle the regulatory straitjacket that impeded our commerce and sapped our prosperity. And we have reversed the dangerous erosion of our military capabilities.

The task before us now is a different one, but no less crucial. Our task is to persevere; to stay the course; to shun retreat; to weather the temporary dislocations and pressures that must inevitably accompany the restoration of national economic, fiscal, and military health.

The correction of previous fiscal and monetary excesses has come too late to avert an unwelcome, painful, albeit temporary business slump. In the months ahead there will be temptation to resort to pump-priming and spending stimulus programs. Such efforts have failed in the past, are not needed now, and must be resisted at every turn. Our program for permanent economic recovery is already in place. Artificial stimulants will undermine that program, not reinforce it.

Likewise, previous excesses in money and credit growth have resulted in financial strain in many regions and sectors of our national economy. The adjustment to lower inflation and a more moderate money and credit policy did not come soon enough to avoid interest rates and unemployment far higher than we would like, and that we are working to reduce. But these effects are temporary. They cannot be remedied by a return to rapid, unsustainable expansion of Federal spending and money growth, which would drive inflation and interest rates to new highs.

Our hard-won gains in reducing inflation must be preserved and extended -- because permanent reduction of interest rates and unemployment is impossible if the fight against inflation is abandoned, just when it is being won.

Similarly, our budget deficits will be large because of the current recession, and because it is impossible in a short period of time to correct the mistakes of decades. But our incentive-minded tax policy and our security-based defense programs are right and necessary for long-run peace and prosperity, and must not be tampered with in a vain attempt to cure deficits in the short-run. The answer to deficits is economic growth and indefatigable efforts to control spending and borrowing. These principles we dare not abandon.

Despite the new course we have charted and the gains we have achieved, the voices of doubt, retreat, and rejection are beginning to rise. They conveniently forget that the present business slump was not caused by our program but is the result of the accumulated burdens of past policy errors, which we have taken action to redress. They fail to comprehend that our spending cuts and tax reductions were not designed to redistribute the output of a stagnant economy, but to revive the economy's growth and to increase its size -- for the jobless as well as the affluent, for those who aspire to get ahead as well as those who have already arrived.

Increasingly, the larger budget deficits that we unavoidably face are offered as evidence that our entire course should be recharted. The matter of budget deficits, therefore, must be addressed squarely. We must fully comprehend why they have grown from our original projections, why they may remain with us for some time to come, what dangers they pose if not vigorously combatted and what steps we can and must take to steadily reduce their size and drain on our available savings.

Our original plan called for a balanced budget in 1984. Balance is no longer achievable in 1984, but the factors that have postponed its realization are neither permanent nor cause for abandoning the goal of eventually living within our means.

In the near term, the most important setback to our budgetary timetable is the recession now underway. During 1982, receipts will decline by $31 billion and outlays rise by $8 billion due to the fall-off of business activity and the increase of unemployment-related payments. This factor alone accounts for nearly all of the difference between the $45 billion 1982 deficit we projected last year and our current estimate of $98.6 billion.

While the recession will end before this fiscal year is over, its budgetary impact will spill over for many years into the future. It will take time for the unemployment rate to come down and safety net payments to diminish. The growth of receipts will recover, but not at the levels previously projected. This will add billions to deficits for 1983 and 1984.

The discredited philosophy of spend and spend, borrow and borrow, saddled us with a permanent debt burden of staggering dimensions. This year's interest payment of $83 billion exceeds the size of the entire Federal budget as recently as 1958.

In addition, past fiscal, monetary, and credit excesses have resulted in temporarily high interest rates -- rates that will come down, but only as inflation abates, private and public financing practices adjust, and long-term confidence rebuilds. Since market confidence has been so badly shaken by runaway inflation and interest rates in the past 3 years, it is apparent that interest rates over the next several years will fall less rapidly than we had originally anticipated. Between the huge inherited base of national debt, the higher interest rates, and the large prospective additions to the national debt in the next several years, our total debt service costs will rise substantially.

Interest payments on the debt will exceed our original projections by $18 billion in 1982, $32 billion in 1983, and $182 billion over 1982 - 86 taken as a whole. The interest rate/debt service factor, then, constitutes a major source of the setback to our budget timetable. But let us be clear about its origins: it arises primarily from a legacy of past excesses, not from a shortfall in our current budget control efforts, nor from a flaw in our overall program.

The third and most important factor contributing to the growth in deficit projections is quite simply the ironic by-product of our rapid and decisive success in bringing down the rate of inflation. Our economic forecast last February projected a 9.5% inflation rate in calendar year 1981 and a further decline to 7.7% in 1982. This projection was scorned by many as too rosy just 1 year ago. Yet the actual inflation rate in 1981 turned out to be lower than our projection, and the inflation decline this year and next year almost certainly will exceed our earlier projections.

Indeed, every budget from 1975 forward projected a balanced budget 2 years into the future and growing surpluses in the out-years. Not one of these surpluses materialized for a very compelling reason: the monetary excesses needed to finance inflationary growth of wages and incomes are the enemy of savings, investment, real economic growth, and fundamental business confidence and financial stability. They lead to the kind of pervasive economic breakdown that we experienced during 1979 - 81 -- a breakdown that swells Government spending, interrupts the flow of receipts, and causes prospective budgetary surpluses to vanish in a flow of red ink.

Instead, we must recognize that for a period of time, success in our unyielding battle against inflation will appear to work against our goal of a balanced budget. Thus, while our current revenues will reflect the decline of inflation today, part of our current outlays will reflect the higher rates of inflation in years past. This is especially true in the case of some $249 billion in indexed programs. Generally, the inflation rate used to adjust indexed benefits lags a year or more behind the current payment period. During 1983, for example, an inflation rate of 6.5% is projected, but cost-of-living adjustments to social security and other program benefits will be 8.1% based largely on the actual inflation experience of 1981. Much the same is true of the $96.4 billion in debt service for 1983. Some part of that will reflect the higher cost of debt securities issued in 1980 - 82 when inflation and interest rates will have been higher than is now projected for 1983.

The final factor contributing to the worsening of the deficit outlook is that all of the budget savings we had planned for last year were not actually achieved. Most importantly, our plan to ensure the short- and long-run solvency of social security was discarded by the Congress. In an effort to eliminate partisanship and facilitate movement toward a constructive solution, our reform proposal has been withdrawn in favor of a bipartisan commission charged with developing a plan to rescue the social security system by next fall. I am confident that the commission will do just that, but in the meanwhile our outlay projections must be increased by $6 billion in 1983 and $18 billion for 1987.

Likewise, the Congress failed to adopt all of the reforms we proposed for medicaid, guaranteed student loans, food stamps and other entitlements. Without further action, about $4 billion would be added to the 1983 deficit in these areas alone. While major and unprecedented action was taken to curb the growth of entitlements last year, the shortfall is still substantial. Entitlement reforms not acted upon by the Congress last year will add nearly $20 billion to the deficit over the next 3 years. When this is combined with substantial added outlays for farm subsidies and for discretionary programs that were not reformed, it is clear that the task of budget control is far from complete.

Constant vigilance and relentless efforts to pare back future spending and borrowing will be imperative to ensure that they are not permitted to worsen and add further pressure to financial markets and interest rates.

Second, these deficits reflect the excess spending commitments of past rather than new spending programs with potential to grow in the future. That means that by remaining firm in our efforts to reduce waste and excess, reform entitlements, reduce low priority spending, and gradually return domestic programs back to State and local governments, the gap between spending subject to firm fiscal discipline and revenues being lifted by steady economic expansion will gradually diminish.

The prospect of high deficits during the transition to strong economic growth and low inflation contains a profound warning: any relaxation of our budget control efforts, any backsliding to spending politics as usual, any retreat to time-worn excuses about ``uncontrollables'' -- that results in spending growth significantly above our projections, will mean a serious threat to the progress of our entire economic recovery program. There is precious little margin for shirking or diluting the task the American people have charged us with. That task is nothing less than a constant, comprehensive, ceaseless search for ways to reduce the size of Government and the future growth of its spending.

The 1983 budget I am presenting to the Congress faithfully adheres to that mandate. If all proposed measures are adopted, the prospective deficit will be reduced by $56 billion next year, $84 billion in 1984, and $99 billion in 1985. In short, the budget this year represents much more than simply a tabulation of accounts or a compilation of spending decisions, large and small.

Instead, it represents a far-reaching, resourceful, and integrated blueprint for reducing the prospective deficit by $239 billion over the next 3 years. It is a bold action plan that, if faithfully implemented, can cut the prospective deficits over that period by nearly 50%.

The first area concerns nonsocial security entitlements. Despite the heartening progress we made toward reform last year, the cost of these automatic spending programs will rise to $201 billion in 1983 without further action. This figure compares to only $119 billion in 1979.

Thus, our 1983 budget proposals continue the objective set out previously: to reduce the swift growth of automatic entitlements while preserving benefits for the truly needy. If acted upon fully by the Congress, these new reform measures will save $12 billion next year and $52 billion over the next 3 years. They include new steps to tighten eligibility, reduce errors and abuse and curtail unwarranted benefits in the welfare, medical, and nutrition programs. The explosive growth of medical programs -- 16.7% per year since 1978 -- will be contained with tighter reimbursement standards for providers, modest copayment requirements for medicaid beneficiaries, and, later in the year, a comprehensive plan to reform the health care reimbursement system and provide new cost control incentives for all participants. We have also proposed measures to target guaranteed student loans better to those with financial need and to limit the cost growth of Federal military and civilian retirement programs.

Nevertheless, let me be clear on this point. Our administration has not and will not turn its back on our elderly or needy citizens. Under our new budget, funding for social insurance programs will be more than double the amount spent only 6 years ago. For example, the Federal Government will subsidize 95 million meals every day. That is one of every seven of all meals served in America. Headstart, senior nutrition programs, and child welfare programs will not be cut from the levels we proposed last year.

The second component of our deficit reduction plan covers domestic discretionary and other programs for purposes ranging from agricultural research to housing subsidies and manpower training. Our proposed savings here total $14 billion next year and $76 billion over the next 3 years.

These savings measures involve two essential principles. First, where programs are unnecessary, can be better targeted or can be significantly streamlined, we have proposed substantial reductions. Our proposals to convert the fragmented and wasteful CETA training program to a block grant, to target low-income energy assistance to the colder States where it is needed, to combine the WIC program with the child and maternal health block grant, and to further reduce subsidies to business for energy technology development and commercialization are all examples of this principle.

The other principle governing discretionary programs is that we have generally not provided inflation allowances for them. This will provide a powerful incentive to reduce overhead, waste, and low-priority activities and ensure that the money we spend for many worthwhile purposes in the areas of education, transportation, community development, and research is utilized in the most efficient and productive manner possible. Our deficit problem is simply too severe to permit business as usual to continue any longer.

The third component of the deficit reduction program involves user fees, or more appropriately, the recovery of costs borne by the taxpayers generally, but that predominantly benefit a limited group of businesses, communities or individuals. Total savings would amount to $2.5 billion in 1983 and $10 billion over the next 3 years.

While the Congress made great strides on most of our proposed budget cuts last year, the user fees proposals were a noticeable and disappointing departure from this pattern. The case for action now is even stronger than it was last year. With sacrifices required of almost every beneficiary of Federal programs, it is simply inexcusable and intolerable that yacht owners escape without paying even a small part of the Coast Guard services; or that commercial and general aviation are not paying the cost of the air traffic control system that ensures their safety; or that ship and barge operators do not pay a fair share of the costs of waterways maintained by the Federal Government. Our user fee package corrects these and similar shortcomings in current budget policy and will contribute significantly toward reducing the deficit.

The fourth part of the plan is aimed at the executive branch and the most inexcusable of all forms of spending: lax management, the toleration of fraud and abuse, the failure to recover debts owed the Government or to dispose of properties it does not need, and outdated, inefficient, procurement practices.

Our fiscal plan has always assumed that our new management would take hold, and that savings would be possible in areas we have simply never looked at before. After 1 year, our new mangement team has indeed taken hold, the results to date have been impressive, and our plans for future savings are bold and farreaching. All told, these efforts will reduce the budget deficit by $20 billion next year and $68 billion over the next 3 years.

We will collect the debts we are owed and the taxes we are due. New legislation will be needed in some cases, but much of these savings will flow from tighter, more aggressive management throughout executive branch agencies.

Likewise, we will move systematically to reduce the vast Federal holdings of surplus land and real property. It is estimated that the Federal Government owns approximately 775 million acres, and 405,000 buildings, covering about 2.6 billion square feet. Some of this real property is not in use and would be of greater value to society if transferred to the private sector. During the next 3 years we will save $9 billion by shedding these unnecessary properties while fully protecting and preserving our national parks, forests, wildernesses and scenic areas.

Our management efforts will also be directed toward the more cost-effective procurement of the goods and services required by the Federal Government. The changes we seek will increase competition for the Government's business, reduce and simplify paperwork and regulations, and develop better standards for our procurement processes and personnel. Over time these efforts will yield large outyear savings not included in the budget totals.

Government's take from the paychecks of workers and the profits of business. On that principle we will not waver. But that does not mean unintended loopholes should go uncorrected, that obsolete tax incentives should be continued, or that profitable business should not contribute at least some minimum fair share to the cost of financing Government. Thus, our deficit reduction plan includes $34 billion over the next 3 years in additional receipts from new initiatives in these areas.

About one-third of this total is attributable to our proposal to strengthen the minimum corporate tax, and a substantial share of the other tax revisions will also affect business. In every case, these measures involve the collection of a tax that is owed now or that was intended by the Congress, or elimination of incentives that are no longer needed due to the sweeping reform of business taxation contained in the Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981.

Soviet Union will be at its worst in the mid-1980's and hence needs to be addressed quickly. It also concluded that the multiple protective structure basing proposal for MX did not provide long-term survivability since the Soviets could counter it (at about the same cost) by simply deploying more warheads.

In addition, our review pointed to serious deficiencies in force survivability, endurance, and the capability to exercise command and control during nuclear war. Current communications and warning systems were found to be vulnerable to severe disruption from an attack of very modest scale.

Longer-term programs include: development of a survivable deployment plan for the MX missile, development of a new submarine-launched ballistic missile, continued improvements in the survivability of warning and communications systems, and improvements in strategic defenses against both bomber and missile attacks.

U.S. force readiness. Our concerns with military readiness reflect both the long lead time required to procure sophisticated equipment (both parts and finished equipment) and past failures to provide adequate peacetime support for combat units. We cannot wait for a period of rising tensions before bringing forces up to combat readiness.

My program will continue to bolster combat readiness by increasing training, operating rates, and equipment support. There will be increased aircraft flying hours and supply inventories. In addition, backlogs of combat equipment and real property awaiting maintenance will be reduced.

Current U.S. mobility forces cannot move the required combat or combat support units fast enough to counter effectively military aggression in Europe, Korea or in the Southwest Asia/Persian Gulf region. For example, at present only a small light combat force could be moved rapidly to the Southwest Asia region. Major mobility shortages include wide-body military cargo aircraft; fast logistics ships; and prepositioned ships and associated support equipment.

In the last decade, the Soviet Union introduced large quantities of highly capable, new-generation tactical equipment including combat ships, tanks and aircraft, which must be countered by modernized U.S. forces. Also, the traditional U.S. superiority in system quality has been considerably narrowed, making Soviet quantitative advantages more serious. The Soviet military force buildup has increased the risk that they may rely on military power to support their foreign policy goals. For the U.S. to maintain, in concert with our allies, sufficient conventional forces to deter potential aggression, our forces must be provided with adequate numbers of new, modern tactical equipment.

My 1983 budget includes $106.2 billion for general purpose forces (including both operations and investment), an $18 billion increase over 1982. A key initiative is an expanded shipbuilding program. The United States, dependent on open seas for commerce and military resupply, must have the naval capability to maintain control of vital sea lanes. While our naval forces have declined from the mid-1960's, the Soviets have in existence or under construction eight new classes of submarines and eight new classes of major surface warships, including nuclear-powered cruisers and new aircraft carriers.

The budget provides an $18.6 billion shipbuilding program including full funding for two nuclear-powered aircraft carriers, to be constructed during 1983 - 87. Other ships included in my 1983 program are three large cruisers equipped with an advanced air defense system; two nuclear-powered attack submarines; two frigates for convoy protection and four mine countermeasure ships to improve fleet capability to operate in mined waters. My longer term objective is to increase the deployable battle force from 513 ships in 1982 to over 600 by the end of the decade.

All of this will be done with a major reform of the acquisition process and vastly improved management of defense operations, which will save $51 billion by 1987. In a continuing fight against fraud, waste, and inefficiency, the Secretary of Defense has appointed an Assistant for Review and Oversight and a Council on Integrity and Management Improvement.

The Constitution provides clear distinctions between the roles of the Federal Government and of the States and localities. In their wisdom, our founding fathers provided for considerable flexibility so that in following centuries these responsibilities could be adapted to new conditions. But in recent years we have not adapted well to new conditions. We have created confusion as to who is responsible for what. During the past 20 years, what had been a classic division of functions between the Federal Government and the States and localities has become a confused mess.

Governments at all levels have had and will continue to face various problems. But, as Governor of California, I learned that a problem in one part of the country does not automatically mean that we need a new Federal program in all 50 States. Yet that is what has happened.

Federal grants to States and localities exceeded $90 billion, meaning that 18% of Federal tax receipts were being passed through to States and localities for one reason or another. However, these funds were not passed through entirely benignly. Attached to them were Federal rules, mandates, and requirements. This massive Federal grantmaking system has distorted State and local decisions and usurped State and local functions.

I propose that over the coming years we clean up this mess. I am proposing a major effort to restore American federalism. This transition over nearly 10 years will give States and localities the time they need to plan for themselves when and how to meet State and local needs that are now being met with Federal Government funds. My proposal will also make available to the States and localities the tax resources that would otherwise fund these programs by the Federal Government.

In coming weeks, we will have intensive discussions with local and State officials, the Congress, and many others to hammer out a proposal I will soon send to the Congress. Essentially, I believe the Federal Government should assume full responsibility for the medicaid program which assures adequate health care for the poor. In contrast, financial assistance to the poor is a legitimate responsibility of States and localities. I am proposing, therefore, that the aid to families with dependent children (AFDC) and food stamp programs be turned over to the States. This swap will clarify responsibilities substantially because these programs will become the clear responsibility of one level of government or another. That responsibility is now mixed.

Government about $30 billion a year be turned back to the States and localities, along with the funds to pay for them. During the period 1984 - 87, these programs will be funded by a specially designated set of taxes to be used exclusively for financing this transition program. These taxes will be deposited in a fund that will belong to the States. Each State will be able to make its own decision on how rapidly to phase out the turnback programs. This is because each State will have two options: it may use its share of the federalism trust fund to reimburse Federal agencies for continuing to carry out turnback programs, or it may ask that the programs be terminated and then use the funds directly for whatever purposes it desires.

The key to this program is that the States and localities make the critical choices. They have the time to make them in an orderly way. A major sorting out of Federal, State and local responsibilities will occur, and the Federal presence and intervention in State and local affairs will gradually diminish.

Cooperation, support, goodwill, and a genuine sense of national purpose have enabled us to make significant progress in setting the Federal Government's affairs in order and America on the road to economic recovery.

The proposals set forth in this budget will not be accepted readily. They are a second challenging installment of a politically difficult, yet necessary, program. In their specifics, these proposals will undoubtedly be altered by the Congress. The general direction we must travel, however, is clear. I urge the Congress to weigh these budget proposals thoughtfully, and to join me, and my administration, in a constructive effort to curb the growth of Federal spending and to provide for the Nation's security. We must, in the end, roll up our sleeves, face our responsibilities squarely, and persevere at the unending task of setting, and keeping, the Nation's affairs in order.

It was a real thrill for me out there in the reception line to see Gordie Howe this afternoon. I remember my mother used to take me by the hand when I was a little boy -- [laughter]. Gordie, would you believe I was a teenager?

Last season, I understand that the attendance at National Hockey League games was nearly 12 million. But your sport stands for far more than numbers coming through the turnstile. The victory of the U.S. hockey team, the Olympic team over the Soviets at Lake Placid back in 1980, is a vivid memory cherished by the American people. And now 10 of those boys of Lake Placid are playing on National Hockey League teams. And one of them, Mike Ramsey, is with us today.

Hockey has a long tradition of which we can all be proud. The Stanley Cup, for example, is one of the oldest, if not the oldest, sports trophy in North America. When I was a sportscaster back in the 1930's, I remember reporting the scores of the Chicago Blackhawks. That was in the days when Taffy Abel, Lionel Connaker, and Chuck Gardner were playing for the Blackhawks. It's always been a rough-and-tumble sport requiring a special breed of athlete.

John Ziegler, were able to join us today. And while we're recognizing management, we can't leave out the name of Clarence Campbell, a man who kept this sport going for over 30 years. Clarence, a special thanks to you for all that you've done.

But in one sequence the movie called for dressing them up in hockey uniforms and skates and putting them out on the ice in Madison Square Garden. And I was out there on skates too as their coach. I have the deepest appreciation of how hard it is to keep peace on the ice. [Laughter] And I can understand why hours of fine sportsmanship are often overlooked because of maybe a few moments now and then when tempers get short. But hockey's such a majestic contest, let's hope that public attention will focus on the nobler aspects of that sport.

The players with us today, for example, have been selected as the best of their profession. I'm certain they stand shoulder to shoulder with the top athletes in the world. Washington has our own up-and-coming hockey team, and we're more than pleased that our city's been selected for the All-Star game. We wish each of you the best of luck.

And yet, there's something more important to America about hockey than athletic achievement and trophies. This rugged sport has cemented a bond between Canada and the United States, a bond that citizens of both countries should never overlook. Canadians and citizens of the United States are more than neighbors; we're friends in the truest and deepest meaning and sense of that word. And there's no doubt that this sport represents what is best about the relationship between our two nations. Citizens from both countries compete together on the ice, cheer together in the stands for teams made up of young men from both sides of the 49th Parallel.

Gretzky. Rumor has it, Wayne, that Washington has been trying to trade and get you here for the team. And I asked what Edmonton was getting in return, and they said two first-round picks and the State of Texas. [Laughter] But north of the border there are many fine people just like him, and we're happy to have them as neighbors and friends.

Mr. Ziegler. Mr. President, ladies and gentlemen, I can't think and I don't think Mr. Campbell could recall an honor that's been paid to our sport and to our game than what you and your staff, in so graciously inviting us to your house. On behalf of the League, all of the members, our All-Star players, everybody connected with hockey, Mr. President, thank you so much.

You mentioned, Mr. President, that the Stanley Cup, which is awarded to these outstanding athletes who vie each year over a thousand games to have their name inscribed on what I believe is the world's oldest, and certainly the most respected professional trophy. We felt that the only way that we could come close to thanking you was to see that you got what these gentlemen worked so hard for, and that is a replica of our Stanley Cup.

I had heard the Stanley Cup was going to be -- I thought it was the real thing. [Laughter] And I was waiting anxiously to have it opened and displayed here. But both of these -- I thank you very much, and I'm greatly honored and pleased to have them.

Bill Frenzel, Vin Weber, and Arlan Stangeland -- and an old friend who is right down here in front, known to all of us. Why don't you stand up here? I know they would all recognize you when you do. Harold Stassen. I thank all of you for that Paul Bunyan welcome.

Minnesota. Dave Durenberger tried to tell me that it's been so cold that the walleyes jumped on the hooks just to get out of the water. [Laughter] Now, I didn't believe that. [Laughter] Then he tried to tell me it's been so cold that the Minnesota State bird is now a penguin. [Laughter] And I didn't believe that. And then he tried to tell me that it's been so cold here that the only place you can keep warm is at a Durenberger campaign rally. And that I believe.

Dave, I was going to say something about you being a Paul Bunyan yourself, and then that connotation of maybe tall tales and everything, I don't want to take away anything from what you just previously said. [Laughter] I don't want to infer that it might not -- anyway, I appreciate it.

But this Senator has spent at least 120 days each year traveling through this State. He spends an average of 2\1/2\ days a week in Minnesota and still maintains a voting record in the Senate of 95 percent. We've got some that have forgotten about going home. They now live in Washington, and they don't have a voting record like that. If every public official served his State and the nation as well as Dave Durenberger, we could lick our problems in no time.

He's been especially helpful in our effort to reduce taxes and spending. You perhaps got that idea hearing him a few moments ago. As a member of the Finance Committee, he played a key role in such areas as a State tax reform so that family farms and businesses wouldn't have to be sold just to pay that death tax. And I can tell you, he is serving Minnesota as an independent and conscientious member.

I have talked about neighbor helping neighbor. And when I say such things, some of the press look at me as if I'm talking Polynesian. Well, I wish those skeptics would put aside their big city newspapers and occasionally read the weekly Kirkhoven Minnesota Banner. If they had picked up the November 12th issue, they would have seen a story about 16 farmers who helped a fellow farmer who had been seriously injured in an automobile accident. They chopped and plowed 160 acres in 6 hours to get his land in shape. They donated their time, their callouses, and their equipment. Wives and friends provided the lunch. The people of Kirkhoven exemplify the true spirit of Minnesota. And so does Dave.

Now, in delivering that budget message, it was not easy for a conservative like myself to say that the deficit that we're estimating for that year is going to be about $90 billion. And yet, this budget represents the lowest annual increase in spending by the Federal Government in 14 years. When we took office, spending was increasing at an annual rate of about 17 percent. In '83, this budget, as adopted, as we've submitted it, that increase will be 4\1/2\ percent.

Our opponents have said that the only thing we must now do -- they're horrified by the thought of a deficit, and so, therefore, they say that we must increase the taxes. Forget this business of the tax cuts that we've put into effect and that we must do this, because we must not have that unbalanced budget. We've only balanced one budget in the last 20 years, and their Congress has been in charge almost uninterrupted in both Houses of the Legislature for the last 40 years. And we have known budgets consistently.

I remember when Lyndon Johnson told us that he didn't want to break the hundred-billion mark -- my, the good old days, the deficit was under a hundred billion dollars -- didn't want to break that, so he submitted a budget that he said he had -- lean and hard, and he had it down to $98 billion.

With that great increase in the money supply, the interest rates went to 21\1/2\ percent. Inflation went to the neighborhood of 14 percent. We knew in, just a couple of years before, the only time in the history of this country when we had double-digit inflation in 2 years, back to back, and followed each other. The unemployment -- there were about 8 million unemployed in this country.

Well, today the interest rates are about 15\3/4\ -- well, there was a jump in some of the bank rates up a point or so, but they're down from what they were when we started. Inflation is down. And for the first time, we're approaching single-digit inflation. And, yes, unemployment is up because of this recession. It's the cruelest thing, I think, that can happen to people, when people who want to work and can find no work.

But here's why we believe that our tax program is their answer. This country in these recent years has had the lowest rate of savings of any of the great industrial nations on the part of our people because of our tax system. This country's industrial machine, which is now unable to compete with the other industrial nations, because we've had the lowest rate of investment in new machinery and plant and equipment -- the average industrial plant and equipment in America is 17 years old. In Japan, it's only 10 years old.

Just since August when the first slight phase of our program went into effect, there has been a definite increase in the percentage of the people's earnings that is being saved. That will form the capital pool where industry and business can turn and get the money they need to expand and modernize and become once again competitive. We're not being outcompeted because the American working man isn't as good as any other. We're being outcommitted, because with the best working people in the world, we haven't given them the tools they need to compete on the international scene.

And already, we can tell you that that $90 billion deficit of 1983 will actually be smaller in proportion to the gross national product than the deficits were in '75 to '78, when we were coming out of that '74, '75 recession. Those who opposed our plan and fought against it and, indeed, were saying that it had failed before it even started, which -- the start, as I say, was last October 1st -- now they're strangely quiet about those last 6 months when the increases took place in inflation and in tax rates and there were 8 million unemployed. We didn't go to the present 9 million from full employment. We were pretty well on our way there to begin with.

Our plan is based on the idea that government spending, the rate of increase in government spending, must be reduced until it comes down within the limit of the normal increase in our revenues that we gain from taxation.

The second point is that we must have an economic program of taxes -- as we have now -- that will stimulate and offer incentives to the economy to broaden the base of the economy so that even the government will get the revenues it needs, but from smaller assessments against each individual.

And the third phase of it is thousands of regulations that have been passed over the last few decades conflicting, competing regulations inflicted on local government, on State government, and on the private sector -- unnecessary regulations, some you could laugh at, if they didn't hurt so much. Well, under the Vice President, we've had a task force working on those regulations.

When people say that our programs, if we're reducing the amount of money, with the increase needed for some of the social programs, we're trying to get at the people who were never intended to participate in those programs in the first place, but who, through the conflicting Federal regulations and loopholes, legally or technically are participating, and there is no real need for them to be helped at the expense of their neighbors. This is what we're trying to do and to change.

To give you an example of how much out there is to be found and how much we're counting on in the coming year, our task force just with one foray -- not a nationwide investigation of this as yet -- has found that in one program, 8,500 recipients of benefits are still receiving those benefits, and they have been dead an average of 7 years. That's why the other part of our program, which you can call the fourth point I proposed the other night, which is the federalism program to get government in at least 40-odd programs back into the hands of local and State governments where it can be run properly by people closest to the scene and not mismanaged by the Federal Government.

I've talked longer than I intended to, but I'm just going to say one more thing. A lot of the demagoguery you will hear will be about the fact of the defense budget, and if anything has to be cut, why don't we cut that? We don't cut it because that's what's been going on for the last several years, and it will take us until the middle of the 1980's before we can even begin to come close to equating what the Soviet Union has built up to threaten us with.

It is absolutely necessary that we restore that capacity to defend ourselves. And when I look at these young people down here -- and I'm so happy to see them here and to participate -- I just want to tell you one thing. When we build up our national defenses, it isn't with the idea that some day you're going to go fight a war. The idea in building them up is that we will be so strong that no other generation of young Americans will have to bleed their lives into foreign battlefields or beachheads someplace out in the oceans.

I promise you one more thing -- that as we build up our national defense, our national security, we will not stop or let up one minute with getting those other fellows across the table from us and now talking legitimate arms reductions.

Well, that's all, except to tell you, you just confirm everything that Dave and I and the others there believe. You have to get about 50 miles, at least, away from the Potomac River and the District to get back to the real world.

Mr. Moore. Mr. President, the figure of $92 billion is an unfathomable figure. It's almost inperceivable to us. We do know that to satisfy the deficit, to meet that deficit, the government's going to have to borrow. That's going to necessarily take away some borrowing availability of the newlywed looking for money to borrow for a home, for an automobile.

You've asked the people to tough it out, to be patient on this kind of thing. How long would you expect the newly married couple to be patient? And I realize I've reduced this to a simplistic term, but can you regard the question in that light, sir?

The President. --  -- Because this is not new, what has been happening to us. This has been the result of policies that were deliberately instituted sometime ago with a belief that they could control inflation.

The President. All right. But at the same time there's this difference -- that with our tax cuts and the increase in savings, which has already begun, you know -- it doesn't take much more than a 1- or 2-percent increase in savings to add billions and billions of dollars to the capital pool. The person that either buys an insurance policy or puts the money in a bank, in a savings account -- that money is subsequently loaned, then, by the banks or the insurance companies, invested in industry, in growth, in mortgages, and so forth. And so, you have a pool of money that can probably handle the government borrowing as well as the rest.

But just to finish up on the answer is this: Those people who were advocating a tax increase as a method of trying to hold down the deficit -- and remember, it never has -- in all the years past we've had nothing but tax increases and the deficits, and the deficits grew bigger. What is the difference whether the government has to borrow the money from the people and take it out of private circulation, or take it out of circulation by taxes? Either way, the people are without the money.

But we know also -- and much earlier than we thought -- remember that -- and the present recession might have been mitigated greatly had we gotten what we originally asked for. We wanted a 10-percent cut in the income tax, retroactive to a year ago January. We finally -- to compromise, to get the bill at all, we finally had to cut to 5 percent instead of 10 in the first year.

Mr. Beckmann. Mr. President, a question about the current budget as it relates to your new federalism. There were the cuts or savings in domestic spending last year and more in your new budget proposal. And last year there was a safety net, programs that would protect the truly needy, and now more cuts or savings. Obviously, last year's safety net is different from this year's safety net. Where is that safety net now, and ultimately, in your new federalism plan, will it be the province of the States to establish that safety net?

And we're getting their input as to how we can phase these more than 40 programs over to State and local control -- a mandatory pass-through of those programs where the money should go on through to local governments, not just to the State level.

And we believe that the savings will be tremendous, because trying to run these programs from the Federal level -- and the Federal Government is never equipped to do that; the Constitution even provides against it -- the Federal Government has tried to make rules and regulations that will fit Wyoming and Montana and Los Angeles and New York City, not recognizing the great diversity of this country. They also -- and I say this as a Governor who for 8 years was implementing programs under the Federal regulations -- they with their redtape and with their regulations they impose extravagance on you. They so dictate the spending of every dollar that you have no leeway to say, ``Well, this is a higher priority in this area, in this other program. We should be doing more of this and less of this.'' You had no right to do that. You had to spend the money the way they told you to spend it.

What we are trying to do is give those who are administering the programs the freedom to get rid of programs that don't work or at the same time get rid of people who actually under the technical rules may be eligible but who do not have the need that justifies their being there.

Mr. Moore. Mr. President, maybe I revert to my original question. How long would you expect the unemployed schoolteacher, of whom there will be about 8,000 in Minnesota, how long would you expect them to wait? How long can their patience go?

The President. Well, unfortunately -- and as one who lived through of the Great Depression, in fact entered the work force at the depths of the Great Depression as I did, there's no one who feels more deeply than I do about the tragedy of unemployment. But I also, I hate to say this, with them listening, if you look back over the recessions, that the policies that we've known for the last few decades have brought us the '70 depression [recession], the 1974 depression [recession], and the one that we had that began in '79, this one. Unemployment is the last to come back. It is the slowest in coming back. But I believe that under our program we're going to begin to see an economic turn along about the late spring or early summer.

Mr. Moore. Sir, how would you expect industry to absorb these -- and I'm talking about the unemployed middle class; I'm talking about the white-collar worker, the professional careers, the schoolteacher -- how would you expect industry to absorb that great number?

The President. But we think the interest rates are going to continue going down. There may be some fluctuation as there has been in the last few weeks -- as there always is at the time of a recession -- coming out of a recession. But remember, the interest rates were going up before we got here. The interest rates have started going down after we got here, and we think they're going to continue to go down.

The President. Not in unemployment, because I believe that's even going to get worse for a little while. But I would say that along about midyear and along about the spring, early summer, we're going to see a turn -- and an upward turn in the economy.

The President. Because Mr. Stockman and I and all the others in the administration, by law, are forced to project deficits out 5 years in advance. I will tell you now I don't believe anyone can. I don't believe in those. There are so many imponderables that we have complied with the law, but I will tell you that I did it knowing we don't know what we're talking about, nor does anyone else who tells you they're projecting deficits 5 years in advance.

Mr. Beckmann. Mr. President, let's go back to your new federalism plan and how it's going to affect the States. As you obviously are aware, Minnesota is one of those States which does not enjoy a good financial picture right now.

The President. There are going to be no winners and no losers in this. We're going to transfer the funds that are necessary to perform the programs. And the trade that we proposed, of the Federal Government taking Medicaid and in return them taking food stamps and the Aid to Dependent Children, was because the increase, annual increase in spending on Medicaid is several times greater than the increase in those other programs. So, the Federal Government, by taking that program on, is going to relieve the States of an increased burden that will begin to be reflected in them having more of their own tax revenues as well as what we give them than they would have had, had they continued participating in Medicaid.

Now, we have been meeting already with Governors, mayors, and so forth, as I've told you. And those we've met with, their joy is expressed that this is something that for 30 years they've been begging for. This was something that Franklin Delano Roosevelt in 1932 spoke of and said we must return to the States and local communities authority and autonomy that has been unjustly seized with the Federal Government, and I have -- the mail that has come in to me from State legislators is unbelievable in their joy. I will be addressing the Iowa State Legislature tomorrow and the Indiana State Legislature later in the same day.

The President. Yes. Yes, although I must tell you this: There are Members of Congress who resist giving up authority and power, and this, you must realize, this is just because it's the nature of a national government. No government in history has ever voluntarily reduced itself in size. And that's what we're going to do to the Federal Government.

WHO radio. [Laughter] You see, some years back, as you may know, I recreated ball games on the air based on reports that came by telegraph. I would, now that I'm here, like to recreate the Rose Bowl game, and this time around you know who's going to win.

When I knew the Hawkeyes back in the thirties, they were struggling to get out of one of those low spots that come every once in a while to a school and a team. Coach Hayden Fry and quarterback Gordy Bohannon and the rest of that team rode the comeback trail all the way to the Rose Bowl.

Well, our country today is at a turning point. We've lived too long by the maxims of past decades, lost in a jungle of government bureaucracy, tangled in its web of programs and regulations. And almost all of those government initiatives were intended to relieve suffering, enforce justice, or preserve an environment threatened by pollution. But for each ounce of blessing, a pound of freedom was quietly stolen.

An all-intrusive Federal Government with Federal Government's big taxing and big spending doesn't work, never has worked, and never will. Those who cling to the policies of yesterday, who offer us only retreat, would condemn us and our children to decades more of economic decay -- decades in which our days of greatness would be just a dim memory.

So I have come to Des Moines to consult with you, to seek your counsel and your support as, together, we take the high road to national recovery and renewal. We share the trust of elected office, you for your State and I for the country and the people who sent me. And I have come to cement again the bond of partnership too many have forgotten.

Together we must go forward to ensure a decent standard of living for all Americans, but we must also protect for the next generation this fragile state of freedom so rare in the world and in the history of man.

I think we've taken the right first steps. We've begun to rebuild America's defenses, which had been left in dangerous decline. We've made clear our commitment to peace and stability in the world and our willingness to participate in strategic arms reduction. But we also have made clear that we will not look the other way as aggressors usurp the rights of independent people or watch idly while they foment revolutions to impose the rule of tyrants. We will not turn our backs on those who seek to gain or secure their liberty, and we will not back down from our duty to keep America strong enough to remain both free and at peace.

Our program for economic recovery and our proposal to restore the partnership between State, local, and Federal government are born from the same philosophy. They spring from an abiding faith in the American people and in our ability to govern ourselves.

American economy from the hands of the American people, have resulted in the painful recession that grips us today. In 4 short months, our programs have begun to restore incentive, to cut away strangling regulations and, for the first time in decades, make significant gains against the budget monster.

And what do you know? Inflation has dropped to single digits for the first time in 3 years, but it's not low enough. Interest rates are below their once dizzying heights, and yet they're not low enough. Our tax and budget cuts were the largest in history, but they only reduced the rate of increase in taxing and spending. We must hold firm to our tax cuts and reduce the budget even more. We have much to do before we'll see the light, but I think we're at last and at least approaching the bend in the tunnel.

Deficits, it is true, still loom large in our forecasts, but they should not overshadow the incentive and drive that is already building in our people. Our people are beginning to save again. There has been an increase in the savings rate since the fiscal year began and our programs began in October. The private savings pool could grow as much as $250 billion by 1984. This will bring needed growth to our economy and ease the strain on the money supply. In addition, yesterday we submitted to the Congress a budget schedule that will reduce the Federal deficit every year.

I'd like to pause here a moment and clear up a couple of things about the budget proposal we sent to Congress yesterday. So, if the reporters would pick up their pencils and the TV correspondents would turn on the cameras, I have an announcement.

There will be no general budget cut this year, and there was no budget cut last year. What we did and what we are doing is reducing the rate of growth in Federal spending. What we're doing is bringing old-fashioned discipline to the budget. Even before the budget came out, you could hear the sound of knees jerking all over Washington. [Laughter] The knee-jerk reactions and instant analyses were as hasty as they were incorrect. Despite all the talk, there is a deafening silence on alternatives.

You wouldn't know, to hear them, that 19 million people will still get food stamps, and over 95 million meals a day -- one out of every seven -- will still be subsidized, that Head Start, the National Institutes of Health, minority business assistance, aid to traditionally black colleges and other major programs will not be reduced from our 1982 request.

And suddenly, people who previously believed the deficit was something you tried to increase were bemoaning the fact that we had one. They didn't tell you that this year's budget marks the lowest annual budget growth in 14 years. They didn't tell you this deficit is actually smaller in proportion to gross national product than in the last recession recovery cycle of 1975 - 78, or that the deficits will decline in future years.

Yes, the deficit is too big, and I'm not about to use a magic pencil and merely create a balanced budget or a lower deficit on paper as has been done in the past. The budget we've proposed is a line drawn in the dirt. Those who are serious about reducing the deficit will cross it and work with us on our proposals or their alternative. Those who are not sincere in their concern about the deficit will stay on the other side and simply continue their theatrics. The American people are tired of theatrics; they want action. And let me tell you, they know the difference.

Our first commitment was to secure America's freedom. We are, as I said, rebuilding our defenses. Our second commitment was to restore America's economy. We have in place the first installments of a solid program for economic recovery. We turn now to our next commitment: paring the unmanageable size of the Federal bureaucracy, returning government to the governed.

Removing the possibility of solving problems where they occur, forcing Americans to accept the dictates of a swollen bureaucracy in Washington instead of dealing with their neighbors in city hall or the statehouse, has to be one of the most serious mistakes of this century. The Federal Government has become involved in such traditionally local concerns as fire protection, police pensions, welfare, and pothole repair.

Federal involvement in fire pollution -- or protection, I should say, amounted to a cooperative agreement between the Forest Service and State agencies. Today every Federal department, except State and Defense, and at least 11 other agencies have their fingers in the fire-related activities of State and local governments. And the taxpayer gets burned.

Divisions of responsibility have blurred beyond recognition. The intentions of big government were good, but the result has been overwhelming inefficiency, waste, and the kind of regulation that ends all hope of finding local answers to local needs. The willingness of the Federal Government to inject itself in matters more properly considered by city or county councils, school boards or State legislatures, has resulted in a confused citizenry unsure of who to turn to, unaware of who to blame when things go wrong.

We have proposed the broad outlines of a plan to restore the accountability now missing in our bloated government. We want to consult with you and your colleagues around the country to develop the details that will make it work.

Our initial program includes the transfer to the States of more than 40 Federal programs in the areas of education, development, and social services, and we want to send back the tax sources to pay for them, as well. But the centerpiece of the proposal is the almost dollar-for-dollar swap of two of the largest areas of welfare. The Federal Government would take over Medicaid in exchange for State assumption of Aid to Families with Dependent Children and food stamps.

Certain law enforcement and civil rights programs dealing with the handicapped and minorities should remain at the Federal level, but we want to reestablish with you a clear and workable philosophy to divide the functions of government.

Let us not confuse the ideals that launched the last 40 years of centralization with the failed realities it has produced. Let us recognize the good that has come from our past efforts, but also understand that we have come into a new day and must change the way we view government and government's role in our rapidly changing society.

Well, here in Iowa you have a strong two-party system. Your Governor, Bob Ray, has provided strong leadership, and your congressional delegation, led by Senators Roger Jepsen and Chuck Grassley, serve you and our country well. Innovation and reform have been the hallmarks of this legislature. Your reapportionment plan has been called a model for the country. You've made significant advances against waste and fraud and have a tradition of top-quality public education.

Just a few weeks ago, someone in a key leadership position in the U.S. House of Representatives, one of the people who for decades has presided over the dissolution of our national economy and system of government, said he would be in no hurry to transfer the authority and resources that belong to you back to your control. He said he knew of a dozen States right now that would shirk their responsibilities. He didn't happen to name those dozen States. It makes you wonder which States are not American enough for him. Well, I'm sure the people in the statehouses around this country would like to know.

First the elitists fought the tax cuts, saying the American people could not be trusted with an increased share of their own earnings. Now they say the people we elect to State and local office can't be trusted to run State and local affairs. Well then, who can we trust? A handful of individuals with a strong case of Potomac fever, the very individuals who got us into this mess to begin with?

Washington, D.C., has no corner on compassion or wisdom or morality. If we do nothing else in this administration, we're going to convince that city that the power, the money, and the responsibility of this country begin and end with the people and not in some puzzle palace on the Potomac.

Some would have us believe that today's world is too complex and our needs too large to be managed by self-rule. But if no one among us is capable of governing himself, then who among us has the capacity to govern the rest of us?

It's been said that if we lose this way of ours, this thing we call freedom, history will record with the greatest astonishment that those who had the most to lose did the least to prevent its happening. That must not be said of us.

I've told you I'm confident our economic recovery program will succeed. That isn't wishful thinking. Our plan is based on simple logic. We have deficits because government spends more than it takes in. We've had only one balanced budget in the last 20 years. Today's interest on the trillion dollar debt is greater than the total budget in Eisenhower's day. So we're reducing the size and cost of government to bring the annual increase in cost to less than the increase in tax revenues.

Now, increasing taxes is not an answer. We doubled taxes between 1976 and 1981 and had the biggest string of deficits in our history. Besides that, taxes reduced our ability as individuals to save. Today we're the last of the seven top industrial nations in savings and investment. Our industrial plant and machinery averages 17 years in age. In Japan, the average is just 10 years. So we're reducing the tax rate.

The Federal Government has, at great cost, been attempting to perform tasks that are not its proper function. So we're restoring the 10th amendment to the Constitution which says the Federal Government will do only those things called for in the Constitution and all others shall remain with the States or with the people.

I don't believe that our destiny is to watch this unique experiment in government slip from disrepair into decay. But if we remember that freedom rests, and always will, on the individual -- on individual integrity, on individual effort, on individual courage, and in an individual faith in God -- then we will have met the challenge of our generation and brought our great nation safely through our turning point in history.

I look to you today and in the coming weeks for guidance as we fashion a new framework for partnership in government. I ask you to join me as we move forward into a new and more prosperous era for America and for all of our people.

I promise you there will be no winners and no losers among the States. I promise you that it will be a fair trade and that the Federal Government will continue to maintain its responsibility for those things that the Constitution has imposed upon it. But we will, in turn, have faith in your compassion and in your good judgment and in your sense of responsibility to those people that you represent here in this great State.

Mr. Weber. With all the changes that are being proposed, one that is paramount in the eyes of many Iowans, particularly those on fixed incomes, is how they're going to maintain their current standard of living with the soaring natural gas prices. I went around doing a little interview with my friends here, and that seemed to be one of the prime issues. And I just wonder, what do you contemplate happening in regards to these people?

The President. Well, I think what we're talking about is the same old problem of inflation. Natural gas is still controlled. I'm not sure that that's the best idea, because we found out when we decontrolled gasoline, the oil prices, that the price went down, not up. It encouraged more exploration and more development at the source. And maybe the same thing would happen with natural gas, but no decision has been made on that.

Our program is aimed at bringing that down. And I have to say, not enough recognition has been paid to the fact that we have brought it down. We brought it down to single digit, where it's been for the last 3 years -- double digit. And I think that we're going to continue bringing it down with the program that we have in place.

That has to be -- I know today a great concern of the country, and it is of ours, is unemployment and this recession. But underlying that, helping cause that, everything comes back down to the fact that we've been in the longest -- in fact, the world has been in the longest sustained period of runaway inflation in world history. And we're very happy about it. As a matter of fact, we've succeeded beyond our expectations, and that's what's contributed to the coming deficit.

You know, government gets a profit from inflation. Inflation is a tax. If it's a sales tax, and the price of a commodity goes up, and the sales tax is based on percentage, the government's percentage goes up. In the income tax for the Federal Government, that's been the big steal, where people getting cost-of-living pay raises have been moved up into upper-income tax brackets. Today, a sizeable percentage of the normal working people in this country are up to the 50 percent bracket. And so we haven't been able to turn it down to where prices are going down, but we have cut that rate at which they're going up.

Mr. Weber. There's quite a bit of concern here in Iowa and throughout the Midwest about the stability of the family farm. And there is fear on the part of many that these farms are going to go under. Can you provide any signs of encouragement for the Iowa farmer?

The President. Yes. We have an Illinois farmer as our Secretary of Agriculture. And we know that this is the whole basis of any economy; has to be that. One of the things where we believe government can participate and be of help -- and we're trying desperately to do this -- is to encourage foreign markets, export markets, because there's no question, the American farmer can and does produce more than the people in our own country can eat, so he has to have an export market. He's been caught worse than most people in the cost-price squeeze of inflation. The cost of the things he buys, even the finished products of the food that he himself grows, when he then buys that in the form of bread and so forth in the market, he finds that he's on the low end of the totem pole when he sells that raw product, but he's paying like everyone else is, the inflated price as it's gone through the industrial processes.

We don't believe that government, as we've known in the past, is the answer of a -- continuing to control and subsidize the farm. What we must do with government is help agriculture get back into the market in getting a fair price for what it produces.

Mr. Weber. I was doing quite a bit in the promotion of gasohol. We've had plans for many more plants here in Iowa, but the plans seem to be falling by the wayside now because of a loss of Federal funds. Is it true that all Federal gasohol funds are being dropped?

The President. Well, we're reducing a great deal of our subsidy now of synthetics, simply because we believe that industry has become involved enough, that the free marketplace should take hold and help with that.

Mr. Weber. I can go back here a little bit. I can recall a visit that you made to Des Moines a number of years ago on behalf of General Electric. Hal Reed -- he worked with my dad down at International News -- and at that time, I think the thing we were talking about was socialized medicine. But very vivid in my mind in regards to the remarks that you made then -- and then also, back in Harlan, I recall in an interview that you talked about what you had done in California as Governor in terms of welfare. And as I recall, you were talking about how, evidently, you were allowed to experiment with the welfare programs there.

But you can come to a community where that isn't their major priority, but they do have another problem that they need to help on, but they don't have the flexibility to switch the funds. And this is what we're trying to do with the new federalism program.

It was one of the poverty programs, and it was in a rural county of California, a project -- they were going to put 17 able-bodied welfare recipients to work in the county parks, maintaining and helping to keep them clean, the parks.

Now, you think that sounds great. That's exactly the type of thing that we want to do. My veto was because under their rules, over half the budget would have gone for 11 administrators to handle the affairs of the 17 people that were going to work in the park. And I thought that was a little unbalanced, and I vetoed it, and the Federal Government had 60 days to override the veto.

Mr. Weber. I have copies of some minutes of the National Conference of State Legislatures in a meeting that you participated in. One of the sections here is in regards to welfare, and they're quoting you as saying that one of the major reasons for keeping welfare at the Federal level is the likelihood that differing benefit levels among the States was based on a court ruling handed down while you were Governor of California. Do you recall that? And it said the courts had struck down the State residency requirements for welfare because it was a Federal program. And I'm quoting from the minutes here: ``The President implied that if the Federal Government got out of the program, residency requirements might be acceptable to the courts.'' Is that a problem here in regards to your welfare change?

It is true that the welfare standards vary, based on -- and this is under the Federal domination of the program -- so these people who say, ``Well, this State might cheat and not give as much as another State,'' are talking through their hats, because that's the present situation.

But the Federal Government insists on minimums that are based on percentages of what is a basic cost of living in the various areas. But because Federal money was involved, the States had residency requirements so that you had to legitimately be a citizen of that State in order to get welfare.

When the Federal Government -- the court -- on the basis of the Federal funds, struck that down, you found people just going shopping. And there was a great influx, not only into California, New York City -- that was when its great problem developed. People only saw the end result of the amount of money that was being paid. They didn't translate it into the added cost of living, of living in those places. Theoretically, you weren't supposed to be better off in one State or the other, that the lower amount was because of the lower cost of living in that area.

But today, our idea is to find out if this is a part of what they want, to get the help of the State and local officials in fleshing out this concept that we've created in turning these programs back.

The President. This -- although here we're still in the early stages of trying to find a better method of providing the needed care for -- Medicare is the program for the older; Medicaid is the program that we have suggested the Federal Government take over instead of giving back and to find a way of doing it that will maintain the funds that are needed for people with a true illness or injury and not the waste, the shocking waste that we have today.

For example, I can give you a case -- let's say this isn't in Medicare or Medicaid -- that has just come to us, a man who told the story himself. He fell at work and broke his finger, went to the emergency division of the hospital, and they X-rayed and then splinted the finger. And then an attendant there told him, when he said he was going back to work, said, ``Well, you know that under the rules you're entitled to 2 weeks at full pay without returning to work.'' Well, he said, ``No, I want to go back to work.'' Believe it or not, they kept him there for half an hour trying to persuade him to take the 2 free weeks. What business was it of theirs? They were there to heal him. And then, he added to his story, he went back to work. And he told that 2 weeks later he called in a doctor that he'd been referred to to check the finger on how it was coming. And the doctor spent a total of less than 10 minutes looking at the X-ray and looking at his finger and submitted a bill to the government for $100. Now, we think there are better ways to run a railroad.

Mr. Weber. Shifting gears here a little bit, a lot of people seem to be picking your budget apart in terms of the money that you want to spend on the military. Why are you so strong in your support of this additional spending?

The President. I'm strong for military spending for this reason. In the last several years before this administration, the military was literally starved. There is a dangerous window of vulnerability.

Even with our military buildup, we will not even be back in the range of ability to stand in the face of our adversaries, the Soviet Union, until the mid-eighties. We will still be below them no matter how much we do now.

But the truth is we're only spending about 6 percent -- our military budget is only about 6 percent of the gross national product. In years past, in the fifties and the sixties, this averaged over 9 percent with the military budget. And even in the peace years, without the Vietnam war or the Korean war, it was over 8 percent, almost 9 percent. So, in point of history, we are not up to what used to be considered the normal peacetime budget.

But we have to show our adversaries that we have the will to defend ourselves. They have thought for several years we don't. But coupled with that, my idea of the real way to save on defense is with them knowing that they're going to have to accept that we're going to build up to their level for our own security.

I want to sit down -- and we already are sitting down with them -- to discuss legitimate arms reductions, and that would be the major savings in defense and for both sides. Today they are literally starving their people of consumer products in order to maintain this great military buildup.

Now unencumbered, just a simple move up, yes, I would favor that. I think that one of the things that could have mitigated if not prevented the present recession is if we had gotten our original request. We originally wanted a 10-percent, not a 5-percent cut, retroactive to January 1st of 1981. And I think if that had been in place, there might be a different situation with regard to the recession. As it was, to get the bill we had to cut to 5 percent on the first installment and delay to October 1st in order to get passage of the bill.

The President. Well, I think we're going to begin to see turns then. The regrettable thing is that the last to recover is unemployment when you're coming out of a recession and that is our major problem today -- the people that are without jobs. But, yes, I think it is going to begin to turn.

The President. Well, I can't say there have been too many surprises. First of all, there's a great deal of publicity about the office itself, so you know something about it. But I had the 8 years' experience as Governor of California, which is the largest, most populated State in the Nation, so I was prepared for the daily routine and the daily schedule and all the things that had to be done.

They occurred in Sacramento when I was Governor. But in Washington, it seems as if you can have a meeting in a room like this to discuss something, and you haven't made a decision -- it's just an option that you're considering -- and it seems as if 15 minutes after you're out the door and the meeting is over, you're hearing on radio and television or seeing in the print that you've made a decision, and this is what the government is going to do.

In 1919 William Herschell, a columnist for the Indianapolis News, came upon another admirer of this State, an old man near Knightstown who was sitting on a log in the warm sunshine, fishing in the Big Blue River. And with a sweep of his arm, the old boy encompassed the whole countryside, and he says, ``Ain't God good to Indianny!'' Well, God certainly has been good to Indiana, but unfortunately over the past few decades, the Federal Government hasn't been quite so kind. If the Federal Government had been around when the Creator was putting His hand to this State, Indiana wouldn't be here. It'd still be waiting for an environmental impact statement.

And it's not an exaggeration anymore to refer to the almighty Federal Government. In recent years, power and tax dollars flowed to Washington like water down the Wabash. And yet things didn't get better. We didn't move closer to solutions; we moved farther away. Hoosiers, like citizens all over this country, began to realize that the steady stream of money and authority to Washington had something to do with the fact that things didn't seem to work anymore. And the closer you look, the clearer it becomes. The Federal Government has taken too much tax money from the people, too much authority from the States, and too much liberty with the Constitution.

Over the last year, with the help of the American people, we started correcting these imbalances in our governmental system. We have cut the growth in Federal spending nearly in half, brought about the largest tax reduction and the most sweeping change in our tax structure since the beginning of the century. And with farmers and family businesses in mind, we raised the estate tax exemption and eliminated the estate tax for the surviving spouse so that survivors don't have to sell the family farm or the family business in order to pay the tax when death comes. We cut the increase in new Federal regulations nearly in half. And we undertook policies that strengthened State and local authority rather than erode it.

We know it. And we take our commitment to the people seriously. We have in place an economic program that is based on sound economic theory, not political expediency. We will not play hopscotch economics, jumping here and jumping there as the daily situation changes. We have faith in our program, and we're sticking with it.

To the paid political complainers, let me say as politely as I can, ``Put up or shut up.'' We have a solid plan already in place. What do they have? Either they give the American people a better alternative, or they join with us in our efforts to get the economy right.

The 1983 budget, which we recently released, is one of the new-wave budgets that will be rolling in for the rest of the decade. These budgets will require constant and comprehensive pressure so that we can reduce the future growth of government spending and the government's share of the gross national product. I hope the Congress will accept the future. I hope the Congress will approach the new budget proposals with the same cooperative spirit and good will as it did our proposals a year ago.

Now, the defense budgets over the next several years will be especially important. Studies indicate that our relative military imbalance with the Soviet Union will be -- believe it or not -- at its worst by the mid-eighties. As President, I can't close my eyes, cross my fingers, and simply hope that the Soviets will behave themselves. Today a major conflict involving the United States could occur without adequate time to upgrade U.S. force readiness. It's morally important that we take steps to protect America's safety and preserve the peace.

In the months ahead as we pursue a strengthened economy and a strengthened defense, we will also be working toward a revived federalism. During the campaign, I said we would cut taxes, and we have. I said we would reduce regulation, and we have -- 23,000 fewer pages in the Federal Register than there were a year ago, and that's the thing that lists all the regulations. And I've said that we must return more power to the States, and we will.

Now, there are those who for their own narrow political purposes say our federalism plan is a mere diversion from our economic problems, or that federalism is simply a means to cut the budget further. Well, don't you believe it. Our federalism plan stands on its own merits, a key to a freer, better America. Federalism is too important an issue to be treated as a distraction, and the American people deserve a full and public debate of the proposal's merits.

The Congress spends most of its time on the budget these programs represent. Governor Babbitt of Arizona said that the Congress should worry about arms control, not potholes. And if Congress did that, he has said, we would have both a better chance of survival and better streets.

I've got to pause right here and interject something about that. I'm delighted in telling about the town that decided in the interest of safety, they were going to raise all their street signs and everything that were only 5 feet high to 7 feet high. And the Federal Government came along and said, ``We've got a program that'll do that for you.'' Well, it was quite an undertaking to change the height of all these. The Federal Government's idea was they'd lower the streets 2 feet.

But according to an independent governmental commission -- intergovernmental commission -- the growth of such programs has made the Federal Government ``more pervasive, more intrusive, more unmanageable, more costly, and above all, more unaccountable.'' Polls show that the majority of Americans feel the State government can handle local problems better than the Federal Government. Absolutely no one, except the special-interest groups and those who do their bidding, believes that we can continue as we have.

In many respects, the Federal Government is still operating on the outdated and, if I may say so, arrogant assumption that the States can't manage their own affairs. At one time possibly, yes, certain States did ignore a portion of their citizenry. And when the Great Depression hit, the States weren't prepared to handle that kind of an emergency. But that was 50 years ago. There've been great changes in our land.

It's high time the issues were debated. And our federalism initiative is designed to focus that debate. The plan, as you know, has two major components. Starting in fiscal 1984, the Federal Government will assume full responsibility for the rapidly growing Medicaid program in exchange for the States picking up Aid to Families with Dependent Children and food stamps.

Now, by assuming the whole governmental cost of health and virtually the entire financial responsibility for the elderly population, the Federal Government will be taking on the most rapidly growing social domestic needs. The States will be picking up the areas where growth is much less rapid. Under current law, the total funding for AFDC and food stamps is projected to increase only 10 percent by 1987, compared with a projected 83-percent increase in the total cost of Medicaid for the same period.

The other aspect of the plan is a turnback of responsibilities to the States for over 40 Federal programs in education, community development, transportation, and social services -- along with the resources to pay for them. In 1984 the Federal Government will apply the full proceeds from certain excise taxes to a grassroots trust fund that will belong in fair shares to the 50 States. By 1988 the States will be in complete control of these grant programs.

There will be no net winners or losers. This will not be a roll of the dice. The State will not end up like the horseplayer who says, ``I hope to break even; I need the money.'' [Laughter] You'll break even, and there will be no gamble.

There are other guarantees as well, like the mandatory pass-through to the local governments of some funds, such as for mass transit assistance, community development. We will ensure civil rights protections and adequate welfare, and the transition period will allow plenty of time for discussion and fine-tuning of the program.

The concept of federalism is like the green and gold quilt of Indiana crops. There is protection in variety. Well, there's protection in the quilt of the 50 States as well. What the current issue comes down to is whether or not we trust the people and those closest to them to make governmental decisions -- to make government itself work. I trust those James Whitcomb Riley, the Hoosier poet, who called them ``the good, old-fashioned people -- the hale-hardworking people.'' And I believe that the decisions that come from this statehouse are as solid as the limestone it's built of.

Today in Washington there's someone -- at least in the White House and a couple of Congressmen of yours sitting right here -- who are on your side. This administration seeks nothing less than a realignment of government, a realignment that will give power back to those most responsive to the people. Of course, I'm referring to you who sit in the State legislatures, the county boards, the city councils of this country -- you who know the needs of your neighbors and the programs that will serve them best.

I've told you I'm confident our economic recovery program will succeed. This is not wishful thinking. Our plan is based on simple logic. We have deficits because government spends more than it takes in. We've had only one balanced budget in the last 20 years. Today's interest on the trillion-dollar debt is greater than the total budget in Eisenhower's day. So, we're reducing the size and cost of government to bring the annual increase in costs to less than the increase in tax revenues. And increasing tax rates is not an answer. We doubled taxes between 1976 and 1981 and had the biggest string of deficits in our history. Besides that, taxes reduced our ability as individuals to save.

Today we're the last among the seven top industrial nations in savings and investment. Our industrial plant and machinery average 17 years in age. In Japan the average is only 10 years. So, we're reducing the tax rate.

And they had the experience, and they put -- as is customary today -- and they put under the regulation of one government department those plastic bags in the wastebaskets to protect the employees from contamination in handling the waste. But in came another Federal department, took one look, and said, ``Unh-uh, someone might throw a cigarette butt in there, and the fumes of the burning plastic would be injurious to the patients. Take them out.'' Well, they never did get together as to which one was right, so the only thing the hospital can do now is kind of keep an eye on the front door to see whose inspector is coming. Take them out; put them in.

The Federal Government has at great cost been attempting to perform tasks that are not its proper function, so we're restoring the 10th amendment to the Constitution, which says the Federal Government will do only those things called for in the Constitution, and all others shall remain with the States or the people.

The great American experiment will soon enter a new phase that will last until the end of this century and prepare us for the next. And you here are the ones who will carry this experiment forward. You are the public servants who offer the most creative solutions and most promising hopes for our nation's future.

America needs your vitality and her people need your responsiveness. Let us join together to restore federalism, to restore the Nation's vigor, and to restore the faith of our people in their government at every level.

Thank you all very much. Thank you, Dr. Hoffer, Dr. Armstrong, the distinguished guests, ladies and gentlemen. I'm not going to beat around the bush, because I want you to know that you've made my day. Do you realize how great it is after being in the heartland to return and find the population of Washington, D.C., increased by 3,500 more believers?

I've just traveled halfway across the country since yesterday noon. I've visited three States and given four speeches, but no message given or received was more important than the theme of your conference. To preserve our blessed land, we must look to God. And we must look to the hearthstone, because that's where all hope for America lies. Families are the bedrock of our nation -- teachers of cooperation, tolerance, concern, and responsibility. Rebuilding America begins with restoring family strength and preserving family values.

America's elderly are a wise and a very precious resource, and we should always honor them and never set them aside. I know that people in that generation -- in our generation -- [laughter] -- are sometimes a bit sensitive about their age. I was kidded myself again last week, as I celebrated the 32d anniversary of my 39th birthday. But then I remembered something that Thomas Jefferson said. He said that we should never judge a President by his age; we should judge him by his work.

But like you, I've always believed that we were put here for a reason, that there is a path, somehow, a divine plan for all of us and for each one of us. And I've also always believed that America was set apart in a special way, that it was put here between the oceans to be found by a certain kind of people, based on a quality that these people had in that they came from every corner of the world. And a country then was created by men and women who came not for gold but mainly in search of God. They would be free people, living under the law, with faith in their Maker and in their future.

It's been written that the most sublime figure in American history was George Washington on his knees in the snow at Valley Forge. He personified a people who knew that it was not enough to depend on their own courage and goodness, that they must also seek help from God -- their Father and preserver.

Where did we begin to lose sight of that noble beginning, of our conviction that standards of right and wrong do exist and must be lived up to? Do we really think that we can have it both ways, that God will protect us in a time of crisis even as we turn away from him in our day-to-day life?

It's time to realize, I think, that we need God more than he needs us. But millions of Americans haven't forgotten. They know we've been on a toboggan slide, and they're determined to do something about it. And I'm honored to stand before you, 3,500 of their most effective and courageous leaders. And let me say, I do not agree with those who accuse you of trying to impose your views on others. If we have come to the point in America where any attempt to see traditional values reflected in public policy would leave one open to irresponsible charges, then I say the entire structure of our free society is threatened. The first amendment was not written to protect the people from religious values; it was written to protect those values from government tyranny.

State officials or local officials. It begins with the family, where it is the right and the responsibility of every parent. And that responsibility, I think, includes teaching children respect for skin color that is different than their own; religious beliefs that are different from their own. It includes conveying the message to the young as well as to the old that racial discrimination and religious bigotry have no place in a free society.

We need to duplicate the example of Rock Island, Illinois, where a Christian family care center established by local churches and run by volunteer funds provides aid to victims of child or spouse abuse; and the ecumenical Loaves and Fishes Program which help feed the poor in Milwaukee and Minneapolis, St. Paul, where I just was last night; and the Christian Broadcasting Network's Operation Blessing, which matches volunteers of goods and services with those in need throughout the country.

Well, let us come together as friends. We'll never find every answer, solve every problem, heal every wound, or live all our dreams. But we can do a lot if we walk together down that one path that we know provides real hope.

In the year just ended, the first decisive steps were taken toward a fundamental reorientation of the role of the Federal Government in our economy -- a reorientation that will mean more jobs, more opportunity, and more freedom for all Americans. This long overdue redirection is designed to foster the energy, creativity, and ambition of the American people so that they can create better lives for themselves, their families, and the communities in which they live. Equally important, this redirection puts the economy on the path of less inflationary but more rapid economic growth.

My economic program is based on the fundamental precept that government must respect, protect, and enhance the freedom and integrity of the individual. Economic policy must seek to create a climate that encourages the development of private institutions conducive to individual responsibility and initiative. People should be encouraged to go about their daily lives with the right and the responsibility for determining their own activities, status, and achievements.

Administration. It describes the policies which have been adopted to reverse the debilitating trends of the past, and which will lead to recovery in 1982 and sustained, noninflationary growth in the years to follow. And, finally, this Report explains the impact these policies will have on the economic well-being of all Americans in the years to come.

The substantially expanded role of the Federal Government has been far deeper and broader than even the growing burden of spending and taxing would suggest. Over the past decade the government has spun a vast web of regulations that intrude into almost every aspect of every American's working day. This regulatory web adversely affects the productivity of our Nation's businesses, farms, educational institutions, State and local governments, and the operations of the Federal Government itself. That lessened productivity growth, in turn, increases the costs of the goods and services we buy from each other. And those regulations raise the cost of government at all levels and the taxes we pay to support it.

Consider also the tragic record of inflation -- that unlegislated tax on everyone's income -- which causes high interest rates and discourages saving and investment. During the 1960s, the average yearly increase in the consumer price index was 2.3 percent. In the 1970s the rate more than doubled to 7.1 percent; and in the first year of the 1980s it soared to 13.5 percent. We simply cannot blame crop failures and oil price increases for our basic inflation problem. The continuous, underlying cause was poor government policy.

The combination of these two factors -- ever higher rates of inflation and ever greater intrusion by the Federal Government into the Nation's economic life -- have played a major part in a fundamental deterioration in the performance of our economy. In the 1960s productivity in the American economy grew at an annual rate of 2.9 percent; in the 1970s productivity growth slowed by nearly one-half, to 1.5 percent. Real gross national product per capita grew at an annual rate of 2.8 percent in the 1960s compared to 2.1 percent in the 1970s. This deterioration in our economic performance has been accompanied by inadequate growth in employment opportunities for our Nation's growing work force.

Reversing the trends of the past is not an easy task. I never thought or stated it would be. The damage that has been inflicted on our economy was done by imprudent and inappropriate policies over a period of many years; we cannot realistically expect to undo it all in a few short months.

Upon coming into office, my Administration set out to design and carry out a long-run economic program that would decisively reverse the trends of the past, and make growth and prosperity the norm, rather than the exception for the American economy. To that end, my first and foremost objective has been to improve the performance of the economy by reducing the role of the Federal Government in all its many dimensions. This involves a commitment to reduce Federal spending and taxing as a share of gross national product. It means a commitment to reduce progressively the size of the Federal deficit. It involves a substantial reform of Federal regulation, eliminating it where possible and simplifying it where appropriate. It means eschewing the stop-and-go economic policies of the past which, with their short-term focus, only added to our long-run economic ills.

A reduced role for the Federal Government means an enhanced role for State and local governments. A wide range of Federal activities can be more appropriately and efficiently carried out by the States. I am proposing in my Budget Message a major shift in this direction. This shift will eliminate the ``freight charge'' imposed by the Federal Government on the taxpayers' money when it is sent to Washington and then doled out again. It will permit a substantial reduction in Federal employment involved in administering these programs. Transfers of programs will permit public sector activities to be more closely tailored to the needs and desires of the electorate, bringing taxing and spending decisions closer to the people. Furthermore, as a result of last year's Economic Recovery Tax Act, Federal taxation as a share of national income will be substantially reduced, providing States and localities with an expanded tax base so that they can finance those transferred programs they wish to continue. That tax base will be further increased later in this decade, as Federal excise taxes are phased out.

We should use the level of government closest to the community involved for all the public functions it can handle. This principle includes encouraging intergovernmental arrangements among the State and local communities.

To carry out these policies for the 1980s, my Administration has put into place a series of fundamental and far-reaching changes in Federal Government spending, taxing, and regulatory policy, and we have made clear our support for a monetary policy that will steadily bring down inflation.

Last February I promised to bring a halt to the rapid growth of Federal spending. To that end, I made budget control the cutting edge of my program for economic recovery. Thanks to the cooperation of the Congress and the American people, we have taken a major step forward in accomplishing this objective, although much more remains to be done.

The Congress approved rescissions in the fiscal 1981 budget of $12.1 billion, by far the largest amount ever cut from the budget through this procedure. Spending for fiscal 1982 was subsequently reduced by another $35 billion. The Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 also cut $95 billion from the next 2 fiscal years, measured against previous spending trends. Many of these cuts in so-called ``uncontrollable'' programs were carried out by substantive changes in authorizing legislation, demonstrating that we can bring government spending under control -- if only we have the will. These spending cuts have been made without damaging the programs that many of our truly needy Americans depend upon. Indeed, my program will continue to increase the funds, before and after allowing for inflation, that such programs receive in the future.

In this undertaking to bring spending under control, I have made a conscious effort to ensure that the Federal Government fully discharges its duty to provide all Americans with the needed services and protections that only a national government can provide. Chief among these is a strong national defense, a vital function which had been allowed to deteriorate dangerously in previous years.

As a result of my program, Federal Government spending growth has been cut drastically -- from nearly 14 percent annually in the 3 fiscal years ending last September to an estimated 7 percent over the next 3 years -- at the same time that we are rebuilding our national defense capabilities.

We must redouble our efforts to control the growth in spending. We face high, continuing, and troublesome deficits. Although these deficits are undesirably high, they will not jeopardize the economic recovery. We must understand the reasons behind the deficits now facing us: recession, lower inflation, and higher interest rates than anticipated. Although my original timetable for a balanced budget is no longer achievable, the factors which have postponed it do not mean we are abandoning the goal of living within our means. The appropriate ways to reducing the deficit will be working in our favor in 1982 and beyond: economic growth, lower interest rates, and spending control.

We often hear it said that we work the first few months of the year for the government and then we start to work for ourselves. But that is backwards. In fact, the first part of the year we work for ourselves. We begin working for the government only when our income reaches taxable levels.

After that, the more we earn, the more we work for the government, until rising tax rates on each dollar of extra income discourage many people from further work effort or from further saving and investment.

As a result of passage of the historic Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981, we have set in place a fundamental reorientation of our tax laws. Rather than using the tax system to redistribute existing income, we have significantly restructured it to encourage people to work, save, and invest more.

Across-the-board cuts in individual income tax rates phased-in over 3 years and the indexing of tax brackets in subsequent years will help put an end to making inflation profitable for the Federal Government. The reduction in marginal rates for all taxpayers, making Individual Retirement Accounts available to all workers, cutting the top tax bracket from 70 percent to 50 percent, and reduction of the ``marriage penalty'' will have a powerful impact on the incentives for all Americans to work, save, and invest.

To spur further business investment and productivity growth, the new tax law provides faster write-offs for capital investment and a restructured investment tax credit. Research and development expenditures are encouraged with a new tax credit. Small business tax rates have been reduced.

My commitment to regulatory reform was made clear in one of my very first acts in office, when I accelerated the decontrol of crude oil prices and eliminated the cumbersome crude oil entitlements system. Only skeptics of the free market system are surprised by the results. For the first time in 10 years, crude oil production in the continental United States has begun to rise. Prices and availability are now determined by the forces of the market, not dictated by Washington. And, helped by world supply and demand developments, oil and gasoline prices have been falling, rather than rising.

I have established, by Executive order, a process whereby all executive agency regulatory activity is subject to close and sensitive monitoring by the Executive Office of the President. During the first year of my Administration, 2,893 regulations have been subjected to Executive Office review.

Government. It is taking place outside of Washington, in large and small businesses, in State and local governments, and in our schools and hospitals where the full benefits of regulatory reform are being felt. The redirection of work and effort away from trying to cope with or anticipate Federal regulation toward more productive pursuits is how regulatory reform will make its greatest impact in raising productivity and reducing costs.

Such a policy will ensure that inflationary pressures will continue to decline without impairing the operation of our financial markets as they mobilize savings and direct them to their most productive uses. It will also ensure that high interest rates, with their large inflation premiums, will not longer pose a threat to the well-being of our housing and motor vehicle industries, to small business and farmers, and to all who rely upon the use of credit in their daily activities. In addition, reduced monetary volatility will strengthen confidence in monetary policy and help lower interest rates.

The poor performance of the American economy over the past decade and more has had its impact on our position in the world economy. Concern about the dollar was evidenced by a prolonged period of decline in its value on foreign exchange markets. A decline in our competitiveness in many world markets reflected, in part, problems of productivity at home.

A strengthened domestic economy will mean a faster growing market for our trading partners and greater competitiveness for American exports abroad. At the same time it will mean that the dollar should increase in its attractiveness as the primary international trading currency, and thus provide more stability to world trade and finance.

I see an expansion of the international trading system as the chief instrument for economic growth in many of the less developed countries as well as an important factor in our own future and that of the world's other major industrial nations. To this end, I reaffirm my Administration's commitment to free trade. International cooperation is particularly vital, however, in confronting the challenge of increased protectionism both at home and abroad. My Administration will work closely with other nations toward reducing trade barriers on an even-handed basis.

I am sensitive to the fact that American domestic economic policies can have significant impacts on our trading partners and on the entire system of world trade and finance. But it is important for all concerned that the United States pursue economic policies that focus on our long-run problems, and lead to sustained and vigorous growth at home. In this way the United States will continue to be a constructive force in the world economy.

The most significant result was the contribution these policies made to a substantial reduction in inflation, bringing badly needed relief from inflationary pressures to every American. For example, in 1980 the consumer price index rose 13.5 percent for the year as a whole; in 1981 that rate of increase was reduced substantially, to 10.4 percent. This moderation in the rate of price increases meant that inflation, ``the cruelest tax,'' was taking less away from individual savings and taking less out of every working American's paycheck.

There are other, more indirect but equally important benefits that flow from a reduction in inflation. The historically high level of interest rates of recent years was a direct reflection of high rates of actual and expected inflation. As the events of this past year suggested, only a reduction in inflationary pressures will lead to substantial, lasting reductions in interest rates.

In the 6 months preceding this Administration's taking office, interest rates had risen rapidly, reflecting excessively fast monetary growth. Since late last summer, however, short- and long-term interest rates have, on average, moved down somewhat in response to anti-inflationary economic policies.

Unfortunately, the high and volatile money growth of the past, and the high inflation and high interest rates which accompanied it, were instrumental in bringing about the poor and highly uneven economic performance of 1980 and 1981, culminating in a sharp fall in output and a rise in unemployment in the latter months of 1981.

This Administration views the current recession with concern. I am convinced that our policies, now that they are in place, are the appropriate response to our current difficulties and will provide the basis for a vigorous economic recovery this year. It is of the greatest importance that we avoid a return to the stop-and-go policies of the past. The private sector works best when the Federal Government intervenes least. The Federal Government's task is to construct a sound, stable, long-term framework in which the private sector is the key engine to growth, employment, and rising living standards.

The policies of the past have failed. They failed because they did not provide the environment in which American energy, entrepreneurship, and talent can best be put to work. Instead of being a successful promoter of economic growth and individual freedom, government became the enemy of growth and an intruder on individual initiative and freedom. My program -- a careful combination of reducing incentive-stifling taxes, slowing the growth of Federal spending and regulations, and a gradually slowing expansion of the money supply -- seeks to create a new environment in which the strengths of America can be put to work for the benefit of us all. That environment will be an America in which honest work is no longer discouraged by ever-rising prices and tax rates, a country that looks forward to the future not with uncertainty but with the confidence that infused our forefathers.

Thank you very much. I appreciate that very much, and seeing the great number of you -- and that there are many more appointees than would be here today -- makes me very proud. But I'm not just proud of some quota or number or statistic; I'm proud because of the qualifications, the ability, and the energies that each of you brings to this administration. All of you are here as part of this administration for one reason and one reason only: because your country needs you. I appreciate the sacrifice that many of you have made to be here in government, and since most of you have been on the job for some time, my message is not so much one of welcome as it is to thank you for your hard work and to rally you once again to the cause that brought us all here.

You know, I've had the pleasure sometimes of talking to young people on campuses or in high schools, and questions come up about the Constitution and so forth. And I've read the copy of the Soviet constitution and it contains a great many terms that are in ours. They talk about a lot of things that don't happen there, like freedom of speech and right to assemble and so forth. But then I always delight in pointing out to them: Everybody has a constitution, but what makes ours different? And I just mentioned it in that last sentence. What makes ours really different is all those other constitutions tell the people what the government will do for them and let them do, and ours is a constitution that says we, the people, will allow the government to do the following things, and anything we don't allow government to do, government can't do. Government's tended to forget that lately.

Each day as you go into your offices, remember, we came to this place to pare the unmanageable size of government, to reduce its massive bulk, its powers, and its waste, to free our people and our economy from its oppressive hand. The minute that any of you start to think of government as ``we'' instead of ``they,'' we've been here too long.

But we must root out discrimination wherever it exists, whether on the basis of race, religion, or sex, or any other arbitrary barrier. Together we can work to remove it from this government. And working with State and local officials, we can eliminate it at other levels.

We've launched a new task force on legal equality for women and a 50-State project that will examine State laws and regulations for discriminatory language. And incidentally -- while it's true, I confess that I don't believe in the equal rights amendment as the best way to end discrimination against women -- I do believe such discrimination must be eliminated.

While I was Governor of California, we looked at our laws and we found 14 statutes -- it was difficult to believe that anyone had ever passed such laws and that they were still on the books -- and we wiped them off the books and got rid of them. So we have to look for others and repeal them.

We must continue our progress toward the America we all dream of, the America where people are hired and promoted and rewarded on the basis of ability and willingness to work. And if all of us -- not just those of us in this room -- but all of us are committed to that goal, then together we can and will achieve it.

In the days ahead, I'll be relying more than ever on your commitment, your ideas, and your staying power. I believe in the course we've charted for America, and with your help we're going to stick to it.

Throughout the year, let us join together as brothers in the family of man and reach across the religious and racial boundaries which unnecessarily divide neighbor against neighbor. Through friendship and understanding, we all stand to gain. Let us work and grow together as one great nation.

For tonight, though, we have more pressing business. I know I speak for all my fellow members when I say thank you to our outgoing president, Joe Slevin, for a job well done. And best wishes to Vivian Vahlberg on the office she's about to assume.

Well, tonight nobody loses. The club begins a new era. That's era, not ERA. [Laughter] And it's also on the threshold of a promising renovation program. I can honestly say that I feel a sense of humility standing here at this moment in the same building where silent Cal laid the cornerstone, Harry Truman played the piano, and Richard Nixon ate a hamburger. [Laughter] What's left for me? The cornerstone is already in place. I can't play the piano, and my foodtaster is home sick -- something he ate no doubt. [Laughter] But like a second Tip O'Neill, I'll stoop to the occasion.

All right then, Vivian, as a retired journalist, as a proud member of the National Press Club, and as the chief executive of another Washington concern with deficit problems -- [laughter] -- I now pronounce you president of the National Press Club.

Over the past year and a half, you have served not just me but our nation with distinction, honor and a personal energy that knows few parallels. From early morning until late in the evening, both on the road and here in the White House, there was one man I could always call upon for help and know that within minutes I would hear that familiar answer: ``Done''. No one who has known you through these days will forget your colorful character -- the laughter, the verve, the spirit -- but those who know you best will treasure even more those inner qualities of loyalty and character that are so much a part of you.

I remain fully supportive of you and the programs you have undertaken. You truly made a new beginning and, from the private sector, I shall do everything in my power to see that these great initiatives continue.

Nancy and I are delighted to welcome you here tonight. It's a great pleasure to have this chance to meet with you more as friends than as representatives of our countries, more for passing a pleasant evening than transacting business.

It's inspiring to look around this room, to think of the many languages, cultures, religions, and traditions that are present here tonight. Some might say this gathering is a microcosm of the problems that the world faces -- [laughter] -- but to me this gathering is a sample of the opportunities we have to communicate on a personal level and to cooperate as representatives of our independent nations.

This room is occupied by men and women aware of their responsibilities and respectful of the obligations of others. Those responsibilities and obligations are at times in conflict, but our commitment to civility and the proper discourse between nations should never waiver. Today's diplomats shoulder a tremendous burden, but the effort is reminiscent of Antilles, the character in Greek mythology, who drew his strength from the Earth: So long as he touched the Earth, he could not be defeated, but when he lost touch, he grew frail. As long as our governments stay in touch with the hopes and aspirations of our people, the prospects for world peace will be strong.

George Santayana, an American traveler and philosopher, once said, ``A man's feet must be planted in his country, but his eyes should survey the world.'' Well, this is the vision required of each of us and of every world leader. We must uncompromisingly represent the interests of our countries, yet be ever mindful that by our actions, we are determining the future of mankind.

The people of the world owe a special debt of gratitude to diplomats and their families, who today must cope not only with the frustrations inherent with the profession, but also with personal danger. In the last 15 years, diplomats from over a hundred countries have been victims of terrorist attacks. Fortunately, most have survived those attacks; a few, tragically, have not. Those who perpetrate these dastardly acts should never doubt that every nation considers an attack on any diplomat as a crime against mankind which will not be tolerated in any land.

Reflecting on this, we're grateful to the diplomatic community for your courage and your perseverance. So, since there's no one of us that will be toasted separately, I ask you now to raise your glasses with me in a toast in honor of the Washington Chiefs of Missions: May mankind profit by what we do.

He is chairman of the State of Israel Bonds for the greater Los Angeles area and is national vice president and member of the international board of directors of Shaare Zedek Medical Center of Jerusalem, Israel.

Mr. Zarb is currently a general partner at Lazard Freres & Co., where he supervises a broad range of international investment banking activities. Previously, he held senior management posts at a New York-based investment banking organization, now named Shearson Loeb Rhoades. Mr.

Executive Office of the President (EOP). He will, at the same time, continue to serve as Director of the Office of Administration (a statutorily independent agency within the EOP) where he has responsibility for providing common administrative support to the various agencies of the Executive Office of the President. He will continue to act as the White House liaison with the General Services Administration, National Park Service, and Uniformed Division of the Secret Service.

Before joining the White House transition team, Mr. Rogers was assistant to the president for administration at the American Enterprise Institute for Public Policy Research (AEI). He joined the AEI staff in 1977 to help launch a new periodical, Public Opinion. He served on the editorial staff until he moved into the administrative ranks of the Institute.

The first National Day of Prayer was proclaimed in 1775 by the Second Continental Congress. As thousands gathered in prayer in places of worship and encampments throughout the new land, the dispersed colonists found a new spirit of unity and resolve in this remarkable expression of public faith. For the first time, Americans of every religious persuasion prayed as one, asking for divine guidance in their quest for liberty and justice. Ever since, Americans have shared a special sense of destiny as a nation dedicated under God to the cause of liberty for all men.

Through the storms of Revolution, Civil War, and the great World Wars, as well as during times of disillusionment and disarray, the nation has turned to God in prayer for deliverance. We thank Him for answering our call, for, surely, He has. As a nation, we have been richly blessed with His love and generosity.

Just 30 years ago, a Joint Resolution of the Congress requested the President to proclaim a day each year, other than a Sunday, as a National Day of Prayer, on which the people of the United States may turn to God in prayer and meditation in places of worship, in groups, and as individuals. Eight Presidents since then have annually proclaimed a Day of Prayer to the nation, resuming the tradition started by the Continental Congress.

In celebrating the 250th birthday of George Washington, we commemorate the birth of a man whose unsurpassed contributions to our nation place him first in the hearts of all patriotic Americans. From our earliest struggle for independence, his easy, erect, and noble manner combined with his valor and dedication to duty earned him the esteem of his countrymen and gave his life the tenor of greatness.

Forge, and secured our independence with a great victory at Yorktown. His daring and unshakable belief in this nation's destiny carried us through the darkest hours of that protracted conflict to nationhood. Without the faith and vision of General Washington, our democratic experiment might well have expired at an early age.

As President he unified the hearts and minds of his fellow citizens and inaugurated principles of state that continue to serve us today. His character and magnanimity of spirit permitted him to reconcile and harmonize contending factions and establish the Chief Executive as the President of all the people, not the servant of any single group. His judgment and self-command were instrumental in bringing respect and honor to our national government from the beginning.

Through ages yet to come, George Washington will be remembered with reverence in the hearts of free people everywhere. His life, his deeds, and his spirit are the noble expression of the hopes and dreams of all who seek the liberty essential to human dignity and progress.

The President. The only thing I can assume is that they were for personal protection, and I think that's understandable. But I'm asking for a full report, and we'll have one from the Defense Department.

The President. No. I don't see any reason to. This is the only way to stimulate the economy, and that's the only way to really bring down the government spending to within its revenues, by expanding the economy. We've been limping along now for a few decades with these every once in a while, artificial stimulants that seem to be aimed at trying to get the economy going again.

The President. I think if they go out and meet the real people -- and maybe they'll do that -- they'll find out that the real people out there know that government has been -- [inaudible] -- too much.

The President. The program that we have in place is aimed at that, but also I think that we have to have more cooperation between ourselves and the Federal Reserve on this whole problem with regard to the money supply and a more consistent pattern.

The President. Well, I just heard all of you on the news not too long ago -- not very much time was given to it -- but there was a mention that the guerrillas had attacked a village up on the Honduran border, and it was reported that a hundred people were killed. I'd consider that a violation of human rights.

The patriotism of Clay, Lincoln, and generations of Americans was of this nature. They loved their country because it was theirs but even more because it was a land where liberty, justice, and opportunity flourished. They did not love it because of its government but because of its people; not because of the role its government played in world affairs but because of the inspiration the very idea of America gave to every person, great and small, who made this blessed land his home, and to every person in the less fortunate lands of the world who, amid oppression, tyranny, and injustice -- as in Poland today -- looked to America as the land of freedom.

Americans today should dedicate themselves again to that true patriotism. We should dedicate ourselves again to the enduring values of family, neighborhood, work, peace, and freedom which have characterized our country these past two centuries. Let us do this, and our patriotism will be strong and fulfilling.

Monday in February of 1982 as ``National Patriotism Week'' and requested the President to issue a proclamation calling upon the people of the United States to commemorate that week with appropriate celebrations and observances.

I invite all primary and secondary schools to conduct programs of study which are dedicated to those bedrock principles of national greatness devoted to rekindling the patriotic flame in all Americans.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirteenth day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Minnesota and Indiana, time and again I was inspired by the commitment and resolve of average citizens from all walks of life -- farmers, factory workers, small businessmen and professionals pulling together through difficult times to make our country great again.

Thanks to their support -- and the cooperation of the Congress -- last year we were able to put in place the first phase of a program for economic recovery. We gave the American people the biggest tax relief package in this century, we cut the increase in government spending nearly in half, and we dramatically reduced inflation.

I believe that the American people understand this, and at every stop on my trip through the heartland, they urged me to hold firm to the course we have charted for recovery. That course is as clear as it is essential. There will always be room for improvement in any budget and any economic policy. Where further savings can be found, or a better way of meeting agreed upon goals can be worked out, I pledge my full cooperation to you, and I want to hear from you. But my first and foremost obligation is to keep faith with the American people. When it comes to holding down taxes and insuring a strengthened national defense to protect the peace, there must be no such thing as retreat.

There's an old mountaineer saying that heroism is endurance for one moment more. I understand the nervousness that some members of Congress may feel in an election year. The temptation is always strong to go for the easy option, the quick fix that may buy a little time but solves nothing in the long run. Well, it was decades of quick fixes and time-buying that landed our country in the economic crisis we are now working to overcome. It will take courage and endurance -- heroism and statesmanship -- to see us through.

We are bringing the budget under control. We are winning the battle against inflation. We are bringing interest rates down. And we are returning resources and responsibilities to the people that will mean more savings, more freedom, more economic opportunity and more jobs for all Americans.

Where we have honest differences, you can count on me to be a willing listener and a sincere partner. But this is no time for turning back. Nothing should sway us from our basic commitments to the people.

I want you to know that America's policy toward Israel has not changed. Our commitments will be kept. I am determined to see that Israel's qualitative technological edge is maintained and am mindful as well of your concerns with respect to quantitative factors and their impact upon Israel's security.

Weinberger's statements on the public record are also clear. There has been no change regarding our military supply relationship with Jordan, and Secretary Weinberger brought me no new request. Any decision on future sales to Jordan or any other country in the region will be made in the context of my Administration's firm commitment to Israel's security and the need to bring peace to the region.

Israel remains America's friend and ally. However, I believe it is in the interest of both our countries for the United States to enhance its influence with other states in the region. I recognize the unique bond between the United States and Israel and the serious responsibilities which this bond imposes on us both.

Prime Minister Martens and Foreign Minister Tindemans and their party and the other representatives of the Government of Belgium -- but also the Prime Minister is the President of the European Community Council -- we've had a very valuable meeting, covered a great range of issues, found ourselves in great agreement with regard to the double-track of the Intermediate Nuclear Forces.

We had great discussion and found great agreement and support here with regard to our position in El Salvador and a recognition of what is at stake there, and a very fruitful discussion of the economy, economic trade, and what we can do to be mutually helpful.

Prime Minister of Belgium and as Chairman of the European Council, I had the opportunity to explain to our American friends both the Belgian and the European positions. The discussion with the President and his advisers, though they will be pursued right away with the Secretary of State, have proved very useful in fostering mutual understanding.

The Atlantic Alliance, the Western economies are going through very difficult times, and our solidarity is being put to the test. I have always been convinced that the partnership between Europe and the United States not only can meet this challenge but can also come out stronger after open and frank exchange of views.

Atlantic to pool our efforts to cope with the difficult situation we are facing. Our two countries have the same goals -- peace, prosperity, and the democratic ideals of individual freedom. The differences, when they occur, are more on tactics than on substance. I am looking forward to pursuing this conversation along with other allies when we will meet again at the next NATO summit in June.

April 19, 1982 marks the two hundredth anniversary of the establishment of diplomatic relations between The Netherlands and the United States of America. This is the United States' longest unbroken, peaceful relationship with any foreign power.

Dutch Republic as Minister of the United States of America, thus obtaining the second diplomatic recognition of the United States as an independent nation. Adams also succeeded, on October 8, 1782, in signing the first Treaty of Amity and Commerce between the two countries. This shortly led to a series of vital loans totaling the equivalent of 12 million dollars. This recognition of the United States as an independent nation can be regarded as a culmination of our country's efforts to take its rightful place in the world community of nations as a sovereign state.

In the nineteenth century Dutch immigrants and capital continued to play an important role in the development of our young nation. A considerable part of upstate New York was developed by investments from The Netherlands, and the vast Louisiana Purchase was financed through loans placed in Amsterdam. Washington Irving wrote of the Dutch settlers of the Hudson Valley, and immigrants from Holland founded many new towns on the frontier of the 1840s in Iowa, Michigan and Wisconsin. The Netherlands helped finance much of the building of the great American railway systems which opened up the West and contributed three U.S. Presidents of Dutch descent -- Martin Van Buren, Theodore Roosevelt, and Franklin Delano Roosevelt.

During the dark days of World War II, America was able to return this early support for our nationhood. Thousands of our young men are buried on Dutch soil, having given their lives in the liberation of The Netherlands.

Today, the United States and The Netherlands share a joint commitment to mutual security and the defense of freedom through our NATO partnership. Our close economic ties reinforce our common philosophic and political goals, and The Netherlands is now the top foreign investor in the United States -- a clear sign of Dutch confidence in our country and its future.

While the particular expression of our policies and actions has not always been identical, the theme of common interests and shared ideals has been a hallmark of the continuously peaceful and productive relationship between the United States and The Netherlands for two hundred years.

In my State of the Union address, I said the time had come to control the uncontrollable in runaway government spending. And I also indicated that I would be announcing further measures to achieve this goal. Today I'm making such an announcement. And the need for the step I'm taking is clear.

Survey on Cost Control in the Federal Government. This Presidential initiative will be conducted by outstanding experts from the private sector. They will report directly to me, and I've made it clear that in examining government efficiency, I expect them to roll up their sleeves and search out waste and inefficiency wherever it's to be found in the Federal establishment.

This is not going to be just another blue-ribbon, ornamental panel. We mean business, and we intend to get results. Members of the Survey will be responsible for an in-depth review of the entire executive branch of government. Working with the Inspectors General and the Council on Integrity and Efficiency, which have provided an inside look at how we can improve management of the executive branch, the Private Sector Survey will give us an objective, outsiders view on improving management and reducing Federal costs. Special emphasis will be placed on eliminating overlap, redtape, and duplication; identifying nonessential administrative activities; and increasing management effectiveness.

Chairman and members of the executive committee of the Survey. All of them will be proven leaders in their fields. All of them will bring know-how and a no-nonsense, results-oriented approach to this crucial undertaking. And all of them will offer their services as unsalaried volunteers.

Housing and Urban Development. In turn, other departments and major agencies will be given a detailed evaluation. This will be the largest effort of its kind ever mounted to save tax dollars and improve the working of government. The American people deserve no less. It's their money the Government's spending in such oversized amounts -- too often, unwisely and wastefully.

Government's grown too fast, and the economic stakes for the American people are too high for politics as usual on this vital issue. We all face an economic problem that has been building over many years, and we must all work together to correct it.

A year ago, I went before the American people to say that we'd inherited the worst economic mess in half a century. Inflation and interest rates were both at towering levels, unemployment was far too high, and the economy seemed almost stagnant.

Since then, we have made progress on many fronts. Inflation, our number one enemy, came down by nearly 30 percent last year and is still falling. With the help of the Congress, we also began laying a foundation for sustained economic growth. With the help of the Congress, we're going to keep that up. But obviously, we aren't out of the woods yet. There will still be some difficult days ahead. But at least we're heading toward a clearing.

One of my major concerns today is high interest rates. They hurt everyone -- people who must borrow, families who want to buy a new home, businesses struggling to get ahead. High interest rates present the greatest single threat today to a healthy, lasting recovery. The high level of current interest rates reflects two concerns in the financial community. Some fear that the Federal Reserve Board will revert to the inflationary monetary policies of the past. Others worry that this administration will tolerate ever-widening budget deficits.

Well, I want to make it clear today that neither this administration nor the Federal Reserve will allow a return to the fiscal and monetary policies of the past that have created the current conditions.

I have met with Chairman Volcker several times during the past year. We met again earlier this week. I have confidence in the announced policies of the Federal Reserve Board. The administration and the Federal Reserve can help bring inflation and interest rates down faster by working together than by working at cross purposes. This administration will always support the political independence of the Federal Reserve Board.

We also support the Federal Reserve's 1982 money growth targets, which are fully consistent with the administration's economic projections for the coming year. At the same time, I am sensitive to the need for a responsible fiscal policy to complement a firm, anti-inflationary monetary policy.

I'm confident that by pursuing a prudent course of sound fiscal and monetary policies, inflation will continue to decline, interest rates will fall, and we'll once again enjoy sustained economic growth.

Mr. President, the Secretary of State has said that the United States will do whatever is necessary to head off a guerrilla victory in El Salvador and that the mood of the American people should not necessarily determine our course there. Do you agree with those statements, and under what conditions would you send combat troops to El Salvador?

The President. Well, once again, Jim, we get into an area -- there are all kinds of options -- economic, political, security, and so forth -- that can be used in situations of this kind. And as I've said so often, I just don't believe that you discuss those options or what you may or may not do in advance of doing any of those things -- except that I will say, lest there be some misunderstanding, there are no plans to send American combat troops into action anyplace in the world.

Congress so far. Even your allies are urging you to raise taxes, postpone the tax cut, or to cut defense spending. Will you agree to any of those options? And if you will not, how can you expect to pass the package this year in Congress?

The President. Well, I'm hoping that some of them might soften their attitudes after they've been home for the Lincoln Day dinners and things and heard from the folks back home, because I think there's widespread support for continued cutting of government spending.

I think there's also pretty widespread support on the part of the people for restoring our ability to preserve our national security, which had been allowed to deteriorate so badly over the past few years. And I also believe that to abandon our tax policy now would be to give up the very fundamental thing that is required to expand our economy to create the jobs that we must have for the increased number of unemployed -- and thus, by expanding the economy, to actually add to government's revenues, not by larger assessments on individuals, but by having a broader base and more people paying taxes.

So, I think that either one of those two, defense or the tax policy, we ourselves have agreed that there are areas in the tax structure -- and I'd spoken of this before -- where if, unintended by those who created the tax regulations and policies, there were those who were escaping a legitimate tax burden, they should pay -- we're going to try to close some things of that kind. But we should have done that, and would do that, even without the need for more tax revenue, simply because it's right.

The President. Well, no, we're supporting them. Oh, wait a minute, wait a minute. I'm sorry. I was thinking El Salvador, because of the previous -- when you said that. Nicaragua. Here again, this is something upon which the national security interest -- I will not comment.

Q. If I could follow up, do you approve or reject -- or do you care to state what your policy is as far as having American covert operations to destabilize any existing government without specific reference to Nicaragua?

Q. Mr. President, although you have no plans to send combat troops to El Salvador, plans can be developed quickly. I'd like to hear some expression of your commitment, if there is one, not to use American combat forces in El Salvador. And, again, just how far will your administration go to keep the Duarte government from falling?

The President. Well, George, your question again gets to that thing that I have always said I think has been wrong in the past, when our government has done it -- and I will not do it -- and that is to put down specific do's and don't's with regard to some situation that deals with not only security matters but even such things as trying to influence a situation such as the one in Poland. I think that to do so is just giving away things that reduce your leverage.

Q. Mr. President, This is on another subject. How certain are you that the economy is going to begin to turn around by the end of the spring, the beginning of the summer? Or do you believe, as your budget director, David Stockman, said in testimony yesterday, that it may be late summer or early fall?

The President. Well, I'm not going to pick any particular month or anything and then find myself having to be held to that. Many figures are very volatile when you're coming out of a recession or bottoming out in a recession -- first of all, volatile enough that I think all of us were caught by surprise by the recession.

I do believe that we have a program in place, that there are indices already that give reason to believe that things are going to get better. For example, in December and January the increase in permits for building houses have gone up. There was a six-tenths of a percent rise in a group of the economic indicators, and that was the first rise after quite a long period of decline.

The inflation rate, which is well below what we thought it was going to be -- I'm just going to tell you that I believe in these months ahead in the coming year, I think we're going to see the recession bottomed out, and we're going to see interest rates begin to fall, a return to normal -- beginning of a return to normalcy, the beginning signs of recovery.

Q. Mr. President, you just spoke about cooperation between your administration and the Fed to get interest rates down. In fact, yesterday there was an increase in interest rates. What concrete actions are you going to take or do you plan to take, and when, to accomplish the lowering of interest rates? And will we ever see single-digit interest rates again?

The President. Yes, I'm positive we will. But inflation is one of the causes of interest rates going up, and anyone who's lending money has to compensate in the interest he charges for the depreciated value over the period of time of that money, based on the inflation rate. So, as we continue to reduce inflation, we will be working toward bringing down interest rates. And the other things are -- just the general improvement in the economy is going to contribute to that.

Commission, and he says that he's against certain civil rights legislation, against equal rights for women. I wonder if you knew this when you named him, because your people who name people, in the appointment section, did not notify the Pennsylvania Senator Heinz that he was from Pennsylvania, nor did they notify him of his views. So, now you're blocked in the Senate committee from getting this confirmation.

The President. No, he has expressed his belief that busing is not a proper method of bringing about desegregation of schools, and of course, I think there he has, according to all the polls, quite a majority of both the minority communities and the white community in support of that.

But he has also, at the same time, expressed his belief that through more attention to housing, more attention to breaking down school district boundaries that tend to segregate schools, that we could desegregate more by mixing the society better as a whole.

Baker, Senator Laxalt gave the indication that you were in some kind of position going to deal or compromise with Congress on some things. Yesterday, budget director Stockman seemed to suggest the same kind of thing -- that you might not go for a 30 billion cut in defense, but you might go for 10 -- and some dealings with the tax cuts, especially the business portion of the tax cuts. Are you willing to compromise at all? Your history as Governor and last year on the budget seems to be compromise. Are you going to compromise? Are you willing to?

But we did work long months, very hard on that budget. We think that we have thought pretty much of all the things that had to be considered. And this was what he was trying to say. And if someone can present something that looks reasonable and that will meet the fundamental objectives, which is to continue reducing the cost of government -- but we cannot back away on national defense without sending a message to the world, to our allies, as well as our potential adversaries that would be very unwise.

And as I've said before, on the tax program that was adopted by the Congress, the last year out, I think it would be very foolish of us now to turn around and express a lack of confidence in that and say, ``Well, let's go in another direction.'' I think that tax policy is going to be the strongest thing we have toward restoring productivity and improving the economy.

In the 1960's the CIA came up with a secret plan to get us involved in Vietnam in a surreptitious, covert manner. Is it possible that you can tell us that there is no secret plan now devised by the CIA or any other agency in government to surreptitiously involve Americans in similar activities in Latin America? And can you also assure the American people that we will not go in there secretly without you and this Government giving us some pre-warning?

Vietnam. If I recall correctly, when France gave up Indochina as a colony, the leading nations of the world met in Geneva with regard to helping those colonies become independent nations. And since North and South Vietnam had been, previous to colonization, two separate countries, provisions were made that these two countries could, by a vote of all their people together, decide whether they wanted to be one country or not.

And there wasn't anything surreptitious about it, that when Ho Chi Minh refused to participate in such an election -- and there was provision that people of both countries could cross the border and live in the other country if they wanted to. And when they began leaving by the thousands and thousands from North Vietnam to live in South Vietnam, Ho Chi Minh closed the border and again violated that part of the agreement.

And they were doing this, if I recall correctly, also in civilian clothes, no weapons, until they began being blown up where they lived and walking down the street by people riding by on bicycles and throwing pipe-bombs at them. And then they were permitted to carry sidearms or wear uniforms.

But it was totally a program until John F. Kennedy -- when these attacks and forays became so great that John F. Kennedy authorized the sending in of a division of Marines. And that was the first move toward combat troops in Vietnam.

Q. Mr. President, we hear of decline of the housing and the automotive industry almost daily. But we don't hear much about the problems in the agricultural sector, which has been in the worst straits it's been in since the depression of 50 years ago.

Forty-two Congressmen have asked for a meeting with you to discuss the farm problems, and they've just been notified that you don't have time on your schedule to see them. Also, do you support the market-oriented agricultural policy that your Secretary of Agriculture supports, and would you consider a grain embargo if the situation in Poland or elsewhere gets worse?

The President. I have repeatedly said that the only way I would consider a grain embargo would be as a part of an across-the-board embargo, that we will not again make what I thought was a mistake earlier and penalize one sector of our industry, the farmers, by just using that as an embargo item. So, we will not do that.

But I am very sympathetic to the agricultural industry, because I don't know of any industry that's been harder hit by the cost-price squeeze than the American farmer. And we're doing everything we can to stimulate foreign markets for them.

We have just recently had some good news from one of our trading partners, Japan, which has had a different set of rules with regard to import and has not abided by our own certification of agricultural products. And they have agreed now to accept our own Department of Agriculture's certification.

Q. Mr. President, I know you say that you're not going to be pinned down to a date as to when economic recovery will begin, but the fact is that you and your economic spokesmen have been saying for some time that the recovery would occur by late spring, and that it would be brisk, that it would be a substantial recovery.

The President. No, there's been no change in our position about the economy. We're simply trying to be -- and I'll coin a phrase here I've never used before: ``cautiously optimistic.'' We think this is far better with the -- sometimes the overblown -- or exaggerations that come with remarks that come out -- that we would rather err on the side of caution than err on the side of too much optimism.

I say the program is in place, this is, of course, depending on Congress to give us what we're asking for now in continued reduction in government spending, or they can themselves set back the recovery.

The Center for Export Information has researched that Hispanic minority business enterprise is ready to launch a national crusade for export expansion. I wonder if do you believe this is a good idea, in order to create thousands of jobs for our unemployed. And I wonder if you want to use your persuasion and constructive and dynamic leadership in order to increase and to carry out a more aggressive export policy, and if you can assure me that the people who support you are not going to be accused of supporting -- [inaudible] -- economy.

American States that there will be some answers to your questions with regard to not only the export but the economy, particularly where it involves our American Hispanics -- not only those in our own country but in our neighboring countries here.

The President. We're convinced by the evidence that the arms that are flowing into Nicaragua are coming by way of Cuba, their connection with the Soviet government. They have shipped in a greater tonnage of arms this last year than they have at any time since the Cuban missile crisis.

President Kennedy and Khrushchev that ended the Cuban missile crisis provided that the Russians would not in the future introduce offensive weapons into Cuba. Some of the weapons recently introduced, like MIG's, may classify as offensive weapons. Do you believe that the Soviets in Cuba are abiding by the understanding not to bring in offensive weapons?

I vetoed a bill that was contrary to what I believe while I was Governor of California, and that is for those who believe that the government is interfering in the private lives of the young people by making such a requirement. Those young people couldn't get their appendix taken out without their parents' permission, a number of other things in which the parents have -- I think the government has no business injecting itself between parent and child in a family relationship where it is very definitely a problem of concern to parents who are responsible for the children.

But, again, I have reassured Prime Minister Begin, because of the overblown way in which the whole two tours of the Secretary and Secretary of State -- they coordinated their activities. They were in communication with each other on those trips; there is no difference in policy between them. And I reassured Prime Minister Begin that there is no change in our approach toward Israel and our dedication to the welfare of Israel.

The President. Yes, and that is to continue the policy we're following, which is to try and carry on where Camp David left off and bring about a peace in the Middle East. And then the only basis for armaments in all of them would be against the external threat that could be posed by someone such as the Soviet Union. So, this is what we're trying to do in our Middle East policy is to try to persuade, particularly the more moderate Arab states, to join in the peace-making process with Israel and to accept Israel's right to be a nation.

Poland out in doing that. We retained our leverage, because default would mean great financial hardship for a great many people and a great many institutions here in the West. Default literally is like bankruptcy, and they're absolved of their debts. And we felt that in this way, we could hold that back to where if that becomes a useful alternative, we can make use of it. But the default as it stands right now, we believe, would simply throw Poland more dependent on the Soviet Union, and we would rather not have that happen.

American interests when he was in Jordan? That's one question. The other question is, what would you answer to a Saudi senior official who said that the United States is nothing but an arms supplier; it's only a purchase relationship between the United States and Saudi Arabia, but not a strategic relationship?

Q. Mr. President, many young people are facing the prospect that when they plan for college next year, they will have a harder time with finances because of some of the spending cuts that include the student loan and student aid programs. And the universities now are also beginning to say that they're having more of a financial squeeze. What apprehension do you have about that condition for many young people who are not either very rich or very poor, who will find their opportunities limited and the long-range impact on American education because of this?

The President. The amount of money that is in the budget for '83 for all the human and social affairs is $382 billion. That is a 4\1/2\-percent increase over the 1982 budget. Previously, that part of the budget has been increasing at a rate of about 16 percent a year, and we have reduced that amount of increase. But we have not reduced the budget back.

Now, there are some specific programs that may be of a different size than others. But the overall spending is the same. One of the things having to do with college loans was the knowledge that in the administering of that program, it had become so loose that we had people borrowing money simply because, for a college loan, because they could then reinvest that money at the current high interest rates and make a profit on the money that was sending their son or daughter to college.

Q. Mr. President, when you met the other week with Tip O'Neill, you defended your budget cuts in part by citing abuses, such as the case of the New York neighborhood where children of parents making $75,000 a year were getting free school lunches. I wonder whether you think examples such as those fairly represent the majority of people who are getting their benefits cut in programs such as this. And, secondly, I was wondering whether you could tell us where you got that example.

In Pima County, Arizona, they did save all that money on the food program. In fact, we confirmed it by phone and had them tell us that word for word I was accurate. And then they did say that someone from your side of the auditorium, someone had contacted them also and spent an hour but was resisting any answer that would not prove I was wrong.

Q. Mr. President, could you tell us whether these examples which you often use in talking about the budget cuts, whether you feel they represent -- they fairly represent the cases of a majority of people who are getting cut from these programs? And since you mentioned the source of it, could you tell us what school district it was?

But, no, I don't claim those are the majority. I claim -- and from my own experience in California, in redressing welfare and in having task forces of the kind that I just announced today, that contributed billions of dollars in savings to the State government with their findings -- that we found that many of these programs do drift into a pattern. I will give you an example from the present budget.

We have reduced or eliminated the CETA job-training program, which was $3.2 billion in 1982, and replaced it with a training program that only costs 1.8 billion. Now, that sounds like a terrible thing in this time of great unemployment but in the previous program we found only 592 million of the 3.2 billion was going for actual training. In the 1.8 billion of our new program, 1.35 billion will actually go for training. These are the type of things that we're trying to correct.

We do know that in any one of these -- it's what Milton Friedman once said, that if you start paying people to be poor, you're going to have a lot of poor people. And we want to help people that are poor but help them get to the place that they can take care of themselves.

I have said all along that our government programs for welfare of all kinds were created with the noblest of intentions, but there's something wrong when after decades and decades we keep increasing the number of people dependent on them. If those programs were truly successful, they would be removing people from government dependency and making them self-sustaining. And that's what we're trying to do with the programs that we're reforming.

As our Nation looks increasingly to the dynamic forces of the private sector to address the problems of our communities, the Red Cross' role of channeling and coordinating volunteer efforts into productive activities will grow. Recognizing its expanding responsibilities, the Red Cross has recently undertaken an ambitious, ten-year program to help improve the health of every American. This program is based on the simple concept that individuals play the principal role in reducing major health risks to themselves.

Through membership in the Red Cross, we can reach out to the world, to our country, and to our community -- not only to help those in adversity but also to arm ourselves and others with information to deal effectively in matters of health and safety. Moreover, we can help the Red Cross fulfill its traditional responsibility of providing essential communication, welfare, and educational services to members of our Armed Forces in time of peace or war.

Well, tonight it's been our honor to set a table for you and indeed a pleasure to entertain so many charming and beautiful ladies. Nancy and I are delighted to welcome you here as friends -- more as friends than as representatives of our countries, more for passing a pleasant evening than for transacting business.

In an era of instant communication, the diplomatic job becomes even more important. And those manners, customs, and standards of behavior, synonymous with diplomacy, become indispensable tools for keeping the peace. All the world relies on maintaining the ethics and standards of their profession. Certainly, each of us strives uncompromisingly to represent the interest of our countries, which is as it should be. Yet, at the same time, we're mindful that it is our actions that will determine the future of mankind. This dual personality -- or responsibility, I should say -- is a heavy weight. Even so, we must never lose touch with those human qualities that reaffirm that the affairs of state are ultimately relationships between people.

One of my predecessors, John Quincy Adams, who was also a fine Secretary of State, once pointed out, ``In the intercourse between nations, temper is a missionary perhaps more powerful than talent. Nothing was ever lost by kind treatment.'' So tonight as we socialize together -- now, that term should not be taken economically, of course -- [laughter] -- as we get to know each other, let us be mindful that diplomacy is a cherished institution that permits such fraternal interaction.

Americans, perhaps because of our own cultural and racial variety, believe that beneath the world's diversity most people have similar goals. They look for dignity, freedom, peace, and a chance to prosper. These common dreams and aspirations can serve as our strength.

At the diplomatic dinner last week, I recalled Antilles, the character in Greek mythology who drew his power from touching the Earth. So long as he touched the Earth, he could not be defeated. But when he lost touch, he grew frail. Well, similarly, as long as we stay in touch with the hopes and honest desires of our people, the prospects for world peace will be strong.

Looking around this room tonight gives reason for optimism. We represent a panoply of languages, cultures, religions, and traditions. Yet the civility and cordiality between us is not only possible, it is expected. Yes, problems exist. But this dinner is not a microcosm of mankind's problems; it is, instead, a sample of the opportunities we have to communicate on a personal level and cooperate as representatives of our independent nations. Lest some cynic suggest that cooperation does not extend beyond party-going, let us point to our commitment to maintain the diplomatic tradition which we celebrate.

In recent years, this tradition has come under increasing attack from terrorists who seek to strike at governments through their diplomatic respresentatives. In the last 15 years, diplomats from over 100 countries have been victims of terrorist attacks. Fortunately, most have survived these attacks; a few, tragically, have not. Those who perpetrate these cowardly acts should never doubt that every nation considers an attack on any diplomat a crime against mankind which will not be tolerated in any land.

On behalf of my colleagues, members of Washington's diplomatic corps, it is my real pleasure and also a privilege to thank you, Mr. President, and you, Mrs. Reagan, for this wonderful dinner at the White House.

Mrs. Reagan has been standing beside her husband through many years and now, as is well known, gives much of her heart, spirit, and support to the President after his journey from the Pacific, California, to the shores of the Potomac River. And this change of residence, we understand, does not make your life, Mr. President, easier at all.

And I may assure you, Mr. President, that each ambassador will try to present this conversation in the best possible way. After all, how could any ambassador miss this opportunity of the year. This kind of meeting is an excellent practice which we would all like to be continued. We are ready to spend any time with you, Mr. President -- [laughter] -- and at any place of your convenience -- the White House, Camp David, or even your ranch in California. [Laughter] On our part, we would be happy to welcome you and Mrs. Reagan to our embassies any time -- for dinner, for lunch, or even for breakfast -- [laughter] -- if it is, of course, not too early.

I'm sorry I missed the first dinner, since I was out of the country. While in Moscow, I received the word about your speech, Mr. President, made on that occasion, and you repeated some parts of this today. And I can say, on behalf of all my colleagues, that we completely welcome your commitment to the security of diplomats and share your statement that, and I quote, ``an attack on any diplomat is a crime against mankind.'' This is also the policy of our governments and gives us an additional feeling of security. After all, our profession becomes rather dangerous nowadays.

The Washington Diplomatic Corps represents all the continents of the globe, different races and different cultures. We brought here our own ideals and philosophies. We came here to maintain and, if possible, to improve relations between the United States and our countries, to explain as much as possible, the basic and current policies of our governments to the United States leaders and the American people, and to try to understand politics and policies of this country.

We all believe that there is one goal we share, and that is to preserve peace as the most important thing in the troubled world today. Diplomacy should play a leading role in achieving this noble goal, and we know that your Secretary of State, Mr. Haig, fully shares this view.

May I propose a toast to the health of our hosts, the President and Mrs. Reagan. We would also like to warmly congratulate you, Mr. President, and you, Mrs. Reagan, with your thirtieth wedding anniversary, which comes in several days. A lot of personal happiness to you and to your family.

Note: The President spoke at approximately 9:50 p.m. in the East Room at the White House at the second of two dinners honoring the chiefs of diplomatic missions. Anatoly F. Dobrynin is the Soviet Ambassador to the United States and dean of the diplomatic corps.

I'm delighted to have this opportunity to talk to you, and I know that you have been briefed extensively by our people, which gives me the terrible feeling that almost anything I might say would be replowing already plowed ground. I don't want to do that. I would just like to say a few words -- continue a discussion we've been having here at the table about our economic recovery program, which I know has been the subject of a great deal of briefing. And there is much speculation as to whether that continues or what we do with it or whether it should be altered in some way.

Well, I happen to feel that the program has not really had an opportunity. It didn't go into effect until October 1st. It's only been in effect a few months. But the real stimulus to the economy, the parts in the tax program that we believe are going to lead to increased productivity and an economic recovery, will come along -- well, the first one not until July and then the next one in the following year.

I am determined that this program offers us the best opportunity for coming out of this recession, for eventually balancing the budget -- not as quickly as we'd hoped it would be balanced, but then the recession came along and as you know with every one percentage point of added unemployment, you add $25 to $27 billion to the deficit.

The program is based on the idea that government has been spending and taking too much of a percentage of the gross national product for itself. Government has been a restraint on the economy. Savings on the part of private individuals in America has been at the lowest of any of the industrial States. The result is we haven't had the capital pool necessary to fund the deficit spending by government and make capital available for home mortgages, for business investment, and so forth. Well, just since October and our program has gone into effect, there has been a decided increase in private savings.

So, may I point out that even with the deficits now larger than we'd expected and hanging over us, the fact is that our plan calls for reducing the deficits as time goes on until we get to the place that government is within its spending revenues. But there is hope on the scene of capital, because not only is part of our tax plan aimed at providing through tax incentives some of the capital business and industry needs for expansion and modernization, but the savings, the increase in private savings, one percentage point of that increase adds $20 billion to the available capital for investment in this country. Two percent is $40 billion. And therefore, we believe that our continued request for cutting in spending is justified.

We are not cutting below what we've been. Maybe the trouble has been our own as much as anyone else referring to this as ``budget cuts.'' These are cuts in the increase in the budget. Next year the 1983 budget will have reduced the cutting -- or the increase, I should say, in social spending, welfare spending, the human problems outside of defense; it will still be an increase of 4\1/2\ percent in that budget. But it has been increasing over the years at a rate of 15 percent a year, and there's no way we could afford that.

I will say one word, if I may, about the defense spending, which is the other target. Either raise taxes -- and if we do that, we destroy the incentive that will restore our economy -- but we'll cut it out of defense spending.

I'm sure you all must know something that I thought I understood before I came here, but now it's been confirmed that there are things that, in this job -- there is information that you have that probably you're the only person, plus a few immediately around you who have that information. I have to tell you that I am as firm in my conviction that the very safety of this nation requires that we go forward with the defense spending program as we've laid it out. The difference in potential and what the Soviet Union has built up to in the rate at which it is increasing, building is going to leave us still a number of years before we even begin to close the window of vulnerability that has been opened between us and the Soviet Union. So, if it will encourage any, though, you might be interested in knowing that the bulk of the defense spending is for manpower, for maintenance, and for readiness. And if we eliminated all the major weapon programs that are scheduled, it would only reduce next year's deficit by $6\1/2\ billion, and it would at the same time send a message to the world that we were unilaterally disarming. So, we don't think we're going to do that.

Q. Mr. President, some of us just got back from El Salvador, where we were told by Argentinian citizens that members of their army are over with -- under CIA aegis and funding -- in Honduras training anti-Nicaraguan individuals to harass the government there and the supply lines from Cuba to the rebels in El Salvador. I realize that, you know, this is pretty touchy stuff, but many questions and many reports from the Washington Post had mentioned these reports. I wonder if you couldn't give us a little more elucidation on what you're doing there. And isn't it involving a much wider war when you bring in not only Nicaragua and El Salvador but now Honduras?

The President. You're right, it's a very touchy subject. I'm going to plead what I did in the press conference yesterday. I'm going to be making a speech on the whole Latin American affair to the Organization of American States next week, and therefore I'm going to reserve any comments that I might make with regard to our neighbors to the south until that address.

Q. Mr. President, I'm from Harrisburg, Pennsylvania. We in central Pennsylvania are still feeling the aftereffects of our nuclear accident on Three Mile Island. On May 18th the voters of central Pennsylvania will have a nonbinding referendum on whether to restart the undamaged reactor, even while the damaged one has not yet been cleaned up. My question, sir, is, do you have any feelings for or against these referendums? Would a decisive vote in either direction help shape your administration's future policy on nuclear power? And do you feel that a damaged reactor should be cleaned up before a nondamaged one is started again?

The President. I would only have to say, first of all, I do believe in nuclear power, and I think the antinuclear forces in this country are basing their views on a lack of information. I'm not going to say they're ignorant; it's just that they know so many things that aren't true. But I believe in it, and I believe that it is going to be essential to this country and to the world to develop it.

But I must say there, I'm not qualified to answer that question. I'd have to look for the answer to that to others with regard to the damaged reactor and whether there is any complication in starting the others, because I do believe this: We have a profound responsibility that, as we go forward with nuclear power, we must do it on the basis of every precaution for safety that can possibly be taken.

The President. Again, I don't think it's possible in such a referendum. I believe in democracy, and I believe in the people's right to vote and have defended it very much. But I don't believe that an issue of this kind, that they can have the information that is necessary to make that decision.

Q. Mr. President, I'm from Buffalo, New York, sir, and I'd like to ask you what do you say to -- on the economic program now -- what do you say to the autoworker or the steelworker in our area who, 10, 15 years, and, in some case 18 years seniority, who have been told that not only are they laid off but they may never have a job waiting for them again in the auto plant or the steel mills?

The President. Well, again, I think that the plan has to be to go forward to try and restore this economy. At the same time, we have been doing everything we can to help two industries that have really triggered the recession -- housing and the automobile industry. And both of those, I think, have been mainly affected by the interest rates, because both are installment-buying -- you might say -- industries.

The interest rates have come down. They fluctuate a little bit as we're beginning to bottom out in this recession. I think they're going to come down further in the next several months. This has to be the target and we're going to work very closely.

We approve of the level of increasing the money supply the Fed is aiming at now. We think, in the past, what we've had is not a level that was either too high or too low, it was a roller coaster. It was either up here or down there in past years. In the last 6 months of 1980, we had the greatest increase in the money supply in those last 6 months that we've had in the history of the Fed -- 13 percent. And with that came 21\1/2\-percent interest rates and double-digit inflation for the third year, around 14 percent. Now we have inflation down to single digit, and the interest rates, as I say, have shown that they're beginning -- they're going to be a little volatile here and there, but I think they're coming down.

We have extended money now for help to those who are unemployed. But, again, as I say, it's concentrated in about 10 States where they really have -- and those are the States -- it's very curious when you look at a map. The two States up there in the Northwest, the lumber States -- they are with the exceptionally high unemployment. And then you go over here to where the automobiles and the steel industry and so forth, and they are the high. But we're going to do everything we can to ease that situation.

Q. Mr. President, you have spoken often and with some great deal of pride about your years as president of the Screen Actors Guild. It must have had some effect on you when the current president of that organization sided with the rebels in El Salvador and, in fact, handed over a very large check to help buy them bandages, as they think that money will be used for. It must have had some effect on you.

The President. It sure did. I was very proud of the Screen Actors Guild for many years. I was in charge of negotiations for about two decades there with management on a basic Guild contract, and I was president six times.

At that time, the Screen Actors Guild -- I know people don't think actors can have that much sense, but they did -- the Screen Actors Guild was probably the best force for constructive good in the motion picture industry of anyone in that industry, and that didn't come from me. Those were words that were spoken by management of the Guild. But the Guild had a solid rule that it did not engage in politics, that our members crossed the spectrum in their own personal views, and therefore, the Guild would not dare to speak politically. So, the Guild would not participate in politics, nor would we allow politics in the Guild. That has been changed under the present administration.

The President. The Rapid Deployment Force? I think it is. I think it still has a way to go, as does all of the military and what we're building up. But I think that it, yes, is one. And I think -- maybe this wasn't part of your question, but maybe you had this in mind also. We have been greatly encouraged in the last several months with the increase in enlistment, but also with the increased level, caliber of the person who is enlisting and the great increase in reenlistment, particularly of noncommissioned officers, which had been a great drain on the military previously. There is an esprit de corps now in our military that is very heartwarming to see.

I got a letter from a kid on a submarine who told me, he said, ``We may not be the biggest navy in the world anymore, but we're the best.'' And there's a lot of that feeling out there among the Services. And I think we have to do some things to augment -- I know Karen [Karen Small Stringer, Deputy Assistant to the President and Director of Media Relations and Planning] says I've gone beyond what I should, but well, there was a hand back there that I missed way back, and then I know I have to go.

The President. Well, I've been trying to avoid a date, because I found out -- we did talk in terms of spring or early summer and then found out that as the stories went on, this was just becoming, kind of by common usage, as if we were making a statement of fact. And we think the danger of building that up and then, suddenly, if you pass the first day of that particular month and something has not happened as yet, it'll be viewed as a calamity. So, we think that it's just better to tell you that we believe that things are going to improve in the second quarter, and we believe we will be on an upturn in the latter half of -- the last two quarters of the year.

The President. A contingency plan? Well, to continue, as I say, I think we have the program in place. I will say this to you, honestly, that the program, of course, depends on the Congress passing the second installment, which is the budget that we have up on the Hill as of now. They can delay this recovery very much if they do not give us the further cuts that we're asking for, and remember, they are cuts in the increase in spending. The whole Government as a whole was increasing at a rate of around 17 percent when we took office. We have that down now to half of that. And we want to get it further and make it more practical.

Q.  --  -- one last question. I'm from New Jersey and we're kind of concerned about toxic chemical dumps. Is there any room in the budgets to come for some more Superfund legislation or some funding from the Government to help clean up these dumps in New Jersey and other States?

The President. I wish Dave or Don Regan or someone had been here to answer that. I can't recall right now what the situation is. We're as concerned as anyone about it and certainly recognize the threat in that and want to do whatever is required, and will do that. But I -- they tell me. I know, now I'm later than I was for the next appointment.

The President today announced his intention to nominate James B. Wyngaarden to be Director of the National Institutes of Health, Department of Health and Human Services. He would succeed Donald Sharp Fredrickson.

Washington, victorious commander of the American Revolution, chief advocate and President of the Constitutional Convention, and first President of the United States, unquestionably one of our greatest leaders.

His considerable wisdom, unflagging energy, dogged perseverence, profound faith in God, clear vision, and unswerving dedication to democratic principles contributed indispensably to the success of the American Revolution, the formulation and ratification of the United States Constitution and the establishment of the United States as a democratic federal republic.

As a soldier, he provided determined leadership, inspiring his men and sharing their lot in times of adversity. He took a group of farmers, tinkers, and store clerks and forged them into the Continental Army, a fighting instrument able to meet and best the finest professional troops in the world. Trusting in the rightness of his cause and, as he put it, in ``the miraculous care of Providence,'' he proved his valor by leading his men into battle time after time during the long years of war.

Yet, in his great vision, he saw the need for a better form of government, which would bind the sovereign States into an indissoluble Federal Union, while at the same time preserving and enhancing their unique role. To this end, he sponsored the Mount Vernon Conference, which led ultimately to the Philadelphia Convention in 1787.

As a statesman, he made his greatest and most lasting contribution to our American Nation. He presided with both tact and firmness over the Philadelphia Convention, guiding its members in drafting our charter of government so aptly described as the most important document ever composed by the hand of man at one time. Finally, heeding the call of his fellow citizens, he served as first President of the United States, setting precedents and establishing a standard to which all his successors can honorably aspire.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-second day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

We're gathered on hallowed grounds to share a special moment in our history. We come filled with pride and gratitude to honor George Washington, Father of our Country, knowing that because of what he did, we're free and we're Americans.

Pursuit of liberty and justice under God is still the most inspiring, the most successful, the most revolutionary idea the world has ever known. Words alone cannot express how much we revere this giant for freedom.

Yes, he is first in our hearts and will be first for all time. But as Abraham Lincoln said, ``To add brightness to the sun, or glory to the name of Washington, is . . . impossible. Let none attempt it .

If one word could describe all this man was and all he meant, it might be, ``indispensable.'' Had he not lived, perhaps some other great leader would have appeared to liberate the Colonies and establish our Republic. We'll never know. We know only that Washington was there, that he did fulfill this destiny, and that he did it with such skill and perfection he seemed to be carrying out a divine plan for America.

Washington was gifted with the vision of the future. He dreamed America could be a great, prosperous, and peaceful nation, stretching from ocean to ocean. He hoped the deliberations at Philadelphia would end with a declaration of our independence. He even designed and presented a drawing of the new American flag to Betsy Ross -- 13 stripes and a circle of white stars on a field of blue.

When the war was going badly, his courage and leadership turned the tide of history our way. On our first Christmas as a nation in 1776, he led his band of ragged citizen-soldiers across the Delaware River through driving snow to a victory that saved the cause of American independence. Their route of march, it is said, was stained by bloody footprints, but their spirit did not fail. Their will could not be crushed. Washington kept them going, and with the help of France they finally battled their way to Yorktown and the decisive victory that ended the war.

After the Revolution, he wanted to return here to Mount Vernon to be with his family, to farm, to hunt, to engage in commerce. But he loved his country and his country needed him. The 13 former Colonies were impoverished. They were bickering. They needed a constitution so that they could become a union of sovereign States joined to a central government.

The American political experiment was new to all human experience, and the world expected us to fail. If Washington had not stepped forward again -- first at the Constitutional Convention, then as our first elected President, we might well have failed.

His feats were harvested from the seeds of exceptional character. He lacked higher education, but he pulled himself up with years of training and hard work. He was a man of deep faith who believed the pillars of society were religion, morality, and bonds of brotherhood between all citizens.

It has been written that the most sublime figure in American history was George Washington on his knees in the snow at Valley Forge. He personified a people who knew it was not enough to depend on their own courage and goodness; they must also seek help from God, their Father and Preserver.

Washington was so popular he could have been king had he wanted that. But he had no hunger for personal power. His love was liberty, and his trust was in the people. He believed they were dependable and right-minded and he believed that a leader's responsibility is to bring out their best qualities.

Remember our problems are also our opportunities. You can take us to new frontiers in space, find medical cures for deadly diseases, discover technological breakthroughs, develop better ways to grow food, provide shelter, and produce energy. The world's hope is still America's future.

George Washington set. Let us give of ourselves so that when our time is through, history may say of us what Thomas Jefferson said of him: Their integrity was the most pure and their justice the most inflexible we have ever known. They were in every sense of the word a wise and a great people.

Note: The President spoke at 11:40 a.m. on the front steps of the Mount Vernon residence after laying a wreath at President Washington's tomb on the estate grounds. His remarks were broadcast live by the Mutual Broadcasting System. Following his remarks, the President attended a reception in the residence and then returned to the White House.

The Convention seeks to foster international trade through the simplification and harmonization of customs procedures and operations. United States accession will reflect and be consistent with our policy to reduce significantly tariff and nontariff barriers to international trade.

I recommend that the Senate give early and favorable consideration to this Convention and give its advice and consent to United States accession to the Convention and twenty of its annexes, subject to the proposed reservations.

First, all of the United States' major trading partners have accepted the Convention and one or more of its annexes. Acceptance by the United States would significantly further our commitment to eliminate restrictive trade practices and result in beneficial modernization of United States customs procedures.

Second, the Convention serves as a guide for countries seeking to develop and modernize their regulations and procedures. It is therefore important for the United States trade interests that it set forth impartial and simplified methods for conducting customs business. This achievement can best be pursued by the United States as a party to the Convention.

The President. Well, it almost goes without saying, I think, that I'm pleased that all of you could be here today. I heard a rumor that you've been discussing the federalism initiative with Rich Williamson [Assistant to the President for Intergovernmental Affairs] here, and I just want to add a few words here.

Our proposal reflects the comments and advice which we've received over the course of the past year from State and local officials all across the country, including the comments we've received from county officials. I remember meeting with your president, Richard Condor, last September when he urged me to retain full funding for general revenue sharing. Well, revenue sharing is protected in the fiscal 1983 budget that we have submitted. In addition, knowing of local officials' strong support for the revenue sharing concept, we've proposed a super revenue sharing fund in the federalism initiative. Now, this mandate-free trust fund would give you the flexibility to determine your own communities' priorities and to best meet the needs of your citizens.

Let me say in connection with that that among some of the questions that have been raised -- and that we honestly want to find answers for -- has been one that harks back to a day when -- there are those and who, with good reason from history, worry that a full mandate back to the States could result in discrimination in the conduct or the management of some of these programs. Well, here, I believe one of the things that has to be inherent in this program is the Federal Government setting some minimum standards in which there cannot be such discrimination anywhere or at any time.

I think that -- and our own approach in this modern day and our belief in civil rights -- makes this just inherent in any such program. And that protection we will insist is there, because I believe this is one responsibility the Federal Government cannot pass on, and that is the constitutional rights of every individual in this country are the responsibility of the Federal Government, to see that no one's rights are violated.

The proposal contains also, as you probably have been told by Rich, a hundred-percent pass-through provision to local units of government for programs which have traditionally been direct Federal local programs, and a 15-percent pass-through for other programs in the trust fund.

Now, I am unalterably committed to a mandatory pass-through of funds to local units of government. The proposal will also not be effective until fiscal year 1984 and contains an 8-year transition period, provides sufficient lead time to State and local officials to implement this program with the least dislocation possible.

While we've tried to incorporate your views into this package, we don't want your input to end there. And this is why I was so pleased to learn that you've established a special task force on federalism, which I met with in the White House on February 11th. As I've emphasized on many occasions, this initiative is a conceptual framework. It is not presented as a finished plan that we're seeking now to impose on all of our colleagues there in the various echelons of government. It's a statement of principles, and we seek your help in fleshing out the details.

Many of the technical questions which must be addressed are complex, but the issue is simple. Do we defend the status quo of a big, centralized Federal Government which costs too much and produces too little, or do we show progress, change, and new solutions by moving forward and returning programs and resources -- and resources -- to the people? The opportunity to make government work again is much bigger than an accounting program. We must seize this opportunity to reverse a trend that has begun to choke State and local initiative and overload the Federal Government.

We recognize that there are opponents; some can't be won over. And those who don't want the forum for public policymaking shifted -- because it'll be disadvantageous to their special interests -- are being heard from. They are the ones who have fed off the present system, and I don't mean recipients. I mean various representatives of bureaucracies and particular special-interest groups.

Other opponents perhaps genuinely believe that the farther representatives are from the people they serve, the better democracy will function. Well, that's an assumption I reject, as I know you do. Democracy depends on government being close to the people.

I have a quote that's kind of a favorite of mine that I came across one day by an individual who is known more for his silence than for his profound utterances. But this individual said, ``No method of procedure has ever been devised by which liberty could be divorced from local government. No plan of centralization has ever been adopted which did not result in bureaucracy, tyranny, inflexibility, reaction, and decline. Of all forms of government those administered by bureaucrats are about the least satisfactory to an enlightened and progressive people. Being irresponsible, they become autocratic, and becoming autrocratic they resist all development. Unless bureaucracy is constantly resisted, it breaks down representative government and overwhelms democracy. It is one element that our institution sets up under the pretense of having authority over everybody and being responsible to nobody.'' And that was stated on May 15, 1926, at William and Mary College by President Calvin Coolidge. Well, I think that's what county government is all about.

First of all let me tell you that this morning I was watching the news at 7 o'clock -- because we had a long day today -- and the news at the time stated that county government had rejected the new federalism program. The truth of the matter is we did not begin our meeting to discuss it until 7:30, so the word that got out was not correct. I want to dispel that rumor.

But we in county government have been looking for this day, this bold proposal I'm talking about, where we can return responsibility back to the local level and decentralize the Federal Government. We feel very strongly that the responsibility should be performed by the level of government that's closest to the people and is most capable of performing that service. And in so doing, we feel like with that responsibility should come the appropriate revenues. And we feel very strongly about this new federalism program.

The American County platform has been preaching this for some 20, 25 years. It's exactly what we've been saying. And we commend your bold efforts and hopefully that between us and our sister organizations, we can get together and work with you and your administration to find a positive solution to the problem that we've been seeking to iron out for many, many years.

Again I'd like to thank you too on behalf of NACO, because you and your staff have been tremendously responsive to NACO, our staff people. And the communication, the dialog that we have with you is just excellent. We thank you for it and commend you and look forward to our continued dialog as we go forward.

Mr. Murphy. Mr. President, it's nice to be with you again. I was there on February 11th, when we kicked around some of the ideas for the new federalism. Since that time, we've gone back home and done our homework, and your staff has been working along with us -- Rich Williamson and Steve Rhodes and Eve Baskowitz. We have aired and voiced a number of concerns that we have about the program. And I'm happy to say to you that many of those things have already been answered by earlier statements that you've made or by clarifications that Rich has made.

It's a distinct honor for us to be here today, and I know that all the members of our board of directors appreciate it. And I know we have about 1,400 disappointed people left over at the Washington Hilton who couldn't be here.

Specifically, Mr. President, one of the things that concerns us greatly about the new federalism proposal is in the area of the swap, the Medicaid for AFDC and food stamps. And the item of most concern is which of the optional services under Medicaid will, in fact, be picked up. As you know, there is the basic Medicaid program that the Federal Government enforces throughout the United States. And then there are a series of about 14 optional programs -- and you range all the way from Arizona, exercising none of those optional programs, all the way up to New York which exercises all of them.

The President. Well, here again, you have me -- and this is one of the reasons for meetings of this kind and for us getting and working together. That's a very complex problem, we know. And it's one that we don't have an answer that we are imposing on you in this trade -- that we want to work out the details of that kind of an answer in company with yourselves and the others and State entities to find out how it can fairly be done.

The reason that we chose that one for the trade to ourselves was because, as you know, the increase in cost of that program is several times greater per year than the increase in cost for the program that we're willing to trade. So, we believe that that would help when the day comes for final independence, that by that time we would have discovered how much more of your own tax assets you had available from not having to meet that increased cost for that program that could then be applied to the other programs. But this we want to meet with you on and to find out how extensive and how diverse are those problems, those options that you spoke of, and how they can be handled in this transfer program.

Association of Counties -- and after many, many hours of deliberation and real hard work, our board of directors by an overwhelming majority approved a resolution setting forth our approval of the new federalism with the key issues that go with it. And at this time, I'd like to present to you our copy of a final draft of this resolution where our support for the new federalism initiative is in effect and hopefully that we will continue to discuss this with you a bit later on.

The President. Oh, well you will be, and I thank you very much for this. I appreciate it. I felt a sympathy for you when you said that you woke up this morning and heard on the news the decision you'd supposedly made, and you hadn't met yet -- [laughter] -- they've been treating my economic program that way too -- [laughter] -- said it had failed and it hadn't started yet.

Mr. Condor. Let me please ask you -- this $30.2 billion funding level that we're talking about, these 43 turnback programs -- and this is under the assumption now that your budget cuts are successful from your administration. In the event now that these budget cuts are not enacted by Congress and that some greater amount is approved by Congress, will these adjustments be made upward in this trust fund?

The President. Yes, they have to be. There's one thing for certain. The whole idea of this -- when we say no winners and no losers -- is we have no intention of dumping responsibilities on other levels of government without providing the resources to pay for them.

Well, your advice and counsel during these past days and in the year since I came to office have been invaluable as we've worked to renew the health and promise of this country. And together, we've begun restoring the partnership between the levels of American government.

I'm aware that some of you feel caught between yesterday's call for greater autonomy and tomorrow's fear of being left alone with problems you didn't create. To you I give this pledge: The Federal Government will not turn its back on people, communities, or States in need of help. We will not create winners and losers, turning States and regions against each other. Our goal has been and will remain to bring prosperity to all Americans in every part of our country.

But we of this era must understand that we, too, have come upon a new day. We must change the way that we view government's role in our rapidly changing society. Roosevelt's challenge is our challenge tonight and in the weeks and months ahead. We must summon the courage to move forward. Governor Snelling put it very well when he said, ``Either you believe in democracy or you don't.'' Well, I do, and I know you do, too.

Governor Snelling. Mr. President, on behalf of the Governors of the States and territories of this nation, we want to thank you and your very gracious First Lady for this welcome. The state dinner is the highlight always of any meeting of the National Governors' Association, and we consider it a very great privilege to join you here in this house.

Mr. President, one of the reasons why I admire you so much is because you understand and appreciate Cal Coolidge of Vermont. And you have spoken quite a bit about Cal Coolidge, and you understand that Cal didn't say very much. As a matter of fact you've already said more than Cal said in his entire life. But what Cal said he said wisely, and he was not only a man who had great insight about government, but also a very deep sense of humor, and your references to the news reports of what we did reminds me of the story they tell about Cal Coolidge.

People in Plymouth really appreciated him, and they liked the fact that even after he was President of the United States, he still cared about his farm in Plymouth, and he came home often. So, they decided on one occasion to honor him, and they decided they'd have something made -- hand-made as a symbol of their respect for him. And they finally had a rake made -- a hay rake, of course. And they invited him back to Plymouth, and when he was next there they agreed to have the most eloquent person in town present the rake to the President.

Mr. President no matter what you hear about the Governors of the United States rejecting your overture to make federalism a high priority item on your agenda, the Governors of the United States did not do that. The Governors of the United States appreciate the fact that you who have been one of us have fully appreciated that sense of urgency with which the American people wish to see government come back home. And we want to salute you for not only appreciating that urge but for acting upon it, and for putting before us and putting before the Congress and putting before the people of the United States an agenda in which the recognition of the constitutional rights and obligations of the States and of local government has a very high priority. And in that spirit, the Governors of these States and territories have responded by making specific suggestions to you and by accepting your offer to work with them.

And so, we want to salute you for being the kind of leader who recognizes not only what is important to the people of this country but who also takes the kinds of actions which makes it clear that he believes fully in what he says. I think your offer to negotiate with us these matters, and to meet with us, and to provide some give and some take is very, very much appreciated by everyone in this room, because you've not just offered, you have demonstrated that you will treat the Federal partners as partners. And for that, Mr. President, we salute you, and we thank you.

American States embodies -- democracy, self-determination, economic development, and collective security -- are at the heart of U.S. foreign policy. The United States of America is a proud member of this organization. What happens anywhere in the Americas affects us in this country. In that very real sense, we share a common destiny.

We, the peoples of the Americas, have much more in common than geographical proximity. For over 400 years our peoples have shared the dangers and dreams of building a new world. From colonialism to nationhood, our common quest has been for freedom.

Most of our forebears came to this hemisphere seeking a better life for themselves. They came in search of opportunity and, yes, in search of God. Virtually all descendants of the land and immigrants alike have had to fight for independence. Having gained it, they've had to fight to retain it. There were times when we even fought each other.

In the commitment to freedom and independence, the peoples of this hemisphere are one. In this profound sense, we are all Americans. Our principles are rooted in self-government and nonintervention. We believe in the rule of law. We know that a nation cannot be liberated by depriving its people of liberty. We know that a state cannot be free when its independence is subordinated to a foreign power. And we know that a government cannot be democratic if it refuses to take the test of a free election.

We have not always lived up to these ideals. All of us at one time or another in our history have been politically weak, economically backward, socially unjust, or unable to solve our problems through peaceful means. My own country, too, has suffered internal strife, including a tragic civil war. We have known economic misery, and once tolerated racial and social injustice. And, yes, at times we have behaved arrogantly and impatiently toward our neighbors. These experiences have left their scars, but they also help us today to identify with the struggle for political and economic development in the other countries of this hemisphere.

Out of the crucible of our common past, the Americas have emerged as more equal and more understanding partners. Our hemisphere has an unlimited potential for economic development and human fulfillment. We have a combined population of more than 600 million people; our continents and our islands boast vast reservoirs of food and raw materials; and the markets of the Americas have already produced the highest standard of living among the advanced as well as the developing countries of the world. The example that we could offer to the world would not only discourage foes; it would project like a beacon of hope to all of the oppressed and impoverished nations of the world. We are the New World, a world of sovereign and independent states that today stand shoulder to shoulder with a common respect for one another and a greater tolerance of one another's shortcomings.

I was aware that the United States has long enjoyed friendly relations with Mexico and Canada, that our borders have no fortifications. Yet it seemed to me that there was a potential for a closer relationship than had yet been achieved. Three great nations share the North American continent with all its human and natural resources. Have we done all we can to create a relationship in which each country can realize its potential to the fullest?

Now, I know in the past the United States has proposed policies that we declared would be mutually beneficial not only for North America but also for the nations of the Caribbean and Central and South America. But there was often a problem. No matter how good our intentions were, our very size may have made it seem that we were exercising a kind of paternalism. At the time I suggested a new North American accord, I said I wanted to approach our neighbors not as someone with yet another plan, but as a friend seeking their ideas, their suggestions as to how we could become better neighbors.

Today I would like to talk about our other neighbors -- neighbors by the sea -- some two dozen countries of the Caribbean and Central America. These countries are not unfamiliar names from some isolated corner of the world far from home. They're very close to home. The country of El Salvador, for example, is nearer to Texas than Texas is to Massachusetts. The Caribbean region is a vital strategic and commercial artery for the United States. Nearly half of our trade, two-thirds of our imported oil, and over half of our imported strategic minerals pass through the Panama Canal or the Gulf of Mexico. Make no mistake: The well-being and security of our neighbors in this region are in our own vital interest.

Economic health is one of the keys to a secure future for our Caribbean Basin and to the neighbors there. I'm happy to say that Mexico, Canada, and Venezuela have joined in this search for ways to help these countries realize their economic potential.

Each of our four nations has its own unique position and approach. Mexico and Venezuela are helping to offset energy costs to Caribbean Basin countries by means of an oil facility that is already in operation. Canada is doubling its already significant economic assistance. We all seek to ensure that the people of this area have the right to preserve their own national identities, to improve their economic lot, and to develop their political institutions to suit their own unique social and historical needs. The Central American and Caribbean countries differ widely in culture, personality, and needs. Like America itself, the Caribbean Basin is an extraordinary mosaic of Hispanics, Africans, Asians, and Europeans, as well as native Americans.

At the moment, however, these countries are under economic siege. In 1977, 1 barrel of oil was worth 5 pounds of coffee or 155 pounds of sugar. Well, to buy that same barrel of oil today, these small countries must provide 5 times as much coffee -- nearly 26 pounds -- or almost twice as much sugar -- 283 pounds. This economic disaster is consuming our neighbors' money, reserves, and credit, forcing thousands of people to leave for other countries, for the United States, often illegally, and shaking even the most established democracies. And economic disaster has provided a fresh opening to the enemies of freedom, national independence, and peaceful development.

We've taken the time to consult closely with other governments in the region, both sponsors and beneficiaries, to ask them what they need and what they think will work. And we've labored long to develop an economic program that integrates trade, aid, and investment -- a program that represents a long-term commitment to the countries of the Caribbean and Central America to make use of the magic of the marketplace, the market of the Americas, to earn their own way toward self-sustaining growth.

At the Cancun summit last October, I presented a fresh view of a development which stressed more than aid and government intervention. As I pointed out then, nearly all of the countries that have succeeded in their development over the past 30 years have done so on the strength of market-oriented policies and vigorous participation in the international economy. Aid must be complemented by trade and investment.

The program I'm proposing today puts these principles into practice. It is an integrated program that helps our neighbors help themselves, a program that will create conditions under which creativity and private entrepreneurship and self-help can flourish. Aid is an important part of this program, because many of our neighbors need it to put themselves in a starting position from which they can begin to earn their own way. But this aid will encourage private-sector activities, not displace them.

Basin products exported to the United States. Currently some 87 percent of Caribbean exports already enter U.S. markets duty free under the Generalized System of Preferences. These exports, however, cover only the limited range of existing products -- not the wide variety of potential products these talented and industrious peoples are capable of producing under the free-trade arrangement that I am proposing.

Exports from the area will receive duty-free treatment for 12 years. Thus, new investors will be able to enter the market knowing that their products will receive duty-free treatment for at least the pay-off lifetime of their investments. Before granting duty-free treatment, we will discuss with each country its own self-help measures.

The only exception to the free trade concept will be textile and apparel products, because these products are covered now by other international agreements. However, we will make sure that our immediate neighbors have more liberal quota arrangements.

This economic proposal is as unprecedented as today's crisis in the Caribbean. Never before has the United States offered a preferential trading arrangement to any region. This commitment makes unmistakably clear our determination to help our neighbors grow strong.

The impact of this free-trade approach will develop slowly. The economies that we seek to help are small. Even as they grow, all the protections now available to U.S. industry, agriculture, and labor against disruptive imports will remain. And growth in the Caribbean will benefit everyone with American exports finding new markets.

Secondly, to further attract investment, I will ask the Congress to provide significant tax incentives for investment in the Caribbean Basin. We also stand ready to negotiate bilateral investment treaties with interested Basin countries.

Third, I'm asking for a supplemental fiscal year 1982 appropriation of $350 million to assist those countries which are particularly hard hit economically. Much of this aid will be concentrated on the private sector. These steps will help foster the spirit of enterprise necessary to take advantage of the trade and investment portions of the program.

Fourth, we will offer technical assistance and training to assist the private sector in the Basin countries to benefit from the opportunities of this program. This will include investment promotion, export marketing, and technology transfer efforts, as well as programs to facilitate adjustments to greater competition and production in agriculture and industry. I intend to seek the active participation of the business community in this joint undertaking. The Peace Corps already has 861 volunteers in Caribbean Basin countries and will give special emphasis to recruiting volunteers with skills in developing local enterprise.

Fifth, we will work closely with Mexico, Canada, and Venezuela, all of whom have already begun substantial and innovative programs of their own, to encourage stronger international efforts to coordinate our own development measures with their vital contributions, and with those of other potential donors like Colombia. We will also encourage our European, Japanese, and other Asian allies, as well as multilateral development institutions, to increase their assistance in the region.

Sixth, given our special valued relationship with Puerto Rico and the United States Virgin Islands, we will propose special measures to ensure that they also will benefit and prosper from this program. With their strong traditions of democracy and free enterprise, they can play leading roles in the development of the area.

This program has been carefully prepared. It represents a farsighted act by our own people at a time of considerable economic difficulty at home. I wouldn't propose it if I were not convinced that it is vital to the security interests of this nation and of this hemisphere. The energy, the time, and the treasure we dedicate to assisting the development of our neighbors now can help to prevent the much larger expenditures of treasure as well as human lives which would flow from their collapse.

Jamaica's new leadership is reducing bureaucracy, dismantling unworkable controls, and attracting new investment. Continued outside assistance will be needed to tide Jamaica over until market forces generate large increases in output and employment -- but Jamaica is making freedom work.

I've spoken up to now mainly of the economic and social challenges to development. But there are also other dangers. A new kind of colonialism stalks the world today and threatens our independence. It is brutal and totalitarian. It is not of our hemisphere, but it threatens our hemisphere and has established footholds on American soil for the expansion of its colonialist ambitions.

Caribbean area: either the establishment or restoration of moderate, constitutional governments with economic growth and improved living standards, or further expansion of political violence from the extreme left and the extreme right, resulting in the imposition of dictatorships and, inevitably, more economic decline and human suffering.

The positive opportunity is illustrated by the two-thirds of the nations in the area which have democratic governments. The dark future is foreshadowed by the poverty and repression of Castro's Cuba, the tightening grip of the totalitarian left in Grenada and Nicaragua, and the expansion of Soviet-backed, Cuban-managed support for violent revolution in Central America.

The record is clear. Nowhere in its whole sordid history have the promises of communism been redeemed. Everywhere it has exploited and aggravated temporary economic suffering to seize power and then to institutionalize economic deprivation and suppress human rights. Right now, 6 million people worldwide are refugees from Communist systems. Already, more than a million Cubans alone have fled Communist tyranny.

Our economic and social program cannot work if our neighbors cannot pursue their own economic and political future in peace, but must divert their resources, instead, to fight imported terrorism and armed attack. Economic progress cannot be made while guerrillas systematically burn, bomb, and destroy bridges, farms, and power and transportation systems -- all with the deliberate intention of worsening economic and social problems in hopes of radicalizing already suffering people.

Since 1978 Havana has trained, armed, and directed extremists in guerrilla warfare and economic sabotage as part of a campaign to exploit troubles in Central America and the Caribbean. Their goal is to establish Cuban-style, Marxist-Leninist dictatorships.

Government even admits the forced relocation of about 8,500 Mosquito Indians. And we have clear evidence that since late 1981, many Indian communities have been burned to the ground and men, women, and children killed.

The Nicaraguan junta cabled written assurances to the OAS in 1979 that it intended to respect human rights and hold free elections. Two years later, these commitments can be measured by the postponement of elections until 1985, by repression against free trade unions, against the media, minorities, and in defiance of all international civility, by the continued export of arms and subversion to neighboring countries.

It has repeatedly urged the guerrillas to renounce violence, to join in the democratic process, an election in which the people of El Salvador could determine the government they prefer. Our own country and other American nations through the OAS have urged such a course. The guerrillas have refused. More than that, they now threaten violence and death to those who participate in such an election.

A determined propaganda campaign has sought to mislead many in Europe and certainly many in the United States as to the true nature of the conflict in El Salvador. Very simply, guerrillas, armed and supported by and through Cuba, are attempting to impose a Marxist-Leninist dictatorship on the people of El Salvador as part of a larger imperialistic plan. If we do not act promptly and decisively in defense of freedom, new Cubas will arise from the ruins of today's conflicts. We will face more totalitarian regimes tied militarily to the Soviet Union -- more regimes exporting subversion, more regimes so incompetent yet so totalitarian that their citizens' only hope becomes that of one day migrating to other American nations, as in recent years they have come to the United States.

I believe free and peaceful development of our hemisphere requires us to help governments confronted with aggression from outside their borders to defend themselves. For this reason, I will ask the Congress to provide increased security assistance to help friendly countries hold off those who would destroy their chances for economic and social progress and political democracy. Since 1947 the Rio Treaty has established reciprocal defense responsibilities linked to our common democratic ideals. Meeting these responsibilities is all the more important when an outside power supports terrorism and insurgency to destroy any possibility of freedom and democracy. Let our friends and our adversaries understand that we will do whatever is prudent and necessary to ensure the peace and security of the Caribbean area.

In the face of outside threats, security for the countries of the Caribbean and Central American area is not an end in itself, but a means to an end. It is a means toward building representative and responsive institutions, toward strengthening pluralism and free private institutions -- churches, free trade unions, and an independent press. It is a means to nurturing the basic human rights freedom's foes would stamp out. In the Caribbean we above all seek to protect those values and principles that shape the proud heritage of this hemisphere.

I have already expressed our support for the coming election in El Salvador. We also strongly support the Central American Democratic Community formed this January by Costa Rica, Honduras, and El Salvador. The United States will work closely with other concerned democracies inside and outside the area to preserve and enhance our common democratic values.

Our economic assistance, including the additions that are part of the program I've just outlined, is more than five times the amount of our security assistance. The thrust of our aid is to help our neighbors realize freedom, justice, and economic progress.

We seek to exclude no one. Some, however, have turned from their American neighbors and their heritage. Let them return to the traditions and common values of this hemisphere, and we all will welcome them. The choice is theirs.

This is not Washington's problem; it is the problem of all the people of this great land and of all the other Americas -- the great and sovereign republics of North America, the Caribbean Basin, and South America. The Western Hemisphere does not belong to any one of us; we belong to the Western Hemisphere. We are brothers historically as well as geographically.

Now, I'm aware that the United States has pursued good neighbor policies in the past. These policies did some good, but they're inadequate for today. I believe that my country is now ready to go beyond being a good neighbor to being a true friend and brother in a community that belongs as much to others as to us. That, not guns, is the ultimate key to peace and security for us all.

We have to ask ourselves why has it taken so long for us to realize the God-given opportunity that is ours. These two great land masses north and south, so rich in virtually everything we need -- together our more than 600 million people can develop what is undeveloped, can eliminate want and poverty, can show the world that our many nations can live in peace, each with its own customs and language and culture, but sharing a love for freedom and a determination to resist outside ideologies that would take us back to colonialism.

Americas, Jose Marti, warned that, ``Mankind is composed of two sorts of men, those who love and create and those who hate and destroy.'' Today more than ever the compassionate, creative peoples of the Americas have an opportunity to stand together, to overcome injustice, hatred, and oppression, and to build a better life for all the Americas.

I have always believed that this hemisphere was a special place with a special destiny. I believe we are destined to be the beacon of hope for all mankind. With God's help, we can make it so. We can create a peaceful, free, and prospering hemisphere based on our shared ideals and reaching from pole to pole of what we proudly call the New World.

But 40 years ago today, America opened up a crucial front in its war against the enemies of freedom. It was 79 days after Pearl Harbor, and the Nation was mobilizing all its resources in the epic struggle that by then had encircled the planet.

In those days, as now, truth was a vital part of America's arsenal. A spirited band of professionals, men and women dedicated to what their country stood for and anxious to do their part, began broadcasting from the fourth floor of a New York City office building. In those early days, under the able direction of John Houseman, programs were recorded on acetate disks and then shipped via bomber to England and Latin America for broadcast.

Though born in war, the Voice of America continued in peace and has made enormous contributions. Today as we witness new forms of inhumanity threatening peace and freedom in the world, the Voice of America can perform an even more vital function. By giving an objective account of current world events, by communicating a clear picture of America and our policies at home and abroad, the Voice serves the interests not only of the United States but of the world.

Perhaps today I can outline a news story that you may be hearing about -- or as I've already found out, many of you have heard about it already -- and that was that a short time ago I announced at a meeting of the Organization of American States a new initiative promoting peaceful economic and political development in Central America and the Caribbean Basin. That area of the world was dramatically affected by the rising price of oil and the subsequent economic uncertainty of the last decade.

There are those who have sought to exploit this instability. We in the United States are concerned not only because of the proximity of those nations, but also because we've witnessed on too many occasions the suffering and oppression that invariably follow the establishment of Marxist dictatorships.

Hemisphere like Mexico, Canada, Venezuela, to promote economic growth, social stability, and political freedom in the Caribbean Basin and in Central America. On our part, we intend to offer a bold new opportunity for social and economic progress. The centerpiece of the program is a free trade arrangement for Caribbean Basin products exported to the United States. This will encourage new economic development and a better life for the people of the area. Also included in the program are incentives for investment and further financial aid, technical assistance, also, for the area.

We will, furthermore, seek to encourage the democratic process in the region. All too often extremists from right or left have sought to undermine social and economic progress, hoping to impose their will by brute force. This mentality is unacceptable to the United States and the free peoples of the Americas. It has no place in this hemisphere.

The United States intends to continue its support to those who are struggling to establish democratic institutions. The Communist-dominated guerrillas of the region offer nothing but the same bankrupt ideas that have imprisoned the populations of Cuba and Vietnam, Afghanistan, and, yes, Poland.

On March 21st, free peoples around the world will join in observing Afghanistan Day. In marches, meetings, and rallies, they will express their support for the heroic freedom-fighters of Afghanistan in their brave struggle against Soviet aggression. I'm happy to say that the Voice of America will provide thorough international coverage of Afghanistan Day.

Today we celebrate this 40th anniversary of an institution that has given hope to the citizens of those Communist regimes and all the victims of tyranny. The challenges we face are no less grave and momentous than those that spawned the Voice 40 years ago. Freedom is no less threatened, and the opposition is no less totalitarian. In this struggle there's no greater weapon than the truth.

Now, of course, I know there's a great deal of discussion about the truth, as if there are degrees to truth. Well, no, truth can be told -- I remember my first experience, because more than 40 years ago, I was a pioneer in radio, a sports announcer, and I found myself broadcasting major league baseball games from telegraphed reports. I was not at the stadium. And a man on the other side of a window with headphones on and a typewriter would hear the dot and dash of the Morse code and type out and slip under the window. And knowing that there were six or seven other fellows broadcasting the same game -- they did it that way in those days; you could take your choice of who you wanted to listen to -- you had to keep right up with the play, even though you weren't there. So you'd get a little slip and it would say, ``Out. Six to three.'' Well now, number six on a team is the shortstop -- not on his bat; that's the numbered position. Number three is first base, so you knew that had to be a ground ball to the shortstop.

Also, I should say, in those days of radio -- my goodness, they're long-gone -- when you had a sound-effects man in the studio and he had a wheeled cart, and on it he had every kind of device in the world for your radio dramas, from coconut shells that he beat on his chest to be a galloping horse -- [laughter] -- to cellophane he could crumple for a fire, and everything.

Well, we're justifiably proud that unlike Soviet broadcasts, the Voice of America is not only committed to telling its country's story, but also remains faithful to those standards of journalism that will not compromise the truth.

Recently, we celebrated the 250th birthday of George Washington. He understood the power of truth and its relationship to freedom. ``The truth will ultimately prevail,'' he said, ``where there are pains to bring it to light.'' Today we have this responsibility: bringing truth to light in a world groping in the darkness of repression and lies. Let us rededicate ourselves to the task ahead, and like the Founding Father, we can be confident that truth will prevail. And if truth prevails, freedom shall not perish from this Earth.

Mr. Conkling. Mr. President, we'd like to ask you to stay for another moment. It's probably not the appropriate time to discuss our budgets with you -- [laughter] -- but we do have a great deal of antiquated equipment, and we need to do something about it.

The decade of the 1970's will long be remembered as a period of rampant inflation -- the worst inflation in our peacetime history. Inflation not only exacted a cruel toll on the incomes of the American people but also was at the heart of much of the stagnation that we experienced.

Since President Reagan came into office and set forward new economic policies, the Nation has made considerable headway against this threat. In January of 1981, the annual year-over-year inflation stood at 11.7 percent. With today's news, we can see that the annual inflation rate has been reduced to 8.4 percent -- a cut of fully one-third.

It is anticipated that in coming months, there could be some volatility in these numbers. We should expect to see some months when inflation will be higher than in January. But the important message is that over the long haul, inflation is coming down, and that is very good news, indeed.

Today the United States completed its arrangement on November 24, 1981, to procure 1.6 million tons of Jamaica bauxite for the United States strategic stockpile. The agreement, which was signed today by representatives of the United States and Jamaican Government in Jamaica, will benefit both countries as it stimulates the growth of Jamaica's private sector. The United States will receive needed bauxite for our strategic stockpile. Bauxite is the raw material used to produce aluminum, a major element in almost all modern military weapons, such as the F - 15 fighter aircraft and the B - 1 bomber.

Jamaica in return for its bauxite will receive approximately $39 million in needed foreign exchange plus about 7,000 metric tons of nonfat dry milk and 1,900 metric tons of anhydrous milk fat valued at $13 million. These dairy products are part of the agriculture barter aspects of this bauxite procurement, and they represent the first use of agriculture barter to acquire strategic raw material in almost 15 years. The other portions of bauxite will be procured by direct cash payment, as well as exchange with excess stockpile material no longer needed because of the changing requirements of technology. The procurement will be accomplished under current budget allocations.

This program, developed during the first year of the Reagan administration, is directly supportive of United States policy toward the Caribbean Basin announced by the President yesterday. The program also demonstrates that trade programs between the United States and Caribbean countries are mutually beneficial as will be the aid, trade, and investment aspects of the Caribbean Basin Initiative.

Sec. 4. The Administrator of General Services in consultation with the Board shall issue standards and procedures, conduct surveys, and cause surveys to be conducted, to ensure that the real property holdings of Executive agencies shall continually be evaluated with special emphasis on the identification of properties that are not utilized, are underutilized, or are not being put to optimum use. The Administrator shall consult with the Board and appropriate Executive agencies in order to (a) identify real property that is excess or surplus to the needs of the Executive agencies, and (b) make such real property available for its most beneficial use under the various laws of the United States affecting such property.

Sec. 5. The Administrator of General Services shall report to the Board with respect to any property or portion thereof which has not been reported excess to the requirements of the holding agency and which, in the judgment of the Administrator, is not utilized, is underutilized, or is not being put to optimum use, and which he recommends should be reported as excess property.

Sec. 6. Before the Administrator of General Services assigns or conveys property for public benefit discount conveyances, he shall first consult with the Board and consider such guidance as it may provide.

The ability to see is precious. We depend on it for every waking moment. Most of us take this gift of sight for granted until it is threatened by disease or injury. There are, however, many things we can do to protect our eyes and prevent visual loss or impairment.

A very important sight-saving precaution is to have regular eye examinations by an eye care professional. Each year, checkups of this sort alert thousands of Americans to the fact that they have serious eye disease and should consider prompt treatment. For many, immediate attention to the eye problem saves vision that might otherwise be lost forever. This is particularly true for the more than one million people in this country who have diabetes. For years, diabetes has been the leading cause of blindness among middle-aged Americans. Now, however, there is a treatment that can help people with diabetic eye disease retain their vision. If all those who need help for this eye problem were to obtain treatment in time, thousands of cases of blindness could be prevented.

Some of these childhood eye problems cause permanent visual loss if left untreated. Others remain correctable, but a delay in treatment may mean years of needless handicap in both schoolwork and play.

Protecting the eyes from injury is another important way to prevent visual impairment and even blindness. Safety glasses, goggles, or face shields should be worn in hazardous situations at work and while participating in potentially hazardous sports.

We should also remember that thousands blinded by corneal disease or injury could have their vision restored by corneal transplants if people would pledge their eyes at death to their local eye bank as a legacy of sight.

In Witness Whereof, I have herunto set my hand this 25th day of Feb., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

But anyway, I just want to thank you all for all that you've done. And your very presence here and your willingness to be in the overflow room is an indication of why we're going to keep on going until these things we've believed in so many years and fought for from the outside -- we're going to make sure we're on the inside, and we're going to get them, and we're going to accomplish them.

I know we have to go in there so that dinner can continue and we can keep on schedule, but you know, I can't help but be a little -- well, it's a little ironic and I'm a little amused that suddenly our opponents have developed a real conscience about political action committees. [Laughter] I don't remember them being that aroused when the only ones that you knew about were on their side.

Anyone looking at the exciting program you've scheduled over these 4 days, and the size of this gathering here tonight, can't help but be impressed with the energy and vitality of the conservative movement in America. We owe a special debt of gratitude to the staffs of the American Conservative Union, Young Americans for Freedom, Human Events, National Review, for making this year's conference the most successful in the brief but impressive history of this event.

Now, you may remember that when I spoke to you last year, I said the election victory we enjoyed in November of 1980 was not a victory of politics so much as it was a victory of ideas; not a victory for any one man or party, but a victory for a set of principles, principles that had been protected and nourished during years of grim and heartbreaking defeats by a few dedicated Americans. Well, you are those Americans, and I salute you.

I've also come here tonight to remind you of how much remains to be done, and to ask your help in turning into reality even more of our hopes for America and the world. The agenda for this conference is victory, victory in this year's crucial congressional, State, and local elections.

The media coverage that you've received this week, the attention paid to you by so many distinguished Americans in and out of government -- conservative and not so conservative -- are testimony to the sea-change that you've already brought about in American politics. But, despite the glitter of nights like this and the excitement we all still feel at the thought of enacting reforms we were only able to talk about a few years ago, we should always remember that our strength still lies in our faith in the good sense of the American people. And that the climate in Washington is still opposed to those enduring values, those ``permanent things'' that we've always believed in.

But Washington is a place of fads and one-week stories. It's also a company town, and the company's name is government, big government. Now, I have a sneaking suspicion that a few of you just might have agreed when we decided not to ask Congress for higher taxes. And I hope you realize it's going to take more than 402 days to completely change what's been going on for 40 years.

I realized that the other day when I read a story about a private citizen in Louisiana who asked the government for help in developing his property. And he got back a letter that said, ``We have observed that you have not traced the title prior to 1803. Before final approval, it will be necessary that the title be traced previous to that year. Well, the citizen's answer was eloquent.

Now, changing the habits of four decades is, as I say, going to take more than 402 days. But change will come if we conservatives are in this for the long haul, if we owe our first loyalty to the ideas and principles we discussed, debated, developed, and popularized over the years. Last year I pointed to these principles as the real source of our strength as a political movement, and mentioned some of the intellectual giants who fostered and developed them -- men like Frank Meyer, who reminded us that the robust individualism of America was part of deeper currents in Western civilization, currents that dictated respect for the law and the careful preservation of our political traditions.

We must approach the upcoming elections with a forthright and direct message for the American people. We must remind them of the economic catastrophe that we faced on January 20th, 1981: millions out of work, inflation in double digits for 2 years in a row, interest rates hovering at 21\1/2\ percent, productivity and the rate of growth in the gross national product down for the third year in a row, the money supply increasing by 12 percent -- and all this due to one overriding cause: Government was too big and had spent too much money.

In an effort to keep pace, taxes had increased by 220 percent in just 10 years, and we were looking at a tax increase from 1980 to 1984, already passed before we got here, of more than $300 billion. Unless we stop the spending juggernaut and reverse the trend toward even higher taxes, government by 1984 would be taking nearly one-quarter of the gross national product.

Inflation and interest rates, according to several studies, would be heading toward 25 percent -- levels that would stifle enterprise and initiative and plunge the Nation into even deeper economic crisis.

At this point last year, much of the smart money in Washington was betting, as it is today, on the failure of our proposals for restoring the economy, that we could never assemble the votes we needed to get our program for economic recovery through the Congress. But assemble the votes we did. For the first time in nearly 25 years, we slowed the spending juggernaut and got the taxpayers out from under the Federal steamroller. We cut the rate of growth in Federal spending almost in half. We lowered inflation to a single-digit rate, and it's still going down. It was 8.9 percent for all of 1981, but our January figure at an annualized rate is only 3\1/2\ percent.

When they talk of what should be done for the poor, well, one thing alone, by reducing inflation, we increase the purchasing power of poor families by more than $250. We cut taxes for business and individuals and index taxes to inflation. This last step ended once and for all that hidden profit on inflation that had made the Federal bureaucracy America's largest growth industry.

We're cutting the size of the Federal payroll by 75,000 over the next few years and are fighting to dismantle the Department of Energy and the Department of Education, agencies whose policies have frequently been exactly the opposite of what we need for real energy growth and sound education for our children.

Even now, less than 5 months after our program took full effect, we've seen the first signs of recovery. In January, leading economic indicators like housing permits showed an upturn. By 1983 we will begin bringing down the percentage of the gross national product consumed by both the Federal deficit and by Federal spending and taxes.

Western nations shortly after World War II. Many economists then were predicting a return to depression once the stimulus of wartime spending was ended. But people were weary of wartime government controls, and here and in other nations like West Germany, those controls were eliminated against the advice of some experts. At first, there was a period of hardship -- higher unemployment and declining growth. In fact, in 1946, our gross national product dropped 15 percent, but by 1947, the next year, it was holding steady and in 1948 increased by 4 percent.

Unemployment began a steady decline. And in 1949 consumer prices were decreasing. A lot of the experts underestimated the economic growth that occurs once government stops meddling and the people take over. Well, they were wrong then, and they're wrong now.

In the discussion of Federal spending, the time has come to put to rest the sob sister attempts to portray our desire to get government spending under control as a hard-hearted attack on the poor people of America. In the first place, even with the economies that we've proposed, spending for entitlements -- benefits paid directly to individuals -- will actually increase by one-third over the next 5 years. And in 1983 nondefense items will amount to more than 70 percent of total spending.

Now, where do some of these attacks originate? They're coming from the very people whose past policies, all done in the name of compassion, brought us the current recession. Their policies drove up inflation and interest rates, and their policies stifled incentive, creativity, and halted the movement of the poor up the economic ladder. Some of their criticism is perfectly sincere. But let's also understand that some of their criticisms comes from those who have a vested interest in a permanent welfare constituency and in government programs that reinforce the dependency of our people.

Well, I would suggest that no one should have a vested interest in poverty or dependency, that these tragedies must never be looked at as a source of votes for politicians or paychecks for bureaucrats. They are blights on our society that we must work to eliminate, not institutionalize.

Now, there are those who will always require help from the rest of us on a permanent basis, and we'll provide that help. To those with temporary need, we should have programs that are aimed at making them self-sufficient as soon as possible. How can limited government and fiscal restraint be equated with lack of compassion for the poor? How can a tax break that puts a little more money in the weekly paychecks of working people be seen as an attack on the needy?

Since when do we in America believe that our society is made up of two diametrically opposed classes -- one rich, one poor -- both in a permanent state of conflict and neither able to get ahead except at the expense of the other? Since when do we in America accept this alien and discredited theory of social and class warfare? Since when do we in America endorse the politics of envy and division?

When we reformed the welfare system in California and got the cheaters and the undeserving off the welfare rolls, instead of hurting the poor, we were able to increase their benefits by more than 40 percent. By reducing the cost of government, we can continue bringing down inflation, the cruelest of all economic exploitations of the poor and the elderly. And by getting the economy moving again, we can create a vastly expanded job market that will offer the poor a way out of permanent dependency.

So, let's tell the American people the truth tonight and next fall about our economic recovery program. It isn't for one class or group. It's for all Americans -- working people, the truly needy, the rich and the poor.

One man who held this office, a President vastly underrated by history, Calvin Coolidge, pointed out that a nation that is united in its belief in the work ethic and its desire for commercial success and economic progress is usually a healthy nation, a nation where it is easier to pursue the higher things in life like the development of science, the cultivation of the arts, the exploration of the great truths of religion and higher learning.

In arguing for economy in government, President Coolidge spoke of the burden of excessive government. He said, ``I favor a policy of economy, not because I wish to save money, but because I wish to save people. The men and women of this country who toil are the ones who bear the cost of the government. Every dollar that we carelessly waste means that their life will be so much [the] more meager. Every dollar that we save means that their life will be so much the more abundant. Economy is idealism in its most practical form.'' And this is the message we conservatives can bring to the American people about our economic program. Higher productivity, a larger gross national product, a healthy Dow Jones average -- they are our goals and are worthy ones.

But our real concerns are not statistical goals or material gain. We want to expand personal freedom, to renew the American dream for every American. We seek to restore opportunity and reward, to value again personal achievement and individual excellence. We seek to rely on the ingenuity and energy of the American people to better their own lives and those of millions of others around the world.

We can be proud of the fact that a conservative administration has pursued these goals by confronting the Nation's economic problems head-on. At the same time, we dealt with one other less publicized but equally grave problem: the serious state of disrepair in our national defenses.

The last Democratic administration had increased real defense spending at a rate of 3.3 percent a year. You know how much inflation was, so they were actually losing ground. By 1980 we had fighter planes that couldn't fly, Navy ships that couldn't leave port, a Rapid Deployment Force that was neither rapid nor deployable and not much of a force.

There are other matters on the political agenda for this coming year, matters I know that you've been discussing during the course of this conference. I hope one of them will be our attempt to give government back to the people. One hundred and thirty-two Federal grants-in-aid in 1960 have grown to over 500 in 1981. Our federalism proposal, as Mickey Edwards told you, would return the bulk of these programs to State and local governments, where they can be made more responsive to the people.

We've talked a long time about revitalizing our system of federalism. Now, with a single, bold stroke, we can restore the vigor and health of our State and local governments. This proposal lies at the heart of our legislative agenda for the next year, and we'll need your active support in getting it passed.

There are other issues before us. This administration is unalterably opposed to the forced busing of schoolchildren, just as we also support constitutional protection for the right of prayer in our schools. And there is the matter of abortion. We must with calmness and resolve help the vast majority of our fellow Americans understand that the more than 1\1/2\ million abortions performed in America in 1980 amount to a great moral evil, an assault on the sacredness of human life.

This administration has moved in its appointments to the Federal bench and in its legislative proposals for bail and parole reform to assist in the battle against the lawless. But we must always remember that our legal system does not need reform so much as it needs transformation. And this cannot occur at just the Federal level. It can really occur only when society as a whole acknowledges principles that lie at the heart of modern conservatism. Right and wrong matters, individuals are responsible for their actions. Society has a right to be protected from those who prey on the innocent.

This then is the political agenda before us. Perhaps more than any group, your grassroots leadership, your candidate recruitment and training programs, your long years of hard work and dedication have brought us to this point and made this agenda possible.

We live today in a time of climactic struggle for the human spirit, a time that will tell whether the great civilized ideas of individual liberty, representative government, and the rule of law under God will perish or endure.

Whittaker Chambers, who sought idealism in communism and found only disillusionment, wrote very movingly of his moment of awakening. It was at breakfast, and he was looking at the delicate ear of his tiny baby daughter, and he said that, suddenly, looking at that, he knew that couldn't just be an accident of nature. He said, while he didn't realize it at the time, he knows now that in that moment God had touched his forehead with his finger.

I'm sure it has been for many of you. But nostalgia isn't enough. The challenge is now. It's time we stopped looking backward at how we got here. We must ask ourselves tonight how we can forge and wield a popular majority from one end of this country to the other, a majority united on basic, positive goals with a platform broad enough and deep enough to endure long into the future, far beyond the lifespan of any single issue or personality.

We must reach out and appeal to the patriotic and fundamental ideals of average Americans who do not consider themselves ``movement'' people, but who respond to the same American ideals that we do. I'm not talking about some vague notion of an abstract, amorphous American mainstream. I'm talking about ``Main Street'' Americans in their millions. They come in all sizes, shapes and colors -- blue-collar workers, blacks, Hispanics, shopkeepers, scholars, service people, housewives, and professional men and women. They are the backbone of America, and we can't move America without moving their hearts and minds as well.

Fellow Americans, our duty is before us tonight. Let us go forward, determined to serve selflessly a vision of man with God, government for people, and humanity at peace. For it is now our task to tend and preserve, through the darkest and coldest nights, that ``sacred fire of liberty'' that President Washington spoke of two centuries ago, a fire that tonight remains a beacon to all the oppressed of the world, shining forth from this kindly, pleasant, greening land we call America.

American women of every race, creed and ethnic background helped found and build our Nation in countless recorded and unrecorded ways. As pioneers, teachers, mothers, homemakers, soldiers, nurses and laborers, women played and continue to play a vital role in American economic, cultural and social life. In science, business, medicine, law, the arts and the home, women have made significant contributions to the growth and development of our land. Their diverse service is among America's most precious gifts.

As leaders in public affairs, American women not only worked to secure their own rights of suffrage and equal opportunity but also were principal advocates in the abolitionist, temperance, mental health reform, industrial labor and social reform movements, as well as the modern civil rights movement. Their dedication and commitment heightened awareness of our society's needs and accelerated our common efforts to meet those needs.

As volunteers, women have provided invaluable service and leadership in American charitable, philanthropic and cultural endeavors. And, as mothers and homemakers, they remain instrumental in preserving the cornerstone of our Nation's strength -- the family.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 26th. day of Feb in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

As you convene for the first time today, the Nation will be watching with great interest the work and progress of the National Commission on Social Security Reform. As I wrote to you at the time you agreed to serve, I can think of no more important domestic problem requiring resolution than restoring the integrity of Social Security and to do so without penalty to those dependent on the programs.

Every American, of every age, has an important stake in the success of your work. Each of you comes to this Commission from a position in government or the private sector through which you can make possible the successful implementation of a truly bipartisan solution to this great national problem.

This Commission is the product of the leadership of both parties of both houses of the Congress as much as it is mine. Therefore, on behalf of all Americans I wish you success as you begin your deliberations.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 27th day of Feb., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Shanghai Communique. In the ensuing decade, and particularly since the establishment of full diplomatic relations between the two countries on January 1, 1979, our relations with your government and people have greatly expanded, and our contacts have embraced almost all areas of human endeavor.

Our bilateral ties now encompass trade, banking, maritime affairs, civil aviation, agriculture, educational and scientific exchange, technology transfer and many other fields. Well over one-hundred thousand Americans and Chinese now flow back and forth between the two countries each year, and our relations continue to develop through both people-to-people and diplomatic channels.

As we enter the second decade since the issuance of the Shanghai Communique, our desire is to build an even stronger bilateral and strategic framework for long term friendship between our two nations. It is appropriate for me, at this time, to reaffirm the positions agreed to by both sides in the Shanghai Communique and the Joint Communique on the Establishment of Diplomatic Relations between the United States of America and the People's Republic of China and to declare my government's willingness to work with our counterparts in Beijing to overcome differences and deepen U.S.-China ties.

On the occasion of the tenth anniversary of the issuance of the Joint Communique in Shanghai by the People's Republic of China and the United States of America, I wish to extend, on behalf of the Chinese Government and people and in my own name, our cordial regards and good wishes to Your Excellency and the government and people of the United States.

The Joint Communique issued by China and the United States a decade ago was a historic document, which started the process of normalization of relations between China and the United States and subsequently led to the establishment of diplomatic relations between them. During this period, our two sides have had extensive contacts and exchanges in many fields, thus enhancing the understanding between the governments and deepening the friendship between the peoples.

Both the Chinese and American peoples hope that Sino-U.S. relations will continue to move ahead in the years to come. I believe that these relations will continue to develop so long as both governments adhere to the principles jointly established in the Shanghai Communique and the Communique on the Establishment of Sino-U.S. Diplomatic Relations and overcome the obstacles currently existing in the relations between the two countries. The Chinese Government is willing to make efforts together with the U.S. Government towards this end.

And I know yesterday morning in a conversation we had, he raised some points about the need for job training and some things of that kind, and we were able to point out to him that we would be very happy to talk with him about that after he's read what was already in our budget proposal.

The President. I think you always -- [inaudible] -- sit down and see where you can come together on something that will be beneficial to the people. We think that he will be pleasantly surprised when he sees the direction we've taken on the budget -- [inaudible].

The President. Well, we think that it is far more important to stress the idea of training, because we think there are a lot of people unemployed today at a time when there are jobs available. The increase in the advertising of employers seeking workers in all of the metropolitan papers in the country indicates that.

The President. Well, I think some of them are thinking more in terms of the public work types of jobs, and that is not going to restore the economy and get the wheels turning again, which has to be the long-time answer to the problem.

Now, let me make plain, this doesn't mean that there aren't tasks that need doing. Evidence of that was our own passage or request for the 5-cent tax to rebuild the deteriorating highway and bridge system in this country.

Mr. Boyd. You've had people in your own party such as Baker and Michel raising a possibility that you'll have to cut defense a little bit more than you've been willing to do. Can you go along with that?

The President. No, and I think if they will -- if everyone will hold their fire until they understand the situation, they'll see that we voluntarily have been making some reductions based on management improvements, the reduction of inflation, so that the original plan that we submitted in 1981, the 5-year buildup, has been reduced already by some $58 billion. And the bulk of that was voluntary reduction by the Defense Department.

The President. Well, I'm going to have to fight back, because, first of all, the bulk of the defense budget is for personnel and readiness. We have men and women in uniform in our volunteer military that a couple of years ago, it was a disgrace. We were acting as if we were still in a war and they were draftees. Those with families found themselves eligible for welfare.

Now we have increased the pay for those people to something comparable with what they're doing. And yet even here, in this budget, we're asking them to make a sacrifice and not take a cost-of-living pay raise, as we're asking the civilian employees. And I regret that very much, that we have to do that, because we're just getting them up to something that is fair, at least.

Now, that leaves, if they're going to cut, they're going to have to cut in weapons systems, and these are the least of the spending. You will get very little savings in proportion to the deficit we're trying to hold down if you wiped out all the vehicles and all the airplanes and even the reserve ammunition that we're seeking to buy, to say nothing of ships and planes.

Mr. Boyd. There are some people who say, on the deficit issue, that you have intentionally been rather overly cautious and that you expect a much rosier picture down the road, and therefore you won't have as high deficits. Is that true?

The President. Well, what we're trying to do -- because we don't want to get engaged in a debate up on the Hill that we're -- as is sometimes in the past they've tried to do -- their saying that we were coming up with rosy estimates. And to get in that argument, what we have to look at is that among all the experts, all those who project economic estimates, there is a wide range of difference. Now, you can't say some are more expert than others; so you have to say there's real leeway in there.

So, we've looked at what the most pessimistic say about the recovery, what the most optimistic say. And then we have tried to come down at a point that is neither at the bottom or at the top, but that recognizes what might be, based on history, a fair assumption of where it will turn out.

The President. I actually think that we are being conservative and being modest with -- I happen to be an optimist, and I believe that some of the signs, the indications, the fact that there is a stored-up market out there with just one figure, has to do with where we're visiting today.

A few years ago, the average length of time that people drove an automobile before they bought a new one was a little over 3 years. Today the average age of the automobiles on the road is 7 years. That indicates to me that there may be more of a backed-up market that has been delayed by the high interest rates and all that, when they can and do start buying.

The President. I think the recovery has begun -- and I have to put it that way. We've had 9 months now in which, out of the 8 of those 9 months, all the economic indicators are up. But I think the key still lies in further reduction of the interest rates.

The President. Well, I think -- let me put it this way: Just being an optimist, I'll stick with our assumption. But I personally have a -- well, let's call it a hope that it may be a firmer recovery than is estimated.

Legal Services Corporation. And you have people on the Board of Directors who have been charging the public for some fees that raise questions. How do you feel in general about the Legal Services Corporation?

The President. Well, I'm glad you asked that, because, first of all, these totally false charges that would indicate that someone is doing wrong or taking the Government ignored the fact that the commission, under the law, is paid on a consultant basis on the hours they put in. And our commission just happened to put in more hours than the previous one, because we did want some reforms in that legal system. Also, the Congress had raised the hourly rate, and that was before we got on the scene.

They were created to make necessary legal services available to people who might have a grievance that required legal redress but couldn't afford a lawyer. We found that more -- they weren't doing that, the Legal Services Corporation, as much as they were seeming to drum up class-action suits against the Government and, in other words, try to use their organization to legislate reforms. And this -- this at the expense of those individuals who had some legitimate legal claim and needed legal help in pursuing it.

Mr. Boyd. Well, there are a lot of people who say that if you're really serious about it, the thing to do is just to call for a summit with Mr. Andropov without any kind of conditions, sit down and try to work it out. Is that out of the question?

The President. No, but a summit takes a lot of organization. You don't just say, ``Hey, let's sit down and talk about things.'' You look at the history of past summits, and you see that great time has been spent on arriving at what would be a practical agenda. And now we have three teams in Geneva negotiating arms reductions and this all at our instigation. And suddenly there is a propaganda campaign that seems to be aimed at posing them as the people who want peace, and that there's somehow something wrong in our proposals.

The President. Well, I just called attention to what I had said a year ago November when I proposed that we start with the intermediate weapons now aimed at Europe, and to see whether we couldn't arrive at a zero base where they with their, well, more than a thousand warheads targeted on Western Europe. Western Europe with no deterrent to prevent their using them had asked for us to provide a deterrent missile system. We had agreed. And I said that it seemed more logical to me that, if they would destroy their missiles, we wouldn't install ours. And Western Europe and Russia would be free of that nuclear threat.

The President. We've been in constant communication with them; you know, we're not silent with each other. And, no, I have announced principle, I support a summit meeting. I don't want, however, something to take away from this legitimate negotiation that's going on to reduce weapons. That's why I said there's going to be a fine place for me to have a meeting with Mr.

The President. No. We discussed, very openly, this, and whatever information we had for each other on the situation, we exchanged it. And he, too, believes that the beginning step must be, as we've said, the removal of the foreign forces from Lebanon.

Mr. Boyd. One local prerogative, local question. There are some people out in a community called Times Beach that's had a dioxin problem and have been wondering if you would drop by to visit. You're going to Fenton, which is near Times Beach. You're not going by?

The President. Well, we're giving full consideration to their problem out there. And we have been working very closely with the Governor and others. And we have been putting together a kind of a community program, and I think that that will be finalized within the next several days.

It is a complicated problem. We have increased greatly the number of laboratories to -- we've completed the job of taking the samples, more than 300 samples from homes, from the area, from fields and so forth. And we've increased the number of laboratories working to see exactly what the problem is and how real is the threat.

The President. Well, I don't know, now. How do you visit when the real thing is you're telling the people to stay away until we know whether it's dangerous or not? And we have provided housing away from there for several hundred families.

I know that Chrysler employees here in Fenton have had a rough time the last few years. But I want you to know that -- and I really mean it -- America is on the mend, and both the economy and Chrysler are on the comeback trail.

Thank heaven I can say those words that autoworkers love to hear, which is auto sales are up, and that's having its effect. Now, Lee has told me that 1,700 of your fellow autoworkers are being called back to their jobs when a second shift begins in July; 1,500 more will be coming back when plant two resumes operation in the summer. And, all in all, as he told you, Chrysler is investing $150 million to get these two facilities working again.

The other auto companies are beginning to feel the recovery as well. You won't mind my mentioning them. Ford Hazelwood plant is bringing on another shift, and so is that other little company, General Motors -- [laughter] -- and they're calling back some employees.

An economic recovery is something like a seedling. For awhile it grows underground, and you don't see it above ground, and then it shoots up and seeds sprouting all over the place. And that's what we're starting to see around the Nation right now, the shoots of an economic recovery are beginning to push up through the recession with its attending unemployment.

It's no accident that the leading economic indicators are up for 8 of the last 9 months. What we've been trying to do hasn't been too well understood by some, or maybe there's others that didn't want to admit it, but we want to lay a solid foundation for long-term growth. We want an economic base so that you won't have to go through the pain again that you've experienced. And I believe that we've laid that kind of a foundation.

Remember what an enemy inflation used to be? It was murderous. Well, inflation has been brought down from 12.4 percent 2 years ago to 3.9 percent. And we've taken the lead in reducing the interest rates, which have been poison as far as car sales are concerned. The prime rate was 21\1/2\; it's now down to 11; but that's not low enough. We're going to keep on pushing on that and inflation until they're both down some more.

I know the auto companies and the UAW are doing everything they can to get things turned around as well. I wanted to stop by here today and say that the American people know that the United States -- or the U.S. autoworkers are still the greatest autoworkers in the world, bar none.

State government of Missouri. And that's the way it should be also, that government shouldn't be a heavy hand in your pocket and holding you down. It should be cooperating and helping to let private enterprise do the job that it can do in keeping people at work. With your help and Chrysler's help and the help of so many other hard-working people and companies, we're going to get this economy humming like one of those Chrysler engines I saw you just stuffing in the body back there.

I know there's been a lot of misunderstanding, and I know that many of you have been told a lot of things about what we're supposed to be doing or not doing. Very simply, my idea of what the Federal Government should be doing is reducing the cost of government to the lowest practical point at which you can leave the most of your earnings in your pocket that is possible and still do and fill the responsibilities of government. And with that, to stop this inflation binge, which has been the longest continued worldwide inflation the world has ever known -- and that has been the cause of the high interest rates -- bring them down, reduce the regulations and restrictions that have been hampering business and adding to the cost of the product, make us once again competitive in the world market.

Note: The President spoke at 11:55 a.m. in the assembly plant. Prior to his remarks, he was given a tour of the plant. Among those accompanying him on the tour was Lee Iacocca, chairman of Chrysler Corp.

But believe me, I do applaud that picture -- until that moment. It was beautiful. And I would have enjoyed it even more if I wasn't the one who had to follow it with a speech. Those pictures, the words and the music to touch our hearts. And I believe they capture a feeling that's very much with us today. The spirit of St. Louis is alive, and that's the spirit that will rebuild America.

It's a great privilege to stand before your group. I've always believed that entrepreneurs are the forgotten heroes of America. In your dreams and in your courage to take great risks rest America's best hopes for more jobs, stronger growth, and a higher standard of living. Two of every three new jobs are created in firms in America with fewer than 100 employees. If we're to remain true to America, we must preserve and enhance the possibility for every small business man and woman to make it big.

Well, we still have a mountain of challenges to surmount, but the evidence of recovery continues to build. Leading economic indicators are up 8 of the 9 last months. Housing starts and permits are up. Real wages are growing. Auto sales are strengthening. Construction contracting is rising.

Unemployment claims are heading down. And there's one more venture capital -- or one more figure, I should say, venture capital. Investments in the development of small businesses have actually reached -- in this time of recession -- record levels in our history.

Sometimes statistics seem mighty impersonal. Well, today I saw a different kind of proof, the kind that warms your heart and gives pause even to the most hardened cynic. I've just come from that Chrysler plant at Fenton, and I can report to you the men and women are back on the job. They're moving cars off the line. They believe this great nation is on her way back to the top, and they're right. General Motors and Ford are calling back workers and creating jobs, too. By some estimates, auto employment here could increase up to 71 percent, here in the St. Louis area, by next August. What a shot in the arm that would be for Missouri's economic growth.

There seems to be a little confusion about a sentence I used in my State of the Union speech last week -- that we, in government, must take the lead in restoring the economy. Some people seemed to think that I was advocating a return to the old ways. I didn't mean anything of the kind.

We have a plan for America's future. It isn't easy, and it isn't quick. But it will work, because it's designed to attack problems at their roots rather than pretending to legislate them away with still another quick fix.

We had to take the lead in bringing down double-digit inflation by slowing the growth of spending and money growth. Well, we did bring inflation down -- all the way from 12.4 percent to 3.9. And now, we must keep it down.

We had to take the lead in bringing down the interest rates that were wrecking small business, and we have brought them down -- from 21\1/2\ percent to 11 percent. And we're determined to do better. We must do better and get them down further.

We had to reverse the dangerous decline in savings and investment choked off by higher and higher taxes. All personal tax rates are being reduced still 25 -- or another 10 percent. It'll be a total of 25 percent, the first real reduction in nearly 25 -- or 20 years. And this is especially important for small businesses -- which are mainly self-proprietorships -- and for encouraging venture capital.

We're raising the estate tax exemption for family farmers and family businesses to $600,000. Of even greater help, there will no longer be any estate tax for a surviving spouse. And, beginning in 1985, tax rates will be indexed to protect people from being pushed into higher tax brackets when they get cost-of-living pay raises.

Let me say that I will fight any move against the third year of the tax cut or indexing. They must go into effect on schedule. Without that final tax cut, that final installment, Americans will shoulder a higher tax burden than ever before. And repealing indexing -- well, indexing is just a sleight-of-hand -- or, I mean, not indexing is sleight-of-hand, inflation is. Rather than bringing spending down closer to revenues, government simply raised revenues the sneaky way. It used inflation to push every working family in America toward higher and higher tax brackets.

Must the people always do with less so government can spend more? Or should government hold the line so that people can save and America can grow again? We aren't reducing tax rates in 1981 and '82 and '83 just so we can turn around and raise the rates in '84 and '85 and every year after that and do it by way of indexing without anyone having to pass a tax bill.

I say that not indexing, government, has made a profit on inflation. And there is no way that we should permanently leave in place an incentive for government to again stimulate inflation in order to increase its own revenues without having the nerve to pass a tax bill.

Lowering the tax burden is vital to our strategy for lasting growth through greater savings, investment, and production. And that strategy is beginning to work. Those who would destroy the incentives to reduce projected deficits will instead sabotage recovery and make deficits much worse.

So again, we in government must take the lead with a genuine recovery budget. First, we believe that Federal spending in 1984, overall, should increase no more than the rate of inflation. Our budget includes the 6-month freeze and the cost-of-living adjustments recommended by the bipartisan Social Security Commission. We are also requesting a spending freeze on many Federal programs, including a 1-year freeze on Federal pay and pensions.

I hated a little bit to do that with regard to the military, because they for so long have been on a starvation diet, and we finally were just getting their pay scale up somewhat commensurate with what our men and women in uniform should get. But the other day on television, I saw a sergeant over at Ft. Myers. They caught him out there on the grounds and asked him how he felt about having his pay frozen. And he said, ``Well, I'd like, like anyone, I'd like to get a pay raise.'' But then he said, ``If the Commander in Chief says that that's necessary to make our country better, I'm for the pay freeze.'' Having access to a few phone numbers, I couldn't help but call him and tell him how grateful I was and how proud I was to have him in uniform.

Well, many of the people who pay the government's bills have already endured tremendous hardships themselves. And that's why I feel that we can ask others and those in government to sacrifice, too. People who work in the world of risk have no guarantee of profits, income, cost-of-living pay raises, or indexed pensions, let alone a job. Yet, they're the ones who must produce the abundance to fund the government programs which keep America strong and assist those in need.

Second, you've all heard that much of Federal spending is uncontrollable. These are the automatic spending programs, the so-called entitlements. They have a built-in cost increase. Well, in our budget, we propose basic structural reforms in those programs. We will insist on fairness. Those in genuine need will be protected. But if we receive bipartisan support, what used to be out of control will be finally brought under control.

Third, we're adjusting our program to restore America's defenses by proposing $55 billion in defense savings over the next 5 years. I share the desire for defense savings, and I'll continue to seek them. But our Armed Forces were neglected for more than a decade, while the Soviets forged ahead with the most massive military buildup in history. We cannot negotiate strategic arms reductions -- which we're trying to do -- with only trust and good will.

Finally, our budget does propose a standby tax that would not start until 1986, but would only start if the Congress had already passed our spending and budget control program, and only if the deficit still exceeded 2\1/2\ percent of gross national product, and only if recovery from the recession was fully underway. Now, I personally believe that economic recovery will make this standby tax unnecessary. In the meantime, this is our way of protecting the tax cuts and indexing that we've won for the American people. And I think it will reassure many of those out in the money markets today that we do mean to control inflation and interest rates.

The Export Trading Company Act of 1982 will increase U.S. exports and jobs by encouraging the formation of export trading companies to serve as intermediaries for businesses in the international marketplace. It's time to start increasing American exports and to stop exporting American jobs.

Federal research and development budget. This will allow small business to participate more fully in research efforts for our nation's future. For example, during the current fiscal year, this program will direct some $40 million to $50 million to small, high-technology firms for innovative research and development. By 1987, the program will provide nearly half a billion dollars to small business entrepreneurs for high technology, new products, new ideas, and new jobs.

The private sector is providing strong leadership here in St. Louis. I understand that Monsanto is giving the single, largest corporate grant to any university ever for high-tech research and development, about $25 million to Washington University here in your city.

To strengthen our firms, to compete more effectively, to better mobilize the tools and resources of science and technology, we are creating a nonpartisan commission on industrial competitiveness to make specific policy recommendations. So, I'd like to ask you today, please, lend us your wisdom and all the time you can spare, that you have to spare, and we'll make good use of that time and your ideas.

We're a society that's in transition. Those who are hurting need help. We'll provide it. Yet, we must keep our eyes on the future and step up our efforts to train today's work force for tomorrow's world. We want America to remain in the forefront of the technological revolution.

We're submitting to the Congress the Employment Act of 1983, designed to get at the special problems of the long-term unemployed. We'll propose extending unemployment benefits with special incentives to employers who hire the long-term unemployed and young people seeking summer jobs.

One of my great regrets last year was our inability to get our enterprise zones proposal passed by the Congress. And we'll be pressing hard for it this year. Your fine Governor, Kit Bond, he didn't wait. He helped Missouri become one of the 11 States to pass its own enterprise zones proposal.

States, led by Missouri, have become active partners in this program. It's been estimated that this effort could result in billions of dollars for community development and the creation of thousands of new jobs, as Federal, State, and private resources are brought together.

We're a country with great problems. But we can solve those problems because we're a good people. From coast to coast, on the job and in the classrooms and laboratories, at new construction sites and in churches and community groups, neighbors are helping neighbors.

With your permission, sir, the first one -- which may be a composite of a good many small businessmen here: With the budget deficit projections of a couple hundred billion for this year, $188 billion for next year, and the subsequent competition for the funds for the Federal Government, what kind of help, if any, can you offer small business for access to what's going to be left in that available capital pool for their own expansion, their own inventory -- anything at all?

The President. Well, for one thing, let me say that, already, the increased rate of personal savings has increased the amount of capital, private capital, in the capital pool which should, to some extent, offset government's increased borrowing.

I wish I could give more of an answer than that for these next 2 years, but we do know that we're pretty much bound in by these two deficits. The recession is certainly responsible for probably half of those deficits, and a large part of them then is the thing that I mentioned -- the structural problems, the built-in, unreducible things but which we're starting to reduce.

I can tell you that our projections call for, as we get beyond '84, for a decline and a rather steep decline in the deficits on out through 1988 that would take it considerably down and leave that capital pool available there. And I think with this next tax increase, what we're -- tax cut, what we have already seen in the increase in personal savings rate, which has amounted to billions of dollars, tens of billions of dollars, will further increase that so that government won't have a monopoly on that available capital.

United States of America. The question we have for you is three parts, basically. One, is there anything that you can do to help the small businessmen recover on a short-term basis from the double whammy of both the flood and the dioxin -- the contamination situation in the Times Beach area? Two, would you be willing to allow a delegation from Times Beach to speak with you on the long-term solution to the terrible problem we have in Times Beach? And, three, would you be willing to appoint a citizen from Times Beach to your special task force to deal with the Times Beach situation?

Let me just say about that that we are, as you know -- and in response to your Governor's request, we have named -- out of all the bureaus and agencies that could be involved to get by some bureaucratic entanglements -- we've named one man in charge of the Federal effort and working with the people of the State and the local level there. We have finished taking the samples, which we had to do with regard to the possibility of dioxin, one of the most toxic matters that we know of. We've taken those samples. We have tripled, now, the number of laboratories that are now running the tests to make sure if there is a threat, and the extent of the threat both in homes and in the area, in the open spaces and so forth of that area.

I know what it did to your business with regard to having to close that area and put up the barricades, but I don't think -- until we know the threat from that dioxin -- I don't think we could have done anything other and been responsible in our action if we had not said that people must avoid that until we know what the effect can be.

With regard to small business and others, having declared that an emergency area, as we did -- again, at your Governor's request -- that makes small business there available for Small Business Administration loans at the considerably lower rate of interest.

And we'll do what we can. We're housing about 80 percent of the people. They were the only ones who requested it. Some others have either returned to their homes or are living with friends or relatives. We're doing everything we can. And the community cooperative project that has been in the planning -- we are expecting that to be completed 4 days from now, on February 5th. And we're expecting, also, to be hearing the results of the other problems I mentioned before the month is out. We're working as fast as we can on that.

Q. I'm Bill Schierholz of Chemtech, here in St. Louis. Mr. President, may I express our appreciation for your diligence and perseverance in bringing to final passage the 5-cent Federal excise tax on motor fuel? And may I tell you that here in Missouri, we're already putting it to good use. In expectation of these added funds, last Friday bids were received for about $45 million in construction work on highways and bridges, and like amounts will be committed this month of February and next month in March. And very shortly, many of our citizens will be back at work on these important construction projects. And shortly after that, those of us who use the highways will be benefiting from the improvements which were much needed. The attractive feature of this whole thing was that it was a user fee, and funds are provided by users.

Now, a moment ago you referred to the concern for the Federal deficit. And many of us are terribly concerned about that. We also want to protect your position on the tax decreases. But I wonder if any consideration is being given to other user fees which will, in part, offset Federal expenditures?

The President. I can't tell you that there's, right now, any plan for anything of that kind. I know there was a great deal of talk and criticism that the 5-cent gas tax -- that I had gone on record as saying it would take a palace coup before I would approve such a tax. I did say that. But I said it in answer to a question back at a time where they were talking about using it simply to raise general revenues.

Just a few weeks ago in Illinois, a group of roadbuilders met with me and gave me a hardhat -- which I expect to use in my dealings with Congress this session. [Laughter] But they were saying the same thing you are about how many jobs, already, are in the works because of this program.

I would have to look. I do not know how far we can go in that without offsetting the incentive feature of the tax cuts, because when you're in a recession, there is no question but that more money to the people in the private sector is a necessary incentive. So, I would have to review any further ones as against -- the need, against what they might do to reducing those incentives.

Q. Mr. President, given the scenario that we have a nation on the mend and that we also have very high national deficits, do you feel as we move into 1984 that we'll be able to maintain the same relatively low level of inflation and low interest rates that we have today?

The President. Yes, I do. I think the only thing that's keeping interest rates up today is fear. Those in the lending market know that they have to get back enough in interest to offset the depreciated value of the dollar, which is inflation. And they're watching us very closely to see if we are going to stay the course or if we're going to go back to that era of quick fixes that always resulted in more inflation and then interest rates following them up. This is particularly true of long-term lending.

Just one last factor, also, as to why I don't believe that it's necessary, as we begin to return prosperity, for inflation to go up, is when you've got a full third of the industrial capacity of the Nation idle -- that much capacity -- it's difficult to see how suddenly a demand on the part of consumers for more goods and products could, thus, by supply and demand, cause inflation and cause prices to go up. We've got a long way to go before we reach full capacity of industry.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Jim Walsh, the vice president of Jefferson Savings and Loan. And during your State of the Union message last week, you indicated that you would resist any of the efforts of Congress to abolish the 10-percent withholding law that is going to come into effect July the 4th. How do you, or how can you choose to oppose the wishes of 90 million Americans who are small business people and small savers?

And they think that it is a way of taxing people on their savings and so forth. But what we have discovered is that one of the largest areas of avoidance of tax is in that field, that this has been the biggest loophole whereby people just simply do not pay a tax they legitimately owe. It's virtually impossible, even in a computerized age, for the Treasury Department, bureau of internal revenue, to be able to track this down. So, we passed this.

But I would like to call to your attention that there is a very definite level above which that withholding will take place, and that for most of the people, and certainly most of our retired people who are dependent on savings and the income from them, there is no withholding. We put it at quite a high level. But it was done for that reason alone, that there definitely is a large amount of tax that is owed to the government that is not now being paid.

The President. Thank you very much. Thank you. That was one of the best questions I've ever had to not answer. [Laughter] But since that wasn't a question, and since we started on that side, I think it's only fair that we make it even and we finish with one over here.

Company, here in downtown St. Louis. On Sunday evening, right in this very auditorium, the automobile dealers of Greater St. Louis completed a 5-day show, where we set new attendance records for this convention center at 180,000 -- people who paid an average of two and a half dollars to see our automobiles. Four hundred cars were displayed, and over 160 were sold right from the floor here.

However, on another subject, aside from merchandizing Cadillac cars, I am a worker in the pro-life, anti-abortion movement. I can assure you that many citizens voted for you in the last election only because of your pro-life position. Can we now count on you to use your tremendous powers of persuasion to unite our pro-life Members of Congress behind legislation that will stop the killing of the unborn?

I realize this is highly controversial. I realize that there are people who sincerely and honestly believe that it is an unwarranted intrusion into the privacy and the right of choice of women who may choose to go that way. But I have to feel that until and unless someone can prove beyond shadow of a doubt that the unborn child is not a living human being, then we have to opt in favor that it is alive, and it is killing to do what is being done today. And that we only condone in self-defense.

But again, I just want to say to you, I think I'm going home more rewarded than you, because being out there in that plant and meeting the workers today, seeing what's going on, hearing things like these first few words there about what happened here with the increase in sales and all, and seeing all of you, I'm going back to Washington convinced more than ever that there isn't anything the people of this country can't do when the people get together and decide it needs to be done.

Prior to the luncheon, the President attended a reception at the convention center for head table guests. The reception and luncheon were part of the first small business forum sponsored by the association, a private sector organization that periodically sponsors luncheons and seminars to discuss the problems of area businesses.

Two years ago, I came to Washington with a deep personal commitment to change America's economic future. For more than a decade, the economy had suffered from low productivity growth and a rising rate of inflation. Government spending absorbed an increasing share of national income. A shortsighted view of economic priorities was destroying our prospects for long-term prosperity.

The economic program that I proposed shortly after I took office emphasized economic growth and a return to price stability. My tax proposals were designed to encourage private initiative and to stimulate saving and productive investment. I have supported and encouraged the Federal Reserve Board in its pursuit of price stability through sound monetary policy. My Administration has slowed the growth of Federal regulation, strengthening the forces of competition in a number of economic sectors. And I have worked with the Congress to enact legislation that has reversed or limited the growth of government programs that have become too large or outlasted their usefulness.

Although the full effect of these changes in government policy will take time to develop, some of the benefits have already become apparent. The rate of consumer price inflation between December 1981 and December 1982 was only 3.9 percent, about one-third of the rate in the year before I took office. Interest rates are now lower than when I took office, and have fallen rapidly during the last 6 months.

The Administration will propose many additional measures over the next several years to strengthen economic incentives, reduce burdensome regulations, increase capital formation, and raise our standard of living. It is easy to lose sight of these long-term goals in a year, like 1982, when the economy was in an extended recession. I am deeply troubled by the current level of unemployment in the United States and by the suffering and anxiety that it entails for millions of Americans. The unemployment that many of our citizens are experiencing is a consequence of the disinflation that must necessarily follow the accelerating inflation of the last decade. Allowing the upward trend of inflation to continue would have risked even greater increases in unemployment in the future. In spite of the present high unemployment rate and the accompanying hardships, it is essential that we maintain the gains against inflation that we have recently achieved at substantial cost. Continuing success in restraining inflation will provide a stronger foundation for economic recovery in 1983 and beyond.

The Federal Government can play an important role in reducing unemployment. I believe, however, that the government should focus its attention on those groups that will continue to face high unemployment rates even after the recovery has begun. By helping them to develop their job-related skills, we will foster productive careers in the private sector rather than dead-end jobs.

Partnership Act that I supported and signed into law in 1982. I am proposing additional steps this year to strengthen Federal training and retraining programs and to help the structurally unemployed find lasting jobs.

Although programs to help the structurally unemployed are important, only a balanced and lasting recovery can achieve a substantial reduction in unemployment. There are now over four million more unemployed people than there were at the peak of the last business cycle. Nine million new workers are expected to join the labor force by 1988. Only a healthy and growing economy can provide the more than 13 million jobs needed to achieve a progressively lower level of unemployment over the next 5 years.

There are now signs that an economic recovery will begin soon. By December 1982 the index of leading economic indicators had risen in 7 of the last 8 months. Housing starts have risen substantially over the last year, and by December 1982 were 39 percent higher than 12 months earlier. Inventory levels have fallen sharply, so that increased sales should translate quickly into increased production and employment. Both long-term and short-term interest rates have fallen substantially. The Administration's economic forecast predicts that the gross national product will begin to rise in the first quarter of 1983 and will then rise more quickly as the year continues.

If the monetary aggregates grow too slowly, the economy will lack the level of financial resources needed for continued economic growth. But if these aggregates are allowed to expand too rapidly, an increase in inflation and a short-lived recovery will result. I recognize the difficulties that the Federal Reserve has faced and will continue to face in guiding the growth of the money supply at a time when major regulatory changes have made it difficult to rely on old guidelines. I expect that in 1983 the Federal Reserve will expand the money supply at a moderate rate consistent with both a sustained recovery and continued progress against inflation.

An economic recovery beginning in 1983 should bring not only a reduction in unemployment but also an increase in business investment over the next several years. A higher level of investment is an important ingredient in raising productivity and economic growth. The Accelerated Cost Recovery System that I proposed and that the Congress enacted in 1981 was designed to encourage a substantial expansion of business investment above the relatively low levels of the 1970s. Since that time the adverse effects of the recession have outweighed the positive effects of the new tax rules. As the economy turns from recession to recovery, however, incentives to invest will become more powerful. But business investment may not grow rapidly unless measures proposed by the Administration to reduce potentially large Federal budget deficits are enacted.

Federal borrowing competes with private investment for available savings. If the government continues to borrow large amounts to finance its deficit, the real interest rate will remain high and discourage private investment. This process of ``crowding out'' will tend to depress private investment in the years ahead unless the budget deficit is progressively reduced.

It is important to distinguish the cyclical part of the budget deficit from the structural part, which would remain even at the peak of the business cycle. Approximately one-half of the 1983 budget deficit is due to the depressed state of the economy. With earnings and profits reduced, tax receipts have significantly decreased, and expenditures have increased. As the economy recovers, the cyclical part of the deficit will shrink. But cyclical recovery alone will not bring the deficit down to an acceptable size.

In the budget I am now submitting to the Congress, I am proposing the dramatic steps needed to reduce Federal budget deficits in future years. My budget proposals are designed to reduce the deficit by dealing directly with the rapid growth of the domestic spending programs (apart from interest payments) of the Federal Government. In 1970 these programs accounted for 10 percent of the gross national product and 48 percent of Federal spending. By 1980 these programs had grown to 14 percent of gross national product and 63 percent of the budget. I remain committed to the idea that we can reduce budget deficits without increasing the burden on the poor, without weakening our national defense, and without destroying economic incentives by counterproductive tax increases.

Such reassurance should hasten the decline in interest rates, especially long-term interest rates on bonds and residential mortgages, and improve prospects for the recovery of the housing, automobile, and capital investment sectors of the economy.

I recognize the special importance of protecting the social security and medicare programs for aged retirees and their dependents. These programs now face very serious financial problems. The bipartisan National Commission on Social Security Reform has recently recommended a series of measures, which I have endorsed, to eliminate the cumulative deficiency of $150 billion to $200 billion projected for the social security system in the years 1983 through 1989. It is critically important at this time to make changes in the social security programs that will protect their solvency and financial viability for the years to come.

For many decades, the Federal Government has regulated the price and entry conditions affecting several sectors of the American economy. Much of this regulation is no longer appropriate to the conditions of the contemporary economy. Over time, most of this regulation -- by restraining competition and the development of new services and technologies -- has not served the interests of either consumers or producers. Since deregulation of some markets began several years ago, the experience has been almost uniformly encouraging. My Administration has supported these step-by-step efforts to reduce these regulations in markets that would otherwise be competitive. It is now time to consider broad measures to eliminate many of these economic regulations especially as they affect the natural gas, transportation, communications, and financial markets.

The very high levels of real interest rates over the last several years are a principal cause of the sharp rise in the exchange value of the dollar relative to foreign currencies. This rise has reduced the ability of American exporters to compete in foreign markets and increased the competitiveness of imports in the domestic market. Largely as a result, the U.S. merchandise trade balance showed a substantial deficit in 1982.

Our current trade deficit is a reminder of the importance of international trade to the American economy. The export share of U.S. gross national product has more than doubled over the last three decades. American workers, businesses, and farmers suffer when foreign governments prevent American products from entering their markets, thus reducing U.S. export levels. While the United States may be forced to respond to the trade distorting practices of foreign governments through the use of strategic measures, such practices do not warrant indiscriminate protectionist actions, such as domestic content rules for automobiles sold in the United States.

Widespread protectionist policies would hurt American consumers by raising prices of the products they buy, and by removing some of the pressures for cost control and quality improvement that result from international competition. Moreover, protectionism at home could hurt the workers, farmers, and firms in the United States that produce goods and services for export, since it would almost inevitably lead to increased protectionism by governments abroad. I am committed to a policy of preventing the enactment of protectionist measures in the United States, and I will continue working to persuade the other nations of the world to eliminate trade distorting practices that threaten the viability of the international trading system upon which world prosperity depends.

Trade in goods and services is only one aspect of our economic relations with the rest of the world. The international flow of capital into the United States and from the United States to other countries is also of great importance. The United States should play a primary role in preserving the vitality of the international capital market. Severe strains on that market developed in 1982 as several nations found it difficult to service their overseas debt obligations. In 1982, the Federal Government worked closely with debtor and creditor nations and the major international lending agencies to prevent a disruption in the functioning of world capital markets. Now, with the cooperation of a wide variety of creditors, countries with especially severe debt-servicing difficulties are establishing economic and financial programs that will permit them to meet their international obligations.

We are now at a critical juncture for the American economy. The recession has led to strong pressures from some members of the Congress and from others to abandon our commitment to a policy that is aimed at long-term economic growth, capital accumulation, and price stability.

American people. Our economy, despite the recession, is extraordinarily resilient and is now on the road to a healthy recovery. It is essential in the year ahead that the Administration and the Congress work together, take a long-term perspective, and pursue economic policies that lead to sustained economic growth and to greater prosperity for all Americans.

Good morning, and please sit down. And thank you very much. I've just had the opportunity to hear from your leaders regarding the future of the Middle East and world Jewry, and I thank you all for coming to the White House today. We're honored to have you. And I want to take a few moments now, if I could, to discuss some thoughts of my own about the critical issues that we face together.

Jews and gentiles alike, to remember the tragedy of Nazi Germany, to recall how a fascist regime conceived in hatred brought a reign of terror and atrocity on the Jewish people and on the world, and to pledge that never again will the decent people of the world permit such a thing to occur.

Americans can be proud, I think, that our government is moving forward to build a memorial in our Nation's Capital to commemorate the Holocaust. Those who perished as a result of Nazi terror, millions of individual men and women and children whose lives were taken so senselessly, must never be forgotten. I'm aware that, in April, American Holocaust survivors and their families will gather in Washington to thank our country for what it has done for them. And this gathering should touch the heart of every American.

You know perhaps better than I that the defeat of the Third Reich did not present a final triumph over bigotry and prejudice. Even today in the free world we hear of swastikas painted on synagogues, of holy books and scrolls desecrated by hoodlums, and of terrorist attacks. We see Jewish schools in Europe forced to employ armed guards to protect children, and many congregations, even in this country, hiring guards to protect worshiping during the High Holy Days. These things bear witness that the fight, even in the free world, is not yet won.

Jews are denied basic rights to study and practice their religion, to secure higher education and good jobs, or to emigrate freely. Heroic men and women like Anatoly Shcharanskiy, who openly proclaim their Jewish pride and desire to emigrate, are subjected to brutal harassment and imprisonment. But, just as Soviet Jews will not forget their own heritage nor abandon hope for freedom, we will not forget them. We will not, as the Western democracies did 4 days [decades] ago, turn a deaf ear to distant pleas for help.

There are those who suggest that a new era of improved East-West relations is possible because the new Soviet leadership shares Western tastes. Well, yes, we're told that Mr. Andropov drinks Scotch and fine French wines, and listens to jazz and rock and roll, and reads Western literature.

Frankly, it doesn't appear to affect Soviet policy in Poland or Afghanistan. But make no mistake, we seek better relations with the Soviet Union. We pray for the day when all Soviet citizens will enjoy basic human liberties, improvement in that area. And the Kremlin knows this would do much better for East-West relations.

My administration has persistently maintained pressure on Soviet authorities to live up to their agreements. Specifically in the CSCE Review Conference, our representative, Max Kampelman, has continued to raise not only the emigration issue but also to challenge those Soviet internal practices which deny Soviet Jews and other citizens as well their basic human rights and violate the letter and spirit of the Helsinki Accords. Secretary Shultz has also discussed these issues with Foreign Minister Gromyko.

Those of us who believe in better relations with the Soviet Union, yet, at the same time, value freedom and human decency, we've made it plain now we want deeds, not rhetoric and repression from the new Soviet leadership. We've had enough of words. There's no better way for them to begin than by releasing the prisoners of conscience in Siberia and restoring Jewish emigration to the levels of the late 1970's. And I might add, they could give us an accounting of one of mankind's true heroes, Raoul Wallenberg.

Since the foundation of the State of Israel, the United States has stood by her and helped her to pursue security, peace, and economic growth. Our friendship is based on historic moral and strategic ties, as well as our shared dedication to democracy. We've had disagreements, as would be expected between friends, even between good friends. Our friendship continues, however, and there should be no doubt that America's commitment to Israel's security remains as it always has been.

Over the last year, our diplomats and marines have been engaged in a campaign for peace and security in the Middle East. As I said last September, we believe that the events of the past year have created new opportunities for peace that must not be lost. The current political fluidity and general desire to break the cycle of terror and war present a special chance to bring peace to this long-troubled region. It's vital to the United States, to Israel, and to all those who yearn for an end to the killing that we not let these current opportunities pass by.

They're based on an historic U.S. commitment to Israelis' security. They reaffirm the Camp David accords, which deem that peace must bring security to Israel and provide for the legitimate rights of the Palestinians.

Resolutions 242 and 338, which produced the region's first meaningful peace treaty, ending the state of war between Egypt and Israel. Israel and Arab leaders must take the necessary risks for peace to take root and bloom if we're to succeed. It is riskier to do nothing, to let this time pass with no tangible sign of progress.

We share with Israel three goals in Lebanon: a speedy withdrawal of all foreign forces, a strong central government for Lebanon with jurisdiction over all its territory, and full and effective guarantees that southern Lebanon will no longer be used as a staging ground for terrorist attacks against Israel. To achieve these goals will require negotiating flexibility by all of the parties.

With respect to the broader peace process, again, great courage and some risk will be required on both sides. Israel must be prepared to engage in serious negotiations over the future of the West Bank and Gaza. As I've stated previously, the most significant action demonstrating Israel's good faith would be a settlements freeze. On the other hand, King Hussein should step forward, ready to negotiate peace directly with Israel.

Each of these steps is independent but related. And for all three, the time to act is now. The fight against anti-Semitism, the struggle for Soviet Jewry, and the search for peace and security in the Middle East require courage, sacrifice, and tenacity from all parties. There are ample excuses for those who do not share our goals or dedication; but if history is the guide, those who see opportunities for peace and pursue them, who see injustice and condemn it, who fight for liberty will in the end prevail.

Note: The President spoke at 10:07 a.m. in the East Room. Prior to his remarks, he met privately in the Oval Office with leaders of several of the organizations represented in the larger East Room meeting.

During this first year we devoted much time and effort to making our participation in the organizations of the United Nations system more effective and to rendering the system more efficient. We have urged the United Nations and its affiliated agencies to slow budget growth, define priorities, upgrade personnel, and purge debate of irrelevant and divisive rhetoric. We have pursued these changes in order to strengthen the United Nations and help it realize its enormous potential for maintaining international peace and security and for contributing to the economic and social betterment of the world's peoples.

Heights; the United Nations General Assembly called for an end to Soviet and Vietnamese aggression in Afghanistan and Kampuchea; and several United Nations organizations and agencies continued their valuable humanitarian and technical work around the world. The year also saw the election of a new United Nations Secretary General, Javier Perez de Cuellar, an experienced and able international diplomat.

Extreme United Nations resolutions on the Middle East and Southern Africa often increased tensions rather than promoted solutions. The General Assembly called for the Government of El Salvador to negotiate with the guerrillas opposing it, discounting in advance the value of elections which proved a resounding success. Resolutions on arms control were often propagandistic and worked against the goal of genuine, balanced, and verifiable arms reductions. The General Assembly approved an unjustifiably large biennial budget in the face of United States opposition.

My Administration will continue to work strenuously and constructively to defend United States interests in the United Nations setting and to make the Organization itself increasingly more responsive to global problems and needs.

History for its dedicated efforts to promote both popular and scholarly interest in American black history. From 1915 forward this organization has served to familiarize our citizens with the outstanding contributions of black Americans. Through its work, we as a nation can more fully perceive the meaning of the events that have shaped our destiny.

The observance of Afro-American (Black) History Month affords all of us a fine opportunity to recognize further and to appreciate the role of black Americans in the development of our nation This annual observance promotes heightened awareness of the significant participation of black citizens in every level and aspect of our national life. It is a time when we transcend past struggles for advancement and gratefully acknowledge our rich and valuable diversity. Our heritage lends strength to the fiber of our country.

Understanding black history is fundamental to a thorough comprehension of the full scope and sweep of the American historical experience. By more fully appreciating America's commitment to freedom and justice, we can avoid the mistakes of the past and fulfill the hopes of the future.

On February 13 of the Western calendar, Chinese, Korean, and Vietnamese Americans welcome the dawn of a new year and rejoice in the promise of a period filled with happiness and good fortune. It is a time to reaffirm hopes and goals and a time to cast away the troubles of the old year -- a time to take pride in what we have accomplished and to look ahead with enthusiasm to all that we will be able to achieve in the months ahead.

According to ancient lore, those born in the Year of the Boar are lucky in all ways and their lives are marked by success. As one born in this auspicious year, I am delighted to join with you in celebrating this very special year, and it is my heartfelt wish that any good fortune that I derive from it will auger well for our country.

Maybe there's a little bit of Charlie in each of us. [Laughter] But somehow I don't think that wanting to go to heaven, but only on our terms, and certainly not with that other bunch, is quite what God had in mind. The prayer that I sometimes think we don't often use enough -- and one that I learned a few years ago and only after I had gotten into the business that I'm in -- is one of asking forgiveness for the resentment and the bitterness that we sometimes feel towards someone, whether it's in business dealings or in government or whatever we're doing, and forgetting that we are brothers and sisters and that each of them is loved equally by God as much as we feel that He loves us.

Now, I am assuming a new position; but I should warn our friends in the loyal opposition, this new job won't require me to leave the White House. With the greatest enthusiasm, I have agreed to serve as honorary chairman for the Year of the Bible.

We face great challenges in this country, but we've faced great challenges before and conquered them. What carried us through was a willingness to seek power and protection from One much greater than ourselves, to turn back to Him and to trust in His mercy. Without His help, America will not go forward.

I know that at times all of us -- I do -- feel that perhaps in our prayers we ask for too much. And then there are those other times when we feel that something isn't important enough to bother God with it. Maybe we should let Him decide those things.

Reporting because of her coverage of the Korean war, among all her writings had an account one day of the Fifth Company of marines who were part of an 18,000-man force that was in combat with a hundred thousand of the enemy. And she described an incident that took place early, just after dawn on a very cold morning. It was 42 degrees below zero. And the weary marines, half frozen stood by their dirty, mud-covered trucks, eating their breakfast from tin cans.

Now I would like to sign a proclamation which will make 1983 the Year of the Bible. And I want to thank Senator Bill Armstrong and Representative Carlos Moorhead and all those inside and outside of Congress who assisted them and made this all possible. Thank you, and God bless you.

Deep religious beliefs stemming from the Old and New Testaments of the Bible inspired many of the early settlers of our country, providing them with the strength, character, convictions, and faith necessary to withstand great hardship and danger in this new and rugged land. These shared beliefs helped forge a sense of common purpose among the widely dispersed colonies -- a sense of community which laid the foundation for the spirit of nationhood that was to develop in later decades.

The Bible and its teachings helped form the basis for the Founding Fathers' abiding belief in the inalienable rights of the individual, rights which they found implicit in the Bible's teachings of the inherent worth and dignity of each individual. This same sense of man patterned the convictions of those who framed the English system of law inherited by our own Nation, as well as the ideals set forth in the Declaration of Independence and the Constitution.

For centuries the Bible's emphasis on compassion and love for our neighbor has inspired institutional and governmental expressions of benevolent outreach such as private charity, the establishment of schools and hospitals, and the abolition of slavery.

Now, Therefore, I, Ronald Reagan, President of the United States of America, in recognition of the contributions and influence of the Bible on our Republic and our people, do hereby proclaim 1983 the Year of the Bible in the United States. I encourage all citizens, each in his or her own way, to reexamine and rediscover its priceless and timeless message.

Diseases of the heart and blood vessels are our Nation's most pressing health problem. Over sixty million Americans are afflicted by one or another of this family of diseases, which cause nearly a million deaths annually, disable many millions of others, and cost the Nation more than $60 billion each year. The leading killers among the cardiovascular diseases are coronary heart disease and stroke.

In 1948 a newly created Federal agency -- now the National Heart, Lung, and Blood Institute -- and a private health organization, the American Heart Association, joined hands to combat the cardiovascular diseases. Their combined efforts were directed toward the conquest of these diseases through prevention, diagnosis, and treatment; through the training of new research workers and clinicians in the cardiovascular field; and through support for community service programs.

Until the mid-1960s mortality from coronary heart disease had continued to increase despite our best efforts; however, in 1965 mortality from heart disease began a steady decline that continues to the present. From 1972 to 1980, mortality rates from coronary heart disease declined by 22.5 percent, and mortality rates from stroke declined by 36.5 percent.

Advances in diagnosis and treatment have been major factors in these reductions. But perhaps equally important, large numbers of Americans have voluntarily modified their habits and lifestyles: many have quit or cut down on cigarette smoking, are watching their weight and blood cholesterol levels, exercising more, and seeking the help of a physician in the control of treatable conditions which increase the risk of premature arteriosclerosis and its consequences.

Though we have made considerable progress in reducing the toll in illness, disability, and death caused by cardiovascular diseases, these diseases continue to be a serious threat to the health and well-being of our citizens. To encourage continued application of what is known about the prevention and relief of cardiovascular diseases and to stimulate the development of new knowledge and techniques that may bring about their ultimate conquest, the Congress has requested that the President annually proclaim February as American Heart Month.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 3rd day of Feb., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

The President will nominate Mrs. von Damm as Ambassador in late spring. Upon her confirmation, the President intends to appoint John S. Herrington as Assistant to the President for Presidential Personnel.

Mrs. von Damm has been associated with President Reagan since his first campaign for Governor in California in 1966. She has served him as Personal Secretary during his two terms as Governor, executive assistant during his business years, and as Northeast regional finance director in the 1980 Presidential campaign. After the election, during the transition period, she served as Associate Director of Personnel. For the first 9 months of the administration, Mrs. von Damm was Personal Secretary and Special Assistant to the President.

California since 1965, where he had a varied law practice, ranging from criminal prosecution with the Ventura County District Attorney's office to corporate and real estate law. He also expanded his interests into real estate development, ranching, restoration of historic buildings, and other investment undertakings. Mr. Herrington moved to Washington, D.C., in January 1981, to become Deputy Assistant to the President and Director of Presidential Personnel.

Republic of Austria. And in the course of our meeting in the Oval Office and our working lunch today, Chancellor Kreisky and I have had the opportunity to discuss two areas of the world that are vital to the maintenance of peace and human dignity -- the Middle East and Poland.

The Chancellor is a man of extensive experience in international affairs. And I'm pleased that I was able, like the seven American Presidents before me, to have the opportunity to exchange views with him. Our bilateral relationship with Austria remains close and cooperative.

And I was also pleased today to be able to tell him and to have his immediate approval of my intention to nominate as our next Ambassador to Austria, Helene von Damm, who has been with our administration from the very beginning.

The relations between the United States and Austria are completely without frictions. They are characterized by long-lasting friendship between the two peoples and by close cooperation between the two governments.

Austria today, at the time when it is prosperous and in a good position, is still grateful for all which has been done during more than 35 years by the United States. And all this has established an unshakable friendship which connects the great democracy of the United States with the small Republic of Austria.

Mr. President, I am extemely grateful to tell you that the Austrian Republic and the Government and the Federal President would be happy to see Mrs. von Damm in Austria as the next Ambassador of the United States.

Today, millions of Americans can take heart. Unemployment has finally started down. This dip in unemployment, coming just after the word of higher retail sales, higher auto sales, is one more sign that America is on the mend. Confidence is returning and with reason. And while we may see some ups and downs on the way to recovery, we're on the move now, and that's our best hope for more productive, lasting jobs.

According to our own, very cautious forecasts, economic recovery will create more than 4\1/2\ million new jobs by the end of 1984. If the Congress cooperates, if it holds the line on spending, we can enjoy strong, sustained growth without triggering a return to the double-digit inflation and soaring interest rates that caused unemployment to rise and nearly destroyed our economy.

The President. No, because, Chris, first of all, the figures that they give are the seasonally adjusted. And most of the time -- I've always questioned and said, you know, ``Explain that to me,'' because most of the time the unadjusted figures show more people employed. But they've used this. But with regard to the military, they gave two sets of figures. They have just started to include the military as employed -- those serving in the United States only. This is only simple justice, because every time someone left the service and didn't have a job, they automatically counted them as unemployed. But they are using two sets of figures. If you include the military, that set of figures is unemployment was only 10.7 and it went down to 10.2 instead of 10.4. So, they're relatively the same.

The President. Well, we're looking at that and have been looking at that. Those are things that are in the budget, in which various agencies and departments and the Veterans Administration have got things that need doing. And what we're looking at is to see if we can accelerate the start of those and move them up. But it wouldn't make any budget change.

Q. Mr. President, would you look with favor on accelerating some of those construction projects even if it meant increasing the budget -- perhaps by okaying construction projects that were scheduled to take place in later years?

The President. Well, we might look at them, but we would look at them always with the idea that our greatest goal must be to hold this line on deficits in order to reassure the money markets out there that we do intend to hold the line and that they can look forward to continued recovery.

The President. I think it is a trend. I do think this: If you look at past recessions, you'll see that there's been a volatility to the unemployment figures. Now, that doesn't mean that they come up higher than the highest point. But, for example, there may be a month where it might level off or come up, say, a little above the 10.4 [percent]. I don't think that you will see it come up above the high mark of 10.8.

Q. Mr. President, earlier this week in St. Louis, you said quite emphatically that there would be no give on the third year of the tax cut and on indexation the following year. Yet, your spokesmen, including the Treasury Secretary, have been hinting in public otherwise, that there might be some give. Which is it going to be?

The President. I think the worst thing in the world we could do -- and particularly with recovery started now -- is to do anything that would smack of a tax increase -- as those would -- and to take away those two parts of the economic program. And I just feel very determined about that.

The President. I haven't heard exactly the remarks, and since I've come back, we haven't had a chance for any conversations about that. Maybe they're trying to indicate what I did in the State of the Union address, that there is a certain flexibility with regard to wanting to have a bipartisan program here to go forward together as we did on the social security program.

Q. Mr. President, with the consensus now on both sides of the aisle up on Capitol Hill, will you commit to some kind of jobs program and will you commit to one that contains what your own people are calling humanitarian aid for the unemployed?

The President. Well, let me point something out they seem to be ignoring. First of all, the basic employment and training program, the act of 1983, is providing $5 billion in job training and so forth for about 3 million Americans. That's in the fiscal '83 year. But there is already $93 billion in the '84 budget for that very fact, for the unemployed, the needy, and so forth. So, we've got quite a big budgeted amount in this and programs and ideas aimed at job training to meet this structural problem, because there are many unemployed people who will not be going back to the same jobs they had. Those jobs will no longer exist. And we're prepared to do something about that.

The President. I had an argument the other day with someone who was talking about the very thing that I was finally able -- when I got a word in -- to say it's in the budget already. And we're certainly going to listen to what is suggested in relation to what is already proposed. And, as I say, we want to go forward in a bipartisan manner.

The President. We certainly are doing everything that we can in that regard. And there are programs that have been in place over the years for that very problem. Those people are automatically eligible for the programs that are in place. And we intend to continue that.

Q. Mr. President, could you give us your own reaction to the half dozen incidents that have occurred between our marines and the Israelis in Lebanon? And could you also respond to this growing feeling that the marines are in there for a longer stay that we initially thought? Some people are now talking about the possibility that the marines may be there for another year.

The multinational forces were put in there at the request of the Lebanese Government, while they tried to establish stability in their own country. And this is evidence of it, the fact that where the multinational forces are carrying out their purpose, these repeated efforts to go through their lines and do what has been agreed that they will not do. And I think our forces are behaving very well.

Q. Sir, I'd like to follow up on that. Did the marine captain do the right thing? Were the Israelis trying to penetrate a place where they should not have? And, I guess more importantly, do we now have assurances from Israel that it won't happen again?

The President. We do have such assurances. And I must say that, yes, the same unit and the same commander had tried three times at this same point. And in my view, the marine officer did the only thing that he could do.

Q. Mr. President, can you tell us, with the trucking strike having increased violence, whether you agree with Senator McClure who now wants to repeal the user fees that would go into effect in '84 and '85 and that have upset the independent truckers? Would you support that, or would you let Congress repeal those user fees?

The President. I have to say that to allow a very tiny percentage of the truckers -- the trucking union is opposed to what they're doing. About 80 percent of the independent truckers are not observing this strike. Some of them have been intimidated and frightened off the road, and you can understand that with the violence that's taken place. But to let a small percentage of any group of people in our country, by the use of murder and violence of the kind that they've used, change the laws of this country would be the worst precedent that we could set. How could there be any law and order from then on?

No. I have authorized the Justice Department to have the FBI cooperate with local authorities in trying to put an end to this violence. But we have always had a policy with regard to the user fee concept, which governs most of our transportation, gasoline taxes, and so forth, that there has been a proportionately higher tax for the trucks, commercial trucks, based on the very fact that they not only make a greater use, and a commercial use, than does the passenger automobile, they also represent a greater wear and tear on the highways.

Now, the taxes originally proposed were sizably reduced before the bill was passed. And these taxes, over and above the fuel tax, are being phased in, as you pointed out, over the next couple of years. And actually, I think that it is proportionately fair that those taxes be paid. And like any other business tax, they have the opportunity to pass them on to the customer, which is what happens with business taxes. A business can't pay taxes, it's a cost of production.

Congress has had a chance to go over the budget, the Democrats are saying it isn't so much a freeze. Defense spending goes up, social spending comes down, and some services such as legal services would be abolished altogether.

Within that, yes, there are some things that are increased, given higher priorities. There are some things given lower priorities. But I believe that we have preserved the safety net as we've always said we would. And I think that it is about time -- since there have been, in spite of all the talk and the term ``budget cuts,'' there have been no budget cuts. Each year, spending has gone up. And what we have cut are the projected budgets that were left for the next 5 years by the previous administration.

And incidentally, with regard to defense going up, it might be well to point out that the increase in defense spending -- we have more than cut in half the increase over the projected Carter defense budget. More than half has been cut, and the increase since we've been here has only been about $3 billion a year over what he, himself, had proposed then. And he was down in his spending. He was down to 5 percent of the gross national product for defense spending.

Bureau of Labor Statistics also contacts a very sizable proportion of the business institutions in the country. And those that they contacted replied that they have increased employment by more than 300,000 people.

There wouldn't be anything wrong with that, except that it's used as a term for something that's supposed to have failed. So if you don't mind, I'm asking for equal time -- well, at least, for about the next 5 minutes.

We are, and have been for some time, in a recession. Unemployment was running at 10.8 percent as the year ended. But we learned yesterday the welcome news that it dropped to 10.4 percent in January. And if you include our men and women in the military as part of the work force, which makes sense, it's down to 10.2 percent.

Still, only about two-thirds of our industrial capacity is being used. Our government is facing large deficits, and interest rates are still too high. And we're told all of this is the result of an economic program put into place by our administration and which, for obvious reasons, is called Reaganomics.

I know some will say I'm being defensive, but I'll risk that, because in the weeks ahead decisions are going to be made here in Washington that will have a bearing on whether unemployment continues to go down and the economy continues to turn up. You will help determine some of these decisions because public opinion does influence government. Therefore, you must have a clear fix on the facts, the economic realities.

Back in 1979 inflation was rising, unemployment was increasing, and by 1980 we were in a recession. Unemployment had reached such a point in the last half of 1980 that I referred to it as a depression. I was criticized for that by technical-minded people who said it was only a recession.

Our administration opened up shop on January 20th, 1981. The prime interest was still above 20 percent, inflation was 12.4, and unemployment was 7.3 percent. The 1981 budget had already been put in place by the previous administration and began on October 1st, 1980. Now, there was nothing we could do about that budget -- it wasn't ours -- although we did manage to squeeze out a few billion dollars through some management changes. For the most part, however, we were engaged in a struggle to get our budget proposals for 1982 adopted and the other part of our economic recovery program -- tax cuts for all Americans to help stimulate the economy.

Reserve Board, inflation has dropped to only 3.9 percent for all of 1982, the lowest it's been in 10 years. Interest rates are about half what they were. The effect of that is a 40-percent increase in housing starts. Automobile sales are up, as are all retail sales. Factory orders have begun to increase. One timber company I know of, which a year ago today was completely shut down, is now on two shifts a day, 5 days a week. Real wages are up for the first time in 3 years. And the rate of personal savings is up, meaning more capital for investment. And, as I've already mentioned, ``the lagging indicator,'' as it's called, unemployment, just took its first drop -- 10.8 to 10.4. A survey of business establishments shows somewhere around 300,000 more people working. We've a long way to go, but that's a start at last.

In nearby Hazelwood, the Ford plant was adding another entire shift. And General Motors has announced it plans to call back more than 21,000 of the indefinite layoffs over the next few months. For 8 out of the last 9 months, the leading economic indicators have been up.

In the weeks ahead, there'll be debates as to what course we should follow. The choice that will be offered is to turn away from our economic recovery program and go back to what was being done before. May I point out, all of the good things I've mentioned didn't begin until after our program, Reaganomics, if you will, was put in place. Prior to that, everything had been a mess for 3 years or more. I wonder if they'll still use that name when they've found out it works.

But just let me say that since economic recovery has been the lead story on most programs lately, it's awfully good to see -- we've been seeing more signs that the economy is on the mend. And if I could just mention a couple of them.

And if that could continue for 12 months, instead of 3. The index of leading indicators -- up 8 of the last 9 months. Real wages have gone up in the last 3 months. They'd been going down for the last 4 years.

Housing starts are up. Housing permits are up, and sales of new homes has grown by 75 percent since last April. The auto industry is picking up. We all know General Motors has announced they're going to call back more than 21,000 people in the next few months. Initial claims for unemployment insurance -- down. And, of course, I think we must have all been pleased to see at least the slight turnaround there, the four-tenths of a percentage point turnaround on the average.

And more than that, if you take the new method of counting, which I always thought should be the only method -- I don't know how we've been able to ignore almost 2 million people that are fully employed in the military. And yet, at the same time, I don't know whether you're aware that every time one of them left the military and didn't get a job, he was counted as unemployed. But he or she were not counted as employed when they had those jobs. I think it's a more sensible way of counting.

I don't know what that -- well, I suppose I shouldn't have been too surprised. I think it happens to more than one person. I recall attempts of that kind when I was in Sacramento as Governor. Then they called it the Palace Guard. But, no, and I think anyone that's in our administration will tell you that -- that has anything to do with policymaking -- that I make the decisions.

Maybe part of it has come about because of a change that we've made in the Cabinet system. As nearly as I've been able to find out, previous administrations back through the years have sort of used the Cabinet as maybe they'd come once a month and go around the table with each Cabinet head and give him a little brief verbal report of what his agency was doing. Well, I started something in California, with the Cabinet, that I brought here. And that was that it's a kind of a board of directors operation.

We sit around the Cabinet table, as we're sitting here, and instead of just the one person, if he thinks that -- well, it's his agency problem and he's the only one can speak on that. No. Everybody has a pitch-in. And we sit there, and we discuss and sometimes argue. And it goes around the table and around. And when I've finally heard enough to finalize my own decision, I make the decision, and that ends the discussion on that. If I haven't, if it's something that's so tough that there's so much right on both sides, send them away to come back the next day, and we'll take it up again. And maybe that has led to this.

I've noticed that it's always from those unidentified White House informants that this talk, this conversation comes. But I would turn my back and let any of the Cabinet members answer, and I think you'd find the answer was, I make the decision.

Q. Mr. President, are you at all concerned about an apparent continuing perception among a number of black leaders that the White House continues to be, if not hostile, at least not welcome to black viewpoints, and that administration policies are working to widen the income gap between blacks and whites, and also increase black unemployment?

The President. I'm aware of all of that. And it's very disturbing to me, because anyone who knows my life story, knows that long before there was even a thing called the civil rights movement, I was busy on that side.

As a sports announcer I didn't have any Willie Mays or Reggie Jacksons to talk about when I was broadcasting major league baseball. The opening line of the Spaulding Baseball Guide said, ``Baseball is a game for Caucasian gentlemen.'' And as a sports announcer I was one of a very small fraternity that used that job to editorialize against that ridiculous blocking of so many fine athletes and so many fine Americans from participating in what was called the great American game.

I was raised that way. God bless them, my father and mother, both long gone now -- but I can remember when I was only that high, and one of the alltime great motion picture classics, ``Birth of a Nation,'' came to our town. In our household my father simply announced that no member of our family would see that picture, because it was based on the Ku Klux Klan. And to this day I have never seen that great motion picture classic.

In recent years, with inflation, you've moved whether you got higher income, but just if you got a pay raise that simply let you supposedly break even, you didn't break even, because the Government put you up in a higher percentage bracket. But when we gave our tax cut, 25 percent across the board -- yes, if you want to use the number of dollars, a fellow that's paying a hundred dollars income tax is not going to get as many dollars in relief as the fellow that's paying a thousand or on up, ten thousand or a hundred thousand. But proportionately, they are.

But I think that anyone would find -- and with regard to unemployment, there's no question that this has been and it's one of the things that I think for years we've been trying to correct -- that when unemployment comes -- and there have been seven spells of this since World War II before this one, and always the same thing was true -- that it seemed that black employees suffered more in a higher rate of unemployment.

Before there was a minimum wage, young teenage blacks had a far lower rate of unemployment than teenage whites. And as the minimum wage was put into effect and began to increase, this reversed. And I think that it's, of course, affected all teenagers.

But I think that, for youngsters beginning to go into the work force, they're not going to take any adult's job away from him. They never did. They're learning a job. They're getting a skill. They're performing tasks that, at a proper price, an employer will hire them. But, if you make the price too high, they're tasks that the employer feels he can do without. And so no one is hired to take those jobs.

Q. And the week before that, the footrace began toward New Hampshire and Illinois -- the caucus in Illinois and the New Hampshire primary. When are you going to announce your intentions about running again?

The President. [Laughing] Well, I think -- and if you look back over history -- that is a ticklish thing for a President in his first term. If he makes an early decision one way, he becomes a lameduck. If he makes it the other way, he's then accused of everything he does is political campaigning. So, I think that, if you wait -- and I have not made a decision, by the way, because I also believe that the people let you know what the decision should be.

I have to say this. I'm confused by some of the polls. I know a little about polls anymore, and I know a lot of it depends on how the question is asked. But I get around the country enough, make enough appearances that somehow I don't seem to run into many of those people.

As a matter of fact, we have a kind of a standing thing in our family. Nancy's very critical of me, because when you go out and the streets are lined with people and when you're away from Washington and so forth -- and I know that much of that's simply because of the institution itself, the Presidency -- but the reaction of those people. But Nancy's annoyance is, she says that I always somehow manage to see the one person in the whole crowd who is doing like this or making a vulgar sign or something at me. And it is true. I do.

The President. Well, I think that that undoubtedly is the issue on most people's minds. When we started, the issue was inflation -- more than 80 percent -- and all the polls showed that as the number one problem. Well now, that's no longer the number one problem, because we've reduced it. But now it is unemployment and the economy. And I could expect that. And I'm very concerned about unemployment myself, and tragically it's usually the last thing that comes back when you come out of a recession.

Q. Mr. President, in our area we're particularly concerned with the large number of Federal employees, of course. They're our local viewers. And how does the administration justify or explain to them the freeze and the cutbacks and the reduction in the long term -- in the pension plans, which are so much better than private plans are generally?

The President. Well, for one thing, we have not affected the people that are presently employees, except there has been a change -- that there's had to be an increase. Their pension plan is such that today many retirees are getting more money in retirement than the person is getting in wages who is doing the job they retired from. And so, it was out of balance, and it was only fairness to ask, with the built-in increases in those pensions, that they contribute a little larger share.

Now, we have also added -- we are covering them now for Medicare. They do not have such coverage. And with all the talk about whether medicare is being increased in cost or not, or participation -- which it is in our proposed budget -- no one has added that we are adding to that, for the first time, catastrophic care; that these people will now be protected against that catastrophic illness or injury that now and then totally devastates a family because there's no way that any individual could meet the cost.

COLA's is not as significant as it was back when under the previous administration, the inflation rate was 12.4 percent -- or even 14 percent at one point. It isn't that big a sacrifice. But in the condition that we're in, and in an effort to help this economy, we're asking that of everyone.

And I was impressed -- I don't know which one of your stations it was -- but I was impressed enough to make a phone call to that young enlisted man over at Ft. Myer that someone interviewed as to how he felt about having the military pay froze. If anyone has a right to complain, they do, because up till recently they were far behind anyone with regard to pay that was commensurate with the work they were doing at all.

Q. There is settlements proceeding apace on the West Bank. There's tension between our forces and Israeli forces in Beirut. And I'm wondering if the Reagan plan is falling on totally deaf ears as far as Mr. Begin is concerned. Is your relationship -- has your relationship improved at all?

It's true we disagree on this particular issue about getting out of Lebanon, because we know that in our efforts to try and bring the Arab States around to the position that Egypt once took so that they can make peace with Israel, we have to be careful. And one of the big contentions is the withdrawal of all foreign forces from Lebanon. And Israel is delaying, we believe, unnecessarily in that. So, Phil Habib [The President's Special Representative for the Middle East] has gone back again and -- with a proposal and a plan -- and we're hopeful that they finally will, because the Arab nations are holding back and are reluctant unless they see this kind of gesture of good will.

So, we're going to continue trying to bring this peace movement on. But we don't believe that we can move to the actual peace negotiations in the Middle East until the Lebanon situation is cleared. And I personally have believed that if this requires even an increase in the multinational forces for further stability that we should be willing to do that.

And to finish answering your question before I take yours: We thought that asking Government employees, all across the board, to take a freeze in the increase in pay was not too much when you stop to think the sacrifice that's being made out there in the private sector -- those that are unemployed, but also those many employees that have taken voluntary cuts in benefits and programs and in salaries in order to help their employers -- that we could do the same thing.

Q. Mr. President, we are all concerned about perhaps the misuse or misinterpretation of the use of words and phrases. One of those happens to be -- and this ties back to David Stockman -- the phrase, ``We will not have make-work programs.'' Whereas we understand it and Congress understands it, sometimes many of our viewers do not understand, and they think it's hard-hearted Ronald Reagan saying that we will not have any solution to the unemployment program. And I just wonder if you would expand on that for us as to what you mean when you say you are not for make-work programs.

The President. Well, many of the jobs programs -- in the past recessions, there was always a tendency, the one thing that was politically unacceptable was unemployment. So, the Government would rush in with a lot of artificial stimulants, government spending and so forth, and large parts of that would be job programs where the Government would suddenly go out, provide funds, hire people.

But those programs then are supposed to be temporary, and at the same time you were adding to the cause of your recession, increasing the deficit spending. And no one was paying any attention as to whether that increased deficit spending was taking away unemployment over here in the private sector. But the worst feature was that many of those programs, the smallest percentage of the money actually went in to paying the workers. The Federal Government had a very high overhead and quite a carrying charge for those.

Now, there is a difference -- and Tip O'Neill and I have discussed this -- that it isn't make-work if you simply stimulate or move up or accelerate a program of necessary public works. Now, this is what we did with the gasoline tax.

Everyone, I know, said, well, I had said I would not, you know, it would take a palace coup before I would ever accept such a gasoline tax. The framework in which I said that at a press conference was when it was being proposed as just a tax for general revenues to increase taxes -- tax gasoline more. But more than a year before, Drew Lewis had come to me with the rundown on our highway system and the bridges and even the real great risk and danger -- well, just the other day, we saw a bridge collapse with several deaths. And a year before, when he had come with that, proposed a users fee, a gas tax to simply finance that kind of construction, I had to ask him at that time, could he wait a year. And he did.

Now, this is legitimate. This is work that has to be done. The jobs are already going not to individuals that are suddenly given a job, whether they fit it or not. These are people -- construction workers and construction companies. A delegation from the roadbuilding industry in Illinois presented me with a hard hat when I was out there because of the jobs. In Missouri they've already started on their program of rebuilding and even building new ones.

Now, we have asked -- and it won't change the budget a bit -- that every agency and department that has got building maintenance work that is in need of doing and that has not been done and so forth, to accelerate it. It's in the budget already. Don't schedule it for a year from now or 6 months from now, if you can move it up and do it now. That will be legitimate work.

The make-work jobs -- I can give you one example of one that I vetoed when I was Governor. It came from Washington, and a Governor could veto, and if it wasn't overridden in 60 days with the Federal Government, why, it stayed permanent. This was a program to put 17 able-bodied welfare recipients to work in a county park, cleaning up the park and keeping it cleaned up and everything. Why would I veto such a thing as that? Well, because more than 50 percent of the budget was going to go to 11 administrators to make sure that the 17 got to work on time. And I thought the percentages were a little wrong.

The President. Well, yesterday we had to come down early from Camp David so we wouldn't get snowed in. And then we just had a few people for a dinner that we'd been planning for some time, and that's when the birthday was.

I have just received a very heartwarming set of unusual gifts in the other room from some people from Monroe, Louisiana. And among them, though, was a framed picture -- I'll take this as the celebration -- a framed picture of the billboards that they put up all over Monroe, regular billboards saying happy birthday to me and thanking me for coming down in the flood. And another one was a fascimile of a check that the Goodfellows of Monroe contributed for flood relief of 83,600-and-some dollars. Their normal annual contribution is around $370. And so, that was enough of a celebration.

The President. No, I tell you. I gave it up because I'd been doing it about 15 years, and I began -- my belt seemed to be as tight as ever. [Laughter] I was hard, and finally a man knowledgeable in that field told me that that was -- yes, it was, but it was also stretching the muscles. And since those muscles -- there was no place else for them to go but to bulge. So, I quit. And I've got another set of exercises.

And it still baffles my imagination. They told us to come up on the platform there where we were to witness the landing of that craft and all, and then told us that it was on its approach pattern for the landing just out over Honolulu, and we were at Edwards Air Force Base in California.

Today we stand on the edge of a world in which opportunities are limited only by our own imagination. Our leadership in the air and space technology, a leadership we're determined to maintain, has already provided the American people with a rich bounty that has strengthened our economy and bettered our lives.

And this is not a new revolution or revelation. Back in 1969, as the Governor of California, I commissioned a task force on aerospace aviation education so that our young citizens could be prepared for future opportunities in this field. In a program similar to this, and consistent with the thrust of my State of the Union message, Lynn Helms over at the Federal Aviation Administration tells me he's embarking on a new initiative, an aviation education program that will help our students make sure that when the future gets here, they'll be ready for it.

Aerospace sales today account for 2 percent of gross national product, while the aerospace industry employs more than a million Americans. The industry contributes enormously to our ever more important export earnings, and the technological spinoffs from our air and space endeavors have also improved the competitive edge of a host of air industries. When you add it all up, our country's commitment to the development of air and space technology is one of the best investments the American people have ever made.

Will Rogers once reflected that ``America is never in a better humor or feeling better than when moving.'' So all this traveling is a mighty good omen. Will was an air enthusiast himself, as we all know. He had insights about the American spirit that were deeper than one might expect at first glance.

We Americans have always been at our best when we've faced challenge -- exploring and taming new frontiers, testing our talents and abilities and, yes, moving on. We're a nation that lionizes pathfinders, whether they be Daniel Boone or Charles Lindbergh. Many of tomorrow's heroes, the men and women who will inspire our people and exemplify what it means to be an American, will be individuals who are part of our conquest of the vast frontier of space -- a frontier that's always been in sight, but that only now is coming within reach.

Americans played a leading role in developing technology for the conquest of air. It's not mere coincidence that most of the world now travels on American wings, as can be seen on the runways of international airports the world over.

When it comes to the conquest of space, certainly we have competition from friends and adversaries. Well, we welcome it. I firmly believe that space enterprise will bring mankind closer together, even as we compete. We also benefit from cooperation.

On my recent visit to Latin America, I invited Brazil to join us in the use of a space shuttle, an invitation that included the training of a Brazilian who will accompany their payloads on the shuttle. And when I met with Prime Minister Nakasone a few weeks ago, I extended a similar invitation to the Japanese. Our friends and allies in Europe are already working with us. In a few months, a German astronaut, sponsored by the European Space Agency, will fly on the shuttle in a joint U.S.-European space lab mission. In the future, I would hope that joint space ventures will draw all freedom-loving people closer together.

The space shuttle program is a vital part of this effort. To ensure the full potential, I've recently decided that we'll keep the shuttle production lines intact, in order to continue the operation of the shuttle fleet in the most robust manner possible. By doing this, we also preserve the option of building the fifth shuttle to capitalize on the tremendous opportunities that lie ahead.

Jack Swigert, a former astronaut, fell victim to cancer before he was able to take that office. But he was a fighter to the end. He was a pioneer. And if Jack Swigert is the kind of man who emerges from the space program, we have reason to be confident about our nation's future.

Jack was a man of strength and principle, of action yet of wisdom, with an abiding faith in his country and our way of life. During his trip to the Moon, Apollo 13, you'll recall, was rocked by an explosion. It was only with courage and extraordinary ingenuity and the grace of God that the crew managed to return safely to Earth.

While running for election last year, Jack had a message for the voters of his district, a message of optimism that I wish all Americans could hear. I was privileged, Jack said, to be one of the few who viewed our Earth from the Moon, and the vision taught me that technology and commitment can overcome any challenge. Pushing back boundaries, overcoming limitations, and conquering new frontiers is what create men like Jack Swigert.

As we celebrate the many events for this bicentennial, let's remember we're celebrating more than the building of flying machines. We're making choices that are shaping the world in which our children will live. Our commitment to air and space is a pledge to them that the quality of our lives will be better and their horizons broader because of technology, of vision, of human qualities that we bring in our generation to conquering the endless cosmic frontier which stretches before us.

You know, I have to tell you a little personal experience here. I was Governor of California back in the riotous days of the sixties. And I couldn't go to a college football game. There'd be a riot instead. [Laughter] Anyone in authority was in the same position. But I remember one day when a group of the leaders of that came from the campuses of the University of California to Sacramento. They had demanded a meeting with me. Well, I was delighted because, as I say, I couldn't go and meet with them.

Note: The President spoke at 1:15 p.m. in the East Room to a group of leading figures in aviation, government, diplomacy, the military, and business. There was a large model of the space shuttle Columbia off to the side of the podium, and following his remarks, the President, escorted by Apollo 7 astronaut Michael Collins, inspected the model.

O'Connor for being here this afternoon to administer the oath of office to me. She is widely admired and regarded across this country at a time when millions of women are experiencing new opportunities, and their horizons are broadening.

Each person who is here today with me, whether it be a family member, a friend, or a colleague, has played a very special part in my life. I'm especially happy, of course, to have family with me, because they are the ones who have supported me, given me that moral support and encouragement through the years.

But I am happy to have my husband, to have Robin Dole, my brother and his wife and children, with me today. And I'm especially pleased to have my mother, Mary Hanford, from Salisbury, North Carolina, because she has been a real source of support and encouragement and inspiration to me through the years of my life. And certainly from the time I was a small child, it was she who imparted to me the spiritual values that I find so meaningful in my life at this point.

Mr. President, I want to thank you for the challenge, for the opportunities which you have given me to serve as a member of your Cabinet. And I want to pledge to you that I will give you my very best effort, with the help of God, and that I will strive to uphold the traditions of excellence which have been established at the Department of Transportation by my predecessors.

I know that the desk is already stacked high with challenges. So, after this ceremony is finished, I will proceed to the Department of Transportation to undertake those challenges. And I look forward to my opportunity, and thank you so very much.

The President. Elizabeth, let me just say something here. You know, it would be very easy to say that, of course, we're going to miss her here in the White House. But to tell you the truth, she was doing such a wonderful job and working so hard that I didn't see as much of her as I'm going to see now that she's on the Cabinet -- [laughter] -- because the Cabinet meets more frequently than we had opportunities to meet. And I know what she can do, and I'm very proud and happy that she will be a member of the Cabinet. But I also want to say that she has performed magnificently here, and I know that that will be carried on as well by her successor here.

Today we mark the new American partnership, as I'm sure Secretary Regan has told you, with the people of Africa through our acceptance of membership in the African Development Bank. We take the step purposefully, and by it we underscore our commitment to African growth.

At the Cancun summit in October of '81, the United States laid out a broad-based program of trade, investment, and aid to meet the diverse needs of the developing countries. Last year, we put this approach into practice in our Caribbean Basin Initiative for the developing countries of the Caribbean and Central America. And with this step today, the United States reaches out to its developing-nation partners in Africa.

The United States and the African Development Bank are not new friends by any means. Since '68 the United States has provided technical assistance to the bank through the Agency of International Development. And since '76 we've channeled part of our development assistance to Africa through the Bank's affiliates -- or affiliates, I should say, of the African Development Fund.

We're painfully aware that Africa's economic development is encountering difficult obstacles. As the leader in the cause of the progress, the African Development Bank group along with other assistance organizations must strive for a more effective use of the limited development funds.

Far too often, the governments of developing countries undermine their own private sector -- one of the essentials for commercial and industrial expansion -- only to see the standards of living decline in the countries that do that. If the leaders of Africa's nations recognize the critical role of private enterprise, they can then expect to share in much more of the worldwide economic upturn that we think is now beginning in this country.

African Development Bank group symbolizes the determination of Africa and the international community to meet those needs and to achieve that potential. We in the United States are enthusiastic about this partnership as I'm sure the Secretary has told you. And we look forward to seeing tangible results from this cooperative and very special effort.

Bank and on my own behalf, permit me to acknowledge with sincere gratitude the singular honor you have done the Bank and ourselves today in deciding to mark the signing of the formal instruments of accession of the United States to membership of the African Development Bank with this special ceremony.

Mr. President, the ceremony we have just witnessed is significant in many respects. But I think it's most obviously significant in that it marks the clearest commitment of the Government and the people of this great country to the development objectives and aspirations of the African peoples, as collectively expressed in their institutions that form the African Development Bank group.

United States towards these institutions. Your country's assistance, both in the form of funds and technical assistance to the Bank, has been a reliable and invaluable supplement to the Bank's own efforts for nearly as long as the Bank has been in existence. And this, notwithstanding that for reasons that are now happily historical, the United States could not at the time be a member of the African Development Bank.

The same history of great care and concern is even more amply evident in the clear leadership position that the United States unreservedly accepted, in terms of both direct contributions and indirect assistance, when it became possible for this country to become a state participant in the African Development Fund a few years after its creation.

Sir, today it marks a further confirmation of the commitment of your people, your government, and we recognize it as an explicit assurance that it is a long-term commitment. And because it's long-term in nature, it further underscores the concern of the people of this country for the plight of the people of Africa, which it is the duty of the institutions of the Bank group to help mitigate.

On behalf of the governing bodies of the Bank, it is my singular honor and pleasant duty to welcome the United States of America to membership of the Bank. You will, Mr. President, have, no doubt, have been informed at least in outline of the long period of internal debate which preceded the decision of our Governors to admit non-African countries to membership of the Bank. In the end, what persuaded them was the consideration that non-African membership could create an opportunity on the continental level and, under their own leadership, for a more extensive dialog and partnership between the two sides in combating Africa's endemic development problems.

Mr. President, it is this opportunity which we in the Bank, with the assistance of countries like yours, have the responsibility to translate into reality. And I am confident, sir, that we will succeed in this endeavor. There can be no doubt that with the material and technical resources that will be made available to the Bank as the result of this day's work, its effectiveness in manning this frontier and pushing it back is significantly enhanced.

Mr. President, your decision to have present at this ceremony such a distinguished and broadly representative selection of the members of the executive, the legislature, and the business and banking organs of the Nation signifies clearly to all of us how essential is the participation of all these sectors of the Nation before this great adventure in international cooperation can become a true success.

Senate and Congress, whose consistent support for this program over all these years has today brought our efforts to fruition. Equally, sir, a word of thanks is due to the staffs of both the executive and the legislative, who so tirelessly and patiently assisted us at all stages of our preparations.

Mr. President, I would on this happy occasion go further and take this windfall opportunity, on behalf of my colleagues, myself, the African Development Bank, personally to wish you a belated happy birthday and sincere good wishes for health, success, and God's blessings in your future endeavors.

Sir, on behalf of the Boards of Governors and Directors of the Bank group, accept our most sincere welcome to the African Development Bank and our thanks to you and to the people of your great country.

United States of America designates the Department of the Treasury for purposes of communication with the Bank on matters connected with the Agreement, and the Federal Reserve Bank of New York as the depository in which the Bank may keep its holdings of the currency of the United States of America or other assets.

Development Bank, is hereby designated as a public international organization entitled to enjoy the privileges, exemptions, and immunities conferred by the International Organizations Immunities Act. This designation is not intended to abridge in any respect the privileges and immunities which such organization has acquired or may acquire by treaty or Congressional action. This designation shall not affect in any way the applicability of Section 1 of Article 52 of the Agreement, Article 57 of such Agreement or the Declaration made by the United States pursuant to Article 64 of the Agreement.

The President met today with the Cabinet Council on Natural Resources and Environment to discuss ways to solve problems in the current law governing natural gas while protecting the consumer from the present rapid increase in natural gas prices.

Act, which was passed during the previous administration. The Council pointed out that present legislation is not protecting the consumer from rapid price increases and is instead operating to subsidize more expensive imports and uneconomic production of natural gas.

I know by now you must all know everything about the budget and all the fiscal affairs. But I wanted to come in for a few minutes, at least, and welcome you to the White House. I know many of you have been here before, but we're always glad to have you back.

We're well aware of the impact an editorial has not only on the folks at home but on some people up on the Hill. An editorial from the hometown paper can very often mean much more than any call from a lobbyist or even a call from the White House.

A lot of attention has been paid to the 1982 inflation rate, but I think even more significant -- and everyone seems to have overlooked -- is that while it was 3.9 percent for the year, for the last 3 months of 1982 it was running on an annualized basis at 1.1 percent. And I think the fact that it had come down to that and left that other lower average is something that we can focus on as offering a little hope here.

We know, of course, that the unemployment rate went down last Friday. I'm hopeful that one of these days, now that they've changed the method, that they will stick with the changed method instead of giving us two sets of figures. It was only a few months ago that I found out that they were not including the military in the unemployment figures. Well, there's almost 2 million Americans that are fully employed. But what really triggered my reaction was when I found out that when one of them left the service and didn't have a job, he was considered unemployed. But he wasn't considered employed when he had one.

Housing is coming back. Housing starts are up, permits are up, new home sales are up 75 percent since April of last year. Also supporting the recovery idea is the fact that there's been nearly a 12-percent increase in new orders for durable goods. And, of course, as you've probably been told, the leading indicators have been up 8 out of the last 9 months.

Now, if some of you are suspicious that my emphasizing all of this, on top of what you've been hearing, is in the hopes that you might take this as the message to take back home, your suspicions are absolutely correct. That's what I had in mind. I'm optimistic. I'm going to do all that I can, all of us here in the administration are, to work with the Congress to make sure this recovery stays on track.

Q.  Mr. President, I come from Baltimore, which is a city that in the past week has lost 2,300 jobs at Western Electric and about 950 jobs at the Sparrows Point plant of Bethlehem Steel. One of our big concerns is what happens to a steelworker who has been on this job for 25 years and suddenly his job is gone. How do you feel about retraining? How can this country retrain its work force, and in what directions?

The President. Well, we know that there has to be retraining because, as you've probably been told already, part of this unemployment problem is structural. For example, over a 2-year period, when we first came in here, 3 million new people entered the work force for the first time. And the new jobs, because of the recession, were not being created to put those people to work.

There will be changes. I don't know whether -- and maybe it has gotten to the point of someone with that much seniority laid off. I was in an automobile plant the other day, as you know, out in St. Louis, and in that plant, those people still employed -- the ones with the least seniority were 16 years there, because the layoffs come designated by seniority or lack of it.

But the one job training plan that we've gotten passed, that we introduced and has already been legislated into law, is designed, we think, better than many of the previous programs. First of all, where some of those job training plans only about 18 cents out of every dollar went to actual training, this one, better than 70 cents out of every dollar will go to training.

But we're going to direct that training in cooperation with local officials and business and industrial leaders in the communities to train people for those jobs that are vacant there in that area. And you all know from your own papers that on any representative Sunday, you have quite a package of help wanted ads. Now, I mentioned that once in a press conference and immediately got challenged that I was indicating that people were lazy and wouldn't go to work. I wasn't doing anything of the kind. We didn't have this job training program in place at the time. And what I was pointing out -- or trying to -- was that if you read those ads, and I've done so in many of the papers -- the last time I was in Los Angeles, there were 45\1/2\ pages in the Sunday L.A. Times -- but you saw that they called for skills. And here, to me, was the greatest indication of the structural unemployment -- that with 12 million unemployed in the country, we could have that many pages of help-wanted ads in an area which was around the national average or above. It indicated that there were job openings, and there must be a lack of people with the training to fill them.

So, we're doing more of this. And in the present budget, we have made proposals about using unemployment funds, in cooperation with the States that have their own unemployment funds, for training, for relocation, and so forth. I think it can be done, but that's the direction we must go instead of giving someone an imitation job temporarily.

Q. Mr. President, there have been some reports in the news recently that you may be leaning toward recommending or endorsing some kind of jobs program. Could you tell us exactly how you feel about this?

The President. The thing that we have talked about and that is, again, provided for already in the budget, is that where there are legitimate -- and we got this idea from the gas tax program. And incidentally, for all this talk that I had once said that it would take a palace coup to make me accept the 5-cent gas tax, that was when they were talking about it as just general revenue, a tax increase.

But Drew Lewis, Secretary of Transportation, had come to us over a year ago with a complete report on the state of our highways and bridges in the country and the desperate need and the almost emergency situation then. At that time, I asked him if he could hang on for a year and come back a year later, which he did. So, that really was a users fee. The gas tax was passed to get this necessary work that needs to be done, get it in work.

The President. No. I think the only political mistake that we've made there with the defense budget is that in the old-fashioned way that has persisted so long in government, where you pad the budget a little bit and then go up on the Hill and let the Congress cut it where you already knew it could be cut -- we didn't do that. Under Secretary Weinberger, we've been trying to find the cuts ourselves and where we can promote savings. And so a considerable amount of money was actually found by us when inflation went down faster than we thought, fuel costs and everything going down, management changes that were put into effect.

And we came up with 11.3 billion. Now, maybe we should have been smart and left the $11.3 in and let the Congress find it. But the minute we went up there with that cut in place, then they seemed to think that, ``Well, that must mean there's room for more.'' I think if there was, we would have found it.

The President. Well, that's the purpose of the Commission. We'll study that and find out what it is they recommend. And I realize that I'm the one that finally has to decide what we'll take up to the Hill as a recommendation to Congress. But I'm hopeful that the Commission can come up with something that will be acceptable but, at the same time, will meet the need for correcting this imbalance that exists.

And I think this steady drumbeat and this criticism from up on the Hill has created a false belief among too many people in this country that maybe in 1 or 2 years we've solved the problem. But we've got a long way to go before we really can say that we are able to meet the first, prime responsibility of the National Government, which is to be able to guarantee the safety and security of this nation and our people.

And the truth of the matter is -- everyone seems to overlook -- that as a percentage of gross national product, the defense spending is a smaller share of that than it has been at almost any time in the past, except for the preceding few years when it was allowed to deteriorate so badly.

And even the outgoing administration had recognized that, because they had submitted a plan for a 5-year buildup of the military. And we, now, are adding only about $3 billion a year to what their plan was. And frankly, part of that is because they could not have bought, for the money figure they put in, all the things that they had put in as required weapons systems and improvements.

Q. Mr. President, we have to ask you about the big news of the day, which is the Israeli commission's report on Sabra and Shatila. There's a recommendation that General Sharon resign, and there may be some change in the Israeli Government. I imagine you've studied it by now. Do you have any comment?

The President. Well, this is a very easy one. That's a strong democracy over there, and that's an internal problem. And I just don't think that we should be commenting or injecting ourselves into that internal problem.

Disarmament Agency. This report, the 22nd submitted since the creation of the agency, provides a complete review of the important work of an Agency which plays a crucial role in our country's national security program.

In each of these three negotiations, the United States has presented considered and equitable proposals which seek to establish a military equilibrium at reduced levels, eliminate the most destabilizing factors in the existing military balance, and enhance the security of both sides. When our national security, and that of our Allies, is at stake, we must approach arms control realistically. We do not seek agreements for their own sake; we seek them to build international security and stability. This Administration's reductions proposals for strategic and intermediate-range nuclear forces and for conventional forces reflect this approach. We are encouraged by the serious and businesslike conduct of these negotiations thus far. Although much hard bargaining lies ahead, I am determined to bargain in good faith until our objectives can be realized. We urge our Soviet negotiating partners equal seriousness of purpose.

The 1982 Annual Report not only includes details on all aspects of the three negotiations, but also refers to such other important elements of ACDA's responsibilities as providing expertise on both policy and technical levels for all other multilateral arms control negotiations, for our nuclear non-proliferation efforts, and for research and analysis of military budgets and arms transfers.

This agreement is one of a series to be renegotiated in accordance with that legislation to replace existing bilateral fishery agreements. I urge that the Congress give favorable consideration to this agreement at an early date.

Well, it's wonderful to have you all here today. And although I greatly enjoy the back and forth with the White House press correspondents, I do look forward to speaking with some of you who've managed to permanently escape the snares and traps of life in Washington.

And in December the economic indicators, the index, was a full 6.2 percent above last March's low point. Housing starts are also up by 45 percent during the last quarter. The new homes sales have grown 75 percent since April of last year. Housing permits are up 75 percent -- or 61 percent, I'm sorry. And the inventories of unsold homes are now at the lowest levels in more than a decade.

General Motors alone is recalling some 21,400 workers. The sharp decline in unemployment last month, which is usually the last indicator to show any upturn out of a recession, was the most heartening sign of all.

We still have a long way to go, but we've turned the corner and are moving forward. And I'm proud of one thing. We didn't panic when we hit the heavy weather and go for the fast bromides and quick fixes, the huge tax increases or wage or price controls that were recommended by a number of people. I think our stubbornness -- if you want to call it that -- will quite literally pay off for every American in the years ahead.

The second issue I want to mention is defense spending. And I won't launch into another statistical report and tell you this year that defense spending is only 26.7 percent of the Federal budget. I won't even tell you that the Soviets are still outspending us by devoting 13 to 14 percent of the gross national product to defense while we're devoting 6.7 percent of ours -- only about half the rate. I could tell you about the strides we've made at the Pentagon under Cap Weinberger's superb leadership.

Defense auditors had identified more than a billion dollars in potential savings on waste and fraud and from management efficiencies. Over the next 5 years, through multiyear procurement and other acquisition initiatives, we'll save over an additional $15 billion. That's more than the entire budget for the Department of Housing and Urban Development.

Thirty-two percent more of active duty units are combat ready, and reenlistment rate is up at 68 percent. That's the highest since 1964. But you know, our progress in that goes far beyond statistics, beyond bombs and rockets and budgets and bureaucrats. The real issue is the security of the United States and the American people -- our willingness to bear the burden that comes with freedom.

We have begun to correct a decade of neglecting America's defensive needs, but we've only begun. President Kennedy once said that there was no discount on defense. He was right, and I think the American people knew that he was right. The defense issue is one of the most potent in American politics. And time after time, the American people, when given the facts, have made it clear that they support a strong defense program.

They've never had patience with politicians who want to have a fire sale on national security or a bargain basement military. But right now, they've had a drumbeat of criticism based on false charges. Defense spending is not the cause of our economic problems, and without it, we'd have no chance of negotiating on arms reductions and getting an agreement with the Soviet Union in that field.

Q. Mr. President, I'm Frank May from Bryan, Texas, and we're having a special congressional election involving one of the chief architects of your economic program down there Saturday. My question is, do you see that election as a referendum on Reaganomics, and how do you view the outcome? How will it affect getting your budget proposals through Congress, win or lose?

The President. Well, I think it would have an effect either way. I recognize, though, that it may be portrayed as being a referendum on some policy of government. On the other hand, there are some other issues in there. Here is a man who had the courage to -- he could have just changed parties and stayed in the Congress. But he said, no, he had run and won as a member of the Democrat Party, and he felt that it was only fair that he go back and give them a chance, now knowing that he has switched parties.

I admire his courage very much, his principle. And I admire very much his mind, because he was an outstanding help to us in getting our economic program started. So, obviously, I've got a great interest in how he does down there. And I'm going to watch him with great interest.

But there are some problems in, primarily, agricultural and energy producing States -- Oklahoma being one of them -- a combination of wheat farmers going bankrupt and very concerned, an oil industry that is staggering right now under not only windfall profits taxes but a new excise tax being proposed -- a per-barrel price of what I understand now is $7 a barrel. They're worried about incentives to produce. Why should they buy it?

The President. Well, we hope they'll keep on producing. I remember that when I first proposed decontrolling oil -- getting rid of the government controls -- voices were raised saying that the price of gasoline would go to $2. Well, I've always believed in the marketplace, and this confirmed it, because the price of oil has gone down. I think that, maybe, the marketplace is still going to take care of it.

I never was in support of the windfall profits tax. This new proposal, I think, if you look at it fairly, is a tax that I hope would never be put into effect -- that or the surtax. What we did was propose a tax that would only be implemented under certain conditions. And one of the primary considerations was only if the Congress had joined in continuing to reduce Federal spending and get the cost of government down. And if they haven't adopted those proposals and done that, then this tax bill would never go into effect. There were some other things, also, that we still have. We had to be definitely out of recession, and the deficit had to be a certain percentage of the gross national product.

With regard to the farmer, we're doing a number of things and working on this very much. The farmer is truly a victim of the cost-price squeeze. And the farmer is one who, many times, borrows to plant, and through harvest, and then pays back. And with the high interest rates, they have been really caught in a trap. And when the price of their product went down -- so, we're doing everything from working on promoting international markets, more export for them to meeting some of their problems, and some of the problems of soil conservation.

We have a plan that we've proposed, also -- and many farmers are most supportive of it -- and that is, rather than cash helping in their problems, using that great surplus that the Government owns and that is stored in Government surplus, but which, hanging over the market, has a tendency to depress prices just psychologically by virtue of its being there. And we're talking about a trade in kind, that a farmer who leaves idle some of his land in the interest of soil conservation, we'll give him the amount of crop that he would have raised out of that surplus.

Boston, Massachusetts -- and last night Mr. Meese said in Cambridge that, he indicated that he thought you probably would run again. Do you care to share with us your thoughts on that particular subject?

The President. Well, I think that it's, first of all, it is too early for anyone in this position to make a decision on that. So, my answer has always been if you state too early you're, one way you're a lameduck, and if you state too early the other way, then everything you try to do is viewed as being politically inspired. And so, my safest answer is I will let the people determine whether I should run again or not.

No, but something that we were speaking about here earlier -- and I would like to pass this on to any and all of you for your communities -- we've had for a year a task force of citizen volunteers, called the Private Initiative Task Force, that was out finding out what the people can do at a volunteer level, at the people level, to help with many of the problems that we have. And they've concluded a year's work, and we now have a computer-manning staff here in the White House, a computerized program that contains more than 2,500 programs that arrange everything from things of this kind, providing food to the needy to intercepting and heading off dropouts in school, every kind of program that you could imagine -- some of them totally volunteer, some of them combination of volunteer in connection with public officials through grant programs -- 2,500 or more of them with the names, the communities where they're successful, the names and the phone numbers of the people who manage them. And for anyone in their communities and for you who are in the business you're in of communications, to put people in touch with this, to find out how someone else is solving a very real problem that you have in your community -- I highly recommend it, because out of all of this problem that we have, it is amazing the ingenuity of the American people, the willingness, and their ability to come together and solve many of these problems.

Incidentally, in connection with this need and whether the Air Force could or not, I want you all to know also that the problem -- another one that we happen to be talking around the table here, of the people with no shelter, that are on our streets now, our military is already checking on military installations for barracks space that can be made available for shelter for those people.

Leader in recent weeks and hearing from our senior Senator Gordon Humphrey, that they feel that you're moving away from the policies and principles that got you elected. How would you react to those statements by them?

I'm not retreating an inch from where I was. But I also recognize this: There are some people who would have you so stand on principle that if you don't get all that you've asked for from the legislature, why, you jump off the cliff with the flag flying.

I have always figured that a half a loaf is better than none, and I know that in the democratic process you're not going to always get everything you want. So, I think what they've misread is times in which I have compromised -- for example, our entire economic program.

And I wish that I could get more people to realize, no, I have not retreated from what was our original purpose. I am very stubborn in that regard. And I'm just going to have to try and communicate better, and make people realize that, you know, I come back and I ask for more the next time around.

Q. Thank you. I'm Chris Wagner from WPVI in Philadelphia. You were just talking about compromise and not getting everything that you want. It seems that both sides of the fence in Congress now are really pushing for some type of jobs bill that goes beyond what you have already proposed. In which areas are you willing to compromise now? And when can we expect to hear a compromise proposal from you?

The President. Well, some of the things that have been proposed are the type of job bills that we've used in the seven other recessions that took place after World War II up until now. They were make-work job programs; they were temporary; and they increased the deficit spending.

We disagree with that. But what we do have in our budget already -- and we are working together for a bipartisan approach to this -- is that we are looking at all the agencies and departments of government that have already built into the budget programs of construction, of maintenance, of upkeep, and so forth that they need -- and with the idea of accelerating those and, wherever they have them scheduled, doing them now.

But we also have in the budget, and we have passed, job training. And we have some approaches to working with the States in their own unemployment insurance to see if this cannot be utilized not just as insurance payments or benefit payments but utilized to further job training and even for relocation from people for where there are no jobs to other places where their skills might be desirable.

All told, we've got $93 billion in the proposed budget for the needy and for the help to the unemployed. And we have a program that is several billion dollars already -- that I think when they have time to study it, that it is dealing at work. But it won't be make-work. It'll be legitimate work such as the highway program, the 5-cent gas tax for that. And to all of those of you who said that I had stood in a press conference and said I would only give in to a gas tax if there was a palace coup, at that time I was talking, the gas tax had been proposed as a contribution to general revenues.

But more than a year ago, the Secretary of Transportation had brought us a report on the state of the highways and the bridges in our country and the very risk of -- it was almost an emergency situation. And I asked him then if he would come back a year later with it, because of our economic problems. He did. And that's why the present gas tax is devoted completely to the repair and the building of those bridges and so forth. And is already taking an effect in employment in the various States for construction.

Q. Can I just follow up on that a little bit? So, you're saying that the compromise part -- the new part then in which you will work with Congress -- will be speeding up, accelerating construction programs that were in the works for later on down the road?

Q. Roger Sharpe with WABC in New York. Earlier this week, you voiced some criticism or at least frustration over the Israeli attitude on the discussions with the pullout in Lebanon. Do you think the report now from the judicial commission on the massacres in Beirut will help speed up this process, or do you think it'll further complicate it?

We sent Phil Habib [President's Special Representative for the Middle East]back with further recommendations in the plan that we had originally proposed. We hope that we can accelerate the withdrawal not just of the Israelis but of all the foreign forces -- the Syrians and the remnants of the PLO that are still there -- because we believe it essential to the overall peace plan that I proposed -- must be the reestablishment of a government in Lebanon that will be sovereign over its own territory. And that can't happen, and we can't get the cooperation we need from all parties until everyone withdraws to their own borders. And we're going to continue along that plank.

I've heard a lot of numbers this morning, and I'm trying to put that on human terms, especially with some of your budget proposals' cuts. For instance, about a quarter of a million meals would be cut from the elderly meals program. And I'd like to, on human terms, be able to tell those people, those 50,000 elderly in the Bay State, what that's going to mean or what they can do to sustain themselves, having lost a quarter of a million meals with your proposal in the budget.

The President. I can only tell you that the only cuts that we've proposed are cuts that are aimed at eligibility that ensures that what we're doing is going to people who require the help. Many of our programs -- the eligibility requirements that have gone on over the years have been weakened or loosened, or administrative practices have been such that we found that we're helping people that really are not eligible for that help.

Yes, there is, because for one thing there's a reduction in the number of children in school. That has fluctuated. Maybe the baby boom is over, but suddenly their enrollment has dropped. So, there is that need.

We also have eliminated from school food programs a number of rather exclusive, high-priced schools in which there's no question about the ability of the parents of the students in those schools to provide for them. And between those two and between ensuring that the eligibility rule either reduces the food support for students from families with incomes that are above a level where they should not be getting help from their fellow taxpayers, we haven't harmed anyone who has real need. They'll all be provided for.

And, as I say, 95 million meals a day -- I've noticed that in the criticism that we have -- with regard to food stamps, there are more people provided for in our budget than have ever received food stamps before. The amount of money being spent on food stamps is greater, but what we have cut is a projected increase that was based again on standards and eligibility. For example, we have already uncovered over a billion dollars in error and fraud in food stamps, and we don't think that the people that are paying for the food stamps should be helping those who are fraudulently using food stamps.

Q. Tim Weigel from Chicago -- and I apologize. My question is, we read so many studies about how tax dollars leave the Midwest and the Northeast. They go to Washington, and then they distribute it to California, Florida, Texas, for defense spending. What can we do to make defense spending more equitable for the entire country and to turn off the outflow of dollars from the Midwest to the Northeast and just make it a little bit fairer for everybody, or more fair?

The President. In this regard, the Government is a customer, and the first requirement is to give the contracts where the product is being made and where you can get the best buy for the money invested. So, national defense has to be the first priority.

We have and do make efforts where there are items in contracting that can be spread more in the civilian nature -- not particularly weaponry -- we have made efforts to aim at the economically distressed areas to spread that more evenly. But, for example, if you're going to build warships, you have to go where the shipyards are. If you're going to build airplanes, you have to go where the airplane companies are. But since the target is the security of the entire Nation, it's only fair that the entire Nation pays for it.

We could say the same thing, couldn't we, about private industry, that certain States have almost a monopoly on a particular industry that services the whole country, and so the people in all those other States -- but then by the same token, the people in those other States make things and grow things that are sold nationwide. And we've never had in our country a kind of a -- making State borderlines like national lines with tariffs and so forth.

I feel that what probably is more irritating to some than whether the money goes back for something the Government must buy, as any customer has to buy something -- and we go where it can be sold -- is the truth that in many of the Government programs, practically all of them, it is true that there are a number of States in the Union that are considered the rich States, and the amount of tax money that they provide to Washington, when it is redistributed in programs, is redistributed to other States that are not paying proportionately the same share. And it's based on the idea that some of those other States have greater need. This is one, though, that I think should constantly be watched, that a little cluster of States, industrial States, for example, don't wind up supporting the people in others.

And I think that there's a lot of room, and these are some of the controversial things we've been trying to do. And we're sending our missionaries up on the Hill as often as we can to convince them that it'd make more sense if local governments -- and, incidentally, we haven't done enough to tell you how far we have gone with our federalism program and how much we have re-altered the whole structure of government in turning back to States and local communities functions they can perform better than the Federal Government can perform for them.

Q. Jane Waldman, Boston, Massachusetts. You proposed the subminimum wage for teenagers to reduce unemployment. Can you explain how this will reduce youth joblessness while not increasing adult joblessness?

The President. Yes, the figures of the minimum wage that we have seen going back to its very beginning and then every increase that went on -- you can look back at that, and the line on the chart of unemployment for teenagers, or young people, goes right along, increasing with the increase in the minimum wage. In other words, young people basically do not have a job skill.

They're entering the job market for some job that the employer can afford to hire an unskilled person for and teach them whatever needs to be taught. But many of those jobs are jobs that if you make them too expensive, the employer does without the job being filled.

And I have believed for many years, and my experience as Governor and working with youth groups on this, that the minimum wage, which is really based in mind of the mature employee, the person with some job skills and so forth, this never should have been applied to young people that are going to school, that are looking for summer jobs, that are looking for after-school jobs, and so forth. And I think that the best thing that we can do -- I know that it would be this, again, your question about am I retreating, I know it'd be hopeless to ask to eliminate that for such young people. That would be the right thing to do.

I can take you way back before there was such a thing -- when I got my first summer job. It was with a construction gang that was remodeling old homes and reselling them. And before the summer was over, I ended up laying hardwood floors, shingling roof, painting -- did everything but electrical and plumbing. And there weren't any government programs that made the employer have to hire an auditor and deduct from my paycheck for social security or other programs of that kind. He could just reach in his pocket every week at the end of the week and count out what he owed me and hand it to me in cash.

And I wouldn't give up that experience I had for anything in the world. And I think that young people today are in that same situation and would like to do that. But today it's not only the minimum wage, but with all the many useful social reforms that we've put in, of unemployment insurance and social security and other things of that kind, we have made the wedge for the employer. The difference between what the employee actually gets and what it costs the employer to hire him is so big that he just can't afford to take those young people on.

With regard -- I know I mentioned the untouchable: social security. But I remember when I was doing the ``G.E. Theater,'' and they one day wanted our 3-year-old daughter to be in a commercial. Now, she wasn't starting to make television a career at 3 years of age. I don't think she was ever going to have a job again for many, many years. But I thought she was cute, and I thought if they want to photograph her and put her on TV, I'd like to see that, too. So, I spent 4 hours downtown with my 3-year-old getting her signed up for social security. [Laughter] She was going to get the minimum, the Guild minimum for doing the commercial, which I think then was $50. But she was signed up. And that was all deducted and so forth.

But -- well, I know that I've taken -- and I can't get to all the hands that are here, and it's very heartbreaking. I wish I could. I'll tell you, those of you who didn't get your questions asked, if you'll write them down and leave them with Karna and your name and address -- [laughter] -- I guarantee you, I will answer them in writing and send you the answers in writing.

While a checkup will usually show that our eyes are healthy, we may also receive early warning of a serious eye disease requiring treatment. Diabetic eye disease, for example, is a leading cause of visual impairment. Through examination it can be detected and treated. If all diabetics were aware of the need for routine eye checkups, many more cases of blindness could be avoided.

The elderly and the young have a special need for periodic eye examinations. A number of blinding diseases strike more often in later years. With early warning of eye disease and proper treatment, older people could be spared visual handicaps which threaten their independence and limit their enjoyment of life. For children, a routine checkup may reveal an eye problem that can hamper the child in school or at play. Some disorders must be treated during childhood or permanent visual loss will result.

Accidents are a common cause of vision loss or impairment. Tragically, many accidents could have been avoided by the use of such simple precautions as wearing safety glasses, goggles, or face shields while involved in hazardous work or sporting activities.

We can help others in our community to prevent or overcome visual impairment by supporting organizations committed to sight conservation. These organizations campaign for eye safety and the use of protective eye wear in sports and on the job. They provide aids and professional low vision services to improve the quality of life for those who are vision impaired, and they encourage us to donate our eyes after death for biomedical research and for sight-restoring corneal transplant surgery.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 10th day of Feb, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Such services must consist of care, research or education in the fields of human health or social adjustment and rehabilitation; relief of victims of natural disasters and other emergencies; or assistance to those who are impoverished and therefore in need of food, shelter, clothing, education, and basic human welfare services.

Shultz, who have just completed important diplomatic missions in Europe and Asia. Both men accomplished their missions with calmness, competence, and strength -- and helped to reaffirm our country's commitment to peace.

The Vice President and the Secretary of State briefed me and my national security advisers today on the details of their trips. Clearly their journeys have reinforced American policy and have set the stage for added progress in the future in two areas of the world enormously important to our country and our people.

Vice President Bush went to Europe first and foremost to listen. His trip illustrated that NATO -- in contrast to the Warsaw pact -- is a voluntary alliance of free people based on consultation and consensus.

The Vice President also carried a message from me that was simple and clear. First, he emphasized that our zero-zero intermediate-range nuclear forces proposal is a serious one that would represent a real breakthrough in arms control. As such, it contrasts dramatically with the Soviet proposal which would merely preserve an existing Soviet advantage that is dangerous to the West. Second, he made it clear that our initiative -- which would eliminate an entire category of missiles -- is a fair and a moral position. Third, the Vice President made it clear that we are willing to explore any serious Soviet proposal and that I, personally, am prepared to meet Mr.

Andropov anywhere, anytime, to sign an agreement to eliminate all land-based intermediate-range nuclear missile weapons from the face of the Earth. Finally, the Vice President conveyed our belief that progress at Geneva depends now -- more critically than ever -- on continued allied unity and the determination to deploy the missiles requested by our NATO allies if results cannot be achieved which make this unnecessary.

I am deeply encouraged by the report that the Vice President has given me. We and our allies are as one in wanting genuine arms control and in our commitment to the dual track decision. The message that the Vice President carried and the favorable responses he received reflect a solid expression of allied unity we can all be proud of.

The trip of the Secretary of State to Asia was also of great significance strengthening our relations with three countries very important to the people of the United States -- Japan, China, and Korea.

The Secretary reported to me that he comes back from his trip more convinced than ever that much of the world's future is tied up with events in Asia and the Pacific. I fully agree with this assessment. He emphasized to me that Asians share our concerns about the need for significant arms control measures to ensure worldwide peace and security.

Secretary reaffirmed the strength of the U.S.-Japan alliance structure and the partnership for peace to which both of our countries are committed. He followed up on the discussions we had in Washington on ways by which Japan can better assume its appropriate responsibilities in defense and trade matters.

In his meetings at Beijing with the Chinese leadership, the Secretary agreed on the need to develop mutual confidence and trust and to continue the dialog between our two countries in order to achieve a strong and enduring relationship. In this connection, I am pleased that Premier Zhao has accepted my invitation to visit the United States. The time will be agreed on through diplomatic channels.

In the Republic of Korea, the Secretary, in his discussions with leaders of that country and by his visit to American troops in the Demilitarized Zone, made clear the U.S. determination to stand by the Korean people and to maintain our pledge to defend Korean independence against outside aggression.

I regret your departure from my personal staff and from our federalism effort, but I accept your resignation confident that as United States Representative to International Organizations in Vienna you will continue to be of invaluable service both to this Administration and to our country.

Your advice on a wide range of issues has been of enormous benefit, and I will continue to call on you in the future. Nancy and I send you, Jane and your children our best wishes as you prepare for your new assignment in Europe, and look forward to your successful return.

The one sadness in assuming this post is that I must leave your personal staff. Having worked on your behalf in the 1976 and 1980 presidential campaigns, it has been a rewarding experience to be your Assistant for Intergovernmental Affairs as you have translated your campaign promises to action. Thanks to your strong leadership, a 50-year trend of ever more centralized power has been reversed. Drawing upon your years as Governor, you have remained committed to a revitalized federalism and the goal of keeping government decisions close to home. You have achieved historic block grant consolidations, and regulatory relief for cities and states. The federalism initiative which you now are sending to Congress provides the framework for further successes in this area.

Today, all over our land, we remember the birth of one of our greatest sons, Abraham Lincoln -- the self-educated backwoodsman who became a lawyer, Congressman, and President. Whoever would understand in their hearts the meaning of America will find it in the life of Abe Lincoln.

In the spirit of Lincoln, America has carried forward the dream of democracy, guaranteeing political rights for all her citizens. And as our nation has matured, we have sought to meet more fully the obligations that spring from our national conscience. In the history of mankind, there has never been a people who've strived harder or done more than we Americans to help all who are truly in need.

This administration is committed to carry on that tradition. When the first stage of our economic program was passed a year and a half ago, I said, ``America now has an economic plan for her future. We're going forward, and we're not leaving anyone behind.'' Well, getting our economy back on sound footing has been a long, tough haul, and the job isn't done yet. But evidence grows that the worst of what we inherited is behind us. The economy is improving. Recovery has begun.

By and large, our administration is being criticized for our sincere and, I might add, long overdue attempts to target benefits to the truly needy and to reduce benefits for those who should be able to manage for themselves.

Look at one specific area -- nutrition assistance programs. The doom and gloom criers have been having a lot of fun with the charge that we're increasing hunger. Well, the facts are this administration is committed to providing adequate nutritional assistance to all who need it. And we're fulfilling that commitment. The Federal Government is subsidizing 95 million meals a day.

Meal subsidies are now being targeted more heavily than ever toward children from low-income households. Nutrition standards are being maintained. More people are receiving food stamps than ever before, and average benefits per person have grown at a rate faster than food price inflation. Yes, there has been a slight reduction in the number of school lunches, but that's because there's been a reduction in enrollment.

Here's another myth from the misery merchants: They've frightened too many Americans dependent on social security into believing our administration would take away their checks. I have pledged repeatedly that we have only one goal -- to save a system badly in need of repair.

The best thing that could happen to social security is to get it out of the news, out of politics, and back into the confidence of the American people. With cooperation from the Congress, we can pass the Social Security Commission's bipartisan plan and start to do just that.

What about their charge that we're slashing spending on social programs to spend more on defense? Well, it's true that we're requesting $1.6 trillion in defense spending over the next 5 years. But I'll bet you haven't heard that during this same period, spending budgeted for entitlement programs will be over $2 trillion or $500 billion more than defense. What we propose to spend on defense is a much smaller part of the Federal budget and our total economy than was being spent 10, 20, 30 years ago. Yet the threat to America's freedom is greater than it was in those earlier times.

So, let me repeat, far from trying to destroy what is best in our system of humane, free government, we're doing everything we can to save it by slowing down the destructive rate of growing in taxes and spending and by pruning non-essential programs. This way enough resources will be left to meet the requirements of the truly needy, and we will meet the challenge of fairness.

It's a pleasure and a privilege to join such an accomplished group of producers and achievers. I almost thought about wearing snow clothes here, being in Washington. But you all became presidents of sizable corporations by the time you were 40. That says a lot about your energy, drive, and vision -- some of us take a little longer.

You're the people most able to lead the coming economic recovery, increase its momentum, and bring renewed prosperity to America and the world. By definition, you are risk takers, capitalists, and entrepreneurs. Your comparative youth also indicates you're open to new ideas, ready to try new ways of doing things. And that's just the kind of attitude we need to guide America into her next period of economic greatness.

Those of you from the Midwest are well aware that the recession has hit hardest in areas dependent on what has been called our bedrock industries -- autos, steel, chemicals. At the same time, some of our service industries such as banking, computers, and communications are not as affected by the slump. They are becoming pillars of our economy.

We're stepping into a new economic era and one of the most challenging and exciting decades in our history. High technology is revolutionizing our industries, renewing our economy, and promising new hope and opportunity in the years ahead.

America is emerging from a painful period of adjustment. We're paying the price for years and years of big spending, big taxing, and overregulation. We're also suffering the structural problems of an industrial society transforming into more of a service and information society. Our traditional basic industries are not about to die away. America must never abandon them. They're fundamental to our economic base. But each of us, from corporate president to government official to millions of men and women in the marketplace, must recognize what is happening so that we can harness the forces of change to help all of our people.

This technology phenomenon is not new, but it is accelerating. Since 1945 service industries have been providing an increasing share of American jobs. Between 1977 and 1980, jobs in computers and data processing increased by 64 percent. By the year I took office, nearly three-quarters of all Americans worked in the service industries. In 1982 the service and information sector of our economy made up 50 percent of our total gross national product. For this growth to continue, we must both revitalize our industrial complex and encourage the boom in our service industries.

In the long run, if men and women like you fulfill your visions, economic growth will put our unemployed back to work, revive idle factories, and open the necessary doors of opportunity. As we've seen with the reopening of the Chrysler plants in Fenton, Missouri, and the rehiring of a total of 3,200 workers there, the developing recovery is beginning to provide jobs. But as I've said before, our people continue to hurt. Those of us in government and you in the private sector cannot afford to sit back. We must act. We'll not rest until every American who wants a job can find one.

In the short term, I have twice extended the unemployment benefit of workers whose insurance had run out. And I'm asking all Federal departments and agencies to study the prospects for speeding up already budgeted construction to provide jobs sooner than later. But there are other challenges. We must bridge the growing gap between the skills of today's work force and the future needs of business and industry. That's why last October I signed the Job Training Partnership Act which will train more than 1 million of our citizens every year in skills that local business, civic, municipal, and labor leaders say are needed in their communities.

I'll propose extending unemployment benefits, special incentives to employers who hire the long-term unemployed, and support for programs for displaced workers, training, and relocation assistance. Our proposal will also include new incentives for summer youth employment to help young people get a start in the job market.

In our commitment to ensure that all of our people share tomorrow's opportunities, this administration is also moving to assure legal and economic equity for women. We will also seek extension of the Civil Rights Commission. And we will propose measures to contain the skyrocketing costs of health care.

Government must get a hammerlock on the budget monster that threatens the road to recovery. I recently sent to the Congress a budget that is fair, prudent, and realistic. It includes, first, the strong but necessary medicine of a Federal spending freeze; second, specific measures to control the uncontrollable entitlement programs; third, $55 billion in defense savings; and, fourth, to ensure the reduction and eventual elimination of deficits, a standby tax limited to no more than 1 percent of the gross national product, to start in fiscal 1986, but to start only if Congress has implemented the proposed spending cuts and if the deficit is more than 2\1/2\ percent of gross national product.

At the same time, however, this administration will fight to preserve the third year of the tax break coming to working men and women this July and the tax indexing provision which will protect all Americans from inflationary bracket creep. We must not allow inflation to flare up again because of deficit spending, as it has in the past. But let's not lose sight of one vital point: America didn't run up a trillion-dollar debt because government didn't tax enough; we're saddled with a trillion-dollar debt because government spent too much.

I urge you, as leaders of the private sector, to join us in our campaign to forge a working partnership for recovery between business, labor, education, and government. Already, such a partnership is addressing the training needs of American workers. With the help of our Task Force on Private Sector Initiatives, thousands of working people at the community level have already made the shift from dead-end jobs and low-demand skills to the growth areas of high technology and the service economy.

Q. Mr. President, you indicated in your address to us that we're seeing a trend towards the high tech and service industries, the information society. What role do you see the U.S. playing in heavy industry?

The President. Well, there's no question that this doesn't mean -- or possibility that this means that we're going to do away with those industries, or see if we can do without them. That would be impossible; they are still a strong base. But this transition we're going through does not so much mean the disappearance of, say, one of the smokestack industries. It means that high technology is moving in, even there.

Recently, visiting the automobile company that I mentioned in my remarks, I stood at an assembly line that once used to be lined with workers -- but the work was all being done by robots. In other words, we will still have the auto industry and the steel industry and all those things that go with it. We must have them. But they will not require the same number of workers they did before.

The President. Well, we have already put some things in place. One of them is that third installment of the income tax [cut] that I mentioned. But in our tax program of 1981, we made great changes, as you know, in business tax, to make it more possible -- faster write-off, and so forth, for replacing plant and equipment. A number of things of that kind were done to have the same effect that the lowering of the capital gains tax has had. And that is the greater investment -- as a matter of fact, government is getting more revenue as a result of the reduction of that tax rate.

And the improvement that has been made in personal savings -- we're in the best situation in that, that we've been in since 1976. And that has added billions and tens of billions of dollars to the pool of private capital that is available for investment, so that when we can once get at the task of reducing these deficits, which we're going to do, but even with the deficits, there will still be money left for private investors, as well as to fund those government deficits.

In the first place, we are spending a lower percentage of the gross national product on defense than has been customary in the past, with the exception of just the few years before we came here, when there was a real decline in defense spending and a real decline in our ability to protect the freedoms and the people of America.

Now, not only have we reduced the percentage to about 7 percent of gross national product -- and back in the fifties and sixties, it averaged 9 and 10 percent of gross national product -- but we also are taking a much smaller percentage of the budget as a whole. Defense spending that we've asked for is only 26.7 percent of the budget. Historically, defense spending has been around 50 percent. And in the time of John F. Kennedy, in his administration, it was about 46 percent.

So, we feel that it is necessary to do what we're doing. But the budget that has grown the fastest, that is taking the greatest share, is that of the transfer payments, the so-called entitlement programs, where the money is being taken from workers and earners by way of tax and is being distributed.

Now, we are going to be very careful and are careful that we preserve what we call the ``safety net'' and make sure that those transfers will continue to the people who are truly needy and who must, through no fault of their own, depend on the rest of us. But we have found that those programs had become so loose administratively that there were people that were sometimes better off than those who were being taxed to support them, who were receiving those transfer payments. We have done our best to tighten that up. We are making gains in this '84 budget, if the Congress will pass it, that will remedy the situation with those so-called uncontrollable items, the entitlement programs, these transfer payments.

But again, let me point out that the biggest amount of the defense spending is not, as some believe, the investing in great, new weapons systems. It is the simple fact that we began paying the military something a little more commensurate with the service that they're rendering to our country, and the result has been, in these 2 years, a fantastic improvement in the quality and the quantity in our volunteer military. As of 2 years ago, people were saying it was a failure and that we would have to resort to the draft. Today, we have waiting lines. Today, we have an intelligence level and a number, a percentage of high school graduates in the military that is higher than we've ever had before, even when we were using the draft.

But I don't see how those who are criticizing can justify it that we are spending an inordinate amount on the military. I've given you the figures on that, the percentages, and so forth, and I have to say that -- and, incidentally, I pointed out in my remarks that over the next 5 years, we, ourselves, are cutting $55 billion out of our original program. We have already cut some 41 voluntarily -- billion dollars -- out of that, and the Congress has cut some more, which I wish they hadn't, because it did throw us off balance.

Q. Mr. President, all of us serve as chief executive officers of our companies. You're the chief executive officer of the biggest enterprise on the face of the Earth. We would be interested in your personal reflections on the job, how you deal with the decisionmaking process, and the pressures that make your job as difficult as it really is.

First of all, I want all the input I can get. Now, I had learned over the years -- or at least was informed -- that Cabinet meetings in government, in Washington for example, were kind of once-a-month ceremonies where the Cabinet got together and various Cabinet members reported on the doings of their particular agency. Well, I changed that in California and changed it here.

Our Cabinet operates as kind of a board of directors. And if the issue involves one particular agency, that individual just doesn't have the floor all to himself. Everyone is affected. So, everyone gets into the debate and the discussion as they would around a board of directors table.

Now, the one place where we differ is we don't take a vote. I realize that I have to make the decision. So when I've heard all the pros and cons -- and I insist on hearing all views -- when I've heard enough to feel that I am soundly briefed, I make the decision. Sometimes I wait a little bit and go back in the office and stew around with it myself for awhile; sometimes I make it right there at the Cabinet table.

But that, I have found, is one of the most effective ways to get things done and also to have some confidence that I had had all the input that there is on a particular subject. And, as I say, I think to that extent it's pretty much what you yourselves do. I have a staff just as you also do. And they're involved in all of this, and I hear their views, also.

Yes, it is an awesome responsibility. I am grateful for the 8 years that I had in California in that position, because it probably was the best training that anyone could have for this particular job -- much the same thing on a little different scale. And, of course, we didn't have a foreign policy in California; we have that now. But, once again, the same procedure -- the National Security Council, State, and Defense, and all. And this involves other Cabinet members, also -- Treasury and the Commerce Department and all are involved in a great many of the international aspects of this job. So we've followed the same process with them. That's the way it works.

The President. Well, thank you. And together, let me say, we're turning America away from past policies of despair and stagnation. Yes, we still face tough challenges. But we know they're not insurmountable. Just as our forefathers tamed a wild continent and built unparalleled prosperity with their vision, courage, and hard work, so we can claim the promise of tomorrow. If we listen to our hearts, believe in ourselves, and pull together, nothing can stand in our way.

Agreement, which provided for duty-free entry under specified conditions of various educational, scientific, and cultural materials and which entered into force with respect to the United States on November 2, 1966. On January 16, 1981, the President submitted the Protocol to the Senate for advice and consent to its ratification, together with an explanatory letter from the Secretary of State containing a statement that the Administration did not intend to adhere to the optional Annexes F, G, and H of the Protocol.

As the living classroom for some 20 million school children each year, zoos and aquariums have an important role in the American educational process. They also provide stimulating recreational experiences for more than 125 million people who visit them annually.

The United States has some of the finest zoo and aquarium facilities in the world. Many are foremost in the effort to conserve the species they house. American zoos and aquariums cooperate with institutions around the globe to preserve wildlife and to create more sophisticated techniques for exhibiting animals in natural settings.

To both children and adults, animals represent a special sense of curiosity, feeling, and caring. By enabling us to observe animals firsthand and to learn about their habitats, zoos and aquariums have become a valuable and unique asset.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 14th day of Feb., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

The President, by Executive order, is establishing the Emergency Board on recommendation of the National Mediation Board. A strike by BLE threatens to interrupt interstate commerce, substantially depriving a section of the country of essential transportation service. Conrail is the fifth largest railroad in the United States, serving 15 States in the Northeast and the District of Columbia. Its service area contains almost half of the Nation's manufacturing plants and accounts for 45 percent of U.S. economic activity. One quarter of the motor vehicles transported are moved by Conrail, and the carrier is a major hauler of food, pulp and paper products, coal, chemicals, and primary metal products. The Department of Defense relies on Conrail to transport many types of defense material, including certain essential items such as the M - 1 tank.

Consequently, the President invoked the emergency board procedures of the Railway Labor Act, which in part provide that the board will report its findings and recommendations for the settlement of the dispute to the President within 30 days from the date of its establishment. The parties must then consider the recommendations of the emergency board without engaging in self-help during a subsequent 30-day period.

Foreign Service officer of Class one, as Ambassador to the Republic of Cape Verde. Mr. Yates would be the first resident American Ambassador accredited to Cape Verde. He would succeed Peter Jon de Vos, who is being assigned to the Department of State.

Avenue, the plaza adjoining the building, and the public use spaces within the Old Post Office, including the Pavilion and the clock observation tower. This designation is particularly apt since the renovation of the Old Post Office, its occupancy this year by Federal cultural agencies and commercial enterprises, and its exhibits are due in large measure to the talent and vigor of Nancy Hanks.

In December, I pledged that the Caribbean Basin Initiative would be among the very first pieces of legislation that I would submit to the 98th Congress, and today I have taken the opportunity to focus again on this initiative, which is close to my heart and one of my highest priorities.

As you know, last year the Caribbean Basin Initiative enjoyed strong, bipartisan support and was actually passed by the House. It is essential that we renew our efforts now to complete this vital task.

Today our democratic neighbors in the Caribbean Basin area are confronted with unprecedented political and economic pressures. Aid is important, but it is not enough. We must help these countries to renew their economies and strengthen their democracies. We must open new markets and encourage investment and business expansion, which, I would stress, will lead to direct benefits to the U.S. economy. The tax and trade provisions of the CBI that we are seeking are the essential elements that would make our program more promising than past efforts; leaving them out would gut the program of its greatest strengths.

There are those who believe it takes a general crisis to get action out of Washington. Well, we cannot afford to wait for a crisis to erupt so close to home. It has been almost a year since I met with Caribbean leaders in Barbados. Their people believe in democracy and want nothing more than an opportunity to live and work in freedom. We owe it to them -- but more importantly, to ourselves -- to follow through on a program so vital to the well-being of our closest neighbors.

It is no coincidence that I have concentrated considerable effort on the Western Hemisphere over these last 2 years. Shortly after my election, I visited the President of Mexico and have forged close ties with his successor. The first head of state to visit the White House during my administration was Prime Minister Seaga from Jamaica. And just a few months ago I visited South and Central America, meeting with 6 neighboring heads of state. Since entering office it has been my privilege to have conferred directly with the leaders of 15 donor and recipient nations of the CBI.

But I cannot do it alone. Success will require a bipartisan legislative effort; it is the only way we can finish the job we started last year and put into effect the tax and trade provisions of the CBI.

If there is one thing I have learned since getting to the White House, it is that we have got to work together if anything is to be accomplished. I am counting on men and women of both parties -- as represented by today's visitors -- to work with me in securing this vital program for progress in the Caribbean region, and greater security, freedom, and prosperity for all the Americas.

Note: The statement was issued by the Office of the Press Secretary following the President's meeting with a bipartisan group of Congressmen to discuss the proposed legislation. The meeting took place in the Cabinet Room at the White House.

Diversity in educational opportunity has been one of the great strengths of our Nation. It is a foundation of our pluralistic society and essential to a Nation which places a high value on individual freedom.

We are justly proud of our public schools which now offer a free education through the primary and secondary school levels to all American children willing to take advantage of it. At the same time, we must remember the important role that has been played since the beginning of our Nation by the diverse nonpublic schools which also offer an education to American children. Now, as they did prior to the establishment of our public school system, parents cherish their ability to choose from a wide range of educational opportunities for their children. It is of great importance to the continued vitality of our society that parents have a meaningful choice between public education and the many forms of private education that are available.

It is also important that there be innovation and experimentation in education. The existence of many private, as well as public, schools assures that new and possibly more effective teaching approaches will not go untested. It is also important that the differing needs and demands of students and their parents be met. Parents who, for whatever reason, are not satisfied by the education available in their local public schools should be able to seek an education better suited to their children elsewhere. Furthermore, the existence of a viable private alternative should maintain educational standards and meet student needs.

As we are all aware, the cost of education, both public and private, has risen dramatically in recent years. We all bear the burden of the rising costs of public education through State and local taxation, directly or indirectly. But those parents who wish their children to attend nonpublic schools must also bear the additional burden of paying private school tuition. This additional cost has always severely limited the ability of lower income families to choose the nonpublic educational alternative for their children. Rising costs are now putting private schools beyond the reach of a growing number of middle-income Americans as well. If we are to provide a meaningful choice for those for whom it is in danger of becoming an illusion, we must find a way to lighten the ``double burden'' these families bear.

We must also bear in mind that private schools do more than offer alternative educational choices to students and their parents. Nonpublic schools also carry a significant part of the burden of providing primary and secondary school education in this country. If it becomes financially impossible for many of the families now sending their children to nonpublic schools to continue to do so, the resulting increase in public school attendance will place large and unwelcome new tax burdens on State and local taxpayers. The cost to taxpayers of offering some tax relief to parents, so that they can afford to keep their children in the private schools of their choice, is modest compared to the cost of educating their children in the public schools.

Thus, in order to promote diversity in education and the freedom of individuals to take advantage of it and to nurture the pluralism in American society which this diversity fosters, I am transmitting today a draft bill which provides Federal tax credits for the tuition expenses of children attending nonpublic primary or secondary schools. Starting in 1983, the Educational Opportunity and Equity Act of 1983, if enacted, would allow a tax credit for the tuition expenses of each student attending a private, nonprofit primary or secondary school. By 1985, when this new tuition tax credit would be fully phased in, a credit equal to 50% of tuition expenses paid during the year, but not to exceed $300, would be allowed for each student from a family with adjusted gross income of up to $40,000. The tax credit would be phased down for families with adjusted gross incomes between $40,000 and $60,000, and no credit would be available to families with income in excess of $60,000. Because the tax credit is designed to gradually phase out for those taxpayers making in excess of $40,000 a year, the proposal provides the greatest assistance to these lower- and middle-income taxpayers who are most severely affected by rising private school tuition expenses.

Today's proposal makes an important start by providing this relief where it is most necessary. I will be proposing other legislation in the near future to address the problem of financing higher education.

Consequently, the bill contains strong provisions to ensure that no credits will be permitted for amounts paid to schools that follow racially discriminatory policies. These provisions are identical to those that were adopted by the Senate Finance Committee last Fall with broad bipartisan support.

Proclaiming the Lithuanian Republic, its founders stepped forward on February 16, 1918, to assert their country's independence and commitment to a government based on justice, democracy, and the rights of the individual.

Twenty-two years later Soviet tyranny imposed itself on Lithuania and denied the Lithuanian people their just right of national self-determination. In the intervening years, the United States has refused to recognize the forcible incorporation of Lithuania into the Soviet Union.

An enduring belief in freedom for all people unites Americans everywhere. But we must be vigilant in the protection of our common ideal, for as long as freedom is denied others, it is not secure here.

The President. I have a short statement to make before we get to your questions. I assume that you do have some questions. I would especially like to speak to our citizens who've been hurt by unemployment.

One of the most discouraging things about the recent recession was its duration. The figures show that industrial production leveled out in '79, has generally declined since then. But there was encouraging news as you all know today. Industrial production was up nine-tenths of 1 percent in January, with autos and steel up sharply. And this upturn has been supported by other favorable economic signals in recent weeks, including today's report that January housing starts are up 36 percent over the previous month to the highest monthly level since 1979.

As a result of the economic program we have already in place, the recovery is beginning to flex its muscles. But far too many Americans are still unemployed. The question still before us is how to ease the burden on the jobless without threatening the long-term recovery. And with this balance in mind, I recently instructed the Office of Management and Budget to see what we could do to increase employment by providing more relief in the short term. But I told them not to bring me just another quick fix.

The bipartisan compromise has three basic elements. First, it would provide $4 billion in accelerated expenditures for needed Federal construction and repair projects. These projects directly and indirectly could provide as many as 470,000 jobs. Second, we would provide $2.9 billion to fund the supplementary employment insurance -- or unemployment insurance, I should say, the programs through the end of the year. And, third, we're seeking 300 million in additional humanitarian relief for those who are in serious distress.

Contrary to previous plans, this one is consistent with our basic long-term recovery program and my own personal principles. It funds no make-work jobs. Instead we're speeding up projects that are already planned and needed. This approach also will have minimum net impact on the budget deficit over the next 3 years since it accelerates money that we were already going to pay out, spending somewhat more now but less later. And the humanitarian relief is a one-time finding -- or funding, not the creation of some new continuing program.

In the weeks ahead, I will also send to the Congress my proposals for reducing long-term structural unemployment. These will include tax incentives for businesses that hire the unemployed, incentives for summer youth employment, and funds to retrain displaced workers. I hope the Congress will swiftly enact this second package as well, and together I believe we can get more Americans back to work over both the short term and the long.

Q. Mr. President, in the controversy over the Environmental Protection Agency, there have been suggestions of protection of private interests, of mismanagement, of manipulation, all of this creating the impression of an agency in cahoots with business. What's the proper relationship between the EPA, business, and the rest of the Nation? Is the agency living up to your standards, and do you have complete confidence in its director?

First of all was, we know, about a month before I arrived here, the Superfund was created. That was a billion six hundred million dollars of government money to help in the locating and cleaning up of chemical dumps or waste dumps that have taken place over the years. And so this particular fund is to provide money if there is no one else that can be held responsible for some of these dumps, for the government to fund clearing them up. But the law also provides for EPA to bring suit, to make out-of-court settlements to try and get those responsible, where they can be located, to fund or help fund in these cleanups. So far, they have named 418 such dumps in the country -- there must be thousands -- but they've named those as high priority because of the risk associated with them.

Now, there have been 23 settlements so far that I know of. There's been one conviction, criminal conviction, and I have to tell you that I believe that the relationship is what it should be, working together with the concerns that are involved to try and get these cleaned up and, where there is responsibility, to get the private sector paying for it. So far, they've used up about $220 million of the Superfund, but they've also gotten about -- somewhere in the neighborhood of another $150 million from private concerns in these cleanups.

Now, let me point out one thing, because this ties into the whole matter of whether the executive privilege that was invoked over something less than a hundred documents has played some part in what's going on now.

We made available to the Congress some 800,000 documents, and less than a hundred were held out as actually being involved in cases and litigation -- cases involved cleanup and private concerns. And traditionally this makes them eligible for executive privilege, because it would be disastrous to law enforcement, to our own efforts, and to the cleanup of these places if some of the information in these investigative reports was made public.

However, we offered to the congressional committees that they could come and go over these reports themselves to make sure that they were what we said they were, and they refused. But now with this thing that has come up suggesting that there might be wrongdoing, we will never invoke executive privilege to cover up wrongdoing. And so I have ordered complete investigation by the Justice Department into every charge that is made. I hope we're not getting back to a place where accusation is once again going to be taken as proof of guilt.

And we have been negotiating, because the judge that ruled the other day on the executive privilege idea, he really ruled that we and Congress had not done enough to seek a compromise and to get together. So, all afternoon we've been up on the Hill working with the Congress to work out some compromise whereby we can meet this problem, because I can no longer insist on executive privilege if there's a suspicion in the minds of the people that maybe it is being used to cover some wrongdoing. And that, we will never stand for.

The President. This is what I've told the Department of Justice to look into on all of these. I have been confident of the management by Anne Gorsuch at the department, and we are talking about getting someone to be of help and to counsel with regard to the congressional relationships in the future so that she can devote her time to managing the agency.

Q. Mr. President, Congressman Foley praised you today for changing your mind on the emergency jobs bill, and he said that means now that you finally recognize the harsh realities of the recession. My question to you, sir, is, how soon do you think you'll get a compromise, and are you willing to go for an extra billion or so, or less, I should say, for, to meet Democratic concerns in terms of summer jobs, nutrition for women and children, and energy assistance?

What we have done, very simply, is, as we've said, in our budget submitted for '84 and then looking toward '85, were a number of requests that we put in funding for repair, for maintenance, for construction of various agencies and departments. And what we were working on ourselves was accelerating these and simply moving them up into '83, in which I would have to ask for a supplemental appropriation to do them in '83, but then we wouldn't have to ask for that money in the '84 and '85 budgets. So, this is what we're doing for the bulk of this.

There is some new money in our proposal also, and for some of the very things that you just mentioned, and we've been working with the leadership up there. And I think we are -- I can't say that we're agreed right down to every last comma and period, but they have been most receptive to this program, welcomed it, and I am hopeful that we're going to be able to have a bipartisan agreement on such a proposal.

Now, the difference between this and the type of thing that I threatened to veto was, that was about a $5\1/2\ billion program, but which was new funding, $5\1/2\ billion of new funds, and creating what were make-work jobs out in various levels of the public sector.

The President. Well, as I say, wait till you see the second package that we're coming up with, because many of those things are covered. For example, you mention nutrition. Well, right now, in our budget, we will be providing for about a 12-percent increase in the people that are eligible for the nutritional programs over what they knew in 1980.

First of all, arms reduction should not be a political problem on the Hill. It's too serious, and we are too concerned with it. And frankly I feel that since I was the one who took the lead in bringing about the first real arms reduction talks that we've ever been able to hold with the Soviet Union -- and they are engaged in those talks right now -- I believe that I had a right to ask for my choice of who I thought could be of help to me in that.

Q. If I may follow up, sir, what do you expect to do in the next week to turn around that majority that is now against Mr. Adelman? And if Mr. Adelman can't win the confidence of the Republican majority in the Senate Foreign Relations Committee, how do you expect him to be an effective spokesman for the United States with the Soviet Union and our European allies?

The President. I think that what I'll do -- you don't give away trade secrets or anything, but I will try to be as persuasive as I can and make them see the light. If that falls short, maybe I'll try to make them feel the heat.

Q. Further on arms control, sir, since November of '81 your administration has stuck to the so-called zero option in the INF phase, and that tack so far has just led to deadlock. There's been a good deal of debate inside the administration about offering a different position, one that might lead to more bargaining. You've apparently chosen not to do that. Can you tell us why?

Europe it was, calling attention back to when I first, before the Press Club, introduced this proposal for zero option, that I said that we would negotiate in good faith any legitimate proposal that might be offered. Well, we still say the same thing. So far no legitimate counterproposal has been offered that would warrant negotiation or study. But we do believe that the zero option is the moral high ground in this situation, that the opportunity in that area to get rid of an entire class of weapons and release both the Soviet Union, the Eastern bloc, and Western Europe from the threat that is hanging over them warrants doing our best to get that solution.

Q. Sir, if I might follow up. By clinging to that position, if it's leading nowhere, don't you run the risk of the worst of both worlds -- no agreement with the Soviets and a backing down by the European allies about deployment of the new cruise missiles and Pershings?

Q. Mr. President, a memo was drafted recently by the Director of the Office of Minority Affairs in the Agriculture Department, Isidoro Rodriguez. It was for Secretary Block. And it contained some controversial changes in civil rights regulations. It was rejected by Deputy Assistant Secretary John Franke. What information, if any, do you have about this?

The President. Well, I can't give you an answer right now. I don't know what this is, but I'll certainly look into it, because -- are you suggesting that there were some suggestions with regard to employment in the Department?

Q. Well, the memo suggests purging some aspects of title VII of the Civil Rights Act with regard to underrepresentation. It also mentions that women and other groups haven't supported you despite their benefiting politically and financially from Agriculture Department events such as Women's Week. Now, given the perception which you have acknowledged that some people have of you, my other question would be, why would such a memo come up through the administration. Why would it bubble up?

But there's a mounting campaign against the kind of compromise that you and the Democratic leadership came up with. What will you do if you cannot get a compromise through, if those, for instance, representing Federal employees do make the argument successfully to Congress that Federal employees -- their own retirement system would go bankrupt if you started including Federal employees under a social security compact? Do you have a plan of what you will do if you have no success with your compromise?

The President. Well, Ann, first of all, I'm confident that we are going to have an acceptable compromise. I think it ill behooves government employees to make an issue as to why -- and incidentally, remember, we're not talking about government employees who presently are covered by that program. We're talking about new employees who will, henceforth, come into government -- that they will be covered by social security instead of a government pension plan. But I think it ill behooves them when this is a compulsory program for all the rest of the people in the country -- that they should somehow be exempt from this program. Then where do we start drawing the line?

So, I think it was a legitimate part of the compromise to include them. And since the program, the present benefit program for -- or pension plan for government employees, is funded in part by employee contributions, but the balance of it and the greatest percentage of it is covered just simply out of general tax funds, general spending, why, I don't see where they can say that there's any threat to the existing program for existing employees in -- the newcomers then being covered by social security.

With that kind of statement on the record from him, and with the fact that he doesn't have a lot of practical experience in arms control negotiations, are you not handing the Soviet Union a propaganda advantage in that propaganda war in Europe by presenting this man as our lead man on arms control?

The President. No, I don't believe so, and I don't -- I know that he is aware of what it is that we're proposing and what we're trying to do. And it isn't -- he knows it isn't a sham, that we're as on the level as anyone can be in trying to promote this. And I think he can be helpful in that. And I think that it would be far more destructive to our allies and their peace of mind to see me repudiated by a Senate committee on someone that I want to help in this after the great success that George Bush has had and George Shultz in Asia.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to ask you about another important appointment you're going to have to make before too long. The term of Paul Volcker, the Federal Reserve Chairman, expires in a few months, and what I'm wondering is, what are the qualifications that you'll be looking for in a new Fed Chairman? And would you consider reappointing Mr. Volcker to that job?

The President. Well, now you've asked one that I can't answer, because I just don't believe in talking about possible appointments in advance. It'll just have to wait till the time comes. I just don't discuss those.

Q. Mr. President, there's a report tonight that we have sent AWACS to Egypt and that we've sent a carrier nearby. And I wanted to ask you, do you fear that there's going to be a Libyan attack on Egypt, or could you explain why we've taken these actions that we apparently have taken?

The President. Well, I don't believe that there's been any naval movement of any kind. And we're well aware of Libya's attempts to destabilize its neighbors and other countries there in that part of the world.

But the AWACS, this is not an unusual happening. We have conducted joint exercises and training exercises with the Egyptian Air Force -- one, last year. We'll do more in the future. And these planes have been there for quite some time in Egypt, the AWACS planes, for this kind of an exercise, and that's what they're going to conduct.

The President. Well, as I've said to you, we're well aware of their propensity for doing things like that, so we wouldn't be surprised. But this is an exercise that we've done before, are going to do again, and going to do it now. And there, as I say, has been no naval movement at all.

Q. Sir, I'd like to follow up on Lou's question. We understand that the threat may be from Qadhafi to the Sudan. And my question to you is, how serious is the threat to the Sudan? And, if necessary, would you use American forces to stop Qadhafi?

The President. I don't think there's any occasion for that; it's never been contemplated. But we've known that the Sudan is one of the neighboring states that he has threatened with destabilizing and so forth, just as he has with Chad. And that's all I can say about that. But, no, we don't have any forces in that area that would be involved.

The President. Well, this was an exercise that is held annually by our navy, and part of the force was deployed narrowly in the Gulf of Sidra, which he had tried to claim -- international water or was -- not international waters, I'm sorry -- was his waters. This is as if we ran a line from the Texas border over to the tip of Florida and said the Gulf of Mexico is American waters. No one else can get in.

But in that instance, it was just very clear cut. They sent out planes, and they shot missiles at two of our airplanes that were up there. And two of our airplanes turned around and shot missiles at them. And we were just better shots than they were.

The President. We get back to the old argument again -- and I have stated many times -- you cannot find in the States, the various States that have gun control laws, that there is any proportionate difference in the crimes committed where there are those very strict laws and where they are far looser in their laws.

I think that what we should be aiming at all over the country is what we did in California, and that is that -- never mind whether you're going to try to take guns away from good people, the criminal is going to find a way to have a gun. What we did was say that anyone convicted of a crime, if he had a gun in his possession at the time the crime was committed, whether he used it or not, add 5 to 15 years to the prison sentence and make the prison sentence mandatory. No probation could be given. And I think that is more of an answer. The guns aren't making people criminals; criminals are using guns.

Q. Well, I've been wanting to ask you this for a long while, and with Mr. Hinckley in the news again this last week, don't you think that things might have been different if Hinckley hadn't had more difficulty in being able to get a gun?

The President. Sure would have been more comfortable, except that at 2 o'clock in the afternoon, thereabouts, out there surrounded by many of you, he did what he did in an area that has about the strictest gun control laws that there are in the United States. Now, how effective are gun control laws for someone that wants to commit a crime using a gun when he could choose the place where there's supposed to be least likely to have one?

Q. Mr. President, in a recent interview you indicated that if the stabilization of Lebanon would require more peacekeeping forces that we ought to be willing to do that. My question is, is the U.S. proposing or is it backing a plan that would include more peacekeeping forces in Lebanon, and would those forces be somewhere other than the Beirut area?

The President. We have said -- and there had been talk of this with regard to the difficulty in getting the present forces of the PLO, the Syrians, and the Israelis out of Lebanon while they establish themselves and their government -- we have said that if in consultation with our allies, the multinational forces, if an increase and redeployment of those forces could aid and speedup this getting of the other forces out of there, I would be willing to go along with that. Of course, we would have to have the equal agreement of our allies in that, or maybe other countries could join, too.

And I think it would be well worth it, because I think this is too great an opportunity to finally bring peace to the Middle East for us to let this go by. And I would like -- as I say, I think it would be well worth the price to have them there. It doesn't mean that their duty would be very much any different than it is today. It's to be a stabilizing force while Libya [Lebanon] recovers from this long period of warlords with their own armies and so forth, and establishes its sovereignty over its own borders.

The President. No, this is just, as I've said, that if this should become a factor, and this could be the key element in resolving this situation, this departure of forces from Lebanon. Then, yes, I would be willing to go along with this.

Q. Mr. President, as you know, there's an election approaching in West Germany, and the latest polls appear to give the opposition a prospect at least of winning those elections in March. My question to you is, what do you think the consequences would be for the Western alliance if a new German Government took office and declined to deploy the Pershing missiles?

I've had no indication that that would be a possibility. Herr Vogel [Hans-Jochen Vogel, Social Democratic Party candidate for Chancellor.] has been here in this country. He indicated support of what it is that we're proposing in the arms reduction talks, and he seemed to indicate his knowledge of how important our continued plan to deploy -- remember, at their request -- those missiles would be in securing this reduction in armaments.

So, we're not going to inject ourselves into anyone else's internal affairs or elections at all. But I believe that the Vice President's trip there found great support all over Europe of what it is we're doing, and in Germany, even, from the fact that there is -- they're preparing for an election.

When I said it would be terrible, I did not mean that to infer as that someone else might win an election. I meant that it would be terrible if any of our allies withdrew from their present position of support for this.

The President. Well, I'll tell you, I read those things too, and I get pretty frustrated. Because maybe I'm going to have to have an exhibition up here in which we get some of those unnamed aides up and see if they can push me off the platform. [Laughter] I'm not being pushed around. I'm being given what I have asked for, which is every option, every shade of thinking on issues, and then I make the decisions. And there's no one pushing me, and I'm beginning to think that those aides are akin to that mysterious ``they'' who always is saying something. ``They say'' -- and I've never met ``they'' as yet.

The President. No, what he came back with was support expressed for our zero option. And what he also did -- there's no question about, they wanted to know whether, you know, we're going to be willing to talk other issues -- and he pointed out to them my original statement, and that has been our position. If somebody wants to present another offer, we'll negotiate in good faith with this.

The President. Well, no, when you -- you know, I said a reasonable proposal. A hundred and sixty-two missiles with three warheads on each one -- we are up to the neighborhood of 500 missiles -- and yet we would still be zero; we would not have any deterrent force on our side -- that does not sound to me like a reasonable proposal. Now, I think the ball is still in their court.

It's pretty clear -- based on what people on the Hill in both parties are saying -- that there's not much sentiment for your idea of contingency taxes to kick in if the deficit is still going to be high several years down the road. So, what's your alternate solution, and are there any circumstances under which you'd drop the indexing?

The President. No, and I would have to explain why. At the rate we're reducing inflation now, indexing as a tax measure is not going to be very important to anyone whether they have it or not with regard to the amount of money that they're going to be able to keep, because inflation, as I say, is -- and that we hope that by that time -- it is not scheduled to go into effect awhile yet, that it would be -- that we'll even be in a better situation. But what I want indexing for is -- let's not kid ourselves, government has found inflation a very handy method for getting additional revenues without having to face the public and demand a tax increase. It is a tax. Government gets a profit from inflation. And I would like to see the indexing put in place to permanently take away from government the incentive to create inflation in order to get more money. If they think they have to have more money, then they should be able to stand up and tell the American people they're going to ask for a tax increase.

The President. Well, how do they propose to -- how do they propose that; if indexing isn't going to take much revenue away from government with inflation down as low as it is, what are they counting on?

The contingency plan had one feature of it that appealed to me. And that is that it could only be -- it has to be passed first, and then, it sits there as a contingency -- it could only be implemented if the Congress has agreed to the cuts in spending and the changes that we have asked for. If they haven't done that, then we can't.

The President. Well, I can tell you that I'm very pleased -- and we all are -- with the meetings that we've had with Prime Minister Willoch. Norway and the United States enjoy close ties that long predate our alliance, and it's always a happy occasion when we find a friend like Prime Minister Willoch paying us a visit.

Our discussions today come at a critical time for our alliance, a time when it's more important than ever for freedom-loving people on both sides of the Atlantic to reaffirm their shared security interests. For our part, I assured the Prime Minister of a firm American commitment to the preservation of peace and freedom and of our continuing efforts in coordination with our allies in the North Atlantic Community to achieve reductions in the military arsenals of both the East and the West.

I'm deeply impressed that in these challenging times Norway and the United States, two longtime friends, continue to have strong commonality of interests. I hope that Prime Minister Willoch found the visit as useful as I did, and I look forward to maintaining a close and friendly relationship that is traditional between the leaders of our people and our two countries.

Mr. President, I would first like to thank you for your gracious words. My visit to Washington, my discussions with a number of the American leaders, and of course, in particular, the meeting with you, Mr. President, today, has indeed been very, very useful to us. And I would like to add that we feel here, as we felt in Minnesota earlier this week, how close our two nations are.

The Western goal remains clear. We want to reach a balance of forces in Europe with as few nuclear weapons as possible. The zero option with no intermediate nuclear weapons on either side is the optimum outcome. We know that the U.S. will make all possible efforts to get an agreement with the Soviet Union as close to this optimum as possible. And to achieve this, it is of the utmost importance that the allies stand united.

We also had the opportunity to discuss a number of other issues, as the President mentioned. We discussed, among other issues, the economic outlook and the possibilities for improved international cooperation to achieve a revival of our economies and a reduction of unemployment.

To the extent permitted by law, agency policy with respect to the disposition of any invention made in the performance of a federally-funded research and development contract, grant or cooperative agreement award shall be the same or substantially the same as applied to small business firms and nonprofit organizations under Chapter 38 of Title 35 of the United States Code.

Government or obligations of the performer described in 35 U.S.C. 202 - 204 may be waived or omitted if the agency determines (1) that the interests of the United States and the general public will be better served thereby as, for example, where this is necessary to obtain a uniquely or highly qualified performer; or (2) that the award involves co-sponsored, cost sharing, or joint venture research and development, and the performer, cosponsor or joint venturer is making substantial contribution of funds, facilities or equipment to the work performed under the award.

In addition, agencies should protect the confidentiality of invention disclosure, patent applications and utilization reports required in performance or in consequence of awards to the extent permitted by 35 U.S.C. 205 or other applicable laws.

Last year I proposed a major new program for economic cooperation for the Caribbean Basin. I am pleased to report that the aid portion of the Caribbean Basin Initiative was acted upon last year, and that the region has already reaped some of the benefits from the $350 million of this emergency assistance. However, while the House of Representatives also approved the trade and tax portions of this integrated program, Congress adjourned before favorable consideration could take place in the Senate. Today I am transmitting to the Congress for swift action the trade and tax plan as approved by a majority of members during the last session.

The economic, political, and security challenges in the Caribbean Basin are formidable. Our neighbors are struggling to keep up with the rapidly changing global economic system, while striving to develop or nurture representative and responsive institutions. These tasks would be burden enough for any nation, but they are also being forced to defend themselves against attempts by externally-supported minorities to impose an alien, hostile, and unworkable system upon them by force. These challenges must be faced foursquare. The alternative is further expansion of political violence from the extreme left and the extreme right, leading inevitably to further economic decline, and more human suffering and dislocation.

The economic crisis facing most of the Basin countries is acute. Deteriorating trade opportunities, worldwide recession, mounting debt burdens, growing unemployment, and deep-seated structural problems are having a catastrophic impact throughout the region. These developments have forced thousands of people to emigrate and have left even the most established democracies severely shaken. This is a crisis we cannot afford to ignore.

The emergency funding approved last year has helped these fragile economies cope with their mounting balance of payments problems. I must stress, however, that the trade and tax portions I am transmitting today are designed to improve the lives of the peoples of the Caribbean Basin by enabling them to earn their own way to a better future. At the same time, given the interdependence between U.S. and Caribbean Basin economies, this bill will also benefit the U.S. by expanding markets for our exports and hence improving U.S. job opportunities. It should also reduce the pressures of economically-inspired immigration into this country from the region.

Thanks to the cooperative, bipartisan spirit with which this program has been considered, and the changes that were made last year by Congress to ensure beyond any doubt adequate safeguards for domestic interests, I am hopeful that the Caribbean Basin Initiative will be acted upon with maximum speed by the Congress.

But I'm delighted to be back here with you, at your 10th annual conference. In my last two addresses, I've talked about our common perceptions and goals, and I thought I might report to you here tonight on where we stand in achieving those goals -- a sort of state of the Reagan report, if you will.

Well, it's true we haven't brought about every change important to the conscience of a conservative, but we conservatives can take a great deal of honest pride in what we have achieved. In a few minutes I want to talk about just how far we've come and what we need to do to win further victories. But right now, I think a word or two on strategy is in order. You may remember that in the past, I mentioned that it was not our task as conservatives to just point out the mistakes made over all the decades of liberal government, not just to form an able opposition, but to govern, to lead a nation. And I noted this would make new demands upon our movement, upon all of us.

For the first time in half a century, we've developed a whole new cadre of young conservatives in government. We've shown that conservatives can do more than criticize; we've shown that we can govern and move our legislation through the Congress.

Now, I know there's concern over attempts to roll back some of the gains that we've made. And it seems to me that here we ought to give some thought to strategy -- to making sure that we stop and think before we act. For example, some of our critics have been saying recently that they want to take back the people's third-year tax cut and abolish tax indexing. And some others, including members of my staff, wanted immediately to open up a verbal barrage against them. Well, I hope you know that sometimes it's better if a President doesn't say exactly what's on his mind.

Now, in talking about our legislative agenda, I know that some of you have been disturbed by the notion of standby tax increases in the so-called out-years. Well, I wasn't wild about the idea myself. But the economy is getting better, and I believe these improvements are only the beginning. And with some luck, and if the American people respond with the kind of energy and initiative they've always shown in the past, well, maybe it's time we started thinking about some standby tax cuts, too.

But you know, the great thing about that standby tax increase is that if it's passed, they can't put it into effect unless they have first agreed to all our spending cuts. It does give them something to think about.

But you know, with regard to the economy, I wonder if our political adversaries haven't once again proved that they're our best allies. They spent the last 16 months or so placing all the responsibility for the state of the economy on our shoulders. And with some help from the media, it's been a pretty impressive campaign. They've created quite an image -- we're responsible for the economy.

Well, I assume that we're responsible then for inflation which, after back-to-back years in double digits before we got here, has now been reduced to 3.9 percent in 1982. And for the last 3 months of that year, it ran at only 1.1 percent. In 1982 real wages increased for the first time in 3 years.

Interest rates, as you've already been told, have dropped dramatically, with the prime rate shrinking by nearly 50 percent. And in December, the index of leading indicators was a full 6.3 percent above last March's low point and has risen in 8 of the last 9 months. Last month housing starts were up 95 percent and building permits 88 percent over last year at this time. New home sales are up by 54 percent since April, and inventories of unsold homes are at the lowest levels in more than a decade. Auto production this quarter is scheduled to increase by 22 percent, and General Motors alone is putting 21,400 of their workers back on the job. Last month's sharp decline in the unemployment rate was the most heartening sign of all. It would have taken a $5 billion jobs bill to reduce unemployment by the same amount -- and it didn't cost us anything.

Let's confess, let's admit that we've turned the corner on the economy. And we're especially proud of one thing: When we hit heavy weather, we didn't panic, we didn't go for fast bromides and quick fixes, the huge tax increases or wage and price controls recommended by so many. And our stubbornness, if you want to call it that, will quite literally pay off for every American in the years ahead.

So, let me pledge to you tonight: Carefully, we have set out on the road to recovery. We will not be deterred. We will not be turned back. I reject the policies of the past, the policies of tax and tax, spend and spend, elect and elect. The lesson of these failed policies is clear; I've said this before: You can't drink yourself sober or spend yourself rich, and you can't prime the pump without pumping the prime -- as somebody did, like to 21\1/2\ percent in 1980.

And a word is in order here on the most historic of all the legislative reforms we've achieved in the last 2 years -- that of tax indexing. You can understand the terror that strikes in the heart of those whose principal constituency is big government. Bracket creep is government's hidden incentive to inflate the currency and bring on inflation, and indexing will end that. It will end those huge, hidden subsidies for bigger and bigger government. In the future, if we get indexing planted firmly as a law of the land, the advocates of big government who want money, more money for their social spending, their social engineering schemes, will have to go to the people and say right out loud: We want more money from your weekly paycheck, so we're raising your taxes. Do that instead of sneaking it out by way of inflation, which they have helped bring on.

So, all the professional Washingtonians, from bureaucrats to lobbyists to the special interest groups, are frightened -- plain scared -- and they're working overtime to take this one back. Well, I think I speak for all conservatives when I say: Tax indexing is nonnegotiable. It's a fight we'll take to the people, and we'll win.

But I think you can see how even this debate shows things are changing for the better. It highlights the essential differences between two philosophies now contending for power in American political life. One is the philosophy of the past -- a philosophy that has as its constituents an ill-assorted mix of elitists and special-interest groups who see government as the principal vehicle of social change, who believe that the only thing we have to fear is the people, who must be watched and regulated and superintended from Washington.

On the other hand, our political philosophy is at the heart of the new political consensus that emerged in America at the beginning of this decade, one that I believe all -- well, I believe it will dominate American politics for many decades. The economic disasters brought about by too much government were the catalysts for this consensus. During the seventies, the American people began to see misdirected, overgrown government as the source of many of our social problems -- not the solution.

The overriding goal during the past 2 years has been to give the government back to the American people, to make it responsive again to their wishes and desires, to do more than bring about a healthy economy or a growing gross national product. We've truly brought about a quiet revolution in American Government.

For too many years, bureaucratic self-interest and political maneuvering held sway over efficiency and honesty in government. Federal dollars were treated as the property of bureaucrats, not taxpayers. Those in the Federal Establishment who pointed to the misuse of those dollars were looked upon as malcontents or troublemakers.

Well, this administration has broken with what was a kind of a buddy system. There have been dramatic turnabouts in some of the more scandal-ridden and wasteful Federal agencies and programs. Only a few years ago, the General Services Administration was racked by indictments and report after report of inefficiency and waste. Today at GSA, Jerry Carmen has not only put the whistleblowers back in charge, he's promoted them and given them new responsibilities. Just listen to this little set of figures. Today, General Services Administration work-in-progress time is down from 30 days to 7, even while the agency has sustained budget cuts of 20 percent, office space reductions of 20 percent, and the attrition of 7,000 employees.

At the Government Printing Office, under Dan Sawyer, losses of millions of dollars have suddenly been ended as the workforce was cut through attrition and a hiring freeze, and overtime pay was cut by $6 million in 1 year alone. The Government publication program, which ran a cumulative loss of $20 million over a 3-year period, registered a $4.9 million profit, and the GPO as a whole has experienced a profit of $4.1 million last year.

Verne Orr, we have identified more than a billion dollars in savings on waste and fraud and, over the next 7 years, multiyear procurement and other acquisition initiatives will save us almost $30 billion.

Now, these are only three examples of what we're attempting to do to make government more efficient. The list goes on. We have wielded our inspectors general as a strike force accounting for nearly $17 billion in savings in 18 months. With Peter Grace's help, we've called on top management executives and experts from the private sector to suggest modern management techniques for every aspect of government operations. And with an exciting new project called Reform 88, we're going to streamline and reorganize the processes that control the money, information, personnel, and property of the Federal bureaucracy -- the maze through which nearly $2 trillion passes each year and which includes 350 different payroll systems and 1,750 personnel offices.

There is more, much more -- from cutting down wasteful travel practices to reducing paperwork, from aggressively pursuing the $40 billion in bad debts owed the Federal Government to reducing publication of more than 70 million copies of wasteful or unnecessary government publications.

But, you know, making government responsive again to the people involves more than eliminating waste and fraud and inefficiency. During the decades when government was intruding into areas where it's neither competent nor needed, it was also ignoring its legitimate and constitutional duties such as preserving the domestic peace and providing for the common defense.

But on the matter of domestic order, a few things need to be said. First of all, it is abundantly clear that much of our crime problem was provoked by a social philosophy that saw man as primarily a creature of his material environment. The same liberal philosophy that saw an era of prosperity and virtue ushered in by changing man's environment through massive Federal spending programs also viewed criminals as the unfortunate products of poor socioeconomic conditions or an underprivileged upbringing. Society, not the individual, they said, was at fault for criminal wrongdoing. We were to blame.

Well, today, a new political consensus utterly rejects this point of view. The American people demand that government exercise its legitimate and constitutional duty to punish career criminals -- those who consciously choose to make their life by preying on the innocent.

Now, we conservatives have been warning about the crime problem for many years, about that permissive social philosophy that did so much to foster it, about a legal system that seemed to specialize in letting hardened criminals go free. And now we have the means and the power to do something. Let's get to work.

Drugpusher after drugpusher, mobster after mobster has escaped justice by taking advantage of our flawed bail and parole system. Criminals who have committed atrocious acts have cynically utilized the technicalities of the exclusionary rule, a miscarriage of justice unique to our legal system. Indeed, one National Institute of Justice study showed that of those arrested for drug felonies in Los Angeles County in 1981, 32 percent were back out on the streets because of perceived problems with the exclusionary rule.

Now, the exclusionary rule -- that isn't a law that was passed by Congress or a State legislature, it's what is called case law, the result of judicial decisions. If a law enforcement officer obtains evidence as the result of a violation of the laws regarding search and seizure, that evidence cannot be introduced in a trial even if it proves the guilt of the accused. Now, this is hardly punishment of the officer for his violation of legal procedures, and it's only effect, in many cases, is to free someone patently guilty of a crime.

I've taken too much time to explain here. San Bernardino, California, several years ago: Two narcotics agents, based on the evidence that they had, obtained a legal warrant to search a home of a man and woman suspected of peddling heroin. They searched the home. They didn't find anything. But as they were leaving, just on a hunch, they turned back to the baby in the crib and took down the diapers, and there was the stash of heroin. The evidence was thrown out of court and the couple went free because the baby hadn't given permission for the violation of its constitutional rights.

Well, this administration has proposed vital reforms of our bail and parole systems and criminal forfeiture and sentencing statutes. These reforms were passed by the Senate 95 to 1 last year. Our anticrime package never got out of committee in the House of Representatives. Do you see a target there? [Laughter] The American people want these reforms, and they want them now. I'm asking tonight that you mobilize all the powerful resources of this political movement to get these measures passed by the Congress.

American education, to take responsibility for the education of our children out of the hands of the bureaucrats and put it back in the hands of parents and teachers. That's why the Congress must stop dithering. We need those tuition tax credits. We need a voucher system for the parents of disadvantaged children. We need education savings accounts, a sort of IRA for college. And finally -- and don't think for a moment I've given up -- we need to eliminate that unnecessary and politically engendered Department of Education.

There are other steps we're taking to restore government to its rightful duties, to restore the political consensus upon which this nation was founded. Our Founding Fathers prohibited a Federal establishment of religion, but there is no evidence that they intended to set up a wall of separation between the state and religious belief itself.

The Supreme Court opens its proceedings with a religious invocation. And the Congress opens each day with prayer from its chaplains. The schoolchildren of the United States are entitled to the same privileges as Supreme Court Justices and Congressmen. Join me in persuading the Congress to accede to the overwhelming desire of the American people for a constitutional amendment permitting prayer in our schools.

And finally, on our domestic agenda, there is a subject that weighs heavily on all of us -- the tragedy of abortion on demand. This is a grave moral evil and one that requires the fullest discussion on the floors of the House and Senate. As we saw in the last century with the issue of slavery, any attempt by the Congress to stifle or compromise away discussion of important moral issues only further inflames emotions on both sides and leads ultimately to even more social disruption and disunity.

So, tonight, I would ask that the Congress discuss the issue of abortion openly and freely on the floors of the House and Senate. Let those who believe the practice of abortion to be a moral evil join us in taking this case to our fellow Americans. And let us do so rationally, calmly, and with an honest regard for our fellow Americans.

Speaking for myself, I believe that once the implications of abortion on demand are fully aired and understood by the American people, they will resolutely seek its abolition. Now, I know there are many who sincerely believe that limiting the right of abortion violates the freedom of choice of the individual. But if the unborn child is a living entity, then there are two individuals, each with the right to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness. Unless and until someone can prove the unborn is not alive -- and all medical evidence indicates it is -- then we must concede the benefit of the doubt to the unborn infant.

But whether it's cutting spending and taxing, shrinking the size of the deficit, ending overregulation, inefficiency, fraud, and waste in government, cracking down on career criminals, revitalizing American education, pressing for prayer and abortion legislation, I think you can see that the agenda we've put before America these past 2 years has been a conservative one. Oh, and there are two other matters that I think you'd be interested in. First, as part of our federalism effort, next week we will be sending to the Congress our proposal for four megablock grants that will return vital prerogatives to the States where they belong. And second, the Office of Management and Budget will press ahead with new regulations prohibiting the use of Federal tax dollars for purposes of political advocacy.

And these important domestic initiatives have been complemented by the conservative ideas we've brought to the pursuit of foreign policy. In the struggle now going on for the world, we have not been afraid to characterize our adversaries for what they are. We have focused world attention on forced labor on the Soviet pipeline and Soviet repression in Poland and all the other nations that make up what is called the ``fourth world'' --  those living under totalitarian rule who long for freedom.

We publicized the evidence of chemical warfare and other atrocities in Cambodia, which we're now supposed to call Kampuchea, and in Afghanistan. We pointed out that totalitarian powers hold a radically different view of morality and human dignity than we do. We must develop a forward strategy for freedom, one based on our hope that someday representative government will be enjoyed by all the people and all the nations of the Earth.

We've been striving to give the world the facts about the international arms race. Ever since our nearly total demobilization after World War II, we in the West have been playing catchup. Yes, there's been an international arms race, as some of the declared Democratic candidates for the Presidency tell us. But let them also tell us, there's only been one side doing the racing.

Those of you in the frontline of the conservative movement can be of special assistance in furthering our strategy for freedom, our fight against totalitarianism. First of all, there is no more important foreign policy initiative in this administration, and none that frightens our adversaries more, than our attempts through our international radios to build constituencies for peace in nations dominated by totalitarian, militaristic regimes. We've proposed to the Congress modest but vitally important expenditures for the Voice of America, Radio Free Europe/Radio Liberty, and Radio Marti. These proposals stalled last year, but with your help we can get them through the Congress this year. And believe me, nothing could mean more to the Poles, Lithuanians, Cubans, and all the millions of others living in that fourth world.

Now, it would be also unconscionable during any discussion of the need for candor in our foreign policy not to mention here the tragic event that last year shocked the world -- the attack on His Holiness, Pope John Paul II -- an act of unspeakable evil, an assault on man and God. It was an international outrage and merits the fullest possible investigation. Tonight, I want to take this opportunity to applaud the courage and resourcefulness of the Government of Italy in bringing this matter to the attention of the world. And, contrary to what some have suggested, you can depend on it, there is no one on our side that is acting embarrassed or feeling embarrassed because they're going ahead with that investigation. We mean to help them.

And, now, Cap, you can breathe easy, because here we come. We must continue to revitalize and strengthen our Armed Forces. Cap Weinberger's been waging an heroic's battle on this front. I'm asking you, the conservative leaders here tonight, to make support for our defense buildup one of your top priorities.

But besides progress in furthering all of these items on the conservative agenda, something else is occurring -- something that someday we conservatives may be very proud happened under our leadership. Even with all our recent economic hardships, I believe a feeling of optimism is now entering the American consciousness, a belief that the days of division and discord are behind us and that an era of unity and national renewal is upon us.

A vivid reminder of how our nation has learned and grown and transcended the tragedies of the past was given to us here in Washington only a few months ago. Last November, on the Mall, between the Lincoln Memorial and the Washington Monument, a new memorial was dedicated -- one of dark, low-lying walls inscribed with the names of those who gave their lives in the Vietnam conflict. Soon, there will be added a sculpture of three infantrymen representing different racial and ethnic backgrounds.

During the dedication ceremonies, the rolls of the missing and dead were read for 3 days, morning till night, in a candlelight ceremony at the National Cathedral. And those veterans of Vietnam who were never welcomed home with speeches and bands, but who were undefeated in battle and were heroes as surely as any who ever fought in a noble cause, staged their own parade on Constitution Avenue.

As America watched them, some in wheelchairs, all of them proud, there was a feeling that as a nation we were coming together, coming together again, and that we had at long last brought the boys home.

Yet, the most valuable lesson of all, the preciousness of human freedom, has been relearned not just by Americans but all the people of the world. It is ``the stark lesson'' that Truongs Nhu Tang, one of the founders of the National Liberation Front, a former Viet Cong minister and vice-minister of the postwar Vietnamese Communist government, spoke of recently when he explained why he fled Vietnam for freedom. ``No previous regime in my country,'' he wrote about the concentration camps and boat people of Vietnam, ``brought such numbers of people to such desperation. Not the military dictators, not the colonialists, not even the ancient Chinese warlords.

It is a lesson that my compatriots and I learned through witnessing and through suffering in our own lives the fate of our countrymen. It is a lesson that must eventually move the conscience of the world.'' This man who had fought on the other side learned the value of freedom only after helping to destroy it and seeing those who had had to give it up.

The task that has fallen to us as Americans is to move the conscience of the world, to keep alive the hope and dream of freedom. For if we fail or falter, there'll be no place for the world's oppressed to flee to. This is not a role we sought. We preach no manifest destiny. But like the Americans who brought a new nation into the world 200 years ago, history has asked much of us in our time. Much we've already given; much more we must be prepared to give.

This is not a task we shrink from; it's a task we welcome. For with the privilege of living in this kindly, pleasant, greening land called America, this land of generous spirit and great ideals, there is also a destiny and a duty, a duty to preserve and hold in sacred trust mankind's age-old aspirations of peace and freedom and a better life for generations to come.

Levitas' subcommittee and the contempt citation of Administrator Gorsuch. The agreement strikes an appropriate balance in that it is consistent with the doctrine of executive privilege, while it also assures that necessary information is made available to the Congress in the legitimate pursuit of its responsibilities. I thank Mr. Levitas for his cooperation and statesmanship in effecting this resolution.

I asserted executive privilege as to the enforcement-sensitive documents because I have a constitutional obligation to the people -- and to those who have held this Office in the past and will hold it in the future -- to ensure that the integrity of sensitive law enforcement documents be preserved.

Under our constitutional system, the legislative branch has a responsibility for oversight and the executive branch has a responsibility for enforcing the laws. Occasionally there is a legitimate dispute over the respective roles of each. This is nothing new -- it has been going on for almost 200 years. In the past the branches have managed to reach compromises that acknowledge and preserve the legitimate interests of each branch. What we both sought to do in these negotiations was to reach a solution which would do that. That is what we have done.

Unlike Abraham Lincoln, Franklin Roosevelt, and most other famous Presidents, Washington was not a great orator or man of words. He was, above all, a man of action and character. His courage, firmness, and integrity first led a ragged, outnumbered army to triumph against the mightiest empire of his time and then guided our infant republic to maturity as the first President of the United States.

George Washington didn't say much, but when he did speak, as both a soldier and a statesman, what he said was worth listening to. As President, in his first annual address to the Congress, he offered a wise piece of advice on defense preparedness that is as timely today as it was when he uttered it nearly two centuries ago.

American families who are already making sacrifices in the recession, or American businesses which are struggling to reinvest for the future, and it isn't easy for someone like me who's dedicated his entire political career to reducing government spending.

On the other hand, it's always very easy and very tempting politically to come up with arguments for neglecting defense spending in time of peace. One of the great tragedies of this century was that it was only after the balance of power was allowed to erode and a ruthless adversary, Adolf Hitler, deliberately weighed the risks and decided to strike that the importance of a strong defense was realized too late. That was what happened in the years leading up to World War II. And especially for those of us who lived through that nightmare, it's a mistake that America and the free world must never make again.

I want you to know that members of my administration and I have agonized over the current defense budget. We've trimmed back our plans for rebuilding defense by more than half. We've hunted for savings in nonessential programs. We've weighed economic risks and economic benefits. The defense budget we finally presented is a minimal budget to protect our country's vital interests and meet our commitments.

First, we must develop a responsible and balanced understanding of the danger we face. Over the past 20 years, the Soviet Union has accumulated enormous military might, while we restrained our own efforts to the point where defense spending actually declined, in real terms, over 20 percent in the decade of the seventies.

Today, the Soviets out-invest us by nearly 2 to 1. Even with the defense increases of the past 2 years, they outproduce us substantially in almost every category of weapons. And in actions such as the brutal invasion and occupation of Afghanistan, they have demonstrated their willingness to use these weapons for aggression.

Finally, Soviet military power has spread around the globe, threatening our access to vital resources and our sea lines of communication, undermining our forward line of defense in Europe and Korea, and challenging us even at home, here in our own hemisphere.

We must face the facts. If we continue our past pattern of only rebuilding our defenses in fits and starts, we will never convince the Soviets that it's in their interests to behave with restraint and negotiate genuine arms reductions. We will also burden the American taxpayer time and again with the high cost of crash rearmament. Sooner or later, the bills fall due.

For instance, our land-based missiles were designed in the 1950's and installed in the sixties, and many of the pilots of our B - 52 bombers are younger than the planes they fly. The fact is these past fits and starts in a decade of neglecting our defenses have left this administration, this Congress, and the American taxpayer stuck with double duty.

We had to act quickly to increase the basic readiness and staying power of our forces so that they could meet any immediate crisis if one arose. At the same time, we have to make up for lost years of investment by undertaking the research and development and the force modernization needed to meet crises that could arise in the future. We simply cannot afford [avoid] performing this double duty unless we're willing to gamble with our immediate security and pass on to future generations the legacy of neglect we inherited. That kind of neglect would only weaken peace and stability in the world, both now and in the years ahead.

I have lived through two world wars. I saw the American people rise to meet these crises, and I have faith in their willingness to come to their nation's defense in the future. But it's far better to prevent a crisis than to have to face it unprepared at the last moment. That's why we have an overriding moral obligation to invest now, this year, in this budget, in restoring America's strength to keep the peace and preserve our freedom.

You know, there was a lot of talk when I first started to run for office about what was someone that had been in show business in Hollywood doing running for office. Well, you just saw a great example of how it pays off. [Laughter] In Hollywood on the set, the floor is laced with chalk marks so the actors will know where they're to arrive at and stand and so forth for various scenes.

Today we celebrate Washington's birthday, and I can't think of a more appropriate occasion to celebrate National Review's heightened profile in the Nation's Capital; for if George Washington was the father of his country, NR has been the father of American conservative intellectual movement. And it's only fitting that at a time when conservative issues and philosophy are finally setting the terms of debate in the halls of government that NR has come to Washington in a big way.

I see a lot of friends in this room tonight, and I hope I'll have a chance to say a personal hello to many of you before I leave. But before I go any further, I just have to say a few words about three people who are very special to me and to NR.

Ladies first. There's a person here tonight who is respected and loved by everyone who's ever had any dealings with National Review. Her official title: managing editor. But I always think of Priscilla Buckley -- and this is with all due respect to Marlon Brando -- as the godmother of National Review. [Laughter] Priscilla, I hope we can count on you to keep the ``East 35th Street irregulars'' in fighting trim for many more years to come.

And then there's an old friend of mine, Bill Rusher. When he's not toying with the idea of a third party, he's always been tireless and a very valued support. [Laughter] I think that all of us who follow his column and who remember his many appearances on ``The Advocates'' appreciate how much the conservative cause owes to the energetic and articulate champion of the principles that we believe in so deeply. Bill, congratulations on your fine work as a conservative leader and your outstanding service as NR's publisher.

But I think you know that National Review is my favorite magazine. I've even paid the ultimate compliment of commandeering two of your longtime contributors, Aram Bakshian and Tony Dolan, on our White House staff. NR isn't a favorite only because it's fought the good fight so long and so well, although that would be reason enough. It's my favorite because it's splendidly written, brilliantly edited, and a pleasure to read. In fact, I honestly believe even if I were to suffer from mental illness or convert to liberalism for some other reason -- [laughter] -- NR would still be my favorite magazine because of its wit and its charm and intellectual quality of its contents.

There's a problem, though, Bill, that I think you should know about. It's all that talk about your being aloof and insensitive and an out-of-touch editor. People are saying that you spend too much time away from New York. They're also saying you're being pushed around by your staff.

But, this is a party, not a political rally. And I think I addressed most of the substantive issues on everyone's mind last Friday at the Conservative Political Action Conference. By the way, has anyone seen any of the poll results from this year's conference?

Let me just close by saying a heartfelt thank you to National Review for all you've done for the values we share and for sending reinforcements to Washington at just the right moment. I know that your heightened presence here will be an aid and inspiration to all of us in the movement in the years ahead. And just by being here you help to make the Nation's Capital a little less of a puzzle palace and a little more like our town.

Congress. And we all know of the events that occurred in Philadelphia, events that changed the course of history. Six long years passed before Washington was again able to return to Mount Vernon for a brief stay on his way to Yorktown. And it took another 2 years before he was able to resign his commission and return to the civilian life of a farmer.

He was again called to Philadelphia, this time for the Constitutional Convention. And then for another 8 years he led his nation -- not as a general, but as the President. In 1797, when he retired at last to his beloved Mount Vernon, he must have felt the deepest satisfaction from knowing that he'd served his country in every capacity it had asked of him.

MX's. And yet, the ends are the same: to secure liberty and peace for the United States and her citizens. And I want you, the descendants of those colonial officers, to know that I will fight to ensure that today's military officers and troops are given what they need to defend themselves and their country.

The values and valor of those Continental soldiers helped to release the freedom this blessed nation now enjoys. The vigilance and training of today's soldiers keep that freedom secure. Yes, meeting the defense budget calls for sacrificing other ways we might like to spend those funds.

I've said before I believe this land was set aside in an uncommon way, that some divine plan must have placed this continent here between the oceans to be found by people from every corner of the Earth, but who had one thing in common, and that was a special love of faith and freedom and peace.

The President. It's a great pleasure to welcome all of you here this morning. We're here to honor one of the foremost statesmen in our hemisphere and certainly our good friend and my good friend, the Prime Minister, Edward Seaga of Jamaica.

Foundation for his efforts to further democratic institutions and the free market economy and for his courageous leadership in the cause of freedom for all people. Few people are more deserving of this tribute than Prime Minister Seaga. People often say that freedom is a worthy ideal and it works. Well, the proof of this axiom is reflected in the achievements in Jamaica of the man we're honoring today.

Before Prime Minister Seaga, there was violence and lawlessness. Now there's peace and growing respect for the law. Before, there was despair about the future. Now there is hope and expectation of better times ahead. In the recent past, the economy was declining. And now, through free enterprise, it is growing. And a short time ago few new jobs were being created, and now there are significant employment opportunities. Without the political and economic freedom characteristic of democratic societies, these results would have been impossible.

Jamaica's demonstrating to its neighbors who share its structural economic problems and resulting political polarization that conditions of freedom and economic opportunity lead to greater prosperity and peace for all. Prime Minister Seaga's accomplishments are not limited to what he's done in Jamaica in just over 2 years. He has long opposed totalitarian inroads in the Caribbean Basin. He has fought for the adherence of Basin States to the principles of free elections, respect for basic human rights, and other democratic ideals that we all cherish.

Long-term prosperity cannot be achieved without internal conditions of political freedom and economic opportunity. But external assistance is often necessary to help overcome structural economic problems that impede development. This is particularly true in Caribbean Basin nations, whose small economies are especially vulnerable to external shocks. Prime Minister Seaga's ideas about the need for outside trade and investment incentives to foster the region's economic development were an important intellectual force contributing to the development of my Caribbean Basin Initiative -- CBI -- proposal to Congress last year.

Prime Minister Seaga has been the CBI's most persistent and eloquent Caribbean Initiative advocate and spokesman. And I am deeply disappointed that the CBI did not pass the Senate last December. Last week, I sent up to Congress some legislation -- on Friday, as a matter of fact -- on the CBI as one of our highest priorities. And I'm hopeful that it will pass quickly in this session. The Congress knows this legislation is essential to help the Basin countries cope with economic difficulties not of their own making if their people are to have a better future.

In giving this prestigious award to Prime Minister Seaga, the Freedoms Foundation is recognizing a true friend of people everywhere who desire a better life through freedom and economic opportunity. And for that reason, he is also a friend of the United States.

I want to thank you, Dr. Miller and Freedoms Foundation, for the honor which you have bestowed on me today. I would, however, like to think of this not as a personal tribute, but as an award based on the friendship that exists between our two peoples.

States whose personal friendship for Jamaica has been translated into many acts of support over the period of the term of office of my administration, acts of support which have helped in no small way to rebuild some of the bridges that had been torn down between our two peoples in a previous time. Notwithstanding this personal dimension, I would like to think of this award as having a wider basis of considerations which account for the broad base of friendship which exists between the Jamaican and the American people.

Historically, we had a good foundation. Our two Founding Fathers were well known and well understood the role of the United States in the hemisphere and the friendship that would naturally exist between our two peoples. Sir Alexander Bustamente, whose own hundredth birthday anniversary we commemorate in a couple of days, was an unabashed friend of the American people. Norman Washington Manley was born on July 4th, and carrying the middle name Washington, I believe, speaks for itself and I need say no more.

Demographically, one of every four Jamaicans live in the United States, and they find themselves at home here because of the wide range of beliefs and values which they, as a people, share with the American people. Politically, we share a common political system -- parliamentary democracy.

Independence by your own Founding Father -- whose 251st anniversary of his birth was commemorated yesterday -- George Washington, in the principle that government must exist by the consent of the governed.

We share a common belief that personal reward is the greatest motivation for personal initiative and effort and that by this system we can best make two blades of grass grow where only one grew before. Our peoples share the objective of betterment of self and family as the strongest driving force to build a prosperous society.

There are differences, because we are not clones of each other. But the commonalities far outweigh these differences. And I had occasion on the well-remembered visit of President Reagan to Jamaica to present him with the text of many popular polls that had been taken in Jamaica over the last several years in which issues involving the United States Government or its people were in point. And we recorded with pleasure that in every such instance by the voluntary vote of the Jamaican people in such polls, the affirmative response to the American people and to the United States Government was in excess of 70 percent as a minimum.

I emphasize this point, because too often our friendship is seen and described in terms of the personal relationship that may exist between myself and your President or political expediency without understanding that a people with a broad, common background must independently of each other strike broad common positions in their own common interests. This broad span of natural common interests and common design is bigger than the Prime Minister of Jamaica. It is bigger than the President of the United States. It is a people thing that is shaped by their own experiences and nurtured by their own voluntary will.

Freedoms Foundation, which has made this award, is devoted to the recognition of struggles for freedom to make nations free and to honor the strengthening of relations. In our own case, we have had to struggle from destructive forces which tested the full strength of our beliefs. And in doing so, we have been able to preserve our own country for freedom and democracy.

It is indivisible, whether it is the great driving force which created the nation that today leads the free world or the beacon which guided Jamaica in its struggles to preserve its own foundations of freedom.

I thank you for that warm welcome and for the high honor that you've bestowed on me. And let me also thank you for the recognition you've given to a distinguished veteran and outstanding legislative leader -- my good friend Bob Michel. I can't think of a more deserving recipient than Bob Michel for the Legion's Distinguished Public Service Award. I also deeply appreciate Commander Keller's recent telegram to me committing the Legion's support for our government's efforts to achieve an accounting of our missing men.

It is always a special pleasure and honor to address the national convention of the Legion. Each meeting is more than a joyous reunion of old comrades from days gone by; it's a reminder of those who cannot be here -- those who gave their last full measure of devotion so that we and our children could enjoy the blessings of freedom in peace.

Boston, I asked for your help, and the help of millions of other Americans, to reverse a dangerous course America had drifted on for too long. I said then that, together, it was our duty to begin to choose a new road -- a road to peace built upon a realistic understanding of our nation's strength and continuing faith in her values. America has chosen that new road. And today I'd like to report on the progress we've made in the past 2 years in our quest for peace and freedom in an uncertain world.

In recent days I have received reports from four senior members of this administration who've returned from assignments that took them to the far corners of the globe. Vice President Bush was warmly received in Europe, where he helped clear up many misconceptions about American policy. Secretary of State Shultz undertook an extensive tour of the Far East. Our Ambassador to the United Nations, Jeane Kirkpatrick, has returned from a mission to South and Central America.

The international situation then was truly alarming for all who cared about America and the cause of peace and freedom. Our country was the target for countless political and terrorist attacks all around the globe. In the view of many of our friends, we had become an uncertain ally; in the view of potential adversaries, we'd become a dubious deterrent to aggression. Our position in the U.N. had eroded to unacceptable levels, and our strength as a world power according to every index -- moral, political, military, economic -- had deteriorated to such an extent that the enemies of democracy and international order felt they could take advantage of this weakness.

The Soviets sent their Cuban mercenaries to Angola and Ethiopia, used chemical weapons against innocent Laotians and Cambodians, and invaded Afghanistan -- all with impunity. Perhaps the most degrading symbol of this dismal situation was the spectacle of Iranian terrorists seizing American hostages and humiliating them and our country for more than a year.

How did all this happen? Well, the answer is: America had simply ceased to be a leader in the world. This was not the exclusive fault of any one leader or party, and it will take a truly bipartisan effort to make things right again.

We were forever competing on territory picked by our adversaries, with the issues and timing all chosen by them. And no one knows better than combat veterans that once you're on the defensive, you can't go forward. The only movement left to you is retreat.

They were ashamed that America was wealthy in a world with so much poverty. They rarely, if ever, explained that America's wealth came not from exploitation or mere good luck, but from the hard work of the American people, from risk-taking by American investors, from the creativity of American inventors and entrepreneurs, and a free system of incentives.

Too many of our leaders saw the Soviets as a mirror image of themselves. If we would simply disarm, the Soviets would do likewise. They spent all their time viewing the world the way they wished it was, not the way it really is. And that's no way to protect the peace.

Their approach ignored the central focus of politics -- the minds, hearts, sympathies, fears, hopes, and aspirations not of governments, but of people. The 20th century has witnessed and America has led the way in the rising participation of all the people in international politics. Yet, even in this age of mass communications, too many of our leaders ignored this critical dimension.

Too many of our policymakers had lost touch with changing world realities. They failed to realize that to be an effective force for peace today, America must successfully appeal to the sympathies of the world's people -- the global electorate. We can't simply be anti-this and anti-that. We can't simply react defensively to the political proposals of others, sometimes criticizing them, sometimes accommodating them, without positive alternative solutions to basic human problems.

Fortunately, the American people sensed this dangerous drift, and by 1980, a national reawakening was underway -- a reawakening that resulted in a new sense of responsibility, a new sense of confidence in America and the universal principles and ideals on which our free system is based.

It's not an arrogant demand that others adopt our ways. It's a realistic belief in the relative and proven success of the American experiment. What we see in America today, in spite of the many economic hardships we're facing, is a renewed faith in the rightness of our system. That system has never failed us. We have failed the system every time we forgot the fundamental principles upon which it was based.

For America to play its proper role in the world, we had to set our own house in order. Our first and highest priority was to restore a sound economic base here at home. We had to put an end to the inflationary spiral which had been scourging this country for years, creating misery among those who have to survive on fixed incomes, destroying long-term capital markets, and mortgaging the future of our children and grandchildren. Then we had to lay the foundation for a recovery which would be based on sustainable growth without unleashing the inflationary monster again on ourselves and the world.

The other essential precondition of a strengthened and purposeful foreign policy was the rebuilding of our foundation of our military strength. ``To be prepared for war,'' George Washington said, ``is . . . the most effectual means of preserving peace.'' Well, it's precisely because we're committed to peace that we have a moral obligation to ensure America's defense credibility.

Now, I realize that many well-meaning people deplore the expenditure of huge sums of money for military purposes at a time of economic hardship. Similar voices were heard in the 1930's, when economic conditions were far worse than anything we're experiencing today. But the result of heeding those voices then was a disastrous military imbalance that tempted the forces of tyranny and evil and plunged the world into a ruinous war. Possibly some of you remember drilling with wooden guns and doing maneuvers with cardboard tanks. We must never repeat that experience.

Now, for two decades the Soviet Union has been engaged in building up the most powerful military forces in all man's history. During this period, the United States limited its own military spending to the point that our investment in defense actually declined in real terms while Soviet investment was nearly double our own during the decade of the seventies. Neither our limiting or canceling of important weapon systems nor the efforts of a decade's worth of arms control agreements and negotiations have stopped or even slowed the Soviet leadership's pursuit of global military superiority.

Well, 2 years ago, we began the long, tough job of rebuilding America's defenses after those years of systematic underfunding and neglect. And today we're on the verge of putting in place a defense program adequate to our security needs. If we show the resolve to sustain the necessary levels of military spending, and with your support and that of millions of other concerned citizens, we can -- we can restore balance and deterrence, and we can better protect the peace.

Pursuing a policy of honesty and realism toward the Soviets doesn't mean the productive relations between our two nations are impossible. What is required for such relations is restraint and reciprocity. Restraint must be demonstrated not only by words but by deeds. We respect international law and the independence of other peoples. The Soviets need only respond in kind.

Fortunately, America is far from alone in its quest for peaceful, prosperous, and humane international order. With us stand our friends and allies, in particular the democracies of Europe, of Latin America, Asia, and the Pacific. With us in spirit also are millions of people in Poland and other Soviet-dominated countries, as well as in the Soviet empire itself.

I received a snapshot the other day that had been smuggled out of Poland. And I was so proud. It was smuggled out just for the purpose of delivering it to me. It was a picture, a little photograph snapshot of a tiny little girl and a small boy holding a cardboard sign on which was printed things in Polish, and they sent the translation. It said, ``Our father is sitting in prison for Solidarity.'' And the look of sorrow, of pathos on the little girl's face was the most touching thing you can imagine.

Maintenance of our allied partnerships is a key to our foreign policy. The bedrock of European security remains the NATO alliance. NATO is not just a military alliance; it's a voluntary political community of free men and women based on shared principles and a common history. The ties that bind us to our European allies are not the brittle ties of expediency or the weighty shackles of compulsion. They resemble what Abraham Lincoln called the ``mystic chords of memory'' uniting peoples who share a common vision. So, let there be no doubt on either side of the Atlantic: The freedom and independence of America's allies remain as dear to us as our own.

Their growing nuclear threat to Europe, especially since the midseventies, has a political as well as a military purpose, the deliberate fostering of a sense of insecurity among the peoples of Western Europe and pressure for accommodation to the Soviet power.

The ultimate Soviet goal in Europe is to force the nations to accommodate themselves to Soviet interests on Soviet terms. We should all know just what those terms are. We need look no further than the Berlin Wall and the Iron Curtain. The truth is something that we and our NATO allies must not hesitate to use to counter the slurs and threats made against us.

Speaking the truth was one of the primary missions accomplished by Vice President Bush in his recent European trip. He cleared the air of misinformation, indeed, of deliberate falsehoods. He reaffirmed America's fundamental commitment to peace. We're not in the business of imperialism, aggression, or conquest. We threaten no one. Soviet leaders know full well there is no political constituency in the United States or anywhere in the West for aggressive military action against them.

Vice President Bush reaffirmed our commitment to serious, mutual, and verifiable arms reductions. Our proposal is a serious one. And it represents real arms reduction, not merely the ratification of existing levels of weaponry on both sides.

Finally, he conveyed our belief that success in reducing significantly the strategic arsenals of both sides depends on continued Allied unity and a determination to face and speak the truth about the threat confronting us.

I have a deep, personal commitment to achieving an arms reduction agreement at the negotiations in Geneva on intermediate-range nuclear forces. We and our allies are in full agreement that the proposal that I have made for the complete elimination of the entire class of longer range, land-based INF missiles remains the best and most moral outcome. We're negotiating in good faith in Geneva, and ours is not a take-it-or-leave-it proposal. Our negotiations in Geneva are premised upon sound principles, supported by all the allies after long and careful consultation.

These principles include: The only basis on which a fair agreement can be reached is that of equality of rights and limits between the U.S. and the Soviet Union. As a corollary, British and French strategic systems are, by definition, not a part of these bilateral negotiations and, therefore, not to be considered in them. In addition, Soviet proposals which have the effect of shifting the threat from Europe to Asia cannot be considered reasonable. And finally, as in all areas of arms control, it will be essential that an INF agreement be underwritten by effective measures for verification.

Now, we view these negotiations as offering the best hope of assuring peace and stability through the reduction of INF systems. Toward that end, Ambassador Nitze has been instructed to explore in Geneva every proposed solution consistent with the principles to which the alliance subscribes.

Any discussion of alliances, friends, and concerns of the United States must give special attention to Asia. The U.S.-Japanese relationship remains the centerpiece of our Asian policy. Together, the United States and Japan can make an enormous contribution to the economic dynamism and technological progress needed for economic growth and development throughout the world. In Asia itself, we continue to strengthen our partnership in support of peace. Prime Minister Nakasone and I affirmed our commitment to this partnership during his recent visit to Washington. Secretary Shultz' visit to Tokyo underscored it.

Our relationship with the People's Republic of China is another important one, not only for stability and peace in Asia but around the globe. During his visit to Beijing, Secretary Shultz and -- many hours of frank and useful discussions with Chinese leaders. The most important thing to emerge from these talks was that, despite our differences, it is clear that both sides value this relationship and are committed to improve it.

As we rebuild our relationship with China, we will not forget our other friends in the area. We are committed to maintaining our relationship with the people of Taiwan, with whom we've had a long and honorable association.

Incidentally, I must say, Secretary Shultz went up to the dividing line -- the demilitarized zone and met with our troops up there, some of whom were just going out on patrol for the night in that zone. And he came back with such glowing stories of the morale and the esprit de corps of our men there. And I've heard the same from the European theater. We need have no concern about the will and determination of our sons around the world who are representing -- [applause].

I wonder if I could take a second -- I didn't intend to do this and I've told it to some other people before. But it's a letter I received from one of our ambassadors in Europe. He had been up in the East German frontier visiting the Second Armored Calvary Regiment. And he spoke glowingly of them. But in his letter he said that when he went to his helicopter, he was followed by a 19-year-old trooper who asked him if he thought he could get a message to me. Well being an ambassador, he allowed as how he could. [Laughter] The kid stood there and then said, ``Mr.

But in many of the important regions of the world, active conflicts take innocent lives, stunt economic growth, and block social progress. The United States has a unique ability and responsibility to work for peace in these regions.

In the Middle East, we're working to convince the peoples of the area that lasting peace and security can only come through direct negotiations, not the use of armed force. A secure and lasting peace for Israel and its Arab neighbors, including a resolution of the Palestinian problem that satisfies the people's legitimate rights, is a fundamental objective of our foreign policy.

We've launched a new initiative designed to accelerate and broaden the negotiation process begun at Camp David. That process fulfilled the principle of exchanging occupied territory for peace between Israel and Egypt. Today, I repeat my call to the Arab world to accept the reality of Israel, the reality that peace and justice are to be gained only through direct negotiation. King Hussein should be supported in his effort to bring together a joint Jordanian-Palestinian team to negotiate the future of the West Bank, Gaza, and Jerusalem.

We also continue to work for the total withdrawal of all foreign forces from Lebanon so that country can once again be an independent sovereign state. We call on Syria, the PLO, and Israel to withdraw their forces from Lebanon in the shortest possible time. A continued occupation of Lebanon by these forces can only serve the interests of those who wish to undermine the cause of peace.

This administration is prepared to take all necessary measures to guarantee the security of Israel's northern borders in the aftermath of complete withdrawal of the Israeli Army. But peace can only evolve through freely negotiated agreements, not solutions imposed by force.

The world's going through a period of great economic instability, one that poses significant dangers to world security. We and our allies must demonstrate the political courage to cooperate in undertaking the necessary remedies, particularly when these remedies require near-term sacrifices. Never has it been more true that we will all hang separately if we do not hang together.

A key element of our relationship with countries around the world is the economic link that unites us with trading partners. I'll not go into great detail today about the international economic and trade policies. But one point I want to make is that it is and will be our policy to oppose protectionism at home and abroad and to foster the continued pattern of ever freer trade which has served the world so well. And it must also be fair trade.

Closely related to the trade and economic component of our foreign policy is our relationship with the developing world. I'm convinced that the time has come for this country and others to address the problems of the developing nations in a more forthright and less patronizing way. The fact is that massive infusions of foreign aid have proven not only ineffective in stimulating economic development in the Third World; in many cases they've actually been counterproductive. That kind of foreign aid is nothing more than welfare payments on a global scale and is just as ineffectual and degrading.

Our economic assistance must be carefully targeted and must make maximum use of the energy and efforts of the private sector. This philosophy is reflected in the Caribbean Basin Initiative I announced a year ago. Its goal is to combine trade, aid, and incentives for investment into a balanced arrangement that encourages self-help for the people of the Caribbean Basin. Again and again, leaders of these countries have told me that they don't want a handout, only help to improve their own lives by their own efforts.

An important part of such help is exposure to the effective management practices and economic thinking that contribute so much to successful development in the advanced economies like our own. There is no more damaging misconception than the notion that capitalism is an economic system benefiting only the rich. Economic freedom is the world's mightiest engine for abundance and social justice. In our own country it has created more wealth and distributed it more widely among our people than in any other society known to man. Developing countries need to be encouraged to experiment with the growing variety of arrangements for profitsharing and expanded capital ownership that can bring economic betterment to their people.

When countries must divert their scarce resources from economic development in order to fight imported terrorism or guerrilla warfare, economic progress is hard to come by. Security assistance, therefore, is an integral part of our aid policy with respect to Latin America and the developing world in general.

America is too close to us and our strategic stake in the Caribbean sealanes and the Panama Canal is too great for us to ignore reality. The specter of Marxist-Leninist controlled governments in Central America with ideological and political loyalties to Cuba and the Soviet Union poses a direct challenge to which we must respond. Poverty together with social and political instability make a volatile combination which the new colonialists of the totalitarian left are trying to exploit for their own cynical purposes.

The reaffirmation of democracy in Costa Rica in their elections of last year, the transition from military rule to elected civilian government in Honduras, and the launching of democracy in El Salvador with the successful elections last March prove that we're on the right course. Thanks to this progress, Marxist revolution is no longer seen as the inevitable future of Central America.

But economic reform needs time to work, and democracy must be nurtured in countries where it doesn't have long traditions. We must ensure that the governments of El Salvador and other Central American countries can defend themselves against the Marxist guerrillas and [who] receive guns, training, and money through Cuba and Nicaragua. The United States cannot and will not allow Marxist terrorism and subversion to prevail in Central America.

At the same time, we will continue, through our own efforts and through supporting efforts by other democracies of Latin America, to explore all possibilities for reconciliation and peace in Central America. But let me make it plain: There we will never abandon our friends, and we will never abandon our conviction that legitimate political power can be gained through competition at the ballot box in free, open, and orderly elections.

Ambassador Kirkpatrick, on her recent trip to Latin America, engaged in extensive consultations with leaders of the region and assured them that we would pursue our common efforts to foster economic development, assist with security concerns, and strengthen the forces of freedom.

Last June, when I addressed the British Parliament, I outlined the all-embracing goal of our foreign policy. I observed that Americans have a positive vision of the future, of the world -- a realistic and idealistic vision. We want to see a world that lives in peace and freedom under the consent of the governed. So far, however, we and the other democracies haven't done a very good job of explaining democracy and free economy to emerging nations.

Some people argue that any attempt to do that represents interference in the affairs of others, an attempt to impose our way of life. Well, it's nothing of the kind. Every nation has the right to determine its own destiny. But to deny the democratic values and that they have any relevance to the developing world today, or to the millions of people who are oppressed by Communist domination, is to reject the universal significance of the basic, timeless credo that all men are created equal and that they're endowed by their Creator with certain inalienable rights.

People living today in Africa, in Latin America, in Central Asia, possess the same inalienable right to choose their own governors and decide their own destiny as we do. By wedding the timeless truths and values Americans have always cherished to the realities of today's world, we have forged the beginnings of a fundamentally new direction in American foreign policy -- a policy based on the unashamed, unapologetic explaining of our own priceless free institutions and proof that they work and describing the social and economic progress they so uniquely foster.

History is not a darkening path twisting inevitably toward tyranny, as the forces of totalitarianism would have us believe. Indeed, the one clear pattern in world events -- a pattern that's grown with each passing year of this century -- is in the opposite direction. It is the growing determination of men and women of all races and conditions to gain control of their own destinies and to free themselves from arbitrary domination. More than any other single force, this is the driving aspiration that unites the human family today -- the burning desire to live unhindered in a world that respects the rights of individuals and nations. Now, I'll admit we're wrong when we have to put barbed wire up to keep our people from leaving this country.

Nothing makes me prouder of the country that I serve than the fact that, once again, America leads the vanguard of this movement. So, let's turn off and tune out on those voices which for too long would have us cringing under the weight of a guilt complex.

It is America that works closely with the American frontline -- or the African frontline states, I should say -- and our European allies for peace in southern Africa, and that worked tirelessly with both Britain and Argentina to seek a peaceful resolution of the conflict in the South Atlantic.

It is America that encourages the trend toward democracy in Latin America and elsewhere in the world, and cooperates with the Muslim countries and all those who want an end to the brutal Soviet occupation of Afghanistan.

For all the stress and strain of recent ordeals, the United States is still a young nation, a nation that draws renewed strength not only from its material abundance and economic might but from free ideals that are as vibrant today as they were more than two centuries ago when that small but gallant band we call our Founding Fathers pledged their lives, their fortunes, and their sacred honor to win freedom and independence.

My fellow legionnaires, the American dream lives -- not only in the hearts and minds of our own countrymen but in the hearts and minds of millions of the world's people in both free and oppressed societies who look to us for leadership. As long as that dream lives, as long as we continue to defend it, America has a future, and all mankind has reason to hope.

America, and in order to eliminate a mechanism for interagency and intergovernmental coordination which is no longer needed, it is hereby ordered that Executive Order No. 12314, establishing the Federal Regional Councils, is revoked.

The administration has undertaken a series of initiatives over the past year to strengthen the U.S. merchant fleet. The Department of Transportation and other agencies have cooperated on efforts to reduce the regulatory burden on U.S. shipbuilders and ship operators. The administration has also supported the maritime industry's efforts to streamline the liner conference structure.

The U.S. maritime industry has been particularly hard-hit by the recession from which our economy is now emerging. The unique circumstances surrounding our competitive sale to Egypt of wheat flour provided an opportunity to ensure that the U.S. merchant fleet will remain a vital force in shipping the products that U.S. farmers grow for the world market.

President, as to whether you'd be running or not. In fact, he said he needed it very badly. And I just wondered, perhaps, could you help the poor fellow out this morning? A signal whether you're going to run or not.

The President. I think -- no, I've said repeatedly, I think there is a timing to this. And I think that the people sort of indicate and help in making up the decision. I think to do it too early leaves you open to the charge that everything you try to do is based on politics. And if you say the other way too soon, why, you're a lameduck prematurely. So, I think it's a decision that I will come to and I will make at what I think is the appropriate time.

Q. Mr. President, Rick Smith, New York Times. You said yesterday in your speech that your government was prepared to do everything that was necessary to help secure Israel's northern frontier. What does that mean, Mr. President? Does that involve putting American marines or troops down in southern Lebanon to police that area? Or does that involve some kind of international arrangement? Did you have specific ideas in mind?

The President. Well, yes. This isn't anything different than has been said before by me and by several Presidents before me, that this country has always maintained that it has an obligation to the security of Israel. But in this particular instance, I was answering the question, and I thought I made it plain that I was talking about with the withdrawal -- that in the aftermath of that withdrawal, we were prepared to guarantee their safety on the northern border.

Let me recall to you that that was the reason for the invasion in the first place, that there was shelling and rocketing across that border, taking its toll of casualties in Israel. And our idea of trying to settle the Lebanon thing before we get into the actual peace negotiations, I think, is a sound one, after all the years of disruption there, to give the Government of Lebanon a chance to stabilize its country and assume its control and sovereignty over its own territory.

Now, in that instance, I have already said that we, in consultation with our allies in the multinational force, would be prepared until Lebanon was actually stabilized and able to guarantee this safety, that we would be willing to enlarge the multinational forces. This is, of course, in consultation with our allies, as I said before, and, thus, ensure the safety of those borders until this process is completed, until Lebanon is ready to take over the protection of its own borders.

The President. Well, Jack, I've always kind of held to a rule that until it's -- I'll talk about vetoes in general principle. But until it actually gets to my desk, I've always said in the legislative process, sometimes an orange becomes an apple. And I'll wait and make that decision. But I do think that they're entirely wrong. And I think that a great lobbying effort has resulted in much distortion.

First of all, if anyone looks at the withholding that we imposed, it, first of all, protects all those people that they seem to be worrying about at the lower level of earnings. It protects all the senior citizens, everyone over 65. They would not be affected by this.

And it's not aimed in any way at increasing tax, as has been mistakenly reported, on the people that are receiving these interest and dividend revenues. It is aimed at catching the people that are using this device to avoid paying an income tax they legitimately owe. And we have found that that is one of the big parts of our noncollection of taxes that are owed. And this, we figured, was only fair to the people that are going out there and paying their taxes, to see if we couldn't get a handle on those that are avoiding it.

The President. Well, if it will improve the credibility, one thing, yes, we're -- any of the allegations, any of the accusations -- and I must say that I haven't found much substantiation accompanying those -- but any of those are immediately turned over to the Justice Department, and the FBI is investigating and tracking down every charge that's been made. We have worked out this arrangement now while protecting executive privilege, but at the same time, because of some of these charges, and we want the people to have confidence that they will have access.

The other thing that I've been struck by in all of this -- that so little attention has been paid to the fact that from the very beginning, the director of EPA was willing to make available to the Congress almost 800,000 documents, and fewer than a hundred, the tiniest fraction of a percent, were withheld because -- and on the advice of the Justice Department also that these were investigative reports and that these were things that could compromise litigation that might take place.

Now, this arrangement, as I say, has been made. But I don't feel that I have the right, in custody temporarily of this institution, the Presidency, to set a precedent that takes away from that institution some of its legitimate rights and functions. And one of those is executive privilege.

Q. Mr. President, I'm Andy Glass of the Cox Newspapers. Picking a convenient reference point like Budge's 15th anniversary breakfast, which would have been very early in your Presidency, and looking back to that time when you had just come here, can you assess in your own mind and your own feelings how you think you've done in these 2 years since -- what your disappointments are, what your, perhaps, accomplishments, as you see them -- a self-report card, if you will?

The President. Well, a disappointment would be that we didn't get all the things we asked for in our economic proposals. I think we'd be better off today if we had. But I'm pleased that we got as much as we did.

I've had 8 years experience, almost 8 years, as a Governor, with a legislature of the opposite party. So, I knew exactly what I was up against. But I think the very fact that the debate has changed from people of my persuasion, the Republican Party, fighting rearguard actions trying to slow down the growth of government and halt the imposition of new social engineering programs -- the debate today isn't whether to reduce spending; it's how much to reduce it -- and I think we've changed the whole tone of the debate that has been taking place over the last few decades.

But we have made progress. We have sizably reduced the percentage of increase in government spending. You don't come in -- I don't think there's any way that you come in and actually reverse spending and come in with a budget of less money than was spent the year before, and certainly not in a time of inflation. But we have brought inflation down.

The last few months it was running at only a 1.1 annualized rate, 3.9 percent for the year, down from double digits. That, in turn, brought down the interest rates. The economy has started to turn. And I've just noticed that Time magazine's whole battery of economists has substantiated that and are referring to the recession as being over.

I think that in that, in the foreign policy we were quite amazed at how much in disarray we were back at the beginning of this administration, what we found with regard to the feeling of our allies, our relationship with Latin America neighbors and our defense posture. And I think there's been a drastic turnaround in that. I don't think relations have ever been better between us and our European allies and Japan. We've made progress -- our relations over in Asia -- and there's no question about the improvement of our defense posture.

Q. Mr. President, I'm Bart Rowen of the Washington Post. I'd like to ask you, sir, a question about summits. Secretary Shultz said the other day that there's no -- there would be no fixed agenda for the meeting in Williamsburg, that the basic idea is for you and other heads of states to have a chance to have a private meeting, private exchange of ideas together. I'd like to ask you, first, what you expect to accomplish, specifically, at Williamsburg and, secondly, in light of your experiences in Ottawa, Cancun, and in Versailles, whether you think that summitry -- is it still a useful tool in the formulation of goals and strategies for governments?

The President. Yes, I do. I have always believed that you only get in trouble when you're talking about each other, not when you're talking to each other. And the reason for this change is because some of the summitries became so formalized and, by the time people organizing at the ministerial level had finished their chores, you found that you were actually arguing about the communique that would be released, summing up what had been done at the summit. And you were talking and arguing about that before the summit had started. And it became very formalized.

Now, we're all in that summit on a first-name basis. And some of us informally talking in the previous summits have talked about why not have a meeting and get around the table and just throw the subjects out on the table, what are the things that are of concern to us, what are the things we think we can do together, and so forth. And so, being the host this time and, therefore, having a voice in that, I communicated with my colleagues in the other countries on that basis.

Yes, there are always points of difference and things that have to be ironed out. But there are also things which we're in great agreement on. So, we're not going to have that kind of a formal agenda. We're going to treat with all the problems that are of concern to all of us, whether they have to do with trade, whether they have to do with our mutual defense posture, all of those things.

Q. The Social Security Commission recommended that the full retirement age be increased to 66 after the year 2000, and that legislation be enacted promptly so that people could plan on that. I haven't heard you express your view on that recommendation. Do you endorse it?

The President. Well, Ted, I have to tell you that from our first attempts to do something about the fiscal integrity of social security more than a year ago and the way in which that was immediately and instantly transformed into a political football, I decided this time to make a fair catch and then just fall on the ball.

We have approved the bipartisan commission report for the immediate fiscal problem. We do know that there is now the long-range problem that has not been completely solved. And, rather than make a specific answer there, let me say that we know and are going to be ready to go into, again, study and, hopefully, as bipartisan as this first agreement, as to how we meet that long-range, actuarial imbalance. Now, I'm convinced that things like that -- extending the age -- will be under consideration. No decisions, of course, have been made, and I think it'd be wrong for me in advance of any such negotiations to start talking about them.

But I think there's a great deal of logic in something of that kind, when you stop to think that when social security started -- and quoting the man who created it, who's in his nineties now and who recently had a full-page statement in the Washington Post, that he was revealing the mistakes that they had made in the beginning. And one of them was that longevity was so much less than it is now that they didn't think very many people would get to the age 65 to claim their social security payments. Well, we know how much we've improved in longevity, and I think that it's only right that we should look at that. Is 65 now a proper age when we legally have turned to the age 70 as now a legitimate age for retirement?

Q. Pat Furgurson of the Baltimore Sun. To return to the EPA, which is such a hot subject now, there are some suggestions and some bills being formulated on the Hill to remove the EPA from partisan politics by putting it under supervision of an independent commission similar to other regulatory commissions. What is your reaction to that idea?

The President. My reaction is that it's the wrong way to go. I think that the more government is in the hands of elected representatives of the people and the less it is in the hands of appointed and bureaucratic, permanent structure of government, who are not beholden to the voters and not held responsible or can't be held responsible by them, I think that we improve. I believe that some of the things that are being suggested are part of the same age-old battle between the branches of government, in which the legislative seeks again to reduce some of the rights and powers of the Presidency.

Now, in the overall question of the EPA and what is at issue, it seems to me that once again we're falling in -- as I said the other night in the press conference -- to that trap of running as if the sky is falling, just on the basis of accusations, without waiting to see if there is merit in the accusation or if there is any substance back of it. The EPA has, in truth, done a fine job. We came in and found a backlog, for example, in air pollution -- violations of hundreds of cases. That backlog has been totally eliminated now and a solution found for those problems.

I mentioned earlier the number of documents that we were willing to make available; the fact that we have turned anything that has to do with a charge or accusation over to the Justice Department or the FBI for investigation; and my own statement that I would never employ executive privilege to try and cover up any wrongdoing. So, I think that they're getting way ahead of themselves in what they're suggesting with that kind of a measure.

The President. No, because from the very beginning, before the Press Club when I made the first proposal about our INF policy and our desire, our goal to try and get zero option, total elimination of that class of weapons and wipe them out of the world, I also said then and have reiterated it many times that we, on the other hand, were going there to negotiate and would negotiate in good faith on any reasonable proposal, any legitimate proposal that might be presented. And we're still willing to do that.

We still believe that the morality of the position we first took, that that goal should be the ultimate goal for all of us, to get rid of the most destabilizing weapons in the world, interballistic missiles -- or ballistic missiles, I should say, of an intermediate range, in which in a matter of just 5 to 7 seconds are zeroed in on virtually every target in Europe, but only from one side.

Now, so far, the Soviet Union has seemed to want to continue its monopoly, that they have shown evidences of being willing to reduce to a certain extent their weapons, but in return for that, we would have to remain at zero. I just think this is a threat that we can't tolerate.

Q. My followup. Does that mean, sir, that the Nitze proposals, as far as this government is concerned, are still in play? (A) And, (B), in view of the distinction you've just made between short warning and more lengthy ones, do you make a distinction between the Pershings, that are in our original proposal, and the cruise, which take longer to arrive?

The President. Well, there's a very great difference between the two weapons. One of them takes several hours to get where the other gets in several seconds [minutes]. But I'm not sure, Joe, that I understand just what proposal you're referring to from Nitze.

Q. Paul Nitze, I believe, went for a walk with the Soviet delegate and aired a fairly -- it's now been aired pretty widely -- a proposal that I think is not in conflict with the four principles you enunciated. And my question really goes to the issue of whether, from your point of view, the Nitze proposals are still alive.

Q. Mr. President, Bob Thompson of the Hearst Newspapers. About 3 weeks ago your two most recent predecessors, Mr. Carter and Mr. Ford, got together out at Grand Rapids. And they took issue with your proclivity for condemning everything that happened before you got to the White House and blaming them. I have two parts to this. First of all, do you think you blame them too much? Are you ready to stop that? And, number two, are you ready to take responsibility after more than 2 years for what now goes on in this nation, economically and socially and whatnot?

The President. Well, I'll take responsibility for the fact that the interest rates have come down, inflation has come down, the economy is turning around, the housing starts are up to a figure that they haven't been since 1979. I'll be very happy to take responsibility for that.

I have pointed out at times that those people that say that my economic proposals were responsible for everything that happened from January 20th on -- well, you come into office well into the fiscal year with a budget you inherited from the previous administration. There isn't anything, other than we did manage with some management improvements to whittle down by a few billion dollars the budget we'd inherited, the spending proposed. But the economy falling off the cliff, which I think was a continuation of a recession that started in 1979, took place in July.

Incidentally, let me correct one thing. I find that, while it was indicated that -- and there was agreement on some things between the two gentlemen -- Mr. Ford was not a party to the statement about my blaming the previous administrations. In fact, he himself is quite outspoken about the fact that, when he was seeking reelection in `76, that the Carter administration invented the misery index, which came about from adding unemployment to the rate of inflation. And his statement was that no man with a misery index of 12\1/2\ percent had a right to run for the Presidency. But when I ran for the Presidency, Mr. Carter's misery index was up to 19\1/2\. And we have now brought it down somewhere in the vicinity of what it was back in 1976, before he took office.

But I'm trying to get along and to be bipartisan, but I think that it's only fair, when you're accused of being responsible for 21\1/2\-percent interest rates and they were that high before you got here, that you point that out.

The President. I wish I had an answer on that. I must say that is, in economic circles, I know, is one of the great debates that will go on and on. You can point back to history and show that fiat money has never been successful, and in reality, that's what we have is fiat money now. We've had a study that's been going forward on that, and there are many variations of what could be done in partially, let's say, getting metallic money back in circulation.

I can't give you an answer on that, because, as I say, it's something that we're all of us looking at and wondering about. There does seem to be more sentiment against it in this modern day than there is for it.

Q. Could I ask you if you think it would be a good idea, well short of that, to summon an international monetary conference in the near future to discuss the swings in exchange fluctuations and the other difficulties in the financial -- international financial structure?

Q. Mr. President, Jack Nelson of the Los Angeles Times. Some defense officials have expressed concern that the buildup of Soviet missiles in Syria might provoke Israel into making what they would consider a preemptive strike. And now Moshe Arens, the new Defense Minister of Israel, has said that he considers it to be a very unpleasant situation and that if Israel does determine that there's a mortal threat, they would not rule out making a preemptive strike, as they have in the past. I wonder if you share that concern and if the United States is looking at anything that might help address the question of whether there is a military imbalance caused by this missile buildup?

Israelis have proven very much their own military capability in that area. But, yes, it is an alarming situation, all of what's going on. And I think that what we have proposed and what we're trying to accomplish is the answer to it: Get all the foreign forces out of Lebanon, and then immediately proceed with peace negotiations. And we have been working with the Arab nations; we've been working with the Israelis. We believe that the time is now, that there is a feeling on the part of everyone there that peace is the answer to the problems in the Middle East.

The President. No, I don't agree. I think time is not on our side in this. And I believe there's no reason why -- with the proposals that we've made that the PLO remnants that are still in Lebanon, the Syrians, and the Israelis -- why they can't get out of that country -- of Lebanon, and let the Lebanese Government try to reestablish itself and establish sovereignty over its own land.

Q. May I follow up one more time? Do you think this should be done, in other words, before a peace treaty is reached between Israel and Lebanon? And do you think there should be a specific deadline that you might mention?

The President. I think that to wait for a peace treaty for the withdrawal of forces is wrong. And I think that that can come about and, I think, full normalization. I think there can be an agreement, an informal agreement there about what they're going to do with regard to withdrawal and the terms of the border. And, as I say, our own willingness then to help in ensuring that there can't be incidents across that border is enough -- and then settle down to the business of full, formal normalization with Lebanon. But the longer we delay in this, the more we endanger the possibility of moving on into the general peace discussions.

Q. You asked for 5.8 billion for the International Monetary Fund, and this has been widely criticized as a bailout for the Western banks. And I wondered how, in a time of recession and unemployment, you're going to sell this to the Congress and to the American public?

The IMF -- it's not a bailout -- the IMF is serving a very useful purpose in this time in which the whole world, the international banking situation is walking a tightrope. The IMF makes kind of short-term, brief loans to enable countries to get hold of their own financial situation again and not have to come to the point of defaulting on their loans. And it's served a very useful purpose.

So, I think if the people understood properly that this isn't $8\1/2\ billion cash that we're going to take out of our funds or add to a deficit -- this is a kind of paper transaction underwriting a guarantee.

The President. Well now, I'm trying to recall what words I said about that. I've made a lot of speeches since that one. I don't think I singled it out for any other purpose than that energy is directly related to your industrial capacity, your industrial output.

As to the agenda of natural gas and decontrol, we are in consultation with leaders on the Hill and people in the committees that have to do with that, the energy committees, because when you look at the record of what decontrol of oil did when -- I do recall that there was a great deal said about gasoline prices going to $2 a gallon if we decontrolled, and now everyone seems to be distressed because they're below a dollar.

Q. In your economic report a few weeks ago, you said that high unemployment was a necessary price that had to be paid for wringing the inflation out of the economy. Now, I don't remember that you talked about that kind of pain when you ran for President in 1980. In fact, I think you talked about restoring the jobs that had already been lost at that time. And I wonder, sir, if you would concede that, in fact, you were at least slightly overly optimistic in your 1980 campaign?

The President. No, in the 1980 proposals that I made during the campaign for the economic program that we later put in effect, that was based on all the economic projections that we could get from the best people in that field. By the time of the election and before the Inauguration, economic conditions had so worsened that what I had said in October was no longer appropriate.

I think that what happened was that pulling the string on the money supply for the first several months of 1981, maintaining the high interest rates, just continued what had already started, which was the almost closing down of the automobile market and housing -- either one of which can start a recession all by itself. And so, we had this increased unemployment. But remember, unemployment had been increasing for a long period of time.

I, myself, referred to it when -- in the campaign in some of the towns in Michigan. Unemployment from Detroit to Flint and so forth was ranging anywhere from 18 to 20 percent. In a city in Indiana, dependent on the automobile industry, it was more than 20 percent. And, of course, steel and the associated industries from that and housing, from the sheer inability of people to buy a car on time or to get a mortgage for a house -- all, then, the associated industries were beginning to grind down and lay people off. No one that I know of projected that severe slump that took place in July. And about 50 percent today of the anticipated deficits is due to that slump.

We think, and there are a great many people outside -- we're going to stick with our conservative proposals for recovery and hope we'll be happily surprised. But almost every economic authority, every one who reads the signs, believes that recovery is going to be better than we projected. But to suggest that you deliberately created unemployment to lower inflation just isn't true. And, frankly, I'm not sure that anyone has really established a solid connection between unemployment and inflation.

Senator Tower recently has written to his fellow Senators asking them to nominate bases to be closed in their States and/or contracts to be aborted for defense work in their States. As far as I know, only Dale Bumpers of Arkansas, who doesn't want a nerve gas plant in his State, has responded. My question: Have you had any volunteers from either the Senate or the House in this connection?

The President. Well, in the first place, with regard to the Representatives and the Senators and their areas: No, I haven't had any volunteers. I think that John Tower thought that was probably a very good idea, since some of the loudest squawkers against defense spending seem to squawk just as loudly if you suggested that the reduction of some of that spending in their particular district might take place. And I thought it was a good idea that he proposed and make them look realistically at what they were proposing.

With regard to the SALT II treaty, this was one of the objections, I think, that the Senate had that prevented them, under the previous administration, from ratifying that treaty; that it was so ambiguous and that it could best be described as a legitimizing of a continued arms buildup on both sides. But there have been hints and, yet, so far and up until this last case -- and I don't have a full answer on that one yet -- it would have been very difficult. You could say, ``I'm convinced that these are violations,'' but it would have been very difficult to find the hard evidence to make it hold up in court. This last one comes the closest to indicating that it is a violation.

But there's no question that, while there was a kind of an informal agreement that, since the treaty had not been ratified but was still in existence there, having been signed, that both sides would agree in good faith that they would observe the things that they had arrived at in that treaty. This one, I think, makes it plain: The Soviet Union has really continued its buildup. As a matter of fact, in the INF thing that we talked about earlier, while they came to the table to talk to us about the reduction of intermediate-range weapons, they continued right on schedule adding to their weapons all the time that these negotiations have been going on. They now have 342.

The President. Well, I know that they're very concerned, the Fed, about the road they're walking and how narrow it is and if they give a wrong signal or a signal that might be taken wrong out in the financial markets, that they might in some way set back this recovery which, they agree, is taking place. I believe that with inflation at the level it is, that interest rates can come down more and should, because it leaves the real interest rate higher than is necessary to cope with inflation.

Now, what he might have been referring to about M1 and M2 was this recent figure that looked like a big surge in the money supply, and it really wasn't. But it was due to some of the changes in banking practices that had suddenly seen a flood of money go from money funds over into banking and suddenly loom as a great increase in M2. And it really wasn't. And, fortunately, the money markets -- there was a tremor, and he thought maybe they were going to panic and think, ``Oh, here we go again on another one of those roller coaster rides.'' But they didn't, and they evidently read it correctly.

The President. Well, this is up to the banks. They're the ones in the Fed. We have a low discount rate. And there's no reason, I don't think, why the banks could not bring those interest rates down another notch or two.

Bart Rowen earlier about Williamsburg, you ought to be looking at a summit somewhere along the line of Mr. Andropov, in terms of talking with him rather than about him. One, do you think it's conceivable you will be having a summit meeting with the Soviet leader in your first term? And two, if so, what are the preconditions? Mr. Bush has mentioned one, which seems to be unacceptable. Do you have any others in mind?

The President. Well, always talk about whether I'm reluctant or not. I tried to achieve a meeting with Brezhnev on the basis that he would be coming to New York on the disarmament session of the United Nations. And I guess we know now that he wasn't traveling, anything of that kind because of his health. Other reasons were given as to why he couldn't come to New York. And Mr. Bush stated to our allies in Europe my willingness to meet with Mr. Andropov on one subject -- anytime, anyplace.

I think that a summit meeting isn't something that you just, like at Williamsburg, say, ``Let's sit down at the table and talk.'' I think this is different. I think you have to have an agenda and some things to talk about, because you do raise a lot of hopes and expectations in such a meeting.

And we're in communication all the time with the Soviets. It isn't as if there's silence between the two of us. And when and if the time is right and there's some reason to meet, I'm very willing to meet with him.

The President. Well, right now, I think the ball is a little bit in their court. I think that we need some deeds, rather than words, to indicate that there is something to negotiate, that we could have a meeting and discuss some of the differences between us. These could be on any one of a number of subjects.

We made a move in their direction when I withdrew the grain embargo. But there has been nothing in return that shows that they are willing to make some changes in some of the things that are disturbing to us.

Q. Ken Bacon of the Wall Street Journal. Mr. President, I wanted to follow up on the question of interest rates. Do you think that the Fed should force interest rates down, or they will fall under current Fed policy now?

Q. Just to follow up, you seem satisfied then with Federal Reserve policy now. I wonder if you could tell us what sort of political and economic considerations you'll look at when you decide whether to reappoint Mr. Volcker as Chairman or to put somebody else in that job. I know you can't tell us what you're going to do, but if you could tell us your framework for approaching that question, it would be helpful.

Q. Well, I'd like to follow on the arms control. You mentioned the four principles on which you'd negotiate and everything. If you were a betting man, Mr. President, would you bet that there would be some sort of compromise agreement this year as a result of the talks with the Soviets?

Q. Mr. President, last September you talked about perhaps restoring the West Bank to Jordanian sovereignty in some sort of federation. Prime Minister Begin rejected that immediately. Last night, in your speech to the American Legion, you talked about the legitimate rights of the Palestinians, which is also a concept that Israel rejects. I just wonder what are your plans for a meeting with Israeli leaders in sorting out where it is you want to go in the Middle East?

I don't take too seriously the statement of positions in advance of negotiations. Everyone wants to preserve their position at their highest price before negotiations, and for them to do otherwise is to give away something they might not have to give away once the negotiations start. So, I think we have to wait until they get at the table.

I think the recognition -- and I've stated -- that the Palestinian problem has to be a factor in the solution. We cannot go on -- that's been the biggest problem now for a number of years -- we can't go on with these people in not providing something in the nature of a homeland. On the other hand, no one has ever advocated creating a nation. And so, I just believe that, as I say, that you wait until you get to the table.

And what is the stake for Israel? The stake is security. Can they go on forever living as an armed camp? Their economy's suffering. They have 130-percent inflation rate. And they're having to maintain a military presence that is out of all proportion to their size as a nation. And so, the greatest security for Israel -- and this is what's back of our plan -- is to create more Egypts, more nations, more neighbors that are willing to sign peace treaties with them.

Now, Israel proved its willingness to negotiate and to comply with things that certainly weren't appetizing to them -- in the giving up of the Sinai with Egypt. Well, what we're looking to is the same kind of relationship with most of their neighbors. Maybe not all the Arab States will be moderate. Maybe some of them will still continue to be holdouts. But I believe there's real evidence that the more moderate Arab States do want a peace, and this would involve recognition of Israel's right to exist.

The President. I don't know whether they have the means to totally absorb the West Bank at this time, but I think that there's evidence that they've wanted to strengthen their hand somewhat, knowing that this would be a part of the coming negotiations.

Q. Mr. President, Lawrence O'Rourke of the St. Louis Post-Dispatch. I'd like to ask you about your administration's decision to buy up the dioxin-tainted property in Times Beach. What was your reason -- what were your reasons for approving that purchase, and what is your sense of whether you are creating a precedent should similar situations arise in the future?

The President. Well, I think this is an unusual situation there. We have taken more than -- from locations more than 300 -- more than 300 locations these samples. We've augmented the number of laboratories that were checking them and have come up with the findings that there is no question about the hazard for people that are living there. And we are going to go forward with a cleanup, which will take a long time.

But in the meantime, we, the government, for their safety, ordered their people out of their homes. And some businesses are literally destroyed, local businesses there, because of this creating of a ghost town. I think that it was one of the only fair things to do.

Mr. Sperling. Well, I want to thank you, Mr. President, for giving us this hour. And anytime you want to come over and have bacon and eggs over at the Sheraton-Carlton, just let us know. We'll make room. Thank you so much.

The President. Well, I thank you, and I thank you all for coming. And I know exactly how you feel. I know you're a veteran at this, but this is the way I feel after every press conference. All that haunts me are the number of hands that were up that I wasn't able to recognize.

These men and women never lost sight of them, living out their dreams in their adult lives. We call their award ``The Medal of Freedom,'' because only in a free society such as ours do we have the opportunity to climb as high and go as far as our dreams, talent, and energy will take us.

President. It was evening on Memorial Day, and the National Symphony was giving the traditional free concert on the West Lawn of the Capitol. As a backdrop, the Capitol dome was lighted and stood out dramatically against the clear night sky with our flag waving over it. And Maxim Shostakovitch was conducting his first concert since leaving the Soviet Union. And after a standing ovation from the audience, Shostakovitch spoke quietly and with measured eloquence.

With their talent and with the freedom of our way, the life that was given them to use it, by working and living among us, they've broadened and enriched freedom for us all. We're proud and grateful they're Americans.

Since he arrived in America as a young man in 1933, he has entertained and inspired millions with his stage and film choreography. Major among his greatest contributions as a ballet master are the founding of the first American classical ballet company, the great New York City Ballet, and the School of American Ballet. Throughout his career Mr. Balanchine has entertained, captivated and amazed our diverse population, lifting our spirits and broadening our horizons through his talent and art.

In many ways, American sports embody the best in our national character -- dedication, teamwork, honor and friendship. Paul ``Bear'' Bryant embodied football. The winner of more games than any other coach in history, Bear Bryant was a true American hero. A hard but beloved taskmaster he pushed ordinary people to perform extraordinary feats. Patriotic to the core, devoted to his players and inspired by a winning spirit that never quit, Bear Bryant gave his country the gift of a legend. In making the impossible seem easy, he lived what we all strive to be.

America views itself and the world. Since the 1930's, Mr. Burnham has shaped the thinking of world leaders. His observations have changed society and his writings have become guiding lights in mankind's quest for truth. Freedom, reason and decency have had few greater champions in this century than James Burnham.

Dr. Cheek's distinguished career and community work are impressive testimony to his commitment to his calling and his country. His efforts have helped to build a better life for black Americans and a better country for us all.

A true Renaissance Man, and one of the greatest minds of our times, Richard Buckminster Fuller's contributions as a geometrician, educator, and architect-designer are benchmarks of accomplishment in their fields. Among his most notable inventions and discoveries are synergetic geometry, geodesic structures and tensegrity structures. Mr. Fuller reminds us all that America is a land of pioneers, haven for innovative thinking and the free expression of ideas.

Reverend William ``Billy'' Graham's untiring evangelism has spread the word of God to every corner of the globe, and made him one of the most inspirational spiritual leaders of the Twentieth Century. As a deeply committed Christian, his challenge to accept Jesus Christ has lifted the hearts, assuaged the sorrows and renewed the hopes of millions. Billy Graham is an American who lives first and always for his fellow citizens. In honoring him, we give thanks for God's greatest spiritual gifts -- faith, hope, and love.

The son of immigrant parents, Eric Hoffer is an example of both the opportunity and the vitality of the American way of life. After overcoming his loss of sight as a child, Eric Hoffer educated himself in our public libraries. As an adult he has relished hard work and believed in its dignity, spending 23 years in jobs ranging from lumberjack to dockworker. As America's longshoreman philosopher, his books on philosophy have become classics. Mr. Hoffer's spirit, self-reliance and great accomplishments remind us all that the United States remains a land where each of us is free to achieve the best that lies within us.

A novelist, playwright, politician, diplomat, and advisor to Presidents, Clare Booth Luce has served and enriched her country in many fields. Her brilliance of mind, gracious warmth and great fortitude have propelled her to exceptional heights of accomplishment. As a Congresswoman, Ambassador, and Member of the President's Foreign Intelligence Advisory Board, Clare Booth Luce has been a persistent and effective advocate of freedom, both at home and abroad. She has earned the respect of people from all over the world, and the love of her fellow Americans.

As one of the foremost historians, authors, and scholars of this century, Dumas Malone has recounted the birth of our Nation and the ideals of our Founding Fathers. Among Dr. Malone's most notable accomplishments is his biography of Thomas Jefferson, now regarded as the most authoritative work of its kind. Dr. Malone's contributions to our national lore will remain invaluable to succeeding generations as each takes up responsibility for the heritage of freedom so eloquently described in his articles and books.

Mabel Mercer has been called a living testament to the artfulness of the American song, and a legend if there ever was one. Her talent, her elegance and her unique way with a lyric have gathered a devoted following all over the world. Her special style has influenced some of America's most famous performers, earning her the reputation of a singer's singer. Miss Mercer's career has spanned more than 60 years and she continues to delight audiences and critics alike.

As an engineer, businessman, physicist and defense and aero-space pioneer, Simon Ramo's career has been on the forefront of American technology, development and growth. The son of a storekeeper in Salt Lake City, Dr. Ramo built his business from a one-room office to a nationwide network of production plants. A shining symbol of American ingenuity and innovativeness, Dr.

I congratulate Newsweek and its dedicated team on their 50th anniversary and thank them for making this remarkable teleconference possible. Our communication today, beaming into space and bouncing off satellites, relies on technology that few of us dreamed of just a few years ago, and yet it has become almost commonplace. It is one more powerful example of how we in the free world can draw closer together using high technology as a tool.

The innovation represented by this broadcast is typical of Newsweek's first 50 years. The history of the magazine is one of invention and breakthrough. We Americans are very proud of Newsweek and are pleased to point out that it began as a competitive twinkle in an entrepreneurial eye. Many weekly news magazines now bring insights and information to our people. But Newsweek, in particular, can be proud that its keen competitive spirit has made it one of the most respected in the field.

During the last 2 years, we in America have been reawakening the same entrepreneurial, competitive spirit among our people. Not long ago, our economy, like each of yours, was in the grip of a painful worldwide recession and one of the worst sieges of inflation in our history. In the many meetings I've had with other Presidents and Prime Ministers, whether in Washington or other capitals, it's become clear that we in the industrial democracies face many common economic challenges. It is also clear that many nations look to the democracies for leadership.

Of course, here in the United States over the last 2 years has not been an easy one. The length and depth of the recession which brought on so much unemployment have made this a painful transition. But we're making progress now, and we're doing so because we remained firm in our commitment to sound, fundamental principles.

First, we pledged to restrain the growth of government spending. We were concerned that the rapid and sometimes mindless expansion of government services was not only wasteful but was eroding the very foundations of our economy. Federal spending in the United States in 1980 was increasing at the rate of 17 percent a year. Today, that increase is down to 10\1/2\ percent a year.

Second, we pledged to halt the upward spiral in taxation, restoring incentives for savings and investment. It was a matter of grave concern to us that the savings rate in the United States was the lowest of any of the major industrialized democracies. Some of our industries were losing their competitive edge, and our workers were becoming less productive. In the last 2 years, we cut the increases in taxation, too. Taking into account all the tax changes that have been made since I took office and all those we now propose, I'm pleased to report that between 1981 and 1988, an 8-year span, we will save the American people more than half a trillion dollars in new taxes.

Third, we pledged to reduce the heavy burden of government regulation that was weighing so heavily on the economy. Vice President Bush is heading up a governmentwide task force, and today the flow of new regulatory proposals is down by one-third from what it was when he took office.

Finally, we pledged to pursue a course of steady, consistent monetary growth. The central responsibility for monetary policy in the United States rests, of course, with the Federal Reserve Board. But my administration supports its policies for noninflationary growth in our money supply, policies which have helped us cut the rate of U.S. inflation from over 12 percent to less than 4 percent today.

As the winter snows melt in many parts of America, we're seeing that these policies are beginning to bring rich rewards. A new vibrancy is evident in our economy. Spring is almost here and nearly everywhere we turn -- housing sales, consumer spending -- we see the economy reviving. The recent decline in international oil prices provides more good news for the world economy. There are some short-term concerns, to be sure. But over the long run, more realistic, market-oriented oil prices will spur economic recovery and free vast amounts of real resources that previously had been devoted to energy.

Another concern in the United States that we must address is the threat to recovery posed by deficit spending. We believe we can meet basic human needs and basic defense needs without borrowing enormous sums from our private capital markets. We intend to do just that. But we have a struggle on our hands trying to win the cooperation of our Congress. Still, we're confident we're on the right track, and the signs of new vigor in the American economy give us great encouragement.

We in the West are on the threshold of a new economic era. Our common problems have a common solution -- economic growth. Our challenge is to create healthy, sustained growth without inflation. Inflationary policies in the past caused this last recession and, if resumed, would just as surely bring on another. We must rely again on the strength and vitality of our market-oriented economies and democratic governments. In this age of growing interdependence, through wholehearted cooperation, we can realize the hopes and dreams of our people.

Look at recent history. Whenever we've stood together, our accomplishments have been great. A basic premise of the foreign policy of America and of each nation in the free world must be to restore global prosperity and stability. All of us in the United States, Europe, and Japan recognize that our task is difficult.

The international financial system continues to be severely strained. Many developing countries now face a serious cash-flow problem created in part by a lack of confidence. To prevent this temporary problem from becoming a crisis, the United States has been and will continue working with other governments and international institutions, such as the International Monetary Fund, to provide appropriate assistance to debtor nations.

Since about 40 percent of American exports are shipped to developing countries, we realize much more is at stake than faraway ledgers and foreign economies. In a world where we depend on one another for our well-being, helping others is often the best way to help ourselves. We will join in a needed enlargement of the IMF's lending resources. This joint effort, aimed at averting a crisis while encouraging countries to pursue effective domestic policies, is essential to world recovery.

At the same time, the international trade system is also under stress. Unemployment caused by international inflation and past market-distorting policies has created worldwide pressures for protectionism. We must resist these pressures. Such economic nationalism is always self-defeating. And today, because of the world financial situation, it would be even more dangerous.

Next week in San Francisco, I will address more fully America's international economic and trade policy, but today let me underscore a central point. If protectionist measures deprive developing nations of their export markets, our problems will become deeper and harder to solve. The United States will continue to push for free trade and fair trade at home and abroad. The economic summit this spring at Williamsburg will provide the heads of state of the major industrial nations an opportunity to discuss informally the direction of the world economy. We hope to build on agreements made last year at Versailles and work toward even closer cooperation.

Let me also speak for a moment about another concern we in America share with all the people of the world -- the need for nuclear arms reductions. Americans have always been a peace-loving people. We yearn, as each of you do, for a world in which all nations can live in harmony, safe from conflict and the threat of nuclear disaster. This administration will leave no stone unturned in our effort to strengthen the peace and lessen the risk of war.

America neither wants nor seeks an arms race. But history teaches us that weakness only tempts aggression. So, we're rebuilding and modernizing our defenses. We in the free world share a joint responsibility, for this generation and for generations to come, to assure an effective deterrent and genuine arms control on an equal, verifiable basis.

Our agenda for peace is the most sweeping and comprehensive in postwar history. Our representatives at the Geneva negotiations on intermediate-range nuclear forces have proposed the global elimination of the entire class of land-based, intermediate-range nuclear missiles. Ours is a simple, honest, and moral proposal, not an ultimatum. We continue to negotiate in good faith, with the full support and agreement of our allies, guided by four sound principles.

First, the only basis on which a fair agreement can be reached is that of equality of levels between the United States and the Soviet Union. Second, British and French strategic systems are by definition not a part of these bilateral negotiations and, therefore, not to be considered in them.

Third, Soviet proposals which have the effect of merely shifting the threat from Europe to Asia cannot be considered reasonable. And, fourth, as in all areas of arms control, it will be essential that an INF agreement be underwritten by effective measures for verification.

I sympathize with the desires of many who call for a freeze. They genuinely want to reduce the threat of war, and so do I. But a freeze now would remove any Soviet incentive to negotiate real arms reductions, which is what we must achieve. Americans and people everywhere long to be free of fear. There is no higher moral goal than to rid the world of a nuclear nightmare. But let no one take advantage of the deep and sincere feelings of our people. Let no nation think it can exploit our humanitarian concern for their own ends. To those who fear nuclear war, I say, again, I'm with you. We must reduce the risk of war. We must prevent it through deterrence. We must serve mankind through genuine and mutual arms reduction, and that is the path the nations of the West are committed to. With God's help, we can and will secure life, peace, and freedom for generations to come.

We're entering economic recovery. New technologies and expanded trade can spur greater economic growth than we've yet known. Cooperation among nations can restore the world financial markets, revitalize the developing countries, and benefit us all. And Western solidarity on arms reduction can ensure political stability and lasting peace.

To paraphrase Winston Churchill, these are not dark days. These can be great days, the greatest days we've ever lived. And we must all thank God that we've been allowed, each of us according to our stations, to play a part in making these days memorable in the history of our civilization.

But I'm delighted that all of you were able to be here today for briefings on many of the initiatives that we're undertaking. Of course, it also leaves me in a position of not knowing whether I'm plowing the same ground with whatever I say here. But I'll be brief. They've seen to that with the scheduling.

I'm also pleased to tell you that, if you haven't been told already, that today we're transmitting to the Congress our revised federalism initiative, which incorporates four major megablock grants to State and local governments. These legislative proposals represent a continuation and expansion of our efforts to return authority, responsibility, and revenue resources to State and local governments.

You know, Bernie Baruch once said something to the effect that people who believed that they could lean on government would find that when you lean on government, government begins to lean very heavily on you. And in the two decades between 1960 and 1980, we saw ever-accelerating encroachment by the Federal Government on State and local prerogatives.

State and local treasuries. Expenditures were being made for programs that weren't really needed, in particular, communities and localities. State and local officials began calling for a reordering of priorities and a sorting out of responsibilities among various levels of government. Well, we're attempting to address those concerns.

In '81 we were successful in consolidating 57 categorical grant programs into 9 block grants. Our regulatory relief effort, directed in large part to removing regulatory manacles which bind State and local governments -- this effort continued in 1982 with the enactment of the Job Training Block Grant and the Urban Mass Transit Block Grant.

The legislative proposal that I'm sending to Congress today will contain four megablock grants, and they are a Federal-State Block Grant, a Federal-Local Block Grant, a Transportation Block Grant, and a Rural Housing Block Grant. It incorporates the input that we've received from State and local officials during the course of the last 2 years. It'll provide stable and certain funding sources for State and local governments by guaranteeing funding for the programs at levels enacted for fiscal year 1984. And it's not a vehicle for budgetary savings.

It'll provide greater flexibility to State and local officials. It'll provide a pass-through to local governments for programs which have historically gone to the States but where the States have passed through the funding to local governments. It provides special protections for revenue sharing and the entitlement portion of the Community Development Block Grant program. The program will be phased in to avoid dislocations on the State and local governments.

And I don't know whether, when George was talking to you up here -- I'll go back a paragraph or two, when I was talking about regulations. I think you know how much has been achieved under his leadership in a task force there to reduce the paperwork and the regulations that have been tying your hands so much, and that effort will continue. There are still too many.

Working together, you and I can make government work more effectively for all Americans. I think one of the great things that probably came out of the traumatic experience of the Great Depression was, with the best of intentions, the Federal Government moving in where they saw these great emergencies, then made what was supposed to be temporary medicine for the illness permanent medicine, even after the patient got better. And the result was a drastic distortion of the historic relationship between State and local entities and the Federal Government. And we want to get back to what was the original purpose and the original idea of our separation of government levels in this country, because I think they're unique in all the world, and they were the greatest guarantee of individual freedom that this country has ever known.

Following this discussion, and subsequent staff-to-staff conversations, we developed a possible bipartisan compromise on jobs and humanitarian aid. On February 10, members of my staff presented this to the congressional leadership. The possible compromise we outlined included $4.3 billion in accelerated job creation and humanitarian assistance. I was pleased that Speaker O'Neill found this proposal to be an acceptable framework for bipartisan cooperation.

However, some elements of the package do not constitute acceleration of already budgeted items and thus would unnecessarily increase the deficit. These, and other elements of the package that are not fully consistent with the bipartisan framework, could and should be better targeted on higher priority, job-related Federal expenditures.

Had he known how prophetic his statement was, his rhetoric undoubtedly would have been far stronger. During the two decades following the Eisenhower Administration, the Federal government increasingly encroached on state and local prerogatives. Narrow and restrictive Federal grant-in-aid programs grew from under 50 to over 500, pervading such obviously local concerns as rat control and sewer extensions. The dollar amount usurped from State and local treasuries to finance these programs ballooned from $7 billion in 1960 to $95 billion 1981. With increased Federal dollars came suffocating Federal control. Lost was the efficiency and accountability of local spending priorities.

Eisenhower's sentiments throughout the 1960's and 1970's. They came to realize that the mushrooming Federal programs reflected the fact that Presidents and Congresses failed to trust State and local officials as their partners in our Federal system.

The Federal government had too much control, many felt. Programs lacked flexibility. Regulations were restrictive. Federal mandates were depleting State and local treasuries. Expenditures were being made for programs that were not really needed in particular localities. In short, State and local officials believed that they were more capable of making more prudent decisions to run their own jurisdictions than Federal bureaucrats. They started calling for a reordering of priorities and a sorting out of responsibilities among the various levels of government.

For example, throughout the economic recovery program, which I proposed in 1981, there was the underlying theme of federalism. The spending reductions were a reordering of priorities so that the national budget would address truly national needs. The tax cuts addressed the problem created by the Federal government usurping revenue sources which otherwise would have been available to State and local governments and to individuals. And the regulatory relief effort was directed in large part to removing the regulatory manacles which bind State and local governments.

In a more direct assault on Federal usurpation, we proposed the consolidation of scores of narrow and restrictive categorical grant-in-aid programs into seven broad block grants. The package which was ultimately passed by the Congress, and which I signed, consolidated 57 programs into nine block grants. It is estimated that these block grants resulted in a reduction of 5.4 million manhours (83%) in FY '82 for State and local officials and 5.9 million manhours (91%) in subsequent years from the level required to administer the predecessor categorical programs.

I created a Federalism Advisory Committee chaired by Senator Paul Laxalt (R-Nevada). The work of that committee has now been completed and its suggestions have been incorporated into the package which I am today sending to the Congress.

Finally, early in 1982, I proposed the outline of a major Federalism Initiative. I stated at the time that my package was just a conceptual framework and that I wanted to work out the details following extensive consultation with State and local officials. The process which followed was unprecedented, and I want to thank the many State and local officials who assisted me in the development of the legislation. The package which I am sending to the Congress today reflects the input which we received from State and local officials throughout 1982 and early 1983.

During this five-year period we will carefully monitor the block grants and determine whether it would be feasible to return revenue sources, such as Federal excise taxes or a percentage of the Federal income tax, to State and local governments along with the programs in the block grants. I will appoint a presidential commission to review this issue and to provide recommendations to me.

In the Federal-State block grant, for programs where Federal dollars go to the States but are passed through to some degree by the State to local units of government, each State would be required to pass through the percentage that was available to localities in fiscal years 1981, 1982 and 1983 in that program.

Funding for the Federal-State block grant would come from three Federal excise taxes on alcohol, tobacco, and telephones. The transportation block grant would be funded by part of the Federal gasoline tax.

The swap of federalization of Medicaid for State assumption of AFDC and Food Stamps, which was included in my January, 1982 framework has been dropped from the package. Reform of these three programs will be considered on a separate track.

Appointments and Scheduling. Prior to that he was a litigation attorney with the Los Angeles law firm of Hill, Farrer & Burrill. While engaged in his practice, he published several articles on various aspects of the law.

The President. That does it? And I guess the audience should know that we have just met, hardly exchanged a word other than just saying that. And so, this is, as they say on some of those other shows, completely unrehearsed -- [laughter] -- and I have no idea what's going to be asked, except I was told the first person that was going to ask a question would be you.

The President. Well, now, that's a question that all of the press has been asking me also. To tell you the truth, I can't answer that now. I think it's the wrong time to answer it. If you say you're running too early, then everything you do is viewed as being political; and if you say you're not, then you immediately become a lameduck, and you can't get anything done. But also I have always really believed that the people will kind of let you know whether you should run again or not. So, I'll wait a little while on that one and then answer it later.

Brezhnev -- that I was willing to meet. There are no plans right now for a summit, but this doesn't mean that we're not in communication and constant touch between our State Department and their people and all. But more important than a meeting between the two of us -- and I recently sent word to our European allies that I would meet with Mr. Andropov anyplace, anytime, to sign an agreement that would eliminate the intermediate-range nuclear weapons that are now poised and aimed at the countries of Europe. We have no such weapons there as a deterrent.

But let me say that I know this concern of all of you. And I know the fear that everyone has. On the other hand, the very nature of the deterrent, the fact that both sides have these weapons aimed -- it's the first weapon ever invented that has never, at the same time, led to a defensive weapon against it. The only defense you have is being able to say, if one of you does it the other one's going to do it too. And there is no winner.

They've continued to add to that force even though we have this team there, because I proposed some time ago that they meet us to negotiate an outright elimination. Our NATO allies have asked us to put nuclear weapons, intermediate-range weapons, as a deterrent to those that are there on the edge of Western Europe. And we have agreed to do that.

Now, so far, they have a monopoly. They are the only ones with the threat. We will deploy -- we're trying to get what I said was a zero-based option -- destroy theirs, and we won't produce any of ours. And at least we will have made the step of wiping out a whole system of nuclear weapons.

Now, I think they came to the table and are willing to talk because they don't want us to put in that deterrent. I can only tell you that every effort we can make is being made to reduce the numbers of those weapons, and, hopefully, if we once start down that path, hopefully, we can eliminate them altogether. But I would say here, rather than your fear is -- I believe that for 37 years we've proven that that deterrent idea does work. And I'm still confident of that.

World War II against Japan. But we were the only country that had it. And you have to ask yourself, would we have dropped it if we had known they had one they could have dropped on us? And I think we all know the answer to that.

Q. Mr. President, I'm from Northwest High School in House Springs, Missouri. I have a question concerning the cuts in student aid. I realize that cuts need to be made. There are some students who are very intelligent, however, that do not have the money to go to college without help. How will this affect the future of our nation if only those from high-income families can afford to be educated? What are your views toward these cuts?

The President. All right. I think what you've revealed here is there's a widespread misunderstanding about what we've done. Actually, we are still providing student aid at the government level. Remember also, though, that there are many scholarship funds from private foundations, from schools themselves. In California -- and I'm sure this is true of most other States -- while I was Governor, we increased the State scholarship aid 11 times as much as when I first arrived there. So, there is more than the Federal Government.

But we found out that the programs had expanded to the point that people, families with incomes enough that they should be able to provide the education themselves for their children, were still getting this government aid and the government guaranteed loans and so forth. We changed the standards to make it possible to give more of that aid to those whose financial standing or earnings were such that they couldn't go without it.

And so, what we have done is simply take some of the aid away from more affluent families and give it to families that do have real need. And we are still providing aid for almost half the college students in the United States.

Miami, Florida. Mr. President, after the May riots in Miami of 1980 in the Liberty City section of the city, money was promised from the Federal Government to aid black businesses and create jobs, a total revitalization of Liberty City. I would like to know what happened to this Federal money? Was it sent into Liberty City? And if so, how is it being spent? And if it has not been sent into the Liberty City area, is it going to be sent into the area? And why is it taking so long?

And through the Small Business Administration and through the Defense Department we have ordered that more help be aimed at minority-aimed businesses, small businesses, and this by way of subcontracting in Defense. And I know that that has been going forward quite successfully. But for me to have the details on the particular areas -- but since you've asked it, I can tell you that I will look into it. You say it's Liberty City.

Q. My name is Jay Gore, representing LaPorte High School in LaPorte, Texas. Recently there have been rumors that the Interior Department plans to change its policy towards the National Park System and that it's going to change it from more of a conservation -- for people who see and enjoy the park -- to an entertainment role. What do you think the role of the National Park System should be?

Department's policy about national parks is that when we came, the Congress kept proposing more money, in all this stringent time when we're running deficits, to buy more parkland. But what the Department of Interior found out was that the parks, the national parks we presently have, had been allowed to run down, and the spending had been decreased, before we got here, every year, to where they were getting virtually nothing for the maintenance and the upkeep of these parks. And the standards for health and safety had been lowered very much because of this.

And the Interior Department said, ``We're not going to buy more parkland until we have taken care of the parks we have.'' And so, they have vastly increased the amount of money that is being devoted to bring the parks up to standard.

Now, I know that there is a lot of confusion about much -- and maybe some of what you were asking was because of the talk lately about the wilderness territories, not just parks. And the Interior Department, Mr. Watt, is being blamed because he sent a notice to Washington that 800,000 acres of land, almost a million acres, should not be considered any longer for incorporation into the wilderness areas. And this story came out that he was taking this away from wilderness areas.

Well, before we got here, 174 million acres had been designated by the Congress for study as to whether any or all of them should be incorporated in the 80 million acres of national wilderness land that we presently have. Standards were set. It can't be wilderness land if there's roads on it. It can't be wilderness land if there's dual ownership, if, say, a local government or State government has an ownership claim or owns mineral rights under the land and so forth.

Under the previous administration, of that 174 million acres, they had already withdrawn 150 acres of that as -- million acres, I mean, as not being eligible for wilderness. And the Interior Department continued the study, and the 800,000 acres that was withdrawn was simply added to that 150 million acres, which means we still have some 23 million acres that we're continuing to study as to whether it qualifies to be included in the wilderness lands.

The President. Oh, to improve the unemployment situation. Well, first of all, the greatest employer is the private sector, and right now there are a hundred million people employed in this country while there are some 11 million unemployed.

Last month, January, for the first time the unemployment level started to decline. It dropped four-tenths of a percentage point, from 10.8 to 10.4. And in the new method of keeping that, that was from 10.7 to 10.2, because up until last month no one was counting the Armed Forces. Well, they're very definitely working and employed. And they were counting them when they left the service and became unemployed, but they weren't counting them while they were employed. So, the new method is it would be 10.7, down to 10.2.

We have -- the increase in the gasoline tax is going to create some jobs. That isn't why it was passed. It was passed because our highway system and our bridges throughout the country have deteriorated so badly that they need -- it's an emergency situation. They need to be repaired, to be replaced in many instances. But that will create several hundred thousand new jobs.

We now have a bill that we're discussing with the legislative leadership that will -- well, several bills. First, one of them, called the enterprise zones. This a program to go into rundown areas, such as some of our inner cities that have decayed and where many of the people are on welfare, unemployed, and businesses don't go in there. It's a program of using tax incentives at every level of government for businesses that will go in, establish themselves there, and then hire the people that are there presently unemployed and getting welfare, and tax incentives to make this worthwhile. While we're trying to get this through Congress, eight States have already done this on their own with tremendous success.

We have another measure up there that is calling on, accelerating programs that in the budget we're discussing for 1984, where our various government levels or agencies have construction work, maintenance work, repair, that needs to be done, and would be in the '84 budget, that we would move that up and start doing it now to help solve unemployment.

We also, let me just say, have -- we are extending the unemployment insurance benefits. As people have run out the ability to be eligible, we're extending them, but we're also trying to get legislation that would allow us to use those for job training, to use them for relocating people to places where there are jobs, and to also use what we call a voucher system, in which a person would be able to take a voucher instead of his unemployment payment, go to an employer, give the employer that voucher in return for a job, and for a period of time the Government would pay the amount of that voucher as an inducement to the employer to take on this unemployed person.

I'd like to congratulate you on your fight against interest rates, and especially inflation, which on figures that went out today, I heard, was down to 2.2 percent. I think you've done a great job with that.

Now, my question deals with renewable energies. Recently -- or, do you plan to support this industry by keep going with your tax credits, tax credits, tax incentives, and what do you have in the future plans involing this and -- because in the minds of my peers, this is very important to our future.

The President. To invest, yes. These are both at the private level for -- and we've brought up, for the first time in 3 years, the personal savings rate. Now, you know, when people buy insurance policies or put their money in a savings account, that money then becomes part of a capital pool that is loaned to industry and business and so forth, for investment purposes. And we're continuing that. But we're also continuing the tax policies that give business some breaks so that they can afford to improve their capacity and their ability to build, modernize their plant and machinery, and so forth. We are going to continue all of those things. They're very vital.

This is one of the big things that has made us less competitive with our foreign allies. Japan, many companies in Europe after World War II, when there'd been so much destruction and all, they were helped by us to build the most modern of factories. Well, ours weren't bombed, and the result was, with our taxing policies since the war, we made it very difficult for American business to modernize plant and equal these other plants and be able to produce at the lower price that they could produce. And we are providing incentives for that.

I thank you for the words about the interest rates. And you would be happy to know that as of today two of the major banks in the United States have lowered the prime interest rate from 11 to 10\1/2\. And the others, I know, they always follow when that happens.

The President. Well, I think it should be a combination where responsibility lies. First, you try to find, is there a private responsibility? Is some concern, a factory or something, responsible for this? And if so, then secure either help or turn this over completely to them and have them do it, if they're at a real fault. But then, other levels of government.

Now, the situation in Missouri. We have just announced that the dioxin level -- as you know, we've been in there taking tests, and it has turned out to be so much more severe, probably due to the repeated flooding there. The dioxin came, to those of you who don't know, was in oil that was put on dirt roads to hold down the dust. No one knew at the time that they were doing something that would affect the health of the people living there. But the dioxin level, the floods came and spread this and sank into lawns and everything, has infected it so much that we've had to tell the people that it's dangerous to live there.

We are now proposing to simply buy that town. Pay the people for their homes, for leaving their homes, give them the money their homes are worth, businesses, and so forth. And it's a shame and tragic that they must move away. But it will be a long time before that can be cleaned up to where we could say it is safe.

Q. Your administration suggests that federally supported family planning clinics inform parents of minors if they request birth control information. My question is, Mr. President, how does your administration justify this so-called squeal law?

The legislation that authorized the Federal Government to subsidize centers where birth control advice and so forth and means of birth control were being offered the young people, that they should in return for these subsidies, to the greatest extent possible, involve a maximized family participation. Well, they haven't done it. They simply are allowing girls who are under age to come and receive their information and their prescriptions for these various birth control devices and at the same time to keep this information from the parents.

Government has done a lot of things now and in its aid to education and all that has, in effect, kind of moved to take some of what should be parental duties away from the parents now and have you beholden to government. And I just don't think -- government can be a lot of things, but it can't be mama and papa and it shouldn't try.

California. I'd like to address the issue of nuclear arms reduction. Considering the current status of the Adelman nomination and the fact that in yesterday's Foreign Relations Committee, the nomination will be sent to the floor with a recommendation that it not be confirmed, how do you feel your nomination of this man has helped nuclear arms reductions? And how do you feel our allies will perceive it?

Ambassador there, Jeane Kirkpatrick. And some time ago, the United Nations had its conference on disarmament, and Mr. Adelman participated in that. We had a chance to see his performance in that. So, it is not true, as they've been saying, that he does not have experience in arms negotiations.

He is a brilliant young man. Everyone who knows him endorses him, and I think the fact that the committee voted nine to eight indicates that there's a great division as to whether he's competent or not. And this is going to the floor, and I'm going to tell you I'm going to do everything I can to urge the Senate to ratify him for this position. It takes Senate approval of someone.

I think that what the committee has done and this whole fuss over him, this has been injurious to us in the eyes of our allies and friends. But I told you before about those teams that we have negotiating. We picked this man, because the whole idea of the arms reductions was mine and I obviously want it, and I wouldn't have picked him if I did not think he was the best man at hand to do the job. And, frankly, I'm a little annoyed at the Senate that they don't give me credit for believing that.

The President. What role should we play in preventing crime in this country? Well, now, basically, we know that law enforcement is a matter of State and local governments. For example, if someone is tried for murder, they're tried because they have violated the State law in that State against murder. The Federal Government, however, does have a part to play.

One of the great parts that we're playing is -- more than half the crime in the United States is drug-related. And we tried an experiment in south Florida. We put, for the first time, we alined all the Federal agencies from drug enforcement to the FBI to the Federal marshals to all of this. And then we went and joined in with all the local and State apparatus down there. We had what we called a task force. And George Bush, the Vice President, was in charge of it.

This task force did a fantastic job. We have actually intercepted billions of dollars, at street value, of drugs. We have a whole fleet of cabin cruisers and speedboats and yachts and airplanes that we have taken and confiscated. I saw a table one day in Florida with $20 million -- I'd never seen $20 million in my life -- stacked up on a table that had been confiscated from these drug things.

And it was so successful that, of course, we almost cleaned up the situation there. But the same people then started coming into the United States, importing these drugs, bringing them in through different routes. We now are funding 12 task forces that will be in all the other areas in the United States to see if we can do the same thing.

But, also, I think, we've got to take and are taking stands: some national legislation to clean up much of what we think is in the social -- or the criminal justice system, the fact that so many criminals today are turned back out on the streets and sometimes for very little reason.

I'm sure you've heard the thing about the exclusionary rule. Well, now, this is the result of judicial decisions. This isn't a law that anyone passed. But what the exclusionary rule means is that if a policeman in some way violates technicalities of the law in getting some evidence, that evidence is thrown out of court, even though the evidence proves beyond a shadow of a doubt that the accused is guilty.

And the classic case of this and the foolishness of it took place in San Bernardino, California. And there were two agents that got a warrant, which is all legal, to search a home where a man and woman lived that were suspected of selling heroin. And they couldn't find any heroin after searching the house, which they could legally do. On the way out, one of them on a hunch turned around; there was a baby in a crib. He took the baby's diapers down, and there was the heroin.

They were guilty. The evidence was thrown out of court and they went free, because the judge ruled that the baby hadn't given its permission to be searched. [Laughter] Now, this is how ridiculous it could be.

I'm always brokenhearted at the number of hands that I didn't get to point to. I try to go around so you won't think I'm staying in one spot. I'm sorry about those. If those of you who had questions and I didn't get to them want to write them, believe me, I'll send you a written answer to your question. And, Joe, [Joseph R. Holmes, Special Assistant to the President and Director of White House Television, Film, and Radio Services] you can tell them how to write so that the letters will get to me. Sometimes I find that it takes a long time for letters to reach my desk. So, Joe will tell you how to do it.

But the other thing, I say this to you, and I want to say it to other students who will come in here in these meetings of this kind. I've answered some questions here today and with what I claimed were facts and figures. And I believe that I was correct in those. But don't let me get away with it, if you have any question as to whether any of my answers were not based on fact, check me out.

But do that with anyone who's -- whether it's on the evening news or whether you read it in the paper or whether it's someone in the classroom or a lecturer or a speaker. You have some question, check them out.

You have more words thrown at you today, your generation, than has ever been thrown at any generation in history. Well, don't become the sucker generation. Make sure that what someone is telling you is fact and could be substantiated. And that goes for me, too.

The participants in the session were part of the Close-Up Foundation program, a nonpartisan educational foundation providing secondary school students the opportunity to study the American political system.

Today I'd like to talk to you about a subject that touches on all of us one way or another -- in our homes, schools, at workplaces, and in the overall economy. I want to talk about one of our major energy sources -- natural gas -- and what this administration proposes to do to ensure abundant supplies of it at reasonable prices.

As the situation stands now, the American consumer is being hurt by government regulations that actually contribute to higher gas bills. We want to change that. Now, I know all too well that energy is a subject that some people in public life just can't resist playing politics with. It's unfortunate, but I guess it's a fact of life, or at least a fact of life as we know it in Washington, which can be pretty different from hometown America.

Many of you, I'm sure, recall the howls that went up when we acted to deregulate oil prices 2 years ago. Remember how you were told that deregulation would lead to skyrocketing prices for the gasoline that fuels millions of American cars, or the oil that heats millions of American homes?

You don't have to go any further than the nearest filling station to see that prices have gone down, not up, since decontrol, just as we promised they would. The economic realities of the marketplace have done more to bring down the price of oil than all those years of frenetic government regulating.

Now, the vast majority of us identify with the second group, the one that believes in trusting the wisdom of the people rather than taking power away from them and concentrating it in the other hands. On a more personal level, anyone who's ever wrestled with a tax form or had to make sense out of a complicated bureaucratic regulation knows how costly and time-consuming government overregulation can be. And that brings me back to regulation; in this case, regulation of natural gas.

I'm convinced -- and I believe that the evidence backs me up -- that just as deregulation of oil has led to a better deal for the American consumer, a freer market in natural gas will have the same beneficial effect for you. So, next week I'm sending the Congress a proposal for correcting the problems that have resulted from past excessive regulation of the natural gas market. While I'm taking this step out of the deep belief in the principle involved, there are human reasons as well.

In recent months, thousands of you have written to me, to Members of Congress, and to State and local officials expressing your distress about rapidly rising natural gas bills. Some areas of the country have been especially hard-hit, and it's clear that consumers are being poorly and unfairly served by the existing regulatory system. That system prevents natural gas producers and their customers from entering into contracts that respond to market forces, including pressure for lower prices that are now possible due to plentiful gas supplies and declining oil prices.

Today there's a surplus of natural gas, and oil prices are dropping. These factors normally would result in lower natural gas prices. But the regulatory morass has kept the marketplace from achieving lower natural gas prices. In sharp contrast, the Department of Energy estimates that if our proposal is enacted, natural gas prices will drop by at least 10 to 30 cents per thousand cubic feet in the first year.

The measure I will submit to the Congress is not a partisan plan, and it resorts to no quick political fixes. Instead, our approach is a comprehensive proposal that can, and I believe will be supported by Congressmen and Senators of both parties and will benefit the consumers they represent.

Basically, our legislative package will allow a freer market for natural gas so that there will be real and long-term incentives to produce and market abundant gas supplies at the lowest possible cost, just as gasoline and home heating oil prices have declined since we deregulated oil. Although we believe free markets not only can but will achieve these results, we aren't asking you, the consumer, to take that on faith.

To assure that consumers are protected, I have insisted on a provision which reverses the present law and provides that until 1986, there will be a moratorium on the automatic pass-through to consumers of increased gas costs by the gas pipelines, other than those caused by inflation, which, as you know, has been declining steadily.

The key to cheaper, more abundant energy for all Americans is a policy that combines consumer protection, incentives to produce, and efficient, economic use of our resources. That's what our program will do. And I look forward to working closely with Members of both parties in the Congress to obtain its passage without delay.

The President. First of all, let me just say that I'm not used to being up here alone without a hostess at these affairs, but right about now Nancy's getting ready to walk into the sound stage at Twentieth Century Fox, where the dinner is being held for Her Majesty, the Queen of England.

Our dinner tonight begins another round of discussions between us, a time when we can exchange ideas, explain our points of view, and work toward closer cooperation. Since I've been in this office, I've benefited greatly from your advice and counsel in our many meetings with individual Governors, your executive committee, and your able spokesman, Governor Scott Matheson. I hope you found them useful, too.

Americans. Our economy suffered the depths of this recession. Many of our citizens lost their jobs, and millions found themselves suddenly in need of government support. Our budgets were strained and our administrations sorely tested. But by working together, through cooperation, with give and take, we've weathered the worst of the storm.

And now the economic recovery in America has begun. Inflation has plummeted. Real wages are rising. Industrial production is increasing. Our housing industry is rebounding, and our auto industry is on the upswing. The Big Three are predicting their first year of profits since 1979. One company alone is recalling more than 21,000 workers.

Interest rates, once crippling our economy, are half what they were -- 10\1/2\ percent as of this weekend. And we hope to get them still lower. Unemployment has begun to drop. Personal savings are building, and our overall productivity is up. In fact, our leading economic indicators have been up, signaling a recovery for 8 out of the last 9 months.

I know that times are still difficult. I remember what it was like to be elected Governor and immediately face an enormous revenue shortfall. It has happened before. But our programs for sound fiscal management, spending control, and tax-rate reduction are based on economic principles that consistently produce prosperity.

Our federalism proposals, designed to return decisionmaking to governments closest to the people, are fundamental to our Republic. I would like to thank each of you, and especially your federalism negotiating team, for the efforts that you've made to achieve our federalism reforms.

I hope that in the year ahead we can continue to work together in a bipartisan spirit in the best interests of all our people. We stand at the threshold of great economic growth. But I need your help and your support if we're to realize the potential before us.

As Benjamin Cardozo, the Supreme Court Justice, once said, ``The several states must sink or swim together.'' The Federal Government cannot solve America's problems without your help, just as you need assistance from us. Let us act together, so that when history looks back on our days of decision, it will record that we found the courage, met the challenge, and worked as one to bring about better days for all Americans, in each region and in every walk of life.

You know, we are unique in all the world with our exact setup, and that is that we were meant to be and must always be a federation of sovereign States. I know of no other government in the world that maintains this, and I believe it is the greatest guarantee of individual liberty that this country has.

So, I thank you for your help and guidance, not only this week but in the last year. And I ask you to join me in a toast to continued cooperation between State capitals and Washington as together we lay the foundations for a more accountable government and a more prosperous future.

Governor Matheson. Mr. President, we're grateful for your hospitality this evening. Many of us have been here many years, and this is the seventh occasion for Norma and for me. It's always as delightful and as exciting as ever.

We're here to do the Nation's business. We're working very hard and spent a day facing up to the responsibilities that chief executives have -- budget problems throughout the country. You were Governor of California. I'm not sure that Governor Deukmejian wouldn't be very happy to trade places with you right now with that -- [laughter] -- $1.8 billion deficit which he's coping with. But the States are in serious trouble in terms of their economies, and we see glimmers of hope, change in the economy. And we're grateful for that. And we're here to do the job for all of the people.

It is a pleasure today to do what we long have anticipated: to send to Congress our proposal for correcting problems that have resulted from excessive regulation of the natural gas market. Our goal must be to obtain an adequate supply of natural gas at a reasonable price. Anything less is not sufficient and will not solve the problems currently faced by many Americans who depend on natural gas.

In recent months, thousands of people have written to me, to Members of Congress, and to State and local officials expressing their distress about rapidly rising natural gas bills. Some areas of the country have been especially hard hit. It is clear that consumers are being poorly and unfairly served by the existing regulatory system -- a system which prevents natural gas producers and their customers from establishing contracts that respond to market forces, including downward pressure on prices that otherwise would occur as a result of plentiful gas supplies and declining oil prices. There is widespread agreement that something must be done to relieve the regulatory straight jacket in which the natural gas market now operates.

The proposal I am submitting to the Congress today will achieve the needed result. It is not a partisan plan, nor does it resort to seemingly simple ``quick fixes,'' which would turn out to be neither simple nor quick and ultimately would not fix the problems. Instead, our approach is a comprehensive proposal that can -- and I believe will -- be supported by Congressmen and Senators of both parties and will be beneficial to the consumers they represent.

Our legislative package will allow, but not require, the parties to negotiate toward a free market, so that there will be real and long-term incentives to produce and market abundant gas supplies at the lowest possible cost. In this regard, I note the declines in gasoline and home heating oil prices that have occurred since we deregulated oil 2 years ago.

Although we believe free markets not only can, but will, achieve these results, the American consumer need not take this on faith alone. To assure that the consumer is protected, I have insisted on a provision which reverses the present law by providing that, until 1986, there will be a moratorium on the automatic pass-through of increased gas costs other than those increases attributable to inflation, which as you know has been declining steadily.

We believe these ideas offer the best achievable combination of consumer protection and efficient, economic use of our valuable gas resources. I look forward to working closely with the Congress to obtain passage of this urgently needed legislation without delay.

I am today transmitting to the Congress legislation comprising the Health Incentives Reform program. This legislation reforms health care financing policies to constrain rising health care costs and to keep high quality health care affordable for all Americans. Because of the coming shortage in the Medicare Trust Fund, prompt action is particularly important.

This legislative package addresses the underlying causes of excessive increases in health costs: the perverse incentives operating in the market for health services. Cost-based reimbursement, poorly structured cost-sharing, and open-ended tax subsidies for health insurance have contributed to inefficiency and inflation in the health sector. Our proposals correct these incentives. Our plan involves all participants in the health care market in restructuring financing and service delivery arrangements: providers and patients, physicians and hospitals, and beneficiaries of public programs as well as privately insured workers. Thus it shares the responsibility for bringing down health care costs fairly among all segments of society.

Medicare, face the threat of catastrophic illness expense, against which Medicare offers no protection. The poor on Medicaid have seen coverage reduced as States have been forced by rising costs to make cutbacks. Workers with employment-based health insurance have received lower cash wages, because of the unchecked cost increases for health benefits. Americans pay for health care costs in other hidden forms, including higher costs for the merchandise they buy, since the costs of employee health care benefits must be included in the price of products.

Cost sharing in Medicare has been backwards. Those who are less ill, and could act to keep their hospital stays shorter have been given no cost incentive to do so, and severely ill patients have been penalized with high cost sharing and no catastrophic coverage.

The Health Incentives Reform package contains a number of specific provisions which address each facet of our multi-pronged strategy. First, it initiates Medicare coverage for the catastrophic costs of lengthy hospital stays and improves Medicare's cost-sharing provisions. These reforms encourage efficiency while reducing the cost burden on the severely ill.

The plan establishes a prospectively-set hospital rate structure under Medicare that rewards cost-effective hospital practices. This contrasts with the traditional Medicare policy of reimbursing hospitals retrospectively for whatever ``reasonable'' costs they incurred.

The plan expands authority under Medicare for the use of competitive bidding procedures and other cost efficient approaches for the purchase of laboratory services, durable medical equipment, and other non-physician services and supplies. Furthermore, payment for durable medical equipment provided through home health agencies would be limited to 80 percent, the same percentage covered by Medicare under other circumstances.

A provision of the plan will entitle the elderly to Medicare benefits on the first day of the full month that individuals meet all eligibility conditions. At present, entitlement begins on the first day of the month in which an individual meets the conditions for only one day. This proposal is consistent with initial Social Security eligibilities for individuals who attain age 62. Also, most private insurance coverage now remains in effect until Medicare coverage begins; thus most beneficiaries would not be affected.

Finally, the plan makes two changes in Medicaid. The reduction in Federal payments to States authorized by the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 would be extended beyond 1984 for an indefinite period. The reduction would be cut, however, from 4.5 percent to 3 percent. In addition, Medicaid beneficiaries would have to make nominal copayments for outpatient visits and hospital stays.

Our legislative package contains additional Medicare and Medicaid provisions to strengthen program management, simplify requirements for program participation, produce savings in program spending, and reduce waste, fraud and abuse in these programs.

The current Medicare Hospital Insurance program neither adequately protects beneficiaries in cases of prolonged illness, nor provides financial incentives to minimize unnecessary utilization of services. Medicare covers only 90 to 150 days of hospitalization during a spell of illness (depending on whether a ``lifetime reserve'' of 60 days has been previously exhausted), even if additional hospitalization is clearly warranted. After the 60th day, cost sharing becomes onerous.

Medicare Hospital Insurance program. At the same time, the bill imposes coinsurance for a maximum of 60 days annually (8 percent of the inpatient hospital deductible for the 2nd through 15th day of a spell of illness and 5 percent thereafter) to encourage beneficiary cost-consciousness and the efficient use of health resources. The bill also limits to two the number of inpatient hospital deductibles that could be imposed annually (no matter how many spells of illness occur) and reduces the skilled nursing facility coinsurance rate from 12.5 to 5 percent of the inpatient hospital deductible.

The ``Medicare Prospective Payment Rates Act'' will establish Medicare as a prudent buyer of services and will ensure for both hospitals and the Federal government a predictable payment for services. This system of payment can be implemented in October, 1983.

Medicare traditionally paid hospitals retrospectively determined reasonable costs. This system essentially paid hospitals for whatever they spent. There were, therefore, weak incentives for hospitals to conserve costs and operate efficiently. It is not surprising that under this system hospital expenditures have been and are continuing to increase rapidly. Medicare expenditures for hospital care have increased 19 percent annually from 1979 to 1982. The cost of a service varies substantially from hospital to hospital.

The Tax Equity and Fiscal Responsibility Act (TEFRA) changed this system of hospital reimbursement by placing limits on what hospitals could be paid. My proposal builds upon the TEFRA improvements. This bill establishes a system of prospectively determined rates which will foster greater efficiency in the provision of hospital services. Medicare payments for operating costs will be specifically related to the patient's condition, but will not vary from hospital to hospital (except to allow for differences in area wage rates). Rates will be set for each of 467 diagnosis-related groups. Capital expenditures and medical education costs will be excluded initially from the calculation of basic payments and reimbursed separately. Additional payments will be made for unusual cases involving exceptionally long hospital stays.

To the extent that a hospital operates efficiently it would earn a surplus, and to the extent it operates inefficiently it would show a deficit. Hospitals with higher costs will not be able to pass on extra costs to Medicare beneficiaries and thus will face strong incentives to make cost-effective changes in practices.

The Health Costs Containment Tax Act of 1983 is designed to encourage employers to provide an adequate level of health benefits to their employees, while eliminating the open-ended tax preference for health benefits over cash wages.

Under current tax law an employer's contribution to an employee's health plan is not included in the employee's gross income. This bill will limit tax-free health benefits paid by an employer to $175 per month for a family plan and $70 per month for individual coverage. These limits will be indexed to increase yearly in proportion to the Consumer Price Index. Employer contributions above these amounts will be included in the employee's income and taxed (income and Social Security) accordingly. Thus, individuals can choose to purchase as much health insurance as they wish with after-tax dollars, but the tax laws will not subsidize the purchase of unlimited health insurance.

By doing so, they contribute both to the persistence of inefficient forms of health care financing and delivery and to overuse of health services. The limit on tax-free benefits will help to alleviate these problems while allowing employers to provide adequate tax-free coverage to protect an employee against the serious financial consequences of illness. Employees will be free to purchase more comprehensive health care coverage with after-tax dollars.

Last year Congress, with the support of my Administration, amended the Medicare statute to permit payments on a risk basis to HMOs and other competitive medical plans that provide Medicare beneficiaries with coverage at least as extensive as the Medicare benefit package. The optional voucher provision will build on current law by allowing Medicare beneficiaries to use Medicare benefits to enroll in a wider array of private health plans. Medicare will contribute an amount equal to 95 percent of what it would have cost to care for the beneficiary if he or she had elected traditional Medicare coverage. If a beneficiary selects a private health plan with a premium lower than Medicare's contribution, the beneficiary will be eligible for a cash rebate from the private plan. If, on the other hand, the private plan costs more than Medicare's contribution, the beneficiary must pay the difference.

Enrollment in a private health plan will be voluntary. Once a year, beneficiaries will have the opportunity to switch private health plans or to elect traditional Medicare coverage. A qualified health plan may be an HMO, an indemnity insurer, or a service benefit plan. All private plans must cover, at a minimum, the services provided under Parts A and B of Medicare, and must participate in a coordinated annual open enrollment period.

Medicare customary and prevailing charges for physician services will be held at 1983 levels for one year beginning in July, 1984. Under current law prevailing charges would otherwise be increased in July, 1984, by the annualized 1984 value of the Medicare Economic Index while increases in customary charges would not be constrained. This limit is consistent with other steps contained in the Budget to reduce the structural deficit.

The Tax Equity and Fiscal Responsibility Act (TEFRA) limited the increase in hospital expenditures under Medicare to the increase in the cost of goods and services hospitals purchase (the hospital ``market basket index'') plus one percent. This provision amends TEFRA to limit the rate of increase in hospital expenditures for fiscal year 1984 only to the increase in the hospital market basket index.

Medicare spending for physicians increased by 21 percent in 1982 and is expected to rise by 19 percent in 1983 and 17 percent in 1984. As mentioned earlier, Medicare hospital expenditures have grown at comparable rates. In this time of fiscal crisis, we must ask all participants in the health care market, physicians, hospitals, and program beneficiaries, to do their part in slowing increases in spending.

In January, 1984, the Part B premium will be set at 25 percent -- the percentage specified in current law -- of program costs for aged beneficiaries for that calendar year. Over the next four years, the Part B premium will be increased 2.5 percentage points each year, to reach 35 percent of program costs for the elderly in January, 1988. Thereafter, the premium for each calendar year would be set at 35 percent of program costs (the actuarially adequate rate) for the elderly for that year. When Medicare began, Congress envisioned that the elderly would bear 50 percent of SMI costs and the law initially required that SMI costs be equally financed by the general taxpayer and the users of SMI services.

Current law does not provide for future increases in the deductible. As a result, the initial beneficiary liability for medical services will decrease in real terms over time and these costs will be shifted to the Federal government. Furthermore, the value of the deductible as a deterrent to unnecessary utilization will again diminish.

Medicare and Medicaid more effective and efficient programs. They include, among others, proposals for competitive purchasing for laboratory services and durable medical equipment and reimbursement charges for certain Medicare services.

This provision requires States to impose nominal copayments on all Medicaid beneficiaries for hospital, physician, clinic, and outpatient department services. Specifically, the categorically needy would have to pay $1 per day for hospital services and $1 per visit for physician or outpatient services. The medically needy would have to pay $2 per for hospital services and $1.50 per visit for physician services. Beneficiaries who are enrolled in HMOs or who are institutionalized would be exempt from all copayment requirements.

First-dollar insurance coverage, such as that which Medicaid provides, leaves the consumer with virtually no financial incentive to question the need for services. Services that are totally free are likely to be overutilized. If patients share in some of the costs, they and their physicians will reduce unnecessary or marginal utilization. There is substantial evidence that cost-sharing can reduce health care costs, mostly by reducing unnecessary utilization.

Federal deficit. In fiscal year 1984 this legislative package will have a cumulative budgetary impact of $4.2 billion: the net Medicare impact of spending reductions and premium increases is a budgetary reduction of $1.7 billion; Federal Medicaid spending reductions amount to $256 million, and increased tax revenues from the change in the tax treatment of employer-paid health benefits amount to $2.3 billion. These savings are sustained and, in fact, grow in subsequent years.

The legislation that we are advancing today reflects our most thoughtful effort to address and reform the basic economic incentives that operate in the health care sector. Since health care now represents over 10 percent of our Nation's Gross National Product and is growing as a proportion of GNP each year, the enormous task of structural reform is well worth undertaking. As I mentioned earlier, we have taken great care to devise a legislative package that shares the responsibility for such reform and the burden of reductions in health care financing fairly among all segments of our society. The distribution of budgetary savings among workers and Medicare and Medicaid beneficiaries confirms our efforts in this regard.

Our need to constrain the growth of our national spending for health care in the interests of a healthy and stable economy is urgent. Regulatory approaches to health care cost containment tried previously have proven ineffective and sometimes counterproductive to this goal. I urge you to join me in facing the challenge before us and consider favorably our approach to health incentives reform.

These developments are the result of the program I proposed 3 years ago to correct the severe economic and political problems caused by previous short-sighted and misguided policies and priorities. That program focused on long-range real growth. My tax proposals were designed to provide badly needed incentives for saving and productive investment. I supported the Federal Reserve in its pursuit of sound monetary policy. I worked with the Congress to reverse the growth of Government programs that had become too large or had outlived their usefulness, and as a result, domestic programs, which had been growing rapidly for 3 decades, have finally been contained. I worked to eliminate or simplify unnecessary or burdensome regulations.

Frequently, because of entrenched constituency special interests, the political risks involved in doing so were great. I thanked Members then, and continue to be grateful, for the crucial support my program received. The Nation is now beginning to reap the solid fruits of our joint perseverance and foresight.

The economy's response has fully vindicated my economic program. During the past 2 years the percentage rise in consumer price index has been no more than it was during the first 6 months of 1980. Economic recovery has been vigorous during the past year, with real GNP rising over 6% and industrial production by 16%. Unemployment, though still unacceptably high, has declined by a record 2\1/2\ percentage points in a single year. Capacity utilization in American plants has risen dramatically. Business investment in new plant and equipment has risen 11\1/2\% in the past year, in real terms. American productivity, stagnant from 1977 to 1981, climbed 3.7% between the third quarter of 1982 and the third quarter of 1983. Interest rates declined substantially in mid-1982, followed by a major, sustained rally of the stock market that added half a trillion dollars to the net financial worth of American households. Real disposable personal income rose 5.1% in 1983. After a substantial decline, the U.S. dollar has rallied powerfully to its highest level in more than a decade.

We are not, however, out of the woods yet. Despite our success in reducing the rate of growth of nondefense spending in the last three budgets, spending in 1985 will exceed 1981 levels by 41%, reflecting continued increases in basic entitlement programs, essential increases in defense spending, and rapid growth of interest costs. Clearly, much remains to be done. The task of rebuilding our military forces to adequate levels must be carried to completion, and our commitment to provide economic and military support to small, poor nations that are struggling to preserve democracy must be honored. At the same time, further action is required to curb the size and growth of many programs and to achieve managerial efficiencies throughout Government, wherever the opportunity is present.

Last year, I reviewed the dramatic improvements during the preceding 2 years in Government operations, and in the way they affect the economy. I am happy to report that these improvements continued through a third year.

The Federal tax system has been significantly restructured. Marginal income tax rates have been substantially reduced, greatly improving the climate for saving and investment. Depreciation reform has been enacted, restoring the value of depreciation allowances eroded by inflation. Tax loopholes have been closed, making the tax structure more equitable. Efforts have been made to shift to financing Government programs through user fees commensurate with benefits and services provided.

The rapid growth of means-tested entitlement programs has been curbed. Eligibility criteria have been tightened to target benefits more to the truly needy, and significant steps have been taken to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of these programs. Unnecessarily frequent cost-of-living adjustments were pared back.

Improvements in the management and control of Federal credit activities are being pursued. The administration has supported the basic intent of proposed legislation that would move off-budget lending onto the unified budget, in order to provide better budgetary control over Federal lending.

Proliferation of regulations and red tape has been stopped. The number of new Federal rules has fallen by over a quarter during the past three years, and hundreds of unnecessary old rules have been eliminated. For the first time, the Federal Register of new regulatory actions has grown shorter for three consecutive years; it is now one-third shorter than in 1980. Federal paperwork requirements have been cut by well over 300 million hours annually, and will be reduced even further in 1984. This has saved the American public over 150,000 work-years that had been spent every year filing out unnecessary Federal forms and reports. Our regulatory reform efforts to date will save individual citizens, businesses, and State and local governments over $150 billion over the next decade.

Major management improvement initiatives are underway that will fundamentally change the way the Federal Government operates. The President's Council on Integrity and Efficiency has reported $31 billion in cost reductions or funds put to better use.

These are impressive accomplishments -- accomplishments to be proud of and to build on. And together we can build on them. With this budget I call on all Members of the Congress once again for additional steps to ensure the firmness of our foundations and overcome the Nation's budget problem.

Before us stands the prospect of an extended era of peace, prosperity, growth, and a rising standard of living for all Americans. What must we do to ensure that that promise shall be realized and enjoyed in the years to come? What must we do to ensure that the high price of adjustment to this new era paid by the Nation in recent years shall not have been paid in vain?

All signs point to continued strong economic growth, vigorous investment, and rising productivity, without renewed inflation -- all but one. Only the threat of indefinitely prolonged high budget deficits threatens the continuation of sustained noninflationary growth and prosperity.

This specter must be laid to rest: just as fears of rampant inflation and its attendant evils are being laid to rest; just as fears of helplessness before growth in Soviet military might and all it threatens are being laid to rest; just as fears that the Nation's social security system would ``go under'' have been laid to rest. A number of actions will be required to lay it to rest. This budget requests these actions of Congress; it calls for measures to continue to curb the upward momentum of Federal spending and to increase Federal receipts. Other actions involve such fundamental reform of our fiscal procedures that they will require that the Constitution be amended.

Congress has each year enacted a portion of my budget prosposals, while ignoring others for the time being. It is moving slowly, year by year, toward the full needed set of budget adjustments. I urge the Congress to enact this year not only the proposals contained in this budget, but also constitutional amendments providing for a line-item veto and for a balanced budget -- rather than the fitful policy of enacting a half-hearted reform this year, another one next year, and so on.

Where Congress lacks the will to enforce upon itself the strict fiscal diet that is now necessary, it needs the help of the Executive Branch. We need a constitutional amendment granting the President power to veto individual items in appropriations bills. Forty-three of the fifty States give this authority to their governors. Congress has approved a line-item veto for the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, and the trust territories. It is now time for Congress to grant this same authority to the President. As Governor of California, I was able to use the line-item veto as a powerful tool against wasteful government spending. It works, and works well, in State government. Every number in this document bears testimony to the urgent need for the Federal Government to adopt this fundamental fiscal reform.

We must seek a bipartisan basis for fundamental reforms of Government spending programs. We need to reexamine just what, how, and how much the Federal Government should be doing -- given our need for security and well-being and our desire to leave power and resources with the people. The President's Private Sector Survey on Cost Control (Grace Commission) has already come up with some interesting suggestions in this regard that, with the help of the Congress, will be adopted wherever possible.

To those who say we must raise taxes, I say wait. Tax increases pile unfair burdens on the people, hurt capital formation, and destroy incentives for growth. Tax cuts helped sustain the recovery, leading to faster growth and more jobs. Rather than risk sabotaging our future, let us go forward with an historic reform for fairness, simplicity, and growth. It is time to simplify the entire tax code so everyone is on equal footing.

The tax system must be made simpler and fairer; honest people should not pay for cheaters; the underground economy should come back into the sunlight; and everyone's tax rates should be reduced to spark more savings, investment, and incentives for work and economic growth. This is the blueprint for a brighter future and a fairer tax system. Therefore, I am directing the Department of the Treasury to complete a study with recommendations by the end of the year.

It must be fair. Just as all Americans will share in the benefits that are coming from recovery, all should share fairly in the burden of transition to a more limited role of Government in our society.

Education. -- I have devoted considerable time this year to the problems of our schools. The record of the last two decades is not good, though relieved in places by the efforts of many dedicated teachers, administrators, parents, and students. It has been extremely gratifying to observe the response all across the country to my call for a renewed commitment to educational excellence. Excellence in education will only happen when the States and school districts, parents and teachers, and our children devote themselves to the hard work necessary to achieve it. Federal money cannot buy educational excellence. It has not in the past and will not in the future. What we will do in this budget is seek resources to help the States plan and carry out education reforms. My budget includes $729 million, about 50% more than Congress appropriated for 1984, for the education block grant and discretionary fund. States and localities will receive this increase in resources and be able to use the funds for education reform without Federal prescription and interference.

Establishment of education savings accounts to give middle- and lower-income families and incentive to save for their children's college education and, at the same time, to encourage a real increase in saving for economic growth.

Permission for States or localities, if they so choose, to use their compensatory education funds to establish voucher programs to broaden family choice of effective schooling methods for educationally disadvantaged children.

Training and employment. -- While the economic forecast predicts continuing improvement in the economy and further steady declines in the unemployment rate, I recognize that there are those who lack the skills to find and hold steady jobs. This is particularly true for some of our youth. In the past, Federal training and employment programs have not always helped these people gain the skills needed for success in the job market. Instead the Government spent precious tax dollars funding temporary, dead-end, make-work jobs that did little, if anything, to prepare these people for holding real jobs in the private sector. My administration worked with the Congress to change that. The Job Training Partnership Act, which I signed into law in 1982, involves private industry in the design and delivery of job training programs. Each year it will train 1.5 million disadvantaged adults and youths, dislocated workers, and welfare recipients in skills needed for private sector jobs. Additional work experience for over 700,000 disadvantaged youths will be provided during the summer months. What is needed now is not more Government programs, but removal of Government-created barriers that make it difficult for youths who want to work to find jobs. It has long been acknowledged that the minimum wage is a barrier to job finding for youths, especially minority youths who lack skills. Therefore, I am again asking the Congress to authorize a wage of 75% of the minimum wage for youths newly hired for jobs during the summer months. This will let employers lower their costs to levels more in line with the skills youths possess, and it will help many young people find jobs and gain valuable work experience. The legislation I have proposed includes protections for adult workers.

Research. -- Recognizing the Federal responsibility to maintain and strengthen U.S. leadership in science and technology, the budget proposes further increases of more than 10% in Government-wide funding for basic research. The $8 billion planned for support of such research represents a relatively small share of the budget, but it is a critical investment in the Nation's future. Basic research lays the foundation for a strong defense in the years to come and for new technologies and industries that will maintain U.S. industrial leadership, create new jobs, and improve our quality of life.

Space. -- Our civilian space program has made remarkable progress in the past year. The space shuttle, the world's most advanced space transportation system, has made eight pathbreaking trips into space and is progressing rapidly towards achieving routine operational status.

We can not look forward confidently to the next major challenge in space -- a space station. The space station, to be placed in permanent Earth orbit in the early 1990's, is intended to enhance the Nation's science and application programs, to help develop advanced technologies potentially useful to the economy, and to encourage greater commercial use of space. The budget provides planning money to initiate this program.

National defense. -- During the past 3 years, we have also taken decisive measures to increase our military strength to levels necessary to protect our Nation and our friends and allies around the world. At the same time, we have vigorously pursued diplomatic approaches, such as arms reduction talks, in an effort to ensure the principles of security and freedom for all.

The improvement in our defense posture has been across the board. Long-overdue modernization of our strategic forces is proceeding, while our conventional forces are also being modernized and strengthened. Successful recruiting and retention over the past 3 years have resulted in all of our armed services being more fully manned with capable, high-caliber men and women.

Heating oil prices have been lower this past year than they were in January 1981, when I removed oil price controls. Gasoline prices have fallen to levels which, after adjustments for general inflation and sales taxes, are within 5% of those that prevailed in the U.S. in the 1950's.

Energy programs proposed in the budget are designed to complement market forces by focusing resources on limited but appropriate responsibilities of the Federal Government and by managing these programs well. Thus, for example, the budget proposes increased spending for basic and other long-term energy research. In addition, the administration continues its commitment to filling the strategic petroleum reserve. The reserve has more than tripled in size in the last three years.

Health care. -- Progress has been made in slowing the explosive growth of health costs. As part of the Social Security Amendments of 1983, Congress enacted the Administration's proposed fixed price prospective payment system for hospital care. This replaced the previous Medicare hospital reimbursement system under which hospitals were reimbursed for their costs. The new prospective payment system has altered incentives and should lessen the rate of increase in hospital costs.

Under the proposals in this budget, physicians will be asked to maintain present fee levels for medicare through the next fiscal year. Tax incentives prompting overly-costly employee health insurance benefits would be revised to make users and providers more sensitive to costs. Finally, resources for biomedical research will increase.

Transportation. -- My administration has sought to shift much of the costs of transportation from the general taxpayer to those who use transportation services and facilities. I signed into law several administration-backed proposals to increase excise taxes on aviation and highway users and thereby provide funding needed to revitalize and modernize these important segments of the Nation's transportation system. The proportion of the Department of Transportation's budget financed by user fees has risen from 49% in 1982 to 72% in 1985. The budget reflects the administration's continued commitment to the ``users pay'' principle by including receipts proposals for nautical and aviation aids, the inland waterway system, and construction and maintenance of deep-draft ports.

Recognizing the importance of safety in our transportation systems, the budget provides for significant improvements in this area. In addition, my administration secured passage of legislation designed to rebuild the Nation's highway and public transportation facilities. This legislation substantially increased funds available to the States and local communities to complete and repair the aging interstate highway system, to rehabilitate principal rural and urban highways and bridges, and to improve mass transit systems. The budget also provides for improvements in the safety of our transportation system.

My administration will work with the Congress to provide for timely and efficient port construction. A system that recovers a significant portion of the cost of existing port maintenance and new port construction must be enacted prior to any new construction. In the last 3 years, my administration has sent several reasonable proposals to the Congress, and progress is being made.

Criminal justice. -- My administration has continued to strengthen the Federal criminal justice system by seeking major legislative changes in immigration policy, sentencing, and bail procedures, and by seeking increased funding for law enforcement activities. An additional organized crime drug enforcement task force will be established in Florida, bringing the total number of task forces to 13. The budget proposes to bolster immigration control by strengthening border enforcement and improving the effectiveness of border inspection programs. Additional attorneys will be sought for the Internal Revenue Service and the Justice Department, underscoring my administration's determination to tackle the serious problem of tax protesters and evaders. The administration will enhance its efforts to identify, neutralize, and defeat foreign agents who pose a threat to the Nation.

The budget provides for continuing the major expansion of international broadcasting activities started last year. Television, exchanges of people, and other programs to improve communications with foreign countries are included.

My administration will continue to work with the Congress to strengthen the management and coordination of the Government's international trade functions by consolidating them in a Department of International Trade and Industry.

It provides for a significant increase in assistance to Central America, the specific nature of which will be defined after our review of the recommendations of the National Bipartisan Commission on Central America.

Civil service retirement. -- There is growing recognition that civil service retirement has far more generous benefits and is much more costly than retirement programs in the private sector or in State and local governments. Accordingly, the administration continues its strong support of the civil service reform proposals advanced in last year's budget. In 1985, the administration will focus its legislative effort on three of those proposals, in modified form: cost-of-living adjustment (COLA) reform, a high 5-year salary average for the benefit formula, and increased employee and agency retirement contributions.

GI bill rate increase. -- The budget proposes legislation to provide a 15% increase in the rates of educational assistance and special training allowances to GI bill trainees and disabled veterans receiving vocational rehabilitation assistance, effective January 1985. The increase will offset increased costs since GI bill benefits were last raised in 1981. It will provide an increase in monthy education benefit checks to 544,000 veterans and their dependents and survivors.

The overall efficiency of Government in the United States can also be improved by a more rational sorting out of governmental responsibilities among the various levels of government in our Federal system -- Federal, State, and local -- and by eliminating or limiting overlap and duplication.

Federal credit in all its forms imposes costs on the U.S. economy that must be weighed against its benefits. Federal intervention through guarantees and direct loans may misdirect investment and preempt capital that could be used more efficiently by unsubsidized, private borrowers. Because federally assisted borrowers are frequently less productive than private borrowers, large Federal credit demands, and the degree of subsidy involved in Federal credit activity, must be reduced if we are to improve prospects for economic growth.

The administration continues its strong commitment to control Federal direct loans and loan guarantees. It has supported the basic intent of proposed legislation to move off-budget Federal lending into the unified budget. It seeks other basic reforms in the way in which direct loans and loan guarantees are presented and controlled.

In the coming year, my administration will issue a directive establishing Government-wide policies on credit. This directive will be both an explicit statement of the administration's goals in providing credit assistance and a means of controlling the manner in which that assistance is provided.

Federal regulation grew explosively throughout the 1970's. Whether well or poorly designed, whether aimed at worthy or dubious objectives, these rules have one thing in common: they ``tax'' and ``spend'' billions of dollars entirely within the private sector of the economy, unconstrained by public budget or appropriations controls.

Federal regulations must be reviewed by the Office of Management and Budget before being issued to determine whether their social benefits will exceed their social costs. As a result of this review process, we have reversed the rate of growth of Federal regulations. Hundreds of ill-conceived proposals have been screened out, and hundreds of existing rules have been stricken from the books because they were unnecessary or ineffective. Equally important, numerous existing regulations have been improved, and new rules have been made as cost-effective as possible within statutory limits. We are steadily winding down economic controls that regulate prices, form barriers to entry for new firms, and other anti-competitive regulations. At the same time we are increasing the effectiveness of our programs promoting health, safety, and environmental quality.

Our regulatory reform program has been open and public. New rules and changes to existing rules now require public notice and comment. My Executive Order requires regulatory agencies to consider the interests of the general public as well as special interest groups in rulemaking proceedings. The Task Force on Regulatory Relief and the Office of Management and Budget have issued regular reports detailing the progress of regulatory reform efforts. The Unified Agenda of Federal Regulations, issued twice each year, describes all planned and pending regulatory changes in virtually all Federal agencies. The administration's Regulatory Policy Guidelines, published in August 1983, is the first comprehensive statement of regulatory policy ever to be issued.

Individual regulatory decisions will always be contentious and controversial, but surely we can all agree on the general need for regulatory reform. Making each Government rule as cost-effective as possible benefits everyone and strengthens the individual regulatory statutes. Regulation has become such an important role of the Federal Government that strong and balanced central oversight is becoming a necessity and a bi-partisan objective. The Laxalt-Leahy Regulatory Reform Act, which passed the Senate unanimously in 1982, would have accomplished this reform.

It is important to continue to reduce the size of Government. It is equally important to use the remaining resources as efficiently and effectively as possible. My administration has begun to make great strides in doing exactly that.

Reducing fraud, waste, and mismanagement. -- This objective seeks better use of appropriated dollars. The President's Council on Integrity and Efficiency (PCIE) was formed in early 1981 and is made up of 18 department and agency Inspectors General. They recently reported $8.4 billion in cost reductions or funds put to better use in the last 6 months of 1983 and a total of $31 billion since they were appointed. The PCIE is beginning to direct its efforts toward preventing problems before they occur, through improved technology and better audit processes, as described in their latest report.

The PCIE also found that enormous waste was occurring because the Federal Government had never established an effective cash management system -- despite the fact that it handles almost a trillion dollars in cash annually. This is currently being corrected by installing sophisticated, up-to-date systems that the Department of the Treasury estimates could save as much as $3\1/2\ billion a year.

When my administration came to office we found delinquent debt owed the Government rising at a rate of over 40% per year -- with a total debt outstanding of over $240 billion. After only 2 years' effort, this annual growth rate has been reduced to 2%. A credit pre-screening system is now being put in place, and automated collection centers are being installed.

Federal procurement involves annual expenditures of $170 billion. Procurement was an overly complex process with only 50% of our contract dollars awarded under competitive bid. My administration has replaced three sets of regulations with one, and we are now setting up a new pro-competitive policy to cut costs.

We have extended our fight to reduce waste and mismanagement to a direct attack on that nemesis that has always characterized the Federal Government: red tape and paperwork. We have already reduced the paperwork burden placed on the private sector by the Federal Government by well over 300 million hours. In this current fiscal year we intend to reduce the burden by another 130 million hours.

Control (Grace Commission) developed numerous recommendations for savings and cost avoidance. These recommendations range from reducing costs of Federal employee retirement programs to upgrading the Government's seriously outdated and inefficient management and administrative systems. I have already included many of these ideas in this budget and will include more in future budgets. My administration will develop a tracking system to make sure they are carried out.

Developing streamlined Federal Government management systems. -- As we are reducing the size of Government and reducing fraud, waste, and abuse, we also need to change fundamentally the way the Federal Government is managed. When I came into office, we found that the Federal Government lacked a well-planned compatible management process, so we set about developing one. This effort involves five major projects: (1) planning and budgeting, (2) financial management and accounting, (3) personnel management and payroll, (4) personal and real property, and (5) automatic data processing and telecommunications management.

Responsibilities and resources for the development of each of these management systems have been assigned to those agencies that have or are capable of developing the most advanced management system in each category. Without this effort, the Federal Government would continue to operate in an inefficient manner that does not serve our citizens well.

Improving the delivery of services. -- My administration is looking seriously at the way the delivery of Federal services is handled across the country. The objective of this effort is to achieve improved service at lower cost, through improved technology and management techniques such as prescreening, computer matching, adjusted payment schedules, contractor and grantee performance incentives, and a streamlined field structure.

All of these efforts are being planned and coordinated centrally as part of the budget process. The results of these efforts will be reported to the Congress together with resulting savings and proposals to upgrade management of the Federal Government.

Vigorous, noninflationary economic recovery is well underway. The long winter of transition from the misguided policies of the past, with their inflationary and growth-deadening side-effects, is now yielding to a new springtime of hope for America. The hope of continued recovery to long-term noninflationary prosperity can be realized if we are able to work together on further deficit reduction measures. Bold, vigorous fiscal policy action to break the momentum of entrenched spending programs, together with responsible and restrained monetary policy, is essential to keep the recovery on track; essential to the Nation's future economic health and vitality. Limited measures to increase receipts will also be necessary to make our tax system fairer and more efficient. But it is important -- more than important, crucial -- to get the mix of spending restraint and receipts increases right. There must be substantial reductions in spending and strictly limited increases in receipts.

I call urgently upon the Congress, therefore, to take the actions proposed in this budget. Far too much is at stake to permit casual dismissal of these essential belt-tightening measures. The Nation has paid a high price for the prospect of a secure, prosperous, noninflationary future; that prospect must not be sacrificed to a sense of complacency, to an expedient ducking of the issues.

With confidence in the ultimate beneficial effects of our actions, let us seize the high ground and secure, for ourselves and our posterity, a bright and prosperous future -- a future in which the glory that was America is again restored.

President Reagan. It's been a great pleasure for me and for all of us to have -- or to be able to welcome President Spiljak of Yugoslavia and to confer with him on issues of importance to both our countries.

Relations between Yugoslavia and the United States are good. President Spiljak's visit follows a long and well-established tradition of consultation and cooperation. The United States strongly supports Yugoslavia's independence, unity, and territorial integrity. Further, we respect its policy of nonalignment. Further, we respect this man who has done so much in these recent years for his country.

Despite understandable differences, consultations between us provide a unique and valuable perspective, and today's meeting was no exception. I expressed to the President our continued support for his government's efforts to meet its serious economic challenges. We'll do our part to help in cooperation with other Western governments, international financial institutions, and commercial banks. Vigorous economic recovery in the United States will itself help Yugoslavia by creating new opportunities for mutually beneficial commercial activity and the strengthening of bilateral trade.

Yugoslavia, like other nations of Europe, hopes for progress in arms control negotiations between the United States and the Soviet Union. I conveyed to President Spiljak our deeper commitment to reach equitable, verifiable agreements with the Soviet Union. Such agreements would be in our interest, the Soviet Union's interest, and in the interest of all mankind. We're flexible and realistic in pursuit of this goal and share the President's hope that the negotiations will resume in the near future.

Today, we also discussed the serious menace of international terrorism and underscored our intention to cooperate in opposing it wherever it occurs and for whatever reasons. The United States deplores all terrorist attacks against Yugoslav diplomatic counsellor and other representatives, and we will not tolerate such attacks on our territory.

The American people join me in conveying our best wishes to the people of Yugoslavia for the success of this year's Winter Olympic Games, which will begin next week in Sarajevo. Like our Los Angeles Olympic Organizing Committee, the Yugoslav Olympic Committee has invested tremendous human and material resources in putting the games together. As the two host countries for the 1984 games, we have reason to be proud of these endeavors.

President Spiljak has been an especially welcome guest, and I look forward to frequent consultations with him. And I'm confident that our bilateral relations will continue to grow and flourish. It's been good to have you here.

I would like to point out that the talks with President Reagan were held in a friendly and candid atmosphere of full, mutual respect which characterizes the relations between our two countries and peoples. President Reagan and I share the view that a practice of dialog in meetings between the highest representatives of our two countries, regardless of the well-known differences in our positions and views in some international issues, continues to greatly contribute to a better mutual understanding and stable cooperation in all fields of mutual interest. The principles of equality, independence, and noninterference as a mutually accepted basis for bilateral relations and cooperation were reaffirmed in our talks today.

I'm glad to note that our talks confirmed once again that the overall Yugoslav-American relations have been developing successfully and that there exist ample possibilities for their even more comprehensive promotion in the long run.

As President Reagan displayed the interest, I briefed him on the essence of the Yugoslav long-term program for economic stabilization. The achievement of our targets will offer a broader basis for an overall economic cooperation with all countries and in which United States of America is one of the most significant partners. In this context, I would like to emphasize that we attach great importance to the results achieved, as well as to the prospects to further develop mutual, economic cooperation in all areas. In this respect, special attention should be devoted to industrial, technological, financial cooperation as well as joint ventures.

President Reagan reiterated the resolve of the United States administration to prevent the terrorists and other hostile activities against Yugoslavia which are, at the same time, directed against the good Yugoslav-American relations and cooperation.

Thus we acquired a greater knowledge of, and gained a better insight in, the positions and activities of our two countries on the international scene. We share the concern over the present dangerous developments and further deterioration of the situation in the world.

We, for our part, pointed in particular to the need for strengthening international confidence and creating an atmosphere favorable for the renewal of dialog as a precondition for the settlement of the acute international political and economic problems.

Europe, and of our deep concern over the continuation of the arms race, in particular. We presented our views on the problems of the relations between the developed and the developing countries, as well as our assessments of some acute hotbeds of crisis such as the Middle East and Near East, southern Africa, and others. We find it to the need of resolving them by peaceful means in compliance with the principles and purposes of the Charter of the United Nations. In this context, we pointed to the activities and initiatives of the nonaligned countries at solving the outstanding international problems.

I'm confident that my visit and the fruitful and meaningful talks I had with President Reagan will give a fresh boost to an even more comprehensive development of cooperation between our two countries, thus contributing to international understanding in general.

Welcome to the White House. We're here for the signing of a proclamation that is designating the week beginning May 27th as National Tourism Week. I know I speak for the entire travel and tourism industry in thanking the Congressional Tourism Caucus for making this event possible.

Travel and tourism is an important industry. It's good business, and it's great for America. And to borrow a line, your industry does it in the old-fashioned way, through the hard work of thousands of small businesses. All Americans benefit from your profession, your calling. As our second largest retail industry, employing 4\1/2\ million workers, you help bring about one of the best economic recoveries in decades. And it's going to get even better.

Foreign visitors may come for the Olympics or a World's Fair, a business conference, or just to enjoy our nation's beauty and its heritage. Whatever they do, or whenever they do, they come to know our values and vision, our system of government, and they can feel the spirit of a good and great country.

There's no better way to promote international understanding and good will, or to explain freedom and democracy, than through travel and tourism. And when you celebrate National Tourism Week, I hope you'll celebrate your achievements and use the opportunity to highlight what you are doing for America.

Each of us benefits from the effects of tourism. It substantially enhances our personal growth and education. Tourism also promotes intercultural understanding and appreciation of the geography, history and people of the United States. Now that inflation has been reduced and the economy is growing, personal incomes and leisure time will increase more rapidly. Tourism therefore can be expected to play an even greater role in the lives of the American people.

In recognition of the significance of the tourism industry to the enhancement of international trade, understanding and goodwill, the Congress, by House Joint Resolution 168, has designated the week beginning May 27, 1984, as ``National Tourism Week'' and has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of that week.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 1st day of February, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

We all in this room, I know, and we know many millions more everywhere, turn to God in prayer, believe in the power and the spirit of prayer. And yet so often, we direct our prayers to those problems that are immediate to us, knowing that He has promised His help to us when we turn to Him. And yet in a world today that is so torn with strife where the divisions seem to be increasing, not people coming together, within countries, divisions within the people, themselves and all, I wonder if we have ever thought about the greatest tool that we have -- that power of prayer and God's help.

If you could add together the power of prayer of the people just in this room, what would be its megatonnage? And have we maybe been neglecting this and not thinking in terms of a broader basis in which we pray to be forgiven for the animus we feel towards someone in perhaps a legitimate dispute, and at the same time recognize that while the dispute will go on, we have to realize that that other individual is a child of God even as we are and is beloved by God, as we like to feel that we are.

This power of prayer can be illustrated by a story that goes back to the fourth century. The Asian monk living in a little remote village, spending most of his time in prayer or tending the garden from which he obtained his sustenance -- I hesitate to say the name because I'm not sure I know the pronunciation, but let me take a chance. It was Telemacmus, back in the fourth century. And then one day, he thought he heard the voice of God telling him to go to Rome. And believing that he had heard, he set out. And weeks and weeks later, he arrived there, having traveled most of the way on foot.

And it was at a time of a festival in Rome. They were celebrating a triumph over the Goths. And he followed a crowd into the Colosseum, and then there in the midst of this great crowd, he saw the gladiators come forth, stand before the Emperor, and say, ``We who are about to die salute you.'' And he realized they were going to fight to the death for the entertainment of the crowds.

And suddenly, a strange thing happened. The gladiators stood looking at this tiny form lying in the sand. A silence fell over the Colosseum. And then, someplace up in the upper tiers, an individual made his way to an exit and left, and others began to follow. And in the dead silence, everyone left the Colosseum. That was the last battle to the death between gladiators in the Roman Colosseum. Never again did anyone kill or did men kill each other for the entertainment of the crowd.

Now, several days ago while I was very concerned about what I was going to say here today and trying to think of something to say, I received through diplomatic channels a message from far out across the Pacific. Sometime ago, our Ambassador presented to General Romulo of the Philippines the American Medal of Freedom. Not only had he been a great friend of the United States in our time of war, but then he had spent 17 years as an Ambassador here in Washington, from his country to ours. And for whatever reason, he sent this message of thanks to me for the medal that had been given, and then included the farewell statement that he had made when he left Washington, left this country, after those 17 years.

And I had to confess, I had never been aware that there had been such a farewell message, and I'm quite sure that many of you hadn't. And so, I'm going to share it with you. I think it fits what we're talking about today. He said, ``I am going home, America. For 17 years, I have enjoyed your hospitality, visited every one of your 50 States. I can say I know you well. I admire and love America. It is my second home. What I have to say now in parting is both tribute and warning.

Like others, I've marveled at your factories, your skyscrapers, and your arsenals. But underlying everything else is the fact that America began as a God-loving, God-fearing, God-worshiping people, knowing that there is a spark of the divine in each one of us. It is this respect for the dignity of the human spirit which keeps America invincible.

I have long believed that the vitality of the American economy and the prosperity of the American people have been diminished by inappropriate policies of the Federal Government: unnecessary government regulations that discouraged initiative and wasted scarce capital and labor; an inefficient and unfair tax system that penalized effort, saving, and investment; excessive government spending that wasted taxpayers' money, misused our Nation's resources, and created budget deficits that reduced capital formation and added to the burden of the national debt; and monetary policies that produced frequent business cycles and a path of increasing inflation.

I came to Washington to change these policies. The needed reforms are far from complete, but substantial progress can already be seen: the burden of regulation has been reduced, tax rates have been lowered and the tax structure improved, government spending on a wide range of domestic programs has been curtailed, and a sound monetary policy has been established.

Although the full favorable effect of those reforms on our Nation's rate of economic growth will take time to develop, some of the benefit of our economic policies is already visible in the current recovery. The economy's performance in 1983 was very gratifying to me. The 3.2 percent rise in consumer prices between 1982 and 1983 was the lowest rate of inflation since 1967. The recovery produced a sharp drop in unemployment and a substantial increase in the income of American families. The number of people at work increased by more than 4 million and the unemployment rate fell from a high of 10.7 percent in December 1982 to 8.2 percent in December 1983. The 6.1 percent rise in real gross national product (GNP) last year means that real annual income per person in the United States rose $700.

Despite the substantial reduction in unemployment, the number of unemployed workers remains unacceptably high. Continued economic recovery will mean millons of additional jobs in the years ahead and further declines in the rate of unemployment. In 1984 alone, the American economy is expected to add more than 3 million additional jobs. By the end of the decade, we will need 16 million new jobs to absorb a growing labor force. Only a strong and expanding economy can provide those jobs while achieving a progressively lower level of unemployment over the next 6 years.

Although economic growth is by far the most important way to reduce unemployment, special policies to help the structurally unemployed and particularly disadvantaged groups can also be helpful. To assist these individuals in developing job-related skills that will lead to productive careers in the private sector, I proposed the Job Training Partnership Act that I signed into law in 1982. Last year I proposed additional measures to increase opportunities for training and retraining. Although the Congress has enacted some of my employment proposals, I am still waiting for congressional action on others.

Of particular concern to me is the unemployment among teenagers. Such unemployment is not only a problem in itself, but is also indicative of lost opportunities to acquire on-the-job training and job-related skills. It is widely recognized that the minimum wage law is a substantial barrier to the employment of teenagers, especially minority teenagers. I have proposed that during the summer months the minimum wage for teenagers be reduced to 75 percent of the regular minimum wage. This reform would give many teengagers the opportunity to get a first job and acquire the skills needed to help them with subsequent employment and would not hurt adult employment. With an unemployment rate of nearly 50 percent among black teenagers and with only about 20 percent of black teenagers employed, we must act. The Federal Government must not be the source of barriers to employment.

Washington. In the preceding 24 months, the consumer price level had increased more than 27 percent. Many people feared the U.S. Government had lost its ability to control inflation. Until inflation was brought under control, a healthy recovery could not get under way.

The inflation rate has declined dramatically over the past 3 years. Between 1982 and 1983, the consumer price index rose only 3.2 percent. Americans can again have confidence in the value of the dollar, and they can save for the future without fearing that the purchasing power of these savings will be destroyed by inflation. I am firmly committed to keeping inflation on a downward path. We must never relax in our pursuit of price stability.

The basic requirement for a continued moderation of inflation is a sound monetary policy. I continue to support the Federal Reserve in its pursuit of price stability through sound monetary policy. Last year was a particularly difficult time for monetary policy because of the substantial changes in financial regulations. I am pleased that, in spite of these difficulties, the monetary aggregates at the end of the year were within their target ranges. I expect that in 1984 the Federal Reserve will expand the money stock at a moderate rate that is consistent with both a sustained recovery and continuing progress against inflation.

Experience shows, however, that rapid money growth inevitably leads to an increased rate of inflation and higher interest rates. The only monetary policy that can bring interest rates down, and keep them down, is one that promotes confidence that inflation will continue to decline in the years ahead.

The high interest rates in the United States and our low rate of inflation continue to make dollar securities an appealing investment for individuals and businesses around the world. In addition, the United States has been an attractive place for stock market investment and for direct business investment. The result has been a continued rise in the dollar's exchange value relative to other currencies of the world.

The sharp rise in the value of the dollar since 1980 has made it cheaper for Americans to purchase products from overseas, thereby helping us fight inflation. But the dollar's sharp rise has made it difficult for American businesses and farmers to compete in world markets. The decline in U.S. exports and the substantial rise in our imports has resulted in record trade deficits in 1982 and 1983. The trade deficit has been temporarily exacerbated by the international debt problems and by the more advanced stage of recovery in the United States than in the world at large.

Despite these problems, I remain committed to the principle of free trade as the best way to bring the benefits of competition to American consumers and businesses. It would be totally inappropriate to respond by erecting trade barriers or by using taxpayers' dollars to subsidize exports. Instead, we must work with the other nations of the world to reduce the export subsidies and import barriers that currently hurt U.S. farmers, businesses, and workers.

I am also firmly opposed to any attempt to depress the dollar's exchange value by intervention in international currency markets. Pure exchange market intervention cannot offset the fundamental factors that determine the dollar's value. Intervention in the foreign exchange market would be an exercise in futility that would probably enrich currency speculators at the expense of American taxpayers. A combination of exchange market intervention and expansionary monetary policy could reduce the dollar's exchange value, but only by causing an unacceptable increase in the rate of inflation. The dollar must therefore be allowed to seek its natural value without exchange market intervention.

One of the four key elements of my program for economic recovery is a far-reaching program of regulatory relief. Substantial progress has been made during the last 3 years. The growth of new regulations has been reduced by more than a third. The demands on the private sector of government paperwork have been reduced by several hundred million hours a year. The Congress approved legislation that has led to substantial deregulation of financial markets and intercity bus transportation. The Federal Communications Commission, with our support, has reduced the regulation of broadcasting and of new communications technology, and the Interstate Commerce Commission and the Civil Aeronautics Board have gone far down the path of deregulation of competitive transportation markets. The benefits of these and other deregulation measures are now increasingly apparent to American consumers and businesses.

It is also apparent that substantial further deregulation and regulatory reform will require changes in the basic regulatory legislation. I urge the Congress to act on the several measures that I proposed last year on natural gas decontrol, financial deregulation, and reform of private pension regulation. I remain confident that there is a basis for agreement on measures that would reduce the burden of Federal regulations, while protecting our shared values and not jeopardizing safety.

The final installment of the 3-year personal tax cut took effect in July, giving a helpful boost to the economic recovery. The income tax rate at each income level has been reduced by about 25 percent since 1980. In 1984 a median income four-person family will pay about $1,100 less than it would have without these tax reductions. And, beginning in 1985, the tax brackets will be adjusted automatically so that inflation will no longer push taxpayers into higher brackets and increase the share of their income taken in taxes.

The Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981 went beyond reducing tax rates to establish important reforms in the structure of the tax system. For businesses, the Accelerated Cost Recovery System increased the after-tax profitability of investments in plant and equipment. The sharp fall in inflation has also increased after-tax profitability. As a result, investment in business equipment has recently been quite strong despite the high real interest rates.

For individuals, the Economic Recovery Tax Act reduced the marriage tax penalty, the estate tax burden, and tax discrimination against saving. The response to the universal eligibility of Individual Retirement Accounts (IRAs) has been far greater than was originally expected. It is estimated that more than 15 million individuals now use IRAs to save for their retirement. Last year, I proposed to expand the opportunity for all married couples to use IRAs fully by allowing them to contribute up to $2,000 each per year to an IRA even if only one has wage income.

Further improvement and simplification of our tax system are sorely needed. The burden of taxation depends not only on the quantity of tax revenue that is collected but also on the quality of the tax system. I have asked the Secretary of the Treasury to develop a plan of action with specific recommendations to make our tax system fairer, simpler, and less of a burden on our Nation's economy. By broadening the tax base, personal tax rates could come down, not go up.

Although many doubted this could be done, both goals are being achieved. We must do everything that we can to avoid waste in defense as in other areas of government. But we must also be willing to pay the cost of providing the military capability to defend our country and to meet our responsibilities as the leading Nation of the free world. Outlays for defense had declined to only 5.2 percent of GNP in 1980, less than one-fourth of total government outlays. By the current fiscal year, defense outlays have increased to 6.7 percent of GNP and 28 percent of total outlays. Real defense outlays have grown 39 percent since 1980. Our spending on defense, however, remains a far smaller percentage of our national income than it was in 1960, when defense outlays took 9.7 percent of GNP.

Real spending has been cut on a wide range of domestic programs and activities. Many wasteful bureaucratic activities have been eliminated and the number of nondefense employees on the Federal payroll has been reduced by 71,000. We have examined every area of Federal Government spending, and sought to eliminate unnecessary and wasteful spending while protecting the benefits needed by the poor and the aged. As a result, total nondefense spending now takes a smaller share of our GNP than it did in 1980. Moreover, under present law, nondefense spending will continue to take a declining share of our GNP in the years ahead.

This reduction has been accomplished without any decrease in existing social security benefits or any change in the medicare benefits for the elderly. Spending on all other nondefense activities and programs has actually declined over 12 percent in real terms since 1980. Even with no further reductions in these activities and programs, their share of GNP in 1986 will be nearly back to the level of 1965.

I am committed to continuing the search for ways to reduce government spending. The budget that I am submitting to the Congress identifies significant savings in entitlement programs and reductions in outlays for other programs that are excessive or that are not the proper responsibility of the Federal Government. The Grace Commission has given us some 2500 ways to reduce wasteful spending that could save billions of dollars in the years ahead.

Federal Government has produced a deficit in 22 of the last 23 years. My most serious economic disappointment in 1983 was therefore the failure of the Congress to enact the deficit reduction proposals that I submitted last January in my budget for fiscal 1984. We would be much closer to a balanced budget today if the Congress had enacted all of the spending cuts that I have requested since assuming office, and if the long recession and the sharp decline in inflation had not substantially reduced real tax revenue. In last year's budget I proposed changes in outlays and revenues that could put the deficit on a sharply declining path that, by 1988, would have been less than 2 percent of GNP and on its way to a balance of revenues and outlays.

The unwillingness of the Congress to accept the proposals that I offered has made it clear to me that we must wait until after this year's election to enact spending reductions coupled with tax simplification that will eventually eliminate our budget deficit. But we cannot delay until 1985 to start reducing the deficits that are threatening to prevent a sustained and healthy recovery. I have therefore called on the Democratic and Republican leaders in the Congress to designate representatives to work with the Administration on the development of a ``downpayment'' deficit reduction program.

I believe that this bipartisan group could develop a package that could be enacted this spring which would reduce the deficit by about $100 billion over the next 3 fiscal years. The package could include a number of the less contentious spending cuts that are pending before the Congress plus additional outlay savings based on the proposals of the Grace Commission. Additional revenue could be provided by measures to close certain tax loopholes -- measures that the Department of the Treasury has previously said are worthy of support.

These deficit reductions can increase the public's confidence in our economic future and their faith in the ability of the political system to deal satisfactorily with the deficit. The downpayment package can be a first step toward full elimination of the remaining deficits. Even with a 3-year $100 billion package, the deficits projected for fiscal 1986 and beyond are totally unacceptable to me. They would be a serious threat to our Nation's economic health and a heavy burden to future generations. I am committed to finding ways to reduce further the growth of spending and to put the budget on a path that will lead to a balance between outlays and receipts. In 1985 I will submit a budget that can achieve this goal. But we must go further and make basic structural reforms in the budgetary process -- including the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment -- that will keep spending under control and prevent deficits in the future.

As I look ahead, I am very optimistic about the prospects for the American economy. Substantial progress has been made in reforming the economic policies that will shape our economic future. If we continue to develop and pursue sound policies, our Nation can achieve a long period of strong economic growth with low inflation, and the American people can enjoy unprecedented prosperity and economic security.

On February 6 in Geneva, the United Nations Human Rights Commission will open its 40th session. This important world forum, which authored the Universal Declaration of Human Rights in 1948, will meet once again to focus on allegations of human rights violations around the world.

We Americans are bound together not by common ancestry, but by our common blessing of freedom. But too often we forget the price that was paid to win that freedom. Sometimes only a person who has experienced tyranny can fully appreciate freedom's blessings. Such a person is the U.S. Representative to the Human Rights Commission, Richard Schifter, who briefed me today on the Commission's work.

Dick Schifter came to this country as a very young man fleeing Nazi tyranny. Many members of his family, including his father and mother, perished in the Holocaust. From bitter personal experience, Dick understands the meaning of human rights. He knows that the difference between a free and an unfree society can be the difference between life and death. And he also knows that the struggle for human rights is a solemn responsibility and a moral duty of all who love freedom.

The great struggle in the world today is not over oil or grain or territory, but over freedom. We believe every man, woman, and child on this Earth is born with God-given rights that are theirs by virtue of their humanity.

That is the American dream, and in articulating it so forcefully and effectively, Dick Schifter has become a spokeman for a more civilized world. As he prepares once again to head our delegation to the U.N. Human Rights Commission in Geneva, I wish him Godspeed and all success.

This is a special time for Chinese, Korean, and Vietnamese Americans -- a time for reflection on the accomplishments of the past year and planning for continued success in the year to come. All of us should look to the future with renewed hope, ready to dream new dreams for the betterment of all peoples.

Permit me to begin by giving every man and woman in this room my heartfelt thanks. For 3 years now, you've been giving me just what I needed -- advice at critical moments and support during some tough times and balanced judgment all the time. Howard and Dick and Ted and Paul and -- well, I'd better stop naming names, because I'll go on -- Bob Michel and Guy, Trent Lott -- all of you are among the most skilled legislators that I have ever known. And George, I believe that -- very firmly -- you're the best Vice President in our history.

Congress would never again work together to produce a program that would benefit not the special interests, but the American people. And we all remember the mess the country was in -- the soaring inflation, the high interest rates, the weakened defenses, and the loss of respect for our nation abroad. Just after the inauguration, I came across a quotation that summed it all up.

But we still have our work cut out for us. We must use our restored strength to put world peace on a more secure footing. And soon I will forward a plan based on the recommendations of the National Bipartisan Commission on Central America, just one example of how we can promote democracy in these troubled regions. And here at home we must attack the deficits and simplify the tax code and make constitutional changes like the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment. I think these are the Republican goals for 1984 and beyond.

And now let's take a moment to consider the Democrats. Tip O'Neill always complains about the way we cut taxes. But if the Democrats had been in charge, there wouldn't have been any tax cut -- none at all. They opposed the very idea of a tax cut again and again throughout the 1980 campaign. But if you look back over the years, the American people -- and maybe this campaign is a good time to remind them -- look back over the years, and you will find they aren't tax cutters at all. The tax cutting that has been done back through the years has been done by the Republican Party.

If they had been running the show, American families would still be suffering sky-high inflation and interest rates. The stock market wouldn't have set new records. The gross national product wouldn't have started growing again. And the American workers' real wages wouldn't have started climbing.

So, let's approach this election year with the high spirits and the sense of challenge that's such an important part of American politics. We can tell the people that, yes, America is back, but we're not satisfied with that. We're not resting on our laurels. Our challenge is to take freedom's next step, and this nation's future is at stake.

We all know the elections will be hard-fought and close. Since a campaign flounders without ideas or intensity, let's make certain that we take the offensive. We must challenge our opponents on the line-item veto, push them on the balanced budget amendment, and challenge them on tax simplification. We must force them to stop gathering special interest endorsements and go to the American people. And we must make it clear that they don't want to cut spending; they want to raise taxes.

I promise to do all I can to see to it that we keep the Senate and gain strength in the House. And for the sake of our cause, let's all pledge to work together in a spirit of firm unity. For the good of the country, we must win. And I'm convinced that working together, we will.

On February 1st we began the Fifty-eighth Annual Black History Month, a national celebration of the role of Black Americans in all segments of life in this nation and in Black culture around the globe.

Afro-American Life and History, Inc., Black History Month provides opportunities for our nation's schools, institutions of higher learning, and the public to gain a deeper understanding and knowlege of the diverse contributions of Black Americans to our country and the world.

As we celebrate Black History Month, 1984, let us also share a prayerful thought for the memory of Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. Dr. King was brutally gunned down by an assassin in 1968, his life cut short at the age of 39. But his leadership and devotion in the cause of human rights changed America forever. In this, the fifty-fifth year since his birth, may Black History Month be an especially meaningful and productive time for all of us.

Americans have played in building our great country. The story of black Americans is one of valor in the face of hardship. The first blacks were brought to America against their will, kidnaped by the thousands from their homelands, and when they reached our country, they encountered prejudice and servitude.

Blacks were barred from hotels and restaurants and made to use separate facilities and even forced to drink at separate water fountains. In a nation that proclaimed liberty and justice for all, too many black Americans were living with neither.

I remember some years ago, before we were freed from that kind of custom, a friend of mine telling me of having to tell his small son who couldn't understand why on a hot day he could not drink from the fountain and how his little son was crying. And hearing that story, I made up my mind then that anything I could ever do to help in seeing that no parent in this country ever again would have to tell a child they were denied something because of some difference in their complexion. And I think all of us are resolved, and we've made marvelous strides in seeing that that isn't going to happen again in this land.

In the years since, the ASALH and annual Black History Months have enriched our country by fostering a sense of pride among black Americans and by teaching all of us about black contributions to American life. And just yesterday, the U.S. Postal Service issued a Carter G.

We'll remember great black lawyers like Charles Hamilton Houston and William H. Hastie. We'll honor black physicians like Dr. Daniel Hale Williams, who performed the first open-heart surgery in the world in 1893, and physicians like Dr. Charles Drew, who discovered a method of storing blood plasma that enabled it to be used in emergencies.

Jackie Robinson, the great Hank Aaron. Here again I interject a personal note. I was a sports announcer, broadcasting major league baseball. And at that time, shamefully enough, I didn't have a Jackie Robinson or a Hank Aaron or a Willie Mays or any of the others to talk about. And there were some of us in the sports world at that time that editorialized and campaigned that that should be changed. And thank God, it has been.

We celebrate the black musicians who combined elements of African and Western music to produce something completely new and distinctly American -- jazz. And as we remember that Louis Armstrong, Duke Ellington, Lionel Hampton, and so many other black musicians began their careers playing in hotels where they were forbidden to take a room, we'll promise never to allow such injustice again.

I tell you that this Black History Month brings back a personal memory. During World War II, I narrated a film about black pilots trained at Tuskegee Institute. I remember how impressed I was by the skill and bravery of those fliers. One of those brave men was Chappie James, who went on to become a great aviator and the first black four-star general in the Air Force. And a few months ago in the Oval Office, I had the privilege, I should say, months -- moments ago, I had the privilege of presenting Tuskegee officials with a grant to help build the Chappie James Center for Aerospace Science and Health Education on the Tuskegee campus. It is a fitting monument to a true patriot.

Hero in two wars, fighter against discrimination, champion of equal opportunity, believer in personal responsibility -- Chappie wore four stars on his shoulder and 50 stars in my heart. This man, who did fight discrimination and who had the bitter memories of that, has still left words, and written words about his love for this land, for this country that should inspire every American who can read those words.

The theme of Black History Month this year is ``Black Americans and the Struggle for Excellence in Education.'' Our country's come a long way since the days when men and women were jailed for teaching blacks to read. Today black Americans are in virtually every school and university in the country, and they're breaking new ground in every field of endeavor. And black Americans, like astronauts Guy Bluford and Ronald McNair, who's blasting off in a space shuttle tomorrow, are teaching black children -- and all our children -- to really reach for the stars.

Martin Luther King and others often said that black Americans must assert a sense of their own worth. Well, this Black History Month will remind all of us that the story of black Americans adds up to just that -- a truly majestic sense of worth.

I've got one more little story I just have to tell -- dates back to World War II -- or, I'm sorry, back to Vietnam. In a warehouse there, a shipment of ammunition, a captain with his platoon in there stacking this ammunition. And the platoon was typical of our military. They were black, brown, and white. And suddenly, a box of grenades was dropped, rolling all over the floor. And the captain ordered everyone out immediately. And they fled. And then they waited -- and no explosion -- nothing had happened.

So, the captain told them all to wait, and he went back inside. And then he gingerly picked up a grenade and with scotch tape tied down the pin so that it couldn't fire -- did it to a few more -- and then called the platoon inside and told them what he had done and showed them how to do it -- and to do this to stop what could have been a terrible disaster.

He had behaved in the highest tradition of an officer of our Armed Forces. He did the dirty job that had to be done to make sure it could be done before he called his men in to do it. And I will regret forever -- I know that story, but I don't have his name. The captain was black. And, as I say, no officer has ever shown more faithfulness to the principles that should govern all officers in the military.

Prior to the President's announcement of his candidacy for reelection, various radio broadcasters were carrying his weekly Saturday morning broadcasts as a public service and also providing an opportunity for the airing of opposing views. Now that the President is a candidate, however, it has become apparent that the continued broadcast of these public service talks has caused some concern to the broadcasters because of a number of complicated questions under existing Federal communications statutes and regulations.

Although the President does not believe that his weekly talks have been partisan in nature, to avoid creating confusion and potentially cumbersome legal issues for broadcasters who wish to continue to carry the President's weekly radio talks, the President has directed his campaign committee (Reagan-Bush '84) to purchase sufficient broadcast time to ensure the continued broadcast of those talks during the period of his campaign.

Mr. Hunt. Why don't we start, if we could, sir, with a budget question. Speaker O'Neill says that your offer of a downpayment on deficit reduction is disingenuous, because you're not willing to put either your defense budget or proposed tax increases on the table. Is that so?

The President. Well, when you invite people to come in as negotiators from both sides and with varying views, there's no restriction on what can be put on the table. And everything's subject to discussion and negotiation there. What we've thought we could do in this political season, instead of going along with the thought that election years are ruled out for any kind of progress or anything, is to see if we cannot discuss the noncontentious issues and find some agreement that will whittle at this deficit.

The President. Well, if anyone -- as I say, no subject is ruled out for discussion. I feel very strongly, myself, with regard, for example, to taxes. We had a tax increase last year, premised on the idea that we were going to get three dollars in spending cuts for every dollar of increased revenue. We never got the three dollars in spending cuts. We think we're owed something.

Mr. Bartley. Mr. President, in drawing up the budget you've obviously made an explicit decision not to ask for very much in the way of cuts -- only $5 billion, I think. Can you tell us why you didn't do more?

The President. Yes, it's pretty much the cuts we got last year. And we discussed this at great length. We know there are more cuts, and we know we need more cuts. But rather than polarize and have no result, we've come in with about, as I say, those cuts that we didn't get.

And, again, the noncontentious ideas -- to see if we can come together in a bipartisan package for the Congress, and we think that there are more cuts than we have put in there. But we know that if we had done everything that we thought we could get, we couldn't get it. Not when the voices we were getting from the opposition were calling for more spending even than we've suggested in this budget.

Mr. Bartley. Could we look forward to what might happen in a second term? When this budget was released, Dave Stockman was talking about structural reforms and tough bullets to bite. If you're reelected, would you try to reduce the big middle-class entitlements? And if so, what would be the prime targets?

The President. Well, yes, I've read something about supposedly the middle class and their entitlements. I don't think we've aimed anything at any class or any group. This misconception that has been quite a drumbeat from -- resulted from the drumbeat from the other side, that somehow we've penalized the poor and the needy -- we are taking care of more people, better, and spending more on this than any other -- well, than any time in our previous history. And so, we don't think that any of our economic program has penalized particularly those people at the lower level.

In California, we succeeded with the most comprehensive welfare reforms that have ever been attempted in this country. We saved there at a State level $2 billion for the taxpayers. We were able to increase the grants to the needy by 43 percent. And they hadn't had -- this was in 1971 and '2 -- they hadn't had a raise in their grant since 1958, in spite of all of the inflation.

Now, I guess what I'm saying is that everytime over the years that people have tried to curb government spending, those who defend it -- the special interest groups -- have come back and said, all right, what program do you want to do without? Well, that is a trap that no one should let themselves get pulled into.

Maybe there are some programs that government shouldn't be performing or conducting -- if so, why those should be eliminated whether there's a deficit or not simply because then there's something that's a needless expense. But, basically, government has some programs that are government's legitimate function. What those of us who have advocated savings are saying is, government can be run more efficiently and more economically than it has been run. And I think we've proved that in the cuts so far.

The President. No, in a political season, I have some idea of what's going to happen in the politicizing the things of that kind. We had an example. It had to do with a program that needed reforming because the program was going broke in 1981, would have been broke by 1983. In 1982, because we suggested correcting that and preventing bankruptcy of the program, nothing was done. We were kicked from every side. And it became the political issue of 1982. But after the election of 1982, a bipartisan group came together and came in with a plan that restored fiscal integrity to that program.

Now, this is pretty much what we have in mind now. Let us deal now with the less contentious issues that can further reduce this present deficit as we have estimated, say, by a hundred billion dollars over the next 3 years -- knowing that that is not enough; we must go farther. On the other hand, I don't think that the score is in yet on the half of the deficit which is caused cyclically by the recession.

Our economic program and reforms, first of all, on reducing spending have been implemented less than half of what we proposed. But on the tax program -- and as I say, we compromised a year ago and gave those who demanded that, a chunk, I think, of what they were asking for -- but we haven't really felt for a long enough period the full impact of what the tax cuts that we've made have done.

The President. If we're talking about the increase in the money supply, right now I am. I am not going to deny that there have been volatile changes in that in the past and that there has been a period in which they fell below even their own track, and in which the string was pulled too tightly on the money supply which, I think, had an effect on the interest rates not coming down after they had started to come down several stages.

I have to say that the monetary policy has certainly been most helpful in getting a handle on inflation, from double digits down to 3.2 for last year. But now I do know that they are in their track, that they have deemed is, and is apparently, pretty much in the context of our growth, what our requirements are.

Mr. Hunt. Let's look ahead for a minute. Some people on Wall Street worry that the Fed might ease too much, that it might rekindle a burst of inflation by the end of the year. On the other hand, some of your allies, like Congressman Jack Kemp, have said, no, that the problem is just the opposite; they're going to tighten up too much. They should focus on bringing interest rates down. Which do you think is the greatest concern if you look 6, 7 months ahead?

The President. I think either one of them is wrong. Let me point something out. If we had a chart here in front of us of the increase in the money supply between '79, 1980: the steepest increase in the money supply in the history of this country and double-digit inflation for 2 years in a row, interest rates, the prime rate at 21\1/2\. At one point inflation touched 19 percent here in this country. And then, realizing -- and that chart, if we were looking at it, would have a peak going up like that.

Mr. Bartley. And yet at the same time you're saying the Soviets are violating existing arms treaties. And we don't seem to be able to do very much about it. Do you think it might be misleading to let people believe that this kind of negotiation on this kind of a treaty is going to solve any of our problems?

The President. Yes, we said that this only strengthens our position of insisting that a major part of any future treaties must be verification, the ability to verify whether the treaties are being kept.

The President. Well, we call them to the attention -- and have -- to the Soviet Union. But, as I say, I think that in the negotiations that we hope will resume, that this is our evidence as to why we're justified in seeking full verification.

Mr. Bartley. You've proposed a big research program for what everyone calls a Star Wars missile defense. Do you agree that actually deploying that kind of a system would require the renunciation of the SALT I treaty? And are you ready to do that, if you have to?

The President. My ambition, or my dream, for -- if there is a defensive weapon -- you see, here's a new weapon in the world and for the first time it is a weapon that has no defense against it, except deterrence, that we each have it. It's like two fellows with a gun pointed at each other, both of them cocked and both with their fingers on the trigger, and we're going to stand, spend the rest of our life doing that.

Well, I feel that way very definitely. And I think that the -- my hope is that if we can continue, resume the negotiations with regard to nuclear weapons -- we are going to; the date is set for the MBFR negotiations -- but the others, that starting down that road, everyone will see the wisdom of total elimination.

Mr. Hunt. Mr. President, let me just try one more arms control question. I remember being with you time and time again in 1980, in which you basically argued that the reason we had to build up our defenses was to persuade the Soviets that it was futile for them to think that they could outdo us in this area and that if we built up our defenses, that sooner or later the Soviets would realize this and out of self-interest they would become more reasonable.

The President. Well, I think that what we're seeing is a part of negotiations. And I think that what we've accomplished here is what I had talked about. And I said then, also in that campaign over and over again, that I would stay at a table -- well, meaning our country, our negotiators stay at a table as long as was necessary to bring about a reduction in arms.

The SALT treaties -- and the reason I've never been enthusiastic about them, they were simply trying to set caps on how many more you could have. And I was shocked when a knowledgeable person in that field told me shortly after I arrived in this office, that had we ratified SALT II, under the terms of that treaty, the Soviet Union would have been able to add the equivalent of the megatonnage that we dropped on Hiroshima -- every 11 minutes since the treaty was ratified.

They didn't have to demand that we eliminate a B - 1 bomber. Even without going to a negotiating table we canceled it. And we were doing this with weapons. We were reducing our Navy. We were unilaterally disarming. Now, it seemed to me that the only way that we were going to convince them that common sense called for reduction of arms was to build our own defenses to where we had a deterrent capacity, but to make it evident that we were going to maintain a deterrent policy. They would then have to look and say, how much would they have to build to try and get a sufficient advantage over us, and I don't think they can. And I think then they know that. They know the industrial might of this nation.

Mr. Hunt. Let me turn you to Lebanon, if I may, sir. As you know, House Speaker O'Neill provided the crucial support for the bipartisan consensus on the war powers resolution 3 months ago. He now says that your policy in Lebanon is a failure. The House next week is expected to pass a resolution which would call on you to bring the marines home. How are you going to respond to that?

The President. Well, I'm going to respond that he may be ready to surrender, but I'm not. As long as there is a chance for peace, the mission remains the same. And the very fact that since, along about last August, for the first year that they were there -- and it's not just the marines; there is a multinational force -- we have three allied powers who feel as strongly as we do who are in there.

The multinational force was sent in at a time when Lebanon, after years of civil war, literally in which there virtually was no government -- certainly they did not have authority over their own territory -- the Israelis, because of the threats to their northern border and the actual assaults on their northern border, had finally advanced and gone all the way to the edge of Beirut. The PLO, with its terrorist bands, was widespread throughout the country. They were less refugees than they were an occupying force. The Syrians had moved in for their own purposes. Beirut was the battlefield. The casualties were mainly civilian.

The idea was, and I had proposed, that we take up where Camp David left off and try to bring about overall peace through negotiations between the Arab nations and Israel. You couldn't do that as long as this situation prevailed in Lebanon. The idea was that if the other international forces or the other countries could be made to withdraw, then the Lebanese Government would have to have the authority and then have the military capability of taking over the areas previously occupied by these other forces, but which now would be in the hands of the same militant Lebanese forces who had been in a state of civil war -- and that the multinational force would be a stabilizing force while Lebanon strengthened itself and then moved out to do this.

When we went in, the understanding was that both Israel and Syria had agreed that they would withdraw, both saying, when the other -- we will withdraw together. The PLO had been taken out, removed from the country. Great progress was made. With the removal of the PLO, the Israelis signed an agreement and have already made phased withdrawals back toward their own border, Syria, for whatever reason of their own, reneged and has now said they won't withdraw.

Mr. Hunt. President Assad yesterday was quoted as saying you have two choices. He said, you either have to increase, you have to escalate the number of troops over there, or you have to get them out. Is that pretty much the size of the dilemma, do you think?

The President. Well, what he was really admitting was the fact that they reneged because Syria is bent on territorial conquest. It wants Lebanon, or a large part thereof, to be Syria. They are an occupying force, in violation of what they had previously agreed to.

We have been equipping them. They are, really, a first rate military force. They don't have the numbers yet. By April, however, there'll be double the number of brigades that they presently have. Of course, Syria's got some 57,000 armed -- or military -- on Lebanese soil. But as long as there is a chance for victory, for peace, I don't know of any of the multinational forces that are in there, the four nations in there, that are desirous of leaving.

We are not just sitting here with our fingers crossed. We are studying and planning on where we can be more effective and where we can resist, because -- as I started to say a moment ago about last August -- the terrorist attacks that are being leveled against the multinational forces are being leveled because of the success of this plan. And now they want to drive us out because they can't recognize their territorial ambitions as long as we're there.

Mr. Hunt. You mentioned the terrorist attacks, sir. You said after the Beirut attack last October -- your administration said bascially that it appeared to be the fault of the Iranians, abetted by the Syrians, and that -- I believe you used the term, or the administration used the term -- those who directed this atrocity must be dealt justice, and they will be. My question is, why haven't you retaliated? And do you plan to?

The President. No, but let me say this also with regard to that. Enough civilians have been the targets in this war. It is true that these terrorist groups and the Syrians and others and the Druze make use of civilians and launch their assaults by rocket or artillery or whatever from civilian enclaves and residential areas where to fire back you are a threat to civilian targets.

On the matter of the terrible tragedy and the terrorist group, we set out with the best ability we had of reconnaissance and intelligence to make sure that we could locate the perpetrators, their stronghold, so that we would not just be killing somebody without knowing who in revenge, you might say, whether they had anything to do with the dastardly deed or not. And we had some feelings that we had located, but there was additional information we wanted that the people involved were still there. And someone else evidently knew more than we did or was not as careful as we were and took that target out before we could get to it. It was as simple as that.

The President. Well, unless we continue trying to the best of our ability intelligence-wise to get evidence on the locale of these-type terrorists and where they might be. And we have, as I said the other night in my speech, we are contacting our own allies and friends worldwide as to how we can together combat this new kind of warfare.

The President. Well, that's going to depend a lot on what kind of a government and what kind of policies he follows. We are determined -- and I think George Shultz and, before him, Vice President Bush, who brought a letter from me down there expressing my views, and then expressed his own and very forcefully and appropriately, that made it plain, we have very definite feelings about the violence and the violation of human rights, whether from the left or right.

I think the thing that we have to recognize, though, is that the left and the right are literally together on their goals. The guerrillas -- we know what they're after, the destruction of a democratic government, the first such government that, I think, that country's had in 400 years.

But those from the right who are opposed to the democratic principles and policies that this government is implementing, they have the same goal as the left. They're trying to destroy that same democratic government.

Mr. Hunt. Mr. President, I would never ignore Larry Speakes, I promise you. But before we go, I just want to ask you quickly one, somewhat different question. And that is about women. We're all sort of products of our environment. And occasionally when you have made references to ``gals'' or something like that, it's tended to offend women, particularly younger women. Has that surprised you?

The President. I think to the extent that things that we've had and that actually are even affectionate terms, and that are not meant in any derogatory manner, are suddenly seized upon by, let's say, certain factions as being violations now of what they believe must be the new acceptance. Well, I always have accepted women, frankly.

When I was assailed by that one woman in the businesswomen's meeting over there for my story about us and what we might do, I wasn't joking. I really meant it. I think they have and are a magnificent civilizing influence. But I also think you can't look around the world and -- their belief that women can be entrusted with certain professions and jobs that they have never or not often had before does not surprise me.

The President. No, because she knows how I feel. But, really, this is -- I think, it's like lacking a sense of balance or humor for some people to get so imbued with something that they set standards that are a little extreme.

Before discussing the positive initiative that we'll propose for the region of Central America, I'd like to share some wonderful news with you. We have just learned that total unemployment has dropped to 7.9 percent, and another 250,000 Americans found jobs last month. Now, I'm just beginning to wonder if the best thing we could do for Central America would be to export our own economic recovery program. [Laughter] But I think, in a way, that's what we're talking about.

As I was about to say, in the coming days we'll send legislation to the Congress based on a remarkable bipartisan consensus of the National Bipartisan Commission on Central America. And I urge prompt congressional action and support.

The distinguished Americans who served on that Commission have performed a great service to all Americans. All of us -- when I say all Americans -- all of us from Point Barrow to Tierra del Fuego. Henry Kissinger and the Commission members and senior counselors: My appreciation for a tough job well done.

Our proposed legislation, the Central America democracy, peace, and development initiative act, is based on the Commission's analysis and embodies its recommendations, and it's in the spirit of Senator Jackson who first proposed the idea of a bipartisan commission and served until his death as one of its senior counselors. He represented something very special in American politics. Scoop Jackson stood for national security and human rights because he knew that one without the other is meaningless. He said what he believed and stuck to it with vision, integrity, and grace.

The legislation does not offer a quick fix to the crisis in Central America; there is none. Our plan offers a comprehensive program to support democratic development, improve human rights, and bring peace to this troubled region that's so close to home.

The approach is right. It includes a mix of developmental, political, diplomatic, and security initiatives, equitably and humanely pursued. We either do them all, or we jeopardize the chance for real progress in the region. The plan responds to decades of inequity and indifference through its support of democracy, reform, and human freedom. It responds to the economic challenges of the region.

To support the security of the region's threatened nations, the legislaton will provide $515 million over the next 2 years. At the same time, it will require semiannual reports to the Congress assessing El Salvadoran policies for achieving political and economic development and conditions of security.

To support dialog and negotiations both among the countries of the region and within each country, the legislation provides guidance for cooperation with the Central American countries in establishing, then working with, the Central American Development Organization.

Our plan is for the long haul. It won't be easy, and it won't be cheap. But it can be done. And for strategic and moral reasons, it must be done. I ask the Congress to study the Commission report and to give our legislative proposal its urgent attention and bipartisan support. It is not an impossible dream. We have the resources to do it. This initiative serves the interest of the United States and of the Western Hemisphere. The beleaguered people in Central America want our help.

Congress, members of the diplomatic community, and administration officials. Prior to his remarks, the President met in the Cabinet Room with the bipartisan congressional leaders to discuss the proposed initiative.

Now, before I say anything else, I want to give you my heartfelt thanks for all the time and effort that each of you has given to the cause that unites us. When all is said and done, what really counts is drive and energy and determination. And that's what makes it possible to put our beliefs into practice. It's you, officeholders in communities throughout our land, who demonstrate the deep Republican commitment to American women.

Women have increasingly taken on new roles in society, and the Republican Party has given them solid support. It was the GOP that gave its backing to women's sufferage. And then our party became the first to elect a woman to the United States Congress -- and I think I'm indebted to Maureen for a little research on this -- and that was before women were allowed to vote. And we're the only party ever to elect women to the United States Senate who were not first just filling out an unexpired term.

